<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1082</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Travel: Tumble-dried through desert landscapes - Fleeing the
charmless tourist island of Jerba, Sara Webb heads west into the Tunisian
Sahara, to a land of dancing butterflies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WAS the writer and traveller Paul Bowles who said there are probably few
accessible places on the face of the globe where you can get less comfort
for your money than the Sahara. For a man who loved North Africa, Bowles
could be damning about the amenities: 'You can still get something flat to
lie down on, stewed turnips and sand, noodles and jam, and a few tendons of
something euphemistically called chicken to eat, and the stub of a candle to
undress by at night, but you will pay heavily for these luxuries. . .
perhaps the logical question to ask at this point is: why go?'
One reason for going might be to get away from a charmless coastal resort
such as Jerba, I thought. The island off the Tunisian coast is one of many
claiming to be the setting for the lotus eaters. Today, Ulysses' sailors
would be only too pleased to escape the identical mock village hotels
swarming with pale-skinned tourists in fuschia shellsuits.
Much has changed since Bowles travelled through the desert. He entered
Tunisia in the pre-independence days with two camels and a long-suffering
camel driver who ran back and forth between them, attempting to force the
recalcitrant beasts to move in a straight line while trying to tend to some
knitting which hung around his neck.
Today, you find electricity and air-conditioned hotel rooms. You journey
across the desert in a cloud of dust and fine sand kicked up by a Jeep. It
is a far less romantic way to travel, and less comfortable than the slow
lolloping stride of a camel. The fine sand steals into every crevice of your
clothing, lodges in your eyelashes and rasps against your teeth. The
Tunisians say it is so fine it can slip unnoticed beneath the sealed cap of
a fizzy drink bottle.
You jolt from bump to hollow, tumble-dried through a succession of different
desert landscapes: from the pink and gold mountains around Mides and Tamerza
near the Algerian border, to the barren salt flats of the Chott El Jerid
that sparkle with crystallised salt and dancing butterflies as jittery as
the mirages; from the scrub-topped yellow hillocks around Douz until you
reach the real desert, the picture-book desert of dunes near Ksar Ghilane
which belong to the Great Eastern Erg.
From a distance, the village of Ksar Ghilane was a splash of green set
against a parched backdrop of sand. Close up, a scummy tideline of old
plastic mineral water bottles and other rubbish marked the outskirts of the
settlement. Hobbled camels and donkeys tethered outside the concrete
bungalows snuffled among the detritus for edible leftovers. It looked a
dump. But behind the palm trees lay a sea of rolling dunes as stippled and
striated as a Bridgit Riley canvas - gold, tawny, and slowly reddening in
the setting sun.
We set out on camelback to see the old Roman fortress and, as dusk fell, the
camel drivers briefly dropped on their knees, backs to the setting sun, and
prayed to Allah. Within an hour, the clear sky was peppered with hundreds of
stars, flashing and shooting in small bursts across the blackness, and
blinking through my tent-flap long after the candles had burnt out.
After the dust and dirt and blow-torch brightness of the desert, it is a
relief to drive up to the shade of an oasis. Frogs splash around in the
waterfalls and are probably the most active of the oasis inhabitants during
the heat of the day.
We stumbled across one of the date farmers in the village of Chebika, and he
obligingly climbed a palm tree to pluck us some fruit. The ripening orange
dates hung like heavy earrings below a spiky punkish halo of palm fronds,
some wrapped in sheets of plastic to save them from rain damage and animals.
Beneath, the pomegranates, figs and oranges grew in disorderly profusion. Of
the 140 or so varieties of dates grown in Tunisia, the ones from the desert
oases are said to be the best, but these ones tasted sour and unripe. The
fruit is eaten or sold at the local market; in the past, the tree trunks and
fronds were used to make the local houses, forming beams and thatching. But
heavy rains and flash floods easily sweep away the flimsy buildings, and
today some of the oasis dwellers prefer to live in concrete bungalows, with
tiny windows to keep out the heat.
Once the sun's heat starts to wane, the people come outdoors to chat and
stroll in the main street. At least, the men do. Even though Tunisia is one
of the more westernised Islamic countries, outside the big cities you might
as well be in a single-sex country. Women, if they venture out, are shrouded
in swathes of black cloth with not so much as an eyeslit to tell you in
which direction they are facing.
The men sip coffee in the street bars, or order the waiter to bring them a
long-necked hookah to smoke in the evening calm. In the palmeries, two male
trees are planted for every harem of 100 females. But in the streets, men
far out-number women.
Sara Webb travelled c/o Tunis Air (24 Sackville St, London W1X 1DE, tel:
071-734-7644). The Tunisian National Tourist Office is at 77a Wigmore St,
London W1H 9LJ, 071-224-5561. Tunis Air flies from London Heathrow to Tunis
on Fridays, Sundays and Tuesdays. If you want to visit the desert oases, you
can fly from Tunis to Tozeur and then hire a Jeep and driver-guide.
The tourist office in Tozeur should be able to recommend an agent if you
want to arrange your own trip to the desert oases. It is better to take a
Jeep and experienced driver - ordinary passenger cars are not suitable for
rough desert terrain. Alternatively, you can join a group; many of the
hotels in towns like Tozeur and Douz arrange trips to the desert.
As always, accommodation ranges from the very comfortable (Hotel Tamerza
Palace, for example) to the basic (the camping site at Ksar Ghilane).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1083</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Travel: A white, white Christmas - Skiing / Arnold Wilson
reports on what looks like being a vintage year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARNOLD WILSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HOWITZER shells and dynamite exploded outside my hotel before dawn, rattling
the windows and, in the darkness, conjuring up images of some war-torn
trouble spot. But this was neither Bosnia nor Beirut, but the 'Bird'. And
the enemy was snow: too much of it for comfort, but enough to make skiers
ecstatic. Downstairs in the lobby of the huge, futuristic Cliff Lodge Hotel
in Snowbird, Utah, was a sign with big red lettering reading: 'Danger of
avalanches. It is illegal to leave the building'.
Much to the delight of skiers on both sides of the Atlantic, December has
turned out to be a vintage month for snow. Skiers were knee-deep in fresh
powder during the traditional curtain-raiser to the season in Val d'Isere,
the criterium de la premiere neige. Austria has had one of the best starts
to the season for years, with good snow everywhere, to depths of 3.5 metres.
Marion Telsnig at the Austrian Tourist Office says some skiers are already
reporting the best skiing they have ever experienced. The Swiss are also
confident of a good season but in Italy, the snow is a little patchy and so
far no one is using superlatives.
In California, where there is officially a drought, an unprecedented 38
inches of snow fell in a day in Kirkwood, south of Lake Tahoe. So much snow
fell in Snowbird and neighbouring Alta that the road through Little
Cottonwood Canyon down to Salt Lake City - notorious for avalanches - was
closed all night until it was made safe by blasting.
On the mountain, supplies of second world war shells for avalanche control
are running low, so the resort is now using shells left over from the Korean
war at Dollars 100 a go, and working on a new system using compressed air
which will cost only Dollars 10 a blast.
Even in Colorado, somewhat jealous of the major early snowstorms hitting
California, Utah and even Vermont, snow was falling steadily during the
party to celebrate the opening night (at last) of the town's biggest and
most controversial hotel, the Ritz Carlton. A layer of fresh powder formed
on the 12-ft tall bronze statue of a bull elk standing guard outside -
nicknamed 'Fritzy' - which was officially unveiled before the celebrations
began.
Dawn revealed an Aspen mountain full of powder and few skiers, celebrities
or otherwise, to take advantage of it. We were able to help ourselves to run
after run, unhindered by the madding crowd, making fresh tracks almost at
will.
There is even enough snow left in New Zealand to enable skiing to continue
here and there until Christmas. Many resorts in Europe and America are
assured not only of a white Christmas but one of the best for skiing in
years.
The lure of the Rockies continues to entice some Europeans away from their
own backyard. For a group of Belgian, German and Dutch ski club executives,
the first taste of skiing this winter was in Colorado, where two more
Europeans - Franz Klammer and Franz Weber - were holding a ski clinic in
Copper Mountain.
Weber, six times world speed skiing champion in the '80s, now lives in Reno.
His fellow Austrian Klammer - the darling of Innsbruck and Kitzbuhel - is a
regular visitor to Colorado. For those of us attending the clinic, it was
fantasy time. The man skiing at more than 50 miles per hour in front of us
down a trail called Oh No] - whom I was trying to keep in my sights like a
Spitfire pilot on the tail of a Messerschmidt - is the most successful
downhill racer of all time. I had waited for this moment since 1976, when
the most celebrated of his 25 downhill victories at Igls in the Innsbruck
Olympics astonished the skiing world.
Right now, Klammer seemed to be trying to relive the experience, although he
was putting in a few turns. Any other skier in any other resort would
probably have had his lift pass taken away. 'Did you do as many turns as I
did?' he asks at the bottom of the mountain.
'No Franz,' I replied wimpishly. 'Why not?' 'Because you are almost 10 years
younger than me.' 'No excuses]' he says. Now approaching 40, Klammer looks
as good as ever. He and Weber are helping us with race techniques.
'Even if you win, you should never be satisfied,' says Klammer. 'You should
always want to have skied it faster. You should say to yourself: 'Dammit,
that wasn't good enough.' Don't slide so much. You must carve your turns
more. When you have crossed the fall line, you should be able to see your
tracks behind you. If there are no tracks, your skis are sliding too much.'
Klammer still races against other former champions. Recently, he was
fighting it out in Utah against the likes of Bill Johnston (whom he called
'nose-picker' when he won the Olympic gold medal in Sarajevo in 1984.)
'Of course, I try to keep in touch with new skiing trends as I get older,'
he says. 'But you know, skiing has not changed fundamentally since I learnt
to ski with leather boots, cable bindings and no edges. When I was a boy,
only racers had edges. But even today, you still have to stay on the middle
of your skis.
'In the old days, it was more difficult. Soft leather boots didn't support
you and you had to find your own middle. Nowadays the boot does it for you,
and today's skis are built to turn on their own, once you apply pressure to
your edges. That's why you get more knee injuries than you used to. If for
some reason the ski failed to turn, the weakest part of your body will turn
instead - your knees]' And with that he was off, steaming down the mountain
as if his knees were bionic. Klammer will be home for Christmas. Colorado
powder or not, he plans to enjoy some of the local variety in his native
Carinthia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1084</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Minding Your Own Business: Shopkeeper who drove his Rolls to
the brink - The bank told Kingsley Maine to sell his yacht and his car. He
ignored their advice
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By COLIN PRESDEE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN 1960, when Kingsley Maine was working as a carpenter in the police
headquarters in Bridgend, he spent his two weeks' summer holidays running a
small general provisions store.
It was a typical, 1950s suburban shop with hardly any stock and run by an
ageing widow. Maine increased the stock range by borrowing from his father's
post office four miles away, and boosted the turnover from the average
Pounds 50 to Pounds 120 in his first week. At the end of the second week, he
resigned his job, borrowed Pounds 3,000 from Barclays, guaranteed by his
father, and bought the business, which included a flat above the shop.
Thirty years on, Maine has five stores. Their annual turnover will be about
Pounds 6m this year. He has survived competition from the supermarket
chains, in spite of being written off by a bank in the mid-1980s.
His two sons provide the family backing that has enabled the company to
expand and streamline its operation in a fiercely competitive market.
The business has gone full-circle from a convenience store, through the
traumas of competition through price cutting, and back to convenience
trading, but with extended hours. The shops are open 8am to 10pm, 364 days a
year.
In 1963, after three years living in the flat above the first shop, the
Maines were able to move to a nearby house. Takings were around Pounds 1,000
a week, allowing them a more comfortable lifestyle. The move left space for
the shop to expand and become one of the first self-service shops in the
area.
With a further five years' confident trading behind him, and with an eye to
expansion, Maine paid a deposit on a car showroom on the other side of the
town. The bank was unimpressed with the development plan, considering it a
poor location, but after much persuasion, Maine gained the cash.
He joined Spar, the wholesale supply chain, to take advantage of its
purchasing power and promotions and developed the 3,000 sq ft shop into a
main food retailer, with self-service and four checkouts. Soon it was
selling more than 40 sides of bacon a week and, in 10 years, the turnover
built up to over Pounds 20,000 a week.
He attempted to repeat the formula in nearby Porthcawl, but the store there
struggled on turnover of just Pounds 3,000 a week, rarely covering
overheads. This time the location was wrong. Business livened up only in the
blizzard of 1978 when the town was cut off. The store was sold in 1981,
never having made a profit. But a further venture in 1972 in the
densely-populated Sandfields area in Aberavon was successful and profitable.
By 1982, Maine's lifestyle included a Rolls Royce, a sea-front house in
exclusive Rest Bay, Porthcawl, and a motor yacht in St Tropez. All this was
threatened when competition arrived. The International Group, under the name
Mainstock, opened the largest in-town food store in Britain, just a few
hundred yards away from Maine's chief store in Bridgend.
Weekly turnover in Bridgend slumped overnight from more than Pounds 20,000
to less than Pounds 12,000. The story was similar in Aberavon.
Maine's shops had become outdated, and at his own admission, a mess. 'We
were overstocked in many departments, many lines were being sold at minimal
profit, it was clear that a major shake up was necessary for survival. But
we were determined to come through it.'
The initial Spar Driver scheme which offered lines at very low prices was a
disaster and cut margins even further. Maine started monitoring stock
levels. The results directed the next move away from food and into more
profitable lines such as video tapes, drinks, and disposable household
goods. This was coupled with extended hours and Sunday trading.
Although the signs of recovery were evident, it took five years to produce a
good set of accounts again. During this time, Maine's Barclays bank manager
of 25 years retired, and competition from the multiples intensified.
This prompted a curt letter from the newly-installed bank manager, declaring
that it was impossible to compete with chains such as Tesco and Sainsbury.
'Sell the Rolls and the boat, and think about a smaller house,' was the only
advice offered.
Fortunately, the view was different from the National Westminster branch
across the road. It had watched Maine for many years, and his accountant,
Bill Mace, who had a long experience with shopkeepers, persuaded NatWest to
take over the account.
Maine's development programme for his shops was able to continue. Much of
the finance came from the local Spar wholesaler Capper and Co, which
arranged favourable leasing deals for modernising the stores.
By the late 1980s, a system of bar-code scanning was installed which
analysed each line by volume, profitability and shelf allocation.
Professional stock and internal controls facilitated by efficient
computerisation helped the company return to profitability. The link with
Capper strengthened, and Maine now buys nearly 90 per cent of all goods from
it.
Such loyalty has shown great benefits this year with the 'purchase' of a
further large store in the Uplands area of Swansea. Here the Spar formula
had worked well in spite of the shoddy presentation of the well-located
store.
Capper bought the business from the previous owners for around Pounds
500,000 and has licensed it back to Maine, who will purchase it over the
first two years, with an opportunity to buy the freehold later.
The full Maine team, including Kingsley's wife Wendy, his daughter Lian and
his sons Julian, Christopher and their wives, has set about revamping the
new acquisition.
'We now have very sophisticated computerised systems and can produce
management accounts within days after each quarter. We are far better placed
to meet the price competition of the 1990s which is already most evident,'
said Maine.
Six months on, trade at the new shop is up 10 per cent, and Maine is buying
Pounds 100,000 of goods a week from Capper.
Six years after the move to NatWest, the business is showing a gross trading
profit of 19 per cent on a Pounds 6m turnover. Maine still has the same
Rolls, boat and house. He takes six weeks' holiday a year, but otherwise
works every day and is in the Swansea shop each Sunday morning.
KD Maine 14-16 Ewenny Road, Bridgend, Mid Glamorgan, tel: 0656-655373
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1085</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Computing: Pegasus prepares to fly once more - Advances in
accounting software
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CARTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MOMENTOUS events are taking place in the world of accounting software.
The undisputed market leader in the early and mid-'80s, Pegasus, has in
recent years been going nowhere. Pegasus produced a string of products, some
good, some bad, all marginal, while its neglected core product Pegasus
Senior came to look increasingly long in the tooth. Pegasus shares fell
sharply recently when their chief executive departed after only six months
in office.
Contrast this with the performance of Sage which, starting from nothing in
the mid-80s, has had a record of unbroken success. It now claims 80 per cent
of the UK market for integrated accounts packages and the title of 'the
world's number one in accounting software'. Last month a Pounds 400,000
advertising campaign heralded the release of its new product Sterling +2 -
'a revolution in accounting software'.
But maybe things are not quite what they seem. The crucial decision
determining Pegasus's future was made in October when the company announced
that it had purchased the rights to Sequel, a package written by former
Pegasus directors Johnie Johnson and Chris Leak.
I tried Sequel earlier this year when only the ledgers and sales order
processing modules were complete, but it was enough to see that this is a
super product with a real 1990s look and an ideal successor to Senior.
Pegasus are going through a torrid time, but I think it has found a winner.
On the Sage front, I have been evaluating Sterling +2 over the last few
weeks. Reluctantly, I have to say that I found this package a terrible
disappointment. The sales and purchase order processing modules are totally
inadequate.
The invoicing module is one of the 'batch update' type that other companies
stopped writing years ago. It will let you enter and print off sales
invoices for an out-of-stock item all day long without a word of complaint,
but when at the end of the day you try to update your batch of 20 or 30
invoices to the ledgers it refuses to accept them because you did not have
any stock]
Any modern-day invoicing package warns you that you are out of stock
immediately you try to enter the invoice.
And has no one at Sage ever heard of invoicing from a product price file?
Unbelievable. Outside the accounting ledgers Sterling +2 is an antique.
But, to be realistic, accounting ledgers (sales, purchase, nominal) is what
most users want, so these wounds, though severe, need not be mortal. Sage
seems to have made a good job on the ledgers. Invoices are fully analysed to
the nominal; financial transactions can be retained live all year, and there
is a particularly comprehensive analysis of VAT for the quarterly VAT
return.
However, where Sterling +2 really is revolutionary is in the 'user
interface'. Sage believes that the future lies in the graphical user
interface ('GUI', as in treacle) and they have implemented the WIMP
(Windows, Icons, Mouse, Pointer) environment in both DOS and Windows
versions of Sterling +2.
In this they are taking a tremendous risk, since probably not one bookkeeper
in a hundred is familiar with the GUI way of doing things. I think Sage
would have been wiser to make it clear to prospective purchasers that
Sterling +2, in either version, is really only suitable for experienced
mouse users.
I ran the DOS version through the keyboard alone, but found it heavy going.
My guess is that, neither mouse-trained nor warned of what to expect, many
bookkeepers will simply hate the new Sage.
So, with Sage wandering into the bogs of GUI land, what is the alternative
for the non-mouse user?
Without doubt, the real shooting star in the accounts package market these
days is TAS Books from Megatech. Launched late last year at the give-away
price of Pounds 99 to the accompanyment of heavy advertising in the PC
magazines, TAS Books now claims 17 per cent of the market.
TAS books was endorsed by the Institute of Chartered Accountants, 'editor's
choice' in this's month's PC Magazine. It is currently on a roll and sales
have shot up from zero to 700 units a month.
Theo van Dort, the founder and designer, believes he has a mission to show
PC users how easy double-entry accounting really is, so TAS Books comes with
a comprehensive 242-page tutorial that takes you through worked examples of
all the major postings. It is really excellent. Here at last is an
entry-level accounts package of high technical quality which can be
recommended unreservedly both to accountant and to non-accountant alike.
TAS Books costs Pounds 99 single user, Pounds 199 multi-user. Megatech are
on 081-874-6511.
David Carter is a consultant in small business computer systems, tel
0727-812447.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1086</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (Briefcase): How to work out that CGT
bill
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR SOME time, I have been buying investment trust shares through a savings
scheme, but I don't know how to calculate liability for capital gains tax
when I come to sell them.
Suppose I have a given number of shares. The older half was bought when the
market was low and the newer half was bought at a dearer price. I sell half
the shares. Have I sold the old cheap ones or the new dear ones?
If you have been buying the shares monthly (starting after the end of the
tax year 1984-85), then this is what you do.
1. Multiply the cost of the first month's purchase by the RPI for the second
month, and divide the answer by the RPI for the first month (unless the RPI
for the second month is lower than that for the first month - in which case,
you simply leave the cost unaltered).
2. Now add the cost of the second month's purchase.
3. Multiply the total by the RPI for the third month and divide the answer
by the RPI for the second month (unless the third month's RPI is lower than
the second month's - in which case you leave the total unaltered).
4. Now add the cost of the third month's purchase and continue in the same
way as before, month by month, up to the last purchase before the sale
(provided that the sale took place at least 10 days after that last
purchase: see * below).
5. Multiply the total by the RPI for the month of the sale and divide the
answer by the RPI for the month of the last purchase (unless the RPI for the
sale month is lower than the RPI for the month of the last purchase - or, of
course, unless the sale took place in the same month as the last purchase).
6. If you have sold half the shares, then you simply subtract half the total
from the proceeds of the sale: the answer is your chargeable gain or your
allowable loss. If you have sold a third of the shares, you take a third of
the total, of course, and so on.
(Between April 1985 and October 1992, these are the months whose RPI was
lower than the previous month's: July and September 1985, June and July
1986, July and December 1987, November and December 1990, July 1991, and
January and July 1992).
*If the sale took place in the nine days after the last purchase (or, by
chance, on the same day as that last purchase), then the shares which you
sold are treated as coming primarily out of the last purchase (and there is
no indexation relief on the cost of that last purchase). The balance of the
shares sold come out of the indexed pool, which is calculated along the
lines set out above - except that in paragraphs 4 and 5, 'last purchase'
should be read as 'penultimate purchase.'
If you have been buying the shares quarterly, or at some other interval, the
'second month' and 'third month' in paragraphs 1 to 4 above should read as
'the month of the second purchase' and 'the month of the third purchase.'
There is an alternative way of doing the calculations, so we suggest you
write to the Inland Revenue Public Enquiry Room, Somerset House, Strand,
London WC2R 1LB, and ask for a copy of SP3/89 (Unit trust and investment
trust monthly savings schemes). The alternative method is too complex to be
explained in this necessarily brief reply, unfortunately: SP 3/89 runs to 28
paragraphs.
You could also ask your own tax office for the free pamphlets CGT13 (The
indexation allowance for quoted shares) and CGT16 (Indexation allowance:
disposals after April 5, 1988).
If your first purchase was made before April 6 1985, the initial
calculations are a little more complex than the rule set out in paragraph 1
above, but the pamphlets will help you to find your way through maze of
rules laid down by parliament.
(If you have not kept a record of the RPIs published in the FT since you
started investing, you should find them in a local reference library - in
volume H** of Simon's Taxes, for example).
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1087</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Investors wary of US under Clinton -
But fund chiefs see opportunities continuing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT POWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INVESTORS in the United States are a cautious lot these days. Many believe
the economy is just bumping along the bottom and that signs of recovery are
mirages. And although stock prices are at all-time highs, worries are
widespread about the country's direction under President-elect Bill Clinton.
But the managers of three top-performing offshore funds that invest in US
securities are mostly unconcerned about a Clinton presidency and believe
they will continue to find market opportunities. James Reynolds, the manager
of Global Asset Management's US fund, thinks Clinton will not tinker with
the economy as much as he promised and will try to maintain the US on its
present economic course. That, he feels, should lead to slow, steady growth,
low inflation - and Clinton's re-election in 1996. 'Clinton has learned from
(former President) Carter,' said Reynolds, a principal with Fayez Sarofim &amp;
Co. in Houston, Texas. 'The most important thing for him to do is get
re-elected.'
Even if Clinton proves a disaster for the economy, Reynolds says the
companies in which he invests - large, US-based multi-nationals - ought to
remain unaffected. They generate most of their profits and earnings growth
from outside the US.
So far, that investment strategy - based on the belief that the global
economy will be dominated by 1,500 companies in the year 2000 - has served
Reynolds well. Indeed, GAM US, with a gain of 72.49 per cent, was the eighth
best-performing offshore fund over the five years to September 1992,
according to Lipper Analytical Services of New York.
Reynolds says the secret is to ferret out those US companies likely to
survive and thrive in the global arena. He will continue to look for
companies with above-average earnings growth over extended cycles, and which
sell at reasonable valuations. He also aims for companies with strong
balance sheets, low debt-to-equity ratios, and higher-than-average returns
on equity.
He admits readily that his criteria leave only a handful of companies and
most are household names: his favourites include Coca-Cola, Gillette and
Proctor &amp; Gamble. 'Clinton won't be disastrous for these companies,' he
says. 'People will still shave, wash their hair and eat food.'
Bradford Lewis, manager of Fidelity Investments' Dollars 108m American
Assets fund and the Dollars 17m Sterling America Fund (the two were in
mid-December), disagrees with Reynolds and thinks inflation could double
from its present 3 per cent over Clinton's first four years. But he does not
believe the cost of living will rise out of control, as it did when both
Congress and White House were controlled by Democrats late in the 1970s. He
hopes the bond market will act to control government spending.
But just in case inflation does rise sharply, Lewis has taken steps to
protect his portfolio by buying shares of gold mining companies.
Despite his outlook for inflation, Lewis is not making wholesale changes to
the fund because of Clinton's election. Rather, he is more occupied with
re-making American Assets into the mirror image of the highly regarded fund
 -Disciplined Equity - that he manages for US investors.
Lewis will use an investment strategy called quantitative analysis, which
relies in part on intensive statistical analysis of stocks, to build a
portfolio. He has created a computer software programme that attempts to
mimic the structure of the human brain. The programme will not only identify
which stocks are cheap, based on value or earnings, but also evaluate how
the market is pricing stocks generally.
This investment strategy has served the Disciplined Equity fund well. It has
gained 14.53 per cent over the three years to October while the average
growth fund gained only 9.72 per cent over the same period.
Daniel Miller, manager of the second best-performing offshore fund over the
past five years, the Putnam Emerging Health Sciences trust, is unsure what
to expect from Clinton's policies, especially those concerned with health
care. He notes that the president-elect spoke during the campaign of putting
in place a system that would provide health care for all, while containing
growing costs. But few people know exactly how Clinton will pursue his
goals; thus, Miller has not yet been able to divine which specific stocks
will benefit from, or be hurt by, his proposals.
Like Reynolds and Lewis, he hopes to invest in companies that will prosper
irrespective of Clinton's policies. For instance, he is backing equipment
groups such as Zoll Medical, maker of the next generation of defibrilators,
and service firms like NovaCare, which specialises in speech and physical
therapy.
The past year has been difficult for Miller. First, health-care stocks fell
from grace. Clinton's promises to reform the health-care system delivered
the final insult later in the year. The upshot was that Miller's fund fell
22.4 per cent during the first nine months of 1992, while the average fund
rose 0.6 per cent. Still, it has a respectable long-term record. It rose 105
per cent over the five years to end-September and 76 per cent over two
years.
Miller believes the worst is now over for his sector. He is confident a
rally could begin within six months - or at least as soon as Wall Street
learns it can live with whichever campaign promises on health-care reform
become law.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1088</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Offshore accounts still have
attractions for UK savers - And one of them, as Scheherazade Daneshkhu
finds, is that you can delay paying tax
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OFFSHORE accounts sound glamorous and, no doubt, some people put their money
in the Channel Islands to feel richer than they are. But, for UK building
society savers, there are still good reasons to consider opening one.
The market is relatively new for societies and many have established
offshore subsidiaries only in the past few years - although some, such as
the Halifax, have had an offshore presence for longer.
Such accounts, which pay interest gross, are aimed mainly at expatriates but
non-taxpaying UK residents needed them before the abolition of
composite-rate tax in April 1991. This tax was deducted at source in the UK
and could not be reclaimed by non-taxpayers. Now it has gone, so has the
main need by UK residents for an offshore account.
Since they must declare their income to the Inland Revenue regardless of
where it is held, is there much point now in putting money in an offshore
building society account? One reason can be found in the table, which
compares rates paid on an instant access offshore account at the top 10 UK
building societies with the corresponding onshore account.
In most cases, the gross rate is higher on the offshore account. Halifax's
Jersey-based Deposit International, for example, offers 6.5 per cent gross
on Pounds 10,000 compared with 5.6 per cent on its Instant Xtra Plus onshore
account.
Its onshore rate is bettered offshore by 1.35 percentage points on sums over
Pounds 50,000, while National &amp; Provincial pays 8 per cent gross on Pounds
100,000 or more in its Isle of Man-based Independent Reserve account,
compared with 6.5 per cent onshore.
One reason for higher rates is due to the funding of offshore subsidiaries.
Guy Stephenson, operations manager of Woolwich Guernsey, explains: 'We
collect sterling and dollar deposits world-wide and lend sterling deposits
to the society on the mainland. They pay us a rate for the money, which has
to be a market rate.' Overheads on offshore subsidiaries also tend to be
lower, since they often are smaller and have fewer staff than mainland
offices.
Societies such as Bristol &amp; West, Bradford &amp; Bingley and Cheltenham &amp;
Gloucester already have the benefit of low overheads with their postal
accounts, and are not able to better these rates offshore (although those
investing Pounds 100,000 or more in C&amp;G's Guernsey Gold account will get a
better return offshore).
Another reason for putting money offshore is that, although a tax liability
cannot be avoided, it can be delayed. depending on your timing.
Take Alliance &amp; Leicester's Maximum Instant account, which is paying 6.75
per cent gross on a Pounds 50,000 deposit. Like most of the onshore
accounts, it offers a choice of dates for crediting interest. You can choose
April 1 or May 1, depending on your tax year.
If you chose May 1 1992, and declared the interest on your 1992-93 tax
declaration form next year, you would then be unlikely to have to pay tax on
it until the first half of 1994 - although the exact timing depends on your
tax office.
Some societies differentiate between expatriate accountholders and those
based in the UK. Leeds, for example argues that paying higher rates on its
Liquid Gold Overseas account would take business away from its UK parent.
Its Overseas Gold account, open only to expatriates, offers a higher rate to
compete with other offshore institutions.
You do not have to be particularly rich to go offshore: the minimum
investment in Leeds Permanent's Liquid Gold Overseas account is Pounds 25,
and Pounds 500 for a Woolwich international account. But some societies
require much higher sums: Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester demands Pounds 10,000
minimum for its Guernsey Gold account.
The UK's Building Societies Deposit Protection Scheme, which guarantees to
pay 90 per cent of the first Pounds 20,000 in an account, does not apply
outside mainland Britain. Of the three main offshore islands, only the Isle
of Man has its own scheme. Under this, deposits are protected up to 75 per
cent of the first Pounds 20,000, and building societies also are covered by
the scheme.
However, section 22 of the 1986 Building Societies Act requires all the
liabilities of a subsidiary to be guaranteed by the parent.
Should that parent go bust, savers would not be covered by the Building
Societies Deposit Scheme. In the past, though, troubled building societies
have been taken over rather than allowed to collapse.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1089</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Try the Ecu for a good return - Dryden
Gilling-Smith suggests using cash funds to benefit from higher interest
rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DRYDEN GILLING-SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHERE can you get 11 per cent interest with instant access and limited
downside risk at a time when you might be lucky to get 6 per cent on UK
sterling bank deposits? Some pundits are saying that you have to start
investing in long UK gilts, or getting into equities, but there are big
question marks about both these markets.
Many commentators consider that UK equities are expensive in terms of
expected dividend flows, while investors may incur losses in the gilt market
as the government floods it with new issues to meet its Pounds 44bn public
borrowing requirement. In any case, many people want to hold considerable
sums in cash, or its equivalent.
UK pension funds, for example, have been holding substantial sums in cash
while interest rates have been good. This applies particularly to small
self-administered pension schemes (SSASs) where cash may be piling up for
older members near retirement to pay out the tax-free lump sums and purchase
annuities.
European Currency Unit cash funds may provide the answer to higher returns.
The Ecu was developed as an accounting convenience for EC member governments
and its value is calculated on the basis of a basket of currencies.
Some 42 per cent of the Ecu's value is accounted for by the heavyweight
currencies - the Deutschmark and the guilder - and another 42 per cent by
sterling and the French and Belgian francs. So, you do not have to worry too
much about the high-risk currencies such as the lira, peseta, escudo and
drachma which account for only a minute proportion of the basket.
Even a change in a major currency, such as the French franc, is not likely
to have an impact on the overall exchange rate of the Ecu any more than the
sterling change did in September.
The Ecu is used extensively by governments and companies raising money, and
by corporate investors, and can also be used by private investors and
pension funds. The fact that there are no Ecu coins or notes does not make
it any less useful as an investment currency.
You should treat Ecus as the equivalent of a currency unit trust, allowing
you to spread your investment over a portfolio of currencies without the
bother, costs and risks of buying each currency yourself.
An Ecu fund also enables you to get higher interest rates. While you can get
around 8.25 per cent on Deutschmarks and guilders, you can get up to 11 per
cent on Ecu units. You can, of course, get 10.5 per cent from French francs
at present, 15 per cent on pesetas and 20 per cent on escudos.
The high interest rate obtainable on these currencies involves the sterling
investor in an exchange rate risk (although because the Ecu is a basket of
currencies, this risk is reduced). If the pound rises against the Ecu, then
your Ecu deposit will fall in value in sterling terms.
For much of the past 10 years, the pound has actually been falling against
the Ecu - it has dropped 40 per cent since the start of 1982. But there have
been periods when the pound has risen: it jumped 15 per cent against the Ecu
between January 1987 and January 1989, which would have wiped out any
interest rate gains in that period. If the UK pulls out of recession faster
than its EC partners, the pound could strengthen against the Ecu, and
investors would need to switch into a sterling fund.
The present big interest differential results from the fact that, since
Britain left the Exchange Rate Mechanism (ERM), the UK has made economic
recovery its number one priority and is, belatedly, following the US low
interest rate approach.
Most of the other EC governments are still pinning their faith on
maintaining parity with the DM, even if it means continued high interest
rates - and all the human misery this entails. This could, in due course,
set off political explosions in the countries concerned, bringing down
interest rates.
So, what is the best way to benefit from these higher Ecu interest rates?
Just over a year ago, I invested part of my own company's pension fund in a
Guernsey-based Ecu cash roll-up fund run by my own bank (Lloyds). Over the
12-month period, it gave me a net return in Ecus of 9.95 per cent; but when
we added the cumulative appreciation of the Ecu against sterling in the same
period, our effective yield was 24.57 per cent.
There are other Ecu funds operating both in the Channel Islands and in
Luxembourg (although the Lloyds Bank Luxembourg fund seems to have been
averaging 1 per cent less per annum than the Guernsey fund).
The latest unit values and interest rates are shown daily in the offshore
and overseas section of the FT Managed Funds Service. Interest accrues
gross, which means that pension funds do not have to reclaim tax deducted at
source (although private investors are liable for tax when they cash their
units).
This tax deferment factor can be a worthwhile advantage for someone whose
marginal tax rate has dropped by the time he cashes in - possibly in
retirement. There is, of course, another point: money that otherwise would
be paid away in tax remains in the fund earning interest. And if you want
the interest as income, you can achieve this by cashing so many units each
year.
Other organisations offering Ecu cash roll-up funds, and which are listed in
the offshore and overseas columns of the FT Managed Funds Service - where
you can check latest unit values and interest rates - include Fidelity;
Rothschild Asset Management (CI) Ltd, Guernsey; Capital House Fund Managers
(CI) Ltd; and Lloyds Bank Luxembourg. Other banks, such as Credit Suisse
(Luxembourg), have their Ecu funds listed but do not show the latest
interest rate.
Interest rates do change each day, and it is simple to check them when you
invest. The Lloyds International Money Market Fund Ltd has no initial charge
and there is no bid/offer spread. At present, the manager levies a daily fee
at a rate of 0.75 per cent per annum of the net assets, and the custodian
fee is 0.2 per cent per annum. There is a free switching facility between
sterling and Ecu funds.
These fees, and the usual auditing and printing expenses, are effectively
allowed for in the unit prices and interest rates quoted.
You should check the minimum investments and transactions allowed. For the
Lloyds fund, the minimum investment in any of the currencies is Dollars
10,000, which at present exchange rates is around Pounds 6,500. The minimum
transaction amount is Dollars 2,000 (about Pounds 1,300).
Dryden Gilling-Smith is managing director of Employee Benefit Services.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1090</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Directors' Transactions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS MACDONALD, Directus Ltd
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE ARE still few signs of investors queuing to buy shares in anticipation
of the usual post-Christmas rally in the stock market. That said, the list
of director purchases this week looks rather healthier than it has for some
time.
Embassy Property Group is a tiny concern in which the majority of shares are
held by Treasure Jade, the company controlled by the Wong family. Roger
Holbeche, chief executive has sold 1m shares at 7p while his chairman,
Malcolm Stone, sold 750,000 at 7.5p.
Macro 4 is one of that select band of UK computer software companies which
has weathered the recession extremely well. Final results announced in
September revealed further growth in profits and earnings. Nevertheless,
Keith Piper, a non-executive director, has sold 25,000 shares at 490p. That
still leaves him with over 1m.
The sight of Richard Beecham buying a further 350,000 shares in Rhino Group
at 28.5p highlights their very strong performance since directors bought in
at 12.5p in October when the company was raising cash through a placing and
open offer. Beecham now holds more than shares in the fledgling retail
group, which aims to tackle the fast growing video games market.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
DIRECTORS' SHARE TRANSACTIONS IN THEIR OWN COMPANIES (LISTED &amp; USM)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                            No of
Company                    Sector     Shares   Value    directors
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
SALES
British Telecom            Tele       84,831     334         1*
Carlton Comm.              Med        27,000     191         1*
Clyde Blowers              EngG        3,000      11         1
Embassy Property           Prop    1,750,000     126         2
Huntleigh Tech             Hlth       45,000     405         2*
Glaxo                      Hlth       96,500     788         2*
Macro 4                    Elns       92,000     449         1
Marks &amp; Spencer            Stor      184,479     614         2*
Morgan Crucible            OthI       40,620     119         1*
Morland &amp; Co               Brew        7,500      32         1
Racal Electronics          Elns       20,000      31         1
Singer &amp; Friedlander       Merc       40,200      18         1
Smith &amp; Nephew             Hlth      100,000     160         1*
Smith Industries           EngA       47,949     167         1*
Southnews                  Med       100,000      78         1
TV-AM                      Med        40,500      28         2
Unilever                   FdMa        8,290      87         1*
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
PURCHASES
API Group                  Pack       10,000      21         1
Bimec                      Misc      250,000      19         1
British Steel              Metl       20,000      12         1
Britton Group              Pack      250,000      16         1
Cater Allen PRPrf          OthF        5,311      34         1
GEC                        Elns       20,000      52         2
Global Group               Misc    2,549,263     102         1
Hall Engineering           EngG       10,000      10         1
Land Securities            Prop        2,500      10         1
Mezzanine Capital          InTr       30,000      31         1
Rhino                      Misc      350,000     100         1
Scottish TV                Med         2,700      11         1
Singer &amp;Friedlander        Merc       40,200      18         1
Smith New Court            OthF       15,000      15         1
Transatlantic A CPf        InsL       20,000      58         1
Wassall (nil pd)           Cong    3,017,148     754         1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Value expressed in Pounds 000s. Companies must notify the Stock Exchange
within 5 working days of a share transaction by a director. This list
contains all transactions, including the exercise of options (*) if 100%
subsequently sold, with a value over Pounds 10,000. Information released
by the Stock Exchange  7-11 December  1992.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Directus Ltd, Edinburgh
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1091</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Royal admits Pounds 1m pension mistake
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YOU MIGHT have thought it was difficult to take almost Pounds 1m out of a
pension fund by mistake, and then not notice it for two years. But Royal
Life managed to do just that with one of its externally managed funds.
Now, the question is exactly how much money should be paid back.
To start with, it was a very basic administrative error. In July 1988,
Michael Telfer, the manager of the BTL Exempt pension fund, asked Royal
Heritage, the unit-linked division of Royal Life, to cancel units from the
cash holding of the fund to a value of Pounds 930,397.50. This was done.
Unfortunately, Telfer says, it then made the same transfer again, leaving
the fund technically insolvent.
Royal Life spotted the error in March 1991 and made a repayment into the
fund. The company admits that the error should not have happened, and that
it should have been discovered and put right much sooner.
The issue then became one of compensation. Royal decided to look at the
number of units which had been removed from the fund in error, and multiply
them by the prevailing unit price in March 1988.
This delivered a total of Pounds 841,401.50 - less than the amount which had
been taken out.
A drop in the unit price over the intervening period had caused this, and
Royal Life's reasoning was that this method meant the fund was now the size
it would have been had the error never happened.
But is this right? Telfer denies this vigorously, pointing out that the
value of the fund's units is determined by its total assets, not the other
way around.
As the cash removed should always have been an asset of the fund, it seems
unfair on that basis to reduce it.
He also points out that the withdrawal of units meant being forced to
realise investments, either at a loss or incurring sizeable bid-offer
spreads in the process. Investment performance, and hence the unit price,
might have been better had this not happened.
Certainly, removing nearly Pounds 1m reduced drastically the manager's room
to manoeuvre, as the fund's size had dropped to Pounds 265,436 by March
1991.
Royal decided in July to make a further payment into BTL, so that the entire
cash sum was repaid but without any interest. Telfer and Royal are now
locked in dispute over what should happen next.
Icki Iqbal, actuary for Royal Life, says the money probably was invested in
cash and gilts while it was outside the fund. He adds: 'If the unit price
had risen, then we would have had to pay more. That would have been our
obligation.
'But unit-linked policyholders' rights are determined by the unit value, and
I really don't think we have an obligation to do more than we have done.'
Around 40 or 50 people, mostly directors and executives, expect to draw
pensions from the BTL fund. Others who want to save through unit-linked
broker funds might want to take note of the problems which arose in this
case.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1092</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Do financial services match M&amp;S image?
 -Disagreement between City experts and the leading UK retailer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA ELLIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE OF the favourite lines trotted out by financial services groups
launching products early in the 1980s was: 'We aim to become the Marks &amp;
Spencer of financial services.' But the line went out of style once M&amp;S
itself moved into financial services, first with a charge card and then unit
trusts and personal loans. Since then, City people have taken to wondering
if the M&amp;S role in financial services really lives up to its high street
retailing image.
Daniel Bunting, an investment strategist with Matheson Securities who
specialises in the retail sector, said M&amp;S had not really applied the same
principle to its financial services activities as to, say, selling clothes.
In clothing, M&amp;S typically would deliver an extra value element by keeping
margins lower than those of competitors while compensating with greater
volume. But with unit trusts, for instance, while M&amp;S's charges were much in
line with the rest of the market, he would have hoped to see them lower.
Ian Lindsey, executive director of Save &amp; Prosper, said: 'Marks &amp; Spencer in
financial services gives reasonable value for money, but not what you would
call the upper quartile.' He added that the unit trusts could be described
as only average while the charge card, acceptable only in the stores,
offered no better quality of service than any bank-issued credit card.
Anne McMeehan, managing director of Framlington Unit Trust Managers, said
M&amp;S had a distinct disadvantage with investment products as opposed to
others. 'No sell-by date - what you can't do is guarantee the quality you
get out of a unit trust by saying it must be bought or sold by a certain
date,' she noted.
For M&amp;S, Robert Colvill, executive director of financial activities, said it
was not true that margins on financial products were higher than on retail
products, although he would not reveal comparative figures.
Since 1985, when M&amp;S launched seriously into financial services, customer
balances have grown from Pounds 91m to Pounds 451m. The first year's loss of
Pounds 10m had become a profit of just over Pounds 5m by 1988/89 and was
just over Pounds 15m for 1991/92. Colvill said he expected a further
significant improvement this year. Pre-tax profitability in financial
services has risen steadily from 16 per cent in 1988/89 to 27.2 per cent in
1991/92.
Out of 2.4m cardholder accounts, M&amp;S estimates that 10 per cent are dormant,
with no activity for the last six months. About one-third show a nil balance
and the rest split roughly equally between those with a balance and paying
interest and those not doing so. 'I don't pretend the card rate is low in
absolute terms,' said Colvill, 'but, taking into account the interest-free
period and no fee, it is less than other issuers charge.' He added that the
group did not think it appropriate to charge a fee on its card while barring
Access and Visa cards from the stores.
Colvill said M&amp;S had been looking at accepting debit cards, with the idea of
paying a processing cost comparable to that for cheques. 'What we don't
accept is a significantly higher charge, an interchange fee passed back to
the card-issuing bank,' he explained, noting that the banks also were trying
to introduce this type of charge on debit cards. This supposedly was to
compensate for fraud losses but, in fact, cost far more.
Colvill says M&amp;S is deliberately staying below high street banks on rates
for personal loans and overdrafts. This is possible. he explains, because
the loans go to customers the group already knows well. Most of the 80,000
loans outstanding have been made to M&amp;S cardholders.
With both cards and personal loans, he said M&amp;S used credit reference
agencies more than banks and had developed more sophisticated uses of
behavioural scoring, which awards and deducts points as debt is run up and
paid off - or not. 'We can be alerted before an account goes wrong and
adjust authorisation procedures,' he said, "This is more difficult for banks
because they don't control the (retail) outlets.'
M&amp;S has two unit trusts with 75,000 investors: the Pounds 110m Investment
Portfolio, launched four years ago, and the Pounds 58m UK Selection. Latest
statistics from Micropal rank the Investment Portfolio 11th out of 15 funds
in the international balanced category, with an 11 per cent gain in the past
three years on an offer-to-bid basis. The UK Selection portfolio ranked 74th
out of 90 funds in the UK equity general class with a gain of 5 per cent
over the same period.
Colvill said that as the Investment Portfolio held mainly UK equities, it
did not really fit into the international balanced category which primarily
held bonds and foreign equities. It could also not be classed as a fund of
funds, since it did not hold other unit trusts.
Consultants Frank Russell constructed a mini-peer group. This ranked the
Investment Portfolio against 11 other funds considered comparable, and
brought it out ahead on asset growth. 'For example, the Investment Portfolio
showed 39 per cent growth in assets over the four years, against Cazenove
Portfolio's 37 per cent and CU Managed 36 per cent.'
The UK Selection falls more clearly into the UK equity general category. 'I
don't deny we have underperformed the UK equity sector by 5 per cent in the
past three years,' said Colvill. 'We had a rough 1991 and a better, but only
average, 1992. But we are very confident that we don't want to change
because this portfolio is very much geared to recovery.'
He explained that the portfolio of UK Selection had been designed
specifically for the personal equity plan (Pep) market with an above-average
level of income: about 70 per cent of the unit-holders were Pep investors.
'With the benefit of hindsight . . . high income has savagely underperformed
and small companies even more savagely.'
M&amp;S uses a variety of managers for each unit trust but refuses to talk about
individual performances. 'They can be hired and fired but they should not
have their figures discussed in public,' said Colvill. For the Investment
Portfolio, the breakdown is 60 per cent UK equities, managed by a
combination of BZW (for indexation). Robert Fleming (for growth) and GMO
Woolley (for value-based investment using quant methods). A further 15 per
cent of the portfolio is in bonds, managed by Phillips &amp; Drew, and 25 per
cent is in international equities run by Clay Finlay, a firm run by two
Englishmen in New York.
The UK Selection fund is one-third in the hands of BZW for indexation, but
tilted towards income. The rest is divided evenly between GMO Woolley,
providing a value base with relatively high income, and Delaware, formed
mostly by Hill Samuel breakaways who use a methodology involving discount
models; a longer-term growth company approach with an income bias.
For the future, Colvill says M&amp;S has some product development thoughts but
will not be coming out with mortgages, a 'horde' of unit trusts, or
investment trusts. But he stresses: 'We do believe firmly in organic growth
wherever possible. It may be a little bit pedestrian and it may have taken
us six or seven years but it is solid progress, we believe.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1093</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Dial 'I' for insurance - A new plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LOCAL insurance brokers are trying to reclaim their dwindling hold on an
increasingly competitive market with a new commercial venture. Called 0800 I
(for Insurance), the idea is to link customers to their local broker quickly
and, for clients, at no cost.
By dialling 0800-1235-789 (which form an 'I' on a push button telephone),
the caller is connected automatically to his local broker.
As policies come up for renewal, customers can use the service to check if
they are paying too much for their existing policy or to see if they are
getting the cover most suitable for them.
0800 I is launched and managed by Bernard T. Down, a firm of
Folkestone-based insurance brokers. Down says the growing breed of direct
insurer - where customers settle their policy over the 'phone with an
insurance company - is not necessarily the cheapest and excludes many
people.
'So tight is their underwriting that, in some cases, the direct companies
won't even quote for risks which other underwriters find quite acceptable,'
he said. 'By going to an independent professional, it is possible for the
public to ensure that they have insurance cover, at each renewal, ideally
suited to their requirements. This does not necessarily mean cheaper
insurance but better value for money.'
Small independent brokers have been losing out to direct insurers and to the
large insurance companies. Down says the number of registered insurance
brokers has decreased by 70 per cent in the last 10 years.
Brokers wanting to join the system are vetted by Down and pay a fee for the
administration of the system and for its publicity. There are 450 linked to
the service nation-wide out of more than 5,000 brokers in the UK.
Down anticipates 30-50 companies entering the 0800 I network every week. 'We
want to let people know that there is a first class alternative for them -
independent intermediaries,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1094</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Brokers take their pick - Trusts
recommended as good buys for the small investor for next year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INVESTORS are always being urged to move their savings into investment and
unit trusts, but which ones should they choose? A bewildering variety of
funds ison offer, and several different classes of share.
So, the Weekend FT asked four private client stockbrokers to pick three
trusts for the small investor to buy for 1993 and beyond. Although we gave
them the choice of unit or investment trusts, all opted for the latter -
perhaps because of their lower costs and long-term outperformance of their
unitised rivals.
Brian Tora, of Greig Middleton, starts by recommending Merchants' Trust. He
says: 'If you are looking for income, this is one of the most successful UK
equity income trusts around. Over the past five years, it has changed from
being an international fund to owning almost exclusively UK blue chip
stocks.
'Kleinwort Benson is the manager and, despite yielding more than the FT-A
All-Share index, it has been able to increase the dividend without buying
income or resorting to convertibles or more risky investments. The discount
is modest at 5 per cent, but at this level still offers better value than a
unit trust.'
Tora's next choice pick is Alliance. 'For the growth-oriented investor, this
is quality indeed. An Pounds 850m plus trust, it has a worldwide portfolio.
The most important geographical areas are the UK, which represents 50 per
cent and the US with 31 per cent.
'Dividend growth has been consistent, averaging 11 per cent plus over the
past five years but even so the discount is in double figures. With the US
moving out of recession and many major UK companies - well represented in
Alliance's portfolio - benefiting from their North America exposure, this
could be a good trust to hold for 1993.'
Finally, he opts for Abtrust New Dawn but warns that 'this is for the racier
punter, convinced that the Far East is still the economic powerhouse of the
world and prepared to take the risks that these volatile markets will
deliver. A relatively small trust at Pounds 40m, it has recovered in recent
months from a dull period as a result of high exposure to Indonesia and
Thailand and by eschewing Hong Kong. The fund manager, Hugh Young, takes a
cautious view of Hong Kong but is very optimistic for China overall. The 15
per cent discount takes good account of the riskier nature of these
markets'.
Paul Killik of Killik picks three UK-invested trusts because of his belief
that the London market offers good value at present. He opts for Law
Debenture Corporation 'for capital appreciation combined with a market
yield. The company's corporate trustee services makes the comparison of
share price to net asset value, somewhat misleading with this trust. A fair
value for trustee services would imply a reasonable discount for the quoted
investments. Managed by Touche Remnant, this has been an outstanding long
term performer.'
Like Tora, Killik recommends Merchants Trust which 'offers an above average
yield of 5 per cent, with prospects for growth of both income and capital.
Kleinwort's flagship trust is entirely invested in the UK, has shown good
long term performance, has minimal gearing and a strong revenue reserve
position.'
Killik's third choice is Drayton English &amp; International Trust. 'On a 50 per
cent discount to net asset value, with the unquoted element of the portfolio
now below 15 per cent and a new manager on board, the gearing employed by
this fund will enhance any strength in the UK smaller company sector, which
is widely expected to outperform.
'The trust has assets of about Pounds 50m and debt of Pounds 25m. The shares
are attractive for capital appreciation with a good yield but have a higher
risk/reward profile.'
Edwin Lilley of Bell Lawrie White in Edinburgh says: 'I start by selecting
the ideal widows and orphans stock, a generalist which will never be in the
top quartile (25 per cent) of performers, but then I would not expect it to
see it in the bottom quartile either. One of the few independents remaining,
Scottish Investment Trust seeks capital and income growth through
international investment and has consistently achieved these two
objectives.'
'It is a conservatively managed trust with a long established management
team and is an ideal core holding. On a 15 per cent discount to net assets
which is well above the sector average, a yield of 3.5 per cent, and with a
modest amount of gearing to take advantage of the improving outlook for
equities, the shares represent very solid value.
'Smaller companies have consistently underperformed their larger
counterparts over the past three years but 1993 should see a broadening of
investor interest away from the FT-SE constituents. Interest rates, one of
the keys to recovery for smaller companies, have more than halved from
earlier highs, and the prospect for further reductions in 1993 is real.
'My second choice therefore is Fleming Mercantile,' says Lilley 'as it is
the largest and one of the most successful smaller company specialists. It
has approximately one third of its assets overseas, mainly in Hong Kong and
the USA.'
'The Fleming's bank connection has allowed the trust to get into a number of
interesting situations at an early stage in their development and at around
20 per cent, unquoteds account for a significant part of the portfolio. The
15 per cent discount looks abnormally high in the context of its fine record
over recent years.'
For his third choice, Lilley picks the capital shares of River &amp; Mercantile
as 'a geared play on economic recovery in the UK. Although the portfolio has
a slight leaning towards higher income/recovery situations the list looks
much stronger than one tends to see in the portfolios of other trusts with
split capital structures.
'Nervousness over future dividend payouts has resulted in large falls in
many higher yielding stocks and the net asset values of splits have suffered
with capital shareholders being hit particularly hard because of the
gearing.
'River &amp; Mercantile's status also suffered due to the rights issue flop
early in 1992 which left 80 per cent of the stock with underwriters. On the
current discount, the capital shares offer exceptional value.'
Nigel Sidebottom of Gerrard Vivian Gray starts with Bankers Investment
Trust. 'This international trust, managed by Touche Remnant's Michael Moule,
has an excellent long-term performance record. Moule has consistently
demonstrated his ability to outperform markets while sticking to a low risk
value-based approach to investment through the 10 years he has managed the
trust.'
'Among the main international general investment trusts only Alliance has
had comparable performance (in terms of NAV total return) over three and
five years. Over 10 years, Bankers is well ahead. The current geographic
exposure is 50 per cent UK, 23 per cent North America, 10 per cent Europe
and 6 per cent Far East. The shares are on a 4.2 per cent discount and yield
3.5 per cent. The trust currently has about 15 per cent gearing through
loans and debenture issues.'
The trust is not Pep (personal equity plan) qualifying. However, TR provides
an attractive savings scheme with a minimum Pounds 25 monthly investment.'
Sidebottom's second option is for zero coupon shares in Jos Holdings. 'These
zeroes were created earlier this year when a conventional trust was
reconstructed; they are redeemable on January 31, 2003 at 249p. With a
current price of 108.5p, they will provide an annual compound growth of 8.6
per cent if held to redemption. There is 102 per cent cover, that is no
growth is required from the underlying portfolio for the zero holders to
receive the promised redemption value. They therefore provide virtually
assured capital growth.
'Investors not making use of their Pounds 5,800 annual capital gains tax
exemption will receive the 8.6 per cent redemption yield as a tax-free
return which compares very well with the net returns available from the
building society. Jos invests principally in UK and European equities and is
managed by Kleinwort Benson.'
The income shares of St David's Investment Trust, says Sidebottom, are
suitable for investors requiring an exceptionally high income. 'The trust
has a fixed life and the income shares will be redeemed at 90p on November
30, 1998 and so ultimately investors buying the shares now - at a price of
around 124p - will suffer some loss of capital. On the assumption, however,
that dividends grow at 5 per cent per annum, the income shares will provide
a gross yield to redemption of around 16 per cent.
'The trust is managed by Brian Banks at Guildhall Investment Management. The
underlying portfolio is invested wholly in the UK and aims to generate both
rising income and capital growth from a spread of blue chips, recovery
stocks and special situations.'
Prices, discounts and yields reflect those prevailing on Friday morning.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1095</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Tax can ruin festive fun
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE INLAND Revenue will be an uninvited guest at many Christmas festivities
this year. But whether it brings tax-free gifts or a harsh assessment
depends on careful planning.
Brian Friedman, head of employee benefits at accountant Stoy Hayward,
highlights three principal areas to consider during the festive season:
Christmas parties, employee gifts and travel by taxi.
Christmas parties are the most obvious seasonal benefit earmarked for
special treatment by the Revenue. A number of companies have been concerned
about the amount they can spend without incurring the tax collector's wrath.
The basic rule is that, to avoid any tax liability, the company must
entertain only 'on a moderate scale' rather than 'lavishly' (in the words of
an extra-statutory concession issued by the Revenue in 1988).
That means spending no more than Pounds 50 per head, a limit which has been
in place ever since. The figure is based on the number of people who
actually attend the party, not the number who have been invited, and it
includes spouses.
To be eligible for tax relief, the party must also be open to all employees.
The concession covers entertainment by a company throughout the year. This
means that if it has a summer as well as a Christmas party, the amount spent
in total on both events must not exceed the limit.
If spending exceeds Pounds 50 a head, the entire amount will be viewed as a
benefit in kind subject to tax, and may be treated in two ways. Either the
employees pay tax on the extra amount at their marginal rate, or their
employer pays that sum directly in addition to the direct outlay on the
party. But the Revenue stresses that if the employer deducts the tax from
the payroll, only those employees who attended the party must pay.
A second seasonal tax risk comes in the form of gifts. Presents with a value
below Pounds 100 from a third party, which are not from the employer and are
not given in recognition of particular services, come free of tax.
Any amount above that limit will be taxable on the excess, while those which
can be shown to relate directly to labour performed would be taxable fully
as income.
The status of gifts from an employer to an employee has been clarified by
the Pepper vs Hart decision in the House of Lords last month. It ruled that
benefits would be assessed for tax at the marginal cost - or extra cost of
producing the goods - rather than average cost.
There is, however, a distinction between two types of employee: those who
earn below Pounds 8,500 a year, and those who earn more than this amount or
are a director of the company.
The first group limit will be taxed on the second-hand value of the gift.
These employees would be better-off receiving goods such as alcohol or
cigarettes, because they have no second-hand value since they require a
license to be re-sold.
For those above the limit, there is no such option. The Revenue will assess
tax on the gift at the greater of either the second-hand value of the goods,
or any amount below their marginal cost.
In the same way as for gifts from a third party, any payments from an
employer which are income related directly to particular services performed
are taxable. But those individuals working for companies with profit-related
pay schemes will be able to share in tax-free income up to Pounds 4,000, if
the business has performed well enough to trigger the targets set by the
scheme.
With the nights drawing in and deadlines to meet, employees may also be able
to avoid paying tax on reimbursements from their employer if they are forced
to take a trip home by taxi. An extra-statutory concession allows this if
they are occasionally required to work late - meaning after 9pm - and public
transport has ceased or become unreasonable to use because of lack of
frequency.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1096</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Call to alter Pep rules
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PROSHARE, the body set up to promote wider share ownership, has called on
the Chancellor to alter the personal equity plan rules substantially in
order to encourage greater investment in equities. Its major proposal is a
'MegaPep' to encourage those who come into lump sums, via inheritance or
retirement, to invest their capital in equities immediately.
Rather than the present annual limit of Pounds 9,000 (Pounds 6,000 in a
general, and Pounds 3,000 in a single company, Pep), the MegaPep would allow
an individual to invest Pounds 80,000 over a rolling eight-year period.
Existing Peps could be rolled into the new scheme tax-free.
ProShare argues that the size of a MegaPep would allow managers to achieve
economies of scale and reduce the effect of charges on plans. The cost to
the Treasury would not be great, since much of the money going into MegaPeps
would consist of switches from earlier Peps.
In addition, ProShare wants a tax break similar to the loi monory system in
France, with investors able to buy shares out of pre-tax income, subject to
an annual limit of Pounds 1,500. An investment like this would, effectively,
cost the basic-rate taxpayer Pounds 1,125 and the top-rate taxpayer Pounds
900.
Such a system would encourage the small investor, who had previously
acquired only privatisation issues, to increase his involvement in the
equity market. Last week, a ProShare survey found that only 200,000 of those
who bought shares in privatisations had acquired holdings in other
companies.
A further proposal from ProShare is that roll-over relief should be extended
to private investor shareholdings. This would allow investors to postpone
paying capital gains tax on a share sale, provided the proceeds were
re-invested immediately into equities.
A recent study of private investor holdings found that 48 per cent of the
value of shares and unit trusts were held in portfolios of over Pounds
150,000. Such holders may be unwilling to sell holdings and incur a CGT
liability; this reduces market liquidity.
How likely are the proposals to become law? ProShare is not alone in calling
for changes to Peps; the Unit Trust Association called recently for gilts
and corporate bonds to qualify for Peps, arguing this would help fund the
growing government borrowing requirement.
But the Chancellor's current priority must surely be a consumer boom, not
increased savings. And the UTA's proposal seems set to fall on deaf ears.
The Treasury ruled this week that gilt or bond trusts would no longer be
classed as part of the Pounds 1,500 'non-qualifying' element of a Pep
(previously defined only as trusts with less than 50 per cent of their
assets in EC equities).
The best hope of change may lie in later years, when GDP is growing again
and the Chancellor can afford to tinker with savings plan rules.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1097</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Markets: So you thought 1992 was bad . . . - Serious Money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BRITISH government's finances are in a mess. This year, it is expected
to run up a deficit of Pounds 37bn; in 1993-94, the prediction is Pounds
44bn. And those are only the Treasury's forecasts. Some economists are
predicting that the deficit for 1993-94 could be well over Pounds 50bn.
There are two things which governments can do to reduce deficits; cut
spending and increase taxes. Both are difficult and unpopular. Some spending
programmes (such as social security) increase automatically in a recession;
others, such as health, rise slowly but surely because of improved
technology and an ageing population.
Government ministers are terrier-like in defending their departmental
budgets, and the long drawn-out public spending rounds each autumn often
result in minimal savings. In any case, spending plans are already set for
1993-94, so the government's only option for reducing the budget deficit in
the near term - short of crisis measures - is to raise taxes.
The government has made a long-term commitment to reducing the basic rate of
income tax, so it would be highly embarrassing if it were to make yet
another policy U-turn in this area.
The changes expected most widely in next year's Budget are an
above-inflation rise in excise duties and an increase in the scope of
value-added tax. Such moves would mean that savers' pounds go less far at
the supermarket; but, in terms of financial planning, there is little they
can do.
Where savers can take action is by dealing with the prospect of an increase
in direct taxation. It might not come in the next Budget, although there
could be an increase in the National Insurance ceiling which would affect
those in work. But if government finances deteriorate as much as some
economists expect, the chances are that one, or more, of the following will
occur:
An increase in the top-rate band of 40 per cent.
Introduction of a new top rate (above the 40 per cent level) of, say, 50 per
cent for high earners.
A reduction in the scope of tax shelters, such as higher-rate relief on
pensions or even mortgage interest relief.
Nobody in government will admit to such a possibility at the moment. But, as
we all know, this administration has been forced to backtrack on its
promises in the past; financial crises may force it to do so in the future.
And Martin Wooller, fixed income director of Fidelity Investments in London,
says: 'There is a significant risk of a 1976 IMF-style crisis during 1994.'
So, what can savers do? The obvious strategy is to take advantage of the
existing tax shelters, which will prove even more valuable if tax rates
increase. All of these are well known but worth reconsidering as you digest
your mince pies over the holidays:
Tax-exempt special savings accounts (Tessas). The second anniversary is now
due and a further Pounds 1,800 can thus be invested. If you have not opened
a Tessa at all, shame on you; you are missing the chance to earn tax-free
interest. You can invest Pounds 3,000 in the first year and a maximum of
Pounds 9,000 over five years.
National Savings. Inflation might have dropped to 3 per cent but it could
yet return in force in the mid-1990s. The tax-free 3.25 per cent real return
(if held for five years) on the 6th issue of index-linked National Savings
looks attractive. A maximum Pounds 5,000 can be invested.
Index-linked gilts. Interesting for the same reason as given above, but
inflation protection is available for longer and there is no upper limit on
investment. Much of the return is in the form of tax-free capital gain; but
tax is payable on the small (2 or 2.5 per cent) income. Real yields are
between 3.5 and 4 per cent on longer issues.
Personal equity plans. Not for the totally risk-averse, but equities have
outperformed the building societies over the long run, and most experts
think they will do so over the short term.
A low-cost plan is Gartmore's Index fund, which tracks the All-Share index,
has an annual management charge of 0.5 per cent, and is available in Pep
form, from WI Carr, for an initial charge of Pounds 30 plus VAT. It might
not be top of the performance tables over the next five years, but it
certainly will not be bottom.
Zero coupon shares of split capital investment trusts. Most investors do not
use their annual capital gains tax allowance (Pounds 5,800 in 1992-93). Zero
shares pay no income, but are designed to grow steadily in capital value; if
you do not use up your CGT allowance, returns are tax-free. Some zeroes are
safer than others (all involve some risk) and you need the advice of a good
stockbroker in this market.
Business expansion schemes. There have been a lot of poor BES vehicles in
the past, but some issues are now available with a clearing bank guarantee.
These are worth investigating, especially as this loophole will be closed at
the end of 1993.
A final caveat. No investment should ever be made purely for tax reasons;
better to pay tax on your profits than to make no profits at all.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1098</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Markets: Bring on the man in the gold lame suit - London
Markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN, Financial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Chancellor
From: Director General, Oflot
Date: December 17, 1994
DEAR Chancellor, Now that I have come to grips with my job as head of the
Office of the National Lottery, I would like to offer my services on a wider
canvas.
As you know, the lottery has been successfully launched, and has achieved
its underlying aim. Two years to the day after it was first announced, it is
already generating a flood of just-fancy-that stories for the newspapers,
usefully distracting attention from the government's problems of rising
inflation and higher taxes.
I now propose ways of applying Oflot's 'light-touch' regulatory style to
other areas of national life. Within a matter of months, it would be
possible for my five-person team to achieve major economies by taking over
the duties of the Civil Aviation Authority, the Independent Television
Commission, the Monopolies and Mergers Commission and the Department of
Health.
The techniques developed over the past few years in devising El Normo ('The
fat one') are admirably suited to the tasks of allocating 'slots' at
airports, licensing television stations, reviewing mergers, reorganising the
brewing industry and restructuring London's hospitals.
Cost-benefit analysis shows that a televised drawing of lots by a man in a
gold lame suit and a woman with a short skirt would achieve far more
intellectually coherent decisions than current procedures.
The biggest potential gains, however, come in the area of financial markets
supervision. If you agree, a simple one-clause bill amending the Financial
Services Act of 1986 would abolish the Securities and Investments Board, the
London Stock Exchange, Liffe, Fimbra, Imro, Lloyd's Council, the Accounting
Standards Board and many other official bodies.
In taking over from these institutions, my office would bring new levels of
integrity to the supervision of financial markets, assisted by our
distinguished US consultant Tony 'Scarface' Gamborelli.
I hope you agree. But if you can not make up your mind, please do not set up
a committee to decide: toss a coin.
* * *
The pent-up demand for a national lottery was clearly in evidence on Friday,
as fund managers bought millions of pounds worth of tickets for the stock
market's soon-to-be-outdated form of tombola.
In one of the heaviest days of trading since the surge of activity that
followed Britain's departure from the exchange rate mechanism, the FT-SE 100
index rose 49.4 points, to close at 2,789.7, up 73.5 on the week.
There was no obvious trigger, except perhaps some startlingly good interim
results from Asda, the food store chain. The new management installed after
a boardroom coup last year was able to report pre-tax profits of Pounds 46m,
much higher than the Pounds 10m (before exceptional items) recorded for the
same period last year and analysts' forecasts of around Pounds 35m.
The market clearly took this as a sign that at least one potential recovery
stock was in fact recovering. It was one of those cheering moments that are
enough to outweigh a week's worth of economic statistics - unemployment,
input prices, retail sales, and so on - all still stubbornly refusing to
provide the firm evidence of economic recovery that the market now daily
anticipates.
Interestingly, the Smith New Court/Gallup survey of institutional investors'
intensions, published early in the week, suggests that fund managers are in
two minds about the outlook. The chart of asset allocation intentions, shown
above, indicates that the big increase in appetite for UK equities that
followed the ERM exit is now slackening off (and the summer's enthusiasm for
gilts is now a fond memory).
But institutions' general optimism about the equity market seems to be
accelerating: the balance of fund managers who are bullish about the FT-SE
100 index leapt from 27 per cent in November to 42 per cent in December.
Economic expectations also improved in the month.
That combination of cautious intentions but underlying optimism probably
helps to explain Friday's rush of buying. Fund managers, with memories of
last year's year-end surge in shares, could be forgiven for deciding that
the risks of being stuck in cash over the holiday period, with the year-end
portfolio measurement deadline looming, were just too great.
The gambling theme pervaded the week, not least in an updated version of one
of those Victorian morality tales in which the reprobate plunger finally
pays the price for his wild moments at the chemin-de-fer table five years
before.
On Thursday, Barclays announced the bill for two heady moments in 1987 and
1991 when it staked a total Pounds 440m on lending to Imry, the property
developer. It was the steepest price any UK bank has paid for bad lending to
a single UK company: a write-off of Pounds 196m and a further provision of
Pounds 44m. Barclays shares ended the week unchanged at 378p.
The week's real gambling story, the national lottery, largely passed the
stock market by - unless you are a shareholder of Zetters, the only one of
the big three pools operators that is an independent quoted company.
With the national lottery part of the Conservative manifesto, Zetters shares
missed the post-election rally and have since slid steadily, closing
yesterday at 82p, well down from their January high of 136p.
Not surprising, perhaps, when the industry's own trade association is
telling the newspapers that both Zetters and Vernons will have to pull out
of the business unless the government changes its mind. Well, as they say in
Whitehall, alea jacta est.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1099</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: A staggered PEP - At a Glance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A new portfolio service is on offer from a combination of Bath-based
advisers Warner Matthews, stockbrokers Foster &amp; Braithwaite and Baring
Private Investment Management. The portfolio combines a Pounds 6,000
ordinary PEP, managed by Foster &amp; Braithwaite, with a regular savings scheme
into a series of single company PEPs, managed by Barings. Investments into
the single company PEPs will be funded by a 5 year temporary annuity.
Initial charge is 4 per cent plus VAT on the ordinary PEP and 3 per cent
plus VAT on the temporary PEP; annual management charges are 1.25 per cent
and 1 per cent plus VAT respectively. The minimum investment is Pounds
12,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1100</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Small companies perk up - At a Glance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Small company shares seem to be ending the year on a high note. The Hoare
Govett Smaller Companies Index (capital gains version) rose 1.9 per cent
from 1126.07 to 1147.06 over the seven days to December 17; the County index
increased 1.8 per cent from 868.43 to 884.2 during the same period.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1101</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Cambridge launches BES - At a Glance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Cambridge University launched a new Business Expansion Scheme yesterday. The
Cambridge University Residential BES comes with a 'buy-back' guarantee after
five years from the university, to pay Pounds 1.14 for every Pounds 1 share
bought now. Cambridge has invested in gilts and deposits to cover this, but
the payment is at risk should the university go out of business in the next
five years.
Non-recourse loans are available from Barclays for top-rate taxpayers who
invest at least Pounds 7,000 - these offer Pounds 740 for every Pounds 1,000
after six months, and Pounds 780 for every Pounds 1,000 after a year. The
effective post-tax investment is Pounds 600. The first Pounds 1.5m has been
reserved for supporters of Cambridge University. The offer is open to the
general public from January 1, but it is probably worth submitting
applications before then.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1102</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: . . . and so does cash - At a Glance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The gap between the return available on cash and that on shares has narrowed
substantially over the year, as the graph shows. Savers may have started to
notice; building societies suffered a net outflow in November and PEP sales
have been going well. Building societies face competition, Section I, Page
7.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1103</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Gold continues to lose its allure . .
.  - At a Glance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GOLD'S PRICE seems almost certain to end the year close to its lowest level
for five years because speculators in Europe, Japan and North America have
almost completely lost interest in it. The precious metal is also locked
into a very narrow trading range, with record demand from the jewellery
industry this year being offset by producers hedging and selling forward any
time the price attempts a significant break upwards.
Another factor holding down the price in 1992 is central bank selling.
Central banks have huge stocks of gold which earn practically nothing and
they now seem more willing to let some go into the market. Analysts suggest
this phenomenon will weigh heavily on the price for some time to come.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1104</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Markets: When the Big Blue chip is down - Wall Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BLUE-CHIP (-chip) adj (after high-value blue chips of poker). 1. designating
any high-priced stock with a good record of earnings and price stability 2.
(Colloq) excellent, valuable etc'
Webster's New World Dictionary
INTERNATIONAL Business Machines, 'Big Blue' to its friends (a dwindling
number these days), was once the king of the blue-chips. For much of the
post-war era, it was a high-priced stock - Dollars 175 was the all-time
peak, reached in 1987 - with a solid history of earnings and price
stability. IBM, to its most ardent admirers at least, was a name that
represented excellence and value.
Not any more. So bad has IBM been to investors, so unlike a blue-chip in its
performance, that (as The New York Times calculated this week) a Dollars
1,000 stake invested in IBM just before the bull market began in 1982, would
now be worth (not counting dividends) a meagre Dollars 857. That is the
worst performance among the 30 stocks that make up the Dow Jones Industrial
Average. In comparison, a similar amount invested in Coca-Cola in 1982 would
now be worth Dollars 13,392.
This week IBM fell to a new 11-year low of Dollars 52, almost exactly half
what the stock was worth in July, just before the latest troubles began.
Those troubles - a shrinking share of the international computer market,
slowing demand worldwide for IBM's goods (especially in Europe), and a
rapidly changing and increasingly competitive market that is leaving IBM
struggling to keep up in the technology products race - led to Tuesday's
announcement of another radical restructuring plan.
The plan will involve cutting a further 25,000 jobs from IBM's workforce
(about 8 per cent of the total) and reducing manufacturing capacity sharply.
Not only will the company have to take a Dollars 6bn fourth quarter charge
to cover the costs of the restructuring, but the annual IBM dividend is now
threatened, as is the company's famed policy of avoiding compulsory
redundancies.
Somewhat surprisingly, the stock market took the IBM news in its stride. Had
it not been for IBM's 11 per cent plunge on Tuesday, the Dow would have
shown a decent gain at the end of trading (instead of an eight-point loss).
Ironically, IBM's problems may actually be helping the market, or at least
certain other stocks and sectors. Most investors that have scrambled to take
their money out of IBM appear to have put it back somewhere else in the
market.
Analysts say that individual investors have been switching from IBM into
either growth-oriented small-capitalisation stocks, which are expected to do
particularly well from the economic recovery, or into the big computer
companies that are profiting most from IBM's travails.
Microsoft, for example, is up almost 20 per cent this year, and Intel -
which earlier this week told investors that its fourth quarter earnings
would come in about 25 per cent higher than the Dollars 1.43bn reported in
the third quarter - is up almost 75 per cent since the New Year. IBM, in
contrast, has fallen 42 per cent so far this year.
All in all, it was not a good week for blue-chips in general. On Wednesday
Ford announced that it would cut its workforce in Europe by more than 10,000
by the end of next year in an attempt to reduce its production capacity to
fit a shrinking European market. The job cuts will cost Ford a Dollars 419m
charge in the fourth quarter.
Two other important constituents of the Dow, Minnesota Mining &amp;
Manufacturing and Goodyear, also fell into the market's disfavour. Shares in
3m dropped sharply on Thursday after the diversified manufacturing group
said it was comfortable with the new, lower 1992 earnings forecast of
Dollars 6.50 a share put out by several Wall Street analysts. Goodyear
tumbled after broking house Merrill Lynch downgraded its rating on the stock
from 'above average' to 'neutral'.
That the market has held up so well in the face of bad performances from
some of its bluest of blue-chips suggests that investors remain optimistic
about the longer-term outlook for the economy and corporate earnings.
The market even seemed to draw comfort from this week's economic 'summit'
hosted in Little Rock, Arkansas, by President-elect Clinton. Although the
political pundits were eager to label the meeting a publicity stunt, the
exhaustive debate on the economic ills of the US, and what to do about them,
seemed to strike a chord with the public.
 ---------------------------------
Monday      3,292.20 - 11.88
Tuesday     3,284.36 -  7.84
Wednesday   3,255.18 - 29.18
Thursday    3,269.23 + 14.05
Friday      3,313.27 + 44.04
 ---------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1105</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Markets: All aboard for some vertical integration - The
Bottom Line
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SKAPINKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN hordes of German and British holidaymakers descend on the same
sun-blessed paradise, it is usually time for the discerning to go somewhere
else. In both countries, travel groups have decided that it is not enough to
arrange holidays; they also have to sell them and fly the customers to their
destinations. Vertical integration is the latest holiday industry vogue.
Many of the claimed benefits, however, are still unproved.
This week, Owners Abroad, the UK's second biggest tour operator, announced a
tie-up with Thomas Cook, the second biggest travel agents' chain. Thomas
Cook, which is taking a 10.3 per cent share in Owners, was itself acquired
earlier this year by LTU, a large German travel company.
Airtours, the third biggest tour operator, bought the Pickfords travel
agency last September. Thomson, the industry leader, owns Lunn Poly.
This consolidation has been the travel industry's most notable development
in 1992. But the year is not over, and it might get more interesting.
Owners Abroad received a preliminary approach earlier this year from
Airtours, which expressed an interest in buying it. A takeover might raise
monopoly issues, as Thomson and the enlarged Airtours would between them
have close to 60 per cent of the UK package tour market.
Talk of a bid for Owners has helped to lift its share price from a low of
46p last September to 90p at yesterday's close. Generally, however, the
market has not been well disposed towards the holiday companies over the
past year.
In 1991, Owners Abroad out-performed the FT All-Share index for most of the
year. Airtours rose further than any other stock. As with most holiday
romances, however, the attraction proved transitory.
The market's disillusionment is based on a belief that travel companies'
margins are too vulnerable to price-cutting, although the criticism is more
properly directed at Owners Abroad than Airtours. Airtours saw some erosion
of margin, but pre-tax profits for the year to end-September 1992 still rose
32.7 per cent to Pounds 36.5m on turnover up 40 per cent to Pounds 405.6m.
Owners Abroad saw 1992 profits fall 19.3 per cent to Pounds 25.5m on
turnover up 19.9 per cent to Pounds 772m. Owners said profits were depressed
by a Pounds 4.9m restructuring charge which followed the move from London to
cheaper premises. The rest of the fall was the result of this summer's
price-cutting.
Howard Klein, Owners Abroad's chairman, described these as non-recurring
events. Moving offices might be a one-off, but price-cutting is as
non-recurring as flaming Mediterranean sunsets.
This is the real problem with vertical integration. Thomson has not been
able to use its ownership of Lunn Poly to boost sales but Airtours and
Owners Abroad, being more aggressive, might be able to. If they are too
successful, however, Thomson will cut its prices to maintain its market
share, as it has done before.
Klein protests that his company plans to reduce the number of holidays it
sells in 1993 by 5 per cent. At the same time, however, he says its
association with Thomas Cook will increase its sales in the longer term. If
this is the case, a rise in market share is a likely prospect, with the
price-cutting consequences that follow.
Owners Abroad is expected to make Pounds 34m pre-tax profits in 1993, with
earnings per share of 11p. The Airtours forecast is Pounds 41.5m pre-tax
profits and earnings per share of 30p. The prospective multiples are 8 and 9
respectively.
Given the relative resilience of the holiday business during the recession,
that might seem a harsh judgment. But it will take a few summers of price
stability to change it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1106</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / The Long View: A year of house arrest
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEVER SELL the stock market when interest rates are going down
significantly, however awful the prospects for individual companies might
appear to be.
A year ago, therefore, I thought it right to be modestly bullish about the
UK stock market, even though I did not believe that there would be any
economic recovery in 1992. I thought we were heading for a serious currency
crisis and, indeed, I suggested that after a quiet 1991 for the European
exchange rate mechanism, the ensuing year would present immense challenges
to the whole system.
So much for the broad picture, but the details were not so easy to foresee.
For instance, German short-term interest rates proved even slower to come
down than I expected, and DM money market rates have dropped only half a
percentage point during the 12 months. That put disastrous pressure on the
ERM. In the end, therefore, UK share prices enjoyed two substantial bonuses,
not just from the unexpectedly clear Conservative victory in the April
election but also from the complete exit of sterling from the ERM in
September.
The big 'what if . . .' question for 1992 must be about the possibility that
Labour might have won the election and then tried to hold a devalued pound
within the ERM, at still-high interest rates. That combination easily could
have pushed the FT-SE 100 index below 2,000. As it is, short-term sterling
rates have dropped by 3 1/2 points over the year, although the drop in
long-dated gilt-edged yields has been only 0.7 of a point. In any case, the
summer crisis sent Footsie down to a low of 2,281 on August 25, having hit a
post-election peak of 2,737 on May 11. But, thanks to the departure from the
ERM and the subsequent tumble in money rates, all that ground was recovered:
the year's high (almost regained last night) was 2,792 on December 1.
The overall rate of return on UK equities so far this year to date has been
about 17 per cent and, interestingly, you could have done as well in
index-linked gilts, which enjoyed a strong surge after Black Wednesday,
September 16. Fixed-interest gilts have, curiously enough, given very much
the same return, too; domestic portfolio strategists will note that, for the
second year running, there has been little to choose between bonds and
equities. The big relative losers have been those still holding liquid
assets, with the return down from 12.3 per cent the year before to something
under 10 per cent for 1992 - with worse to come, although the decline is
broadly justified by the fall in the rate of inflation.
But the game in 1992 was, of course, all about currencies. You could have
earned 23 or 24 per cent gross on Deutsche mark or dollar deposits. D-mark
and dollar bonds have performed a few points better than that. For
sterling-based investors, it has been very much the year of international
fixed income (the year's top unit trust sector). Apart from the currency
effect, though, most of the equity markets around the world have been
disappointing. You had to dabble in politically-risky south east Asian
markets like Hong Kong and Thailand to make decent profits.
Wall Street is only slightly higher in dollar terms, having moved
relentlessly sideways in what has been the least volatile year for US
equities since 1912. Japan is well down on the year, although also usefully
up on its own August low point. Continental European markets have generally
been dull.
A sluggish world economy has provided the backdrop for the general
disappointment in the financial markets. Economic growth is likely to have
been only 1.5 per cent on average in 1992 for the 24 member states of the
OECD. There are serious debt problems in the US, Japan, the UK and
elsewhere, and part of the burden of this debt is in the process of being
transferred from the private sector to the public finances; according to
broker James Capel, the total net government borrowing by the top seven
countries next year is likely to be Dollars 750bn, so it is scarcely
surprising that the markets are under a cloud.
All the same, British investors have escaped yet again from the consequences
of economic failure. Pension funds could well see a return of more than 15
per cent against a growth of under 6 per cent in their pay-linked
liabilities. In August, of course, things did not seem at all so rosy. But
now, institutional fund managers, who often have an 85 per cent exposure to
the equity markets at home and abroad, are rubbing their hands with
satisfaction over the UK's return to old devaluationary and inflationary
ways.
In one area, however, true calamity has struck. The residential housing
market is stuck in its worst-ever slump and the long-term economic
consequences could be dire. More than 1m families have been wiped out
financially and millions more have had their confidence destroyed.
House prices have fallen by about 8 per cent in 1992, slicing perhaps Pounds
80bn off the notional wealth of British citizens. On the other side of the
balance sheet, the debt mountain heaped upon home-owners has begun to erode
only slowly in proportion to incomes, although the sharp interest rate drop
has at least eased the burden of monthly instalments. This stupendous policy
error of the 1980s will take many years to correct. Sterling devaluations
are old hat, but such a house market meltdown is unprecedented.
Goodbye 1992, the year in which, with one September shuffle, chancellor
Norman Lamont was free - but millions of home-buyers stayed trapped.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1107</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / The child victims of India's slave trade: India's poor sell
their children as cheap labour without suspecting the true nature of the
transaction
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE dusty care-worn villagers wait expectantly. They have travelled to
Mirzapur, the sprawling north Indian city which is the centre of the
country's carpet industry, hoping for a miracle. The man they have come so
far to see smiles reassuringly and says: 'We'll get your children back.' He
picks up the telephone and so begins a desperate effort to rescue the men's
sons from illegal bonded labour.
The villagers have travelled by bus for days from their poverty-stricken
farms. All are illiterate Untouchables, members of India's lowest caste and
an easy target for exploitation. To ease their lives of abject poverty, they
have sold their sons to carpet loom owners in return for Rs500 each and
promises of well-paid work for the boys. Now, they want them back.
This tall man with the black beard is their last hope. He is Kailaish
Satyarthi, a 37-year-old former electrical engineer, who has given up his
career to become a social activist. To the horror of his family, he has also
abandoned his own caste, the priestly Brahmins, to fight for the rights of
Untouchables.
Satyarthi telephones Suresh Kumar Singh, the local magistrate, who is
required by law to investigate violations of India's child labour
legislation. But he is unobtainable, said by officials to be 'too busy' to
answer the call. After a fruitless six-hour wait, Satyarthi, accompanied by
fellow campaigners against child servitude and a number of journalists,
storms Singh's office - only to find it empty.
They wait in vain for a further hour, sitting on chairs before a large desk
on which is written the motto: 'Good public relations is the best policy'.
Eventually, a message comes, proposing a 7pm meeting at Singh's house.
Armed guards meet the group at the magistrate's colonial-style mansion. They
lead the way inside where a smiling Singh apologises to Satyarthi for the
delay - and promptly suggests postponing the meeting to the next day. Barely
able to control himself, Satyarthi refuses. He insists that Singh or one his
subordinates accompanies the group to rescue the children. 'It's your duty,'
he argues.
Singh asks for the location of the two villages where the children are
believed to be held and promises, in the best bureaucratic tradition, to see
what he can do.
CHILD labour is banned in India in many industries, including carpet
weaving. Bonded labour, where the workers' freedom of movement is
restricted, is illegal for employees of any age.
But India lacks the resources to properly police laws on child labour, as on
many other social evils. The authorities are often loathe to upset
businessmen such as the loom owners of Mirzapur who make a profitable living
employing children to produce hand-knotted carpets for the showrooms of
London, Berlin and New York.
Still less does the country have the means to quickly eradicate the economic
pressures which force parents to sell their children into bondage, not just
in the carpet industry but also in metalwork, quarrying and the manufacture
of fireworks.
Moreover, even though caste equality is enshrined in the Indian
constitution, caste consciousness makes many Indians insensitive to
exploitation of Untouchables.
Slavery is an emotive term, child slavery particularly so. But it is
difficult to see the bonded child labourers of Mirzapur as anything other
than child slaves. The words are repugnant to carpet manufacturers and to
officials of the textiles ministry.
However, as early as 1984, a local government official in Uttar Pradesh
province, which includes Mirzapur, admitted the truth in a note for a
visiting labour ministry delegation. He wrote: 'The apprentices and wage
earners. . . often work in conditions of semi-slavery.'
Ignorance, greed and corruption ensure that the law is widely flouted in
rural India. A Supreme Court Commission estimates that 75,000 children work
in the carpet industry alone - most of them bonded workers. Anti-child
labour campaigners put the figure at 300,000. Carpet industry employers
maintain such figures are 'lies' and insist there is no bonded child labour
in the industry. The events of Satyarthi's rescue raid, which I witnessed,
suggest otherwise.
The mission begins the morning after our tense meeting with the magistrate.
Somewhat to our surprise, Singh has been as good as his word and arranged
for a junior magistrate and four policemen armed with ancient ex-army rifles
to travel with us. (It later emerges that Singh also found time to warn
carpet industry bosses about the raids, as Satyarthi had feared.)
One father, Paltan Ram, said he sold his eight-years-old son Madan Lal to a
loom owner for Rs500. Only later did he realise he, along with other
parents, were losing their children for good.
To their horror, they discovered loom owners banned home visits and,
sometimes, contact of any kind. Paltan Ram says when he tried to visit his
son, he was driven away by a man armed with a shotgun. He and the others
arrived in Mirzapur after hearing about Satyarthi's campaign from his
co-workers, volunteers who travel to remote villages to collect information
and contact parents who want to recover their children. (Although the
families did not say, another spur may be the government grants of Rs6,250
for the families of rescued bonded labourers.)
Satyarthi tries to reassure the fathers as they stand in silence waiting for
the rescue to begin. The junior magistrate seems distinctly unhappy about
his assignment. Perhaps he is afraid there might be violence - as there was
on previous rescue raids. Perhaps he does not relish the idea of challenging
the carpet industry bosses, a power in the land in Mirzapur.
We drive out of the city in a dusty convoy of battered vehicles. Along the
roadside stand the weavers' workshops, mostly huts housing a weaver and his
family and one or two wooden looms. Every so often, there are large
factories and warehouses - the premises of exporters who dominate the
industry. They take orders from overseas buyers and then parcel out work to
the loom owners, who in turn employ the weavers.
As we reach deeper into the countryside, the road deteriorates into a sandy
track. The cars swerve constantly to avoid children, animals and the
occasional bullock cart. The boys' fathers sit in silence, their faces drawn
and fingers clenched. Satyarthi says he is worried that the delays may have
given the loom owners a chance to learn about the planned raids.
As we near the first of the two chosen villages, the vehicles slow down and
stop. We jump out and run through a maize field to some mud-brick huts
surrounded by trees. Satyarthi heads straight for a large hut with a loom
outside it, and discovers three boys cowering inside.
Satyarthi rushes outside. 'There must be more. Search everywhere,' he shouts
to his fellow campaigners. The activists fan out across the village and into
the surrounding fields. They find three more boys. Six altogether. Satyarthi
is disappointed - he had expected eight. The loom owner is also missing.
Satyarthi urges the group back into the cars - it is essential to reach the
second village before word about the first raid spreads. Already about 50
villagers are milling around us. As before, we drive as close as possible to
the village, and then rush in on foot. Satyarthi sprints into a courtyard
where the looms are housed behind walls studded with broken glass. But it is
too late. The boys he expected to find are gone.
Paltan Ram, Madan Lal's father, is distraught. 'I want to die,' he says,
tears welling up in his tired, blood-shot eyes.
But all is not lost. Searching through one of the village huts, Satyarthi's
co-workers find the loom owner, Govind Singh. They drag him before the
junior magistrate, demanding action. 'What are you waiting for? The parents
are here. The loom owner is here. You have the power to hold a summary
trial,' shouts Satyarthi. He pulls out a file containing the details of
child labour legislation. 'The maximum penalty is three years' jail,' he
says, glaring at the loom owner.
The junior magistrate now seems more uncomfortable than ever. As he sits
wondering what to do, the loom owner's servants come out with water and
biscuits and beds for the visitors to sit on. Satyarthi takes written
statements from the fathers, including lines expressing their fears that the
loom owner might kill their children. He threatens the loom owner, saying he
would be charged with kidnapping unless he produced the boys.
For more than an hour, we sit in the sun as the junior magistrate, the loom
owner and Satyarthi talk and shout at each other. Eventually, the loom owner
caves in and promises to surrender the children. He leaves, accompanied by
the junior magistrate. Another 30 minutes' wait. Finally, the junior
magistrate and the loom owner return, bringing with them three boys. Shyly,
they take their fathers' hands, barely understanding what is going on. Among
them is Madan Lal.
Paltan Ram hugs his son saying: 'I feel so good.' Madan Lal allows Satyarthi
to examine him. His arms are covered with scars from scabies, caused by a
common allergy to wool. On one finger he has a cut, black with diesel oil,
which the loom owner applied to the wound to stop the blood from staining
the carpets.
The junior magistrate reluctantly arrests Govind Singh, the loom owner.
Satyarthi is triumphant. The rescued boys and their fathers walk quietly
back to the cars, overwhelmed by what has happened.
Back in Mirzapur, the boys are registered by clerks at the district
magistrate's office. Madan Lal is the youngest. The oldest is 15 and has
spent five years at the loom. All look thin, and several have signs of
scabies.
For the most part, the boys have few complaints about their food, which
consisted of thin soups, vegetables and bread. But in almost every other way
they were abused. They worked 12 hours a day from 6am to 6pm, with three
half-hour breaks for meals - seven days a week, every week of the year.
They were rarely allowed out of the huts in which they worked and slept. One
says: 'Even when I went to relieve myself (in the fields), someone went with
me.'
They were never paid. If they worked slowly, they were beaten, sometimes
with a wooden stick. Worst of all was the common treatment for cuts to the
fingers suffered during weaving. The loom owners would scrape the powder off
a match on to the wound and then set fire to it to staunch the bleeding. 'It
hurt very much,' says 12-year-old Chilatra Choudhray.
Above all, the children suffered acute psychological distress. Madan Lal's
only thought was for his mother. 'I always missed my mother. I always cried
for my mother but there was nobody there to listen.'
Satyarthi says that since the early 1980s, he has helped in the release of
5,000 children, almost all of them Untouchables. He has won financial
support from western charities such as Britain's Christian Aid and Bread for
the World, a German group.
The employers, he says, only started to take notice when he began
publicising the raids - which is why he invites journalists along.
Now he is trying to generate interest in the plight of Indian child
labourers in Europe and the US - where the bulk of Mirzapur's carpets are
sold. He believes that if western consumers can be taught to take notice of
the fate of whales, they can also be made aware of the sufferings of child
labourers.
Carpet industry leaders loathe Satyarthi. Despite the evidence, including
the Supreme Court Commission's survey, they flatly deny the existence of
large-scale bonded labour. 'There may be isolated cases in remote villages,
but no more,' says Mr Prakash Chandra Jaiswal, president of the All India
Carpet Manufacturers Association, and a prominent exporter.
Jaiswal claims that allegations of parents selling children to loom owners
stem from a misunderstanding. In such transactions, loom owners have merely
made loans to the parents - advances on the wages the children will earn.
Moreover, such cases concern a small minority of children. Most child
labourers work in the homes of their parents or relatives where they learn a
valuable trade.
Nevertheless, Jaiswal and his fellow employers are worried enough to have
planned counter-measures. With the support of the textiles ministry, they
intend to begin to inspect looms. Any weaver found employing non-family
children will be blacklisted.
A breakaway group of carpet manufacturers is even introducing early next
year a special trademark certifying carpets as 'made with child-free
labour'. However, Satyarthi does not trust the employers. He argues checks
will be worthless unless they are carried out with the co-operation of
campaign groups.
India has been particularly slow in ensuring that children attend school.
Elsewhere, education has proved a valuable way of teaching parents that
their children are worth nurturing, if for no other reason that their
ultimate earnings will be higher with education than without.
Myron Wiener, an American social scientist and author of The Child and the
State in India, says just 38 per cent of Indian children complete five years
of education, compared with 70 per cent in China. Wiener argues that it is
not poverty which prevents India investing more in its children but caste
prejudices.
Upper caste Indians, who dominate central and local administration, simply
do not care enough about the children of the lower castes. Satyarthi agrees:
'I hate caste. After I started eating with Untouchables, my own family
refused to eat with me. But I chose what I wanted to do. It is the
Untouchables who suffer the most.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1108</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Watchdog accuses generators of inflating electricity prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN'S TWO leading generators, National Power and PowerGen, were accused
yesterday by Professor Stephen Littlechild, the electricity regulator, of
using their dominant market position to push up electricity prices.
In the Review of Pool Prices report, he said the companies constituted a
duopoly which worked against consumers' interests by creating uncertainty
and discouraging competition.
Although the report was further evidence of concern about the structure of
the post-privatisation electricity industry, Prof Littlechild stopped short
of accusing the generators of collusion.
Instead, he said, they both used their market strength to raise prices, even
at the cost of losing market share. He found higher prices were justified
because the generators' production costs were generally higher than prices
at which they could sell in the 'pool', the wholesale power market.
Because of the technicalities of the pool, the generators' practices might
not lead to higher profits, or push up electricity prices for domestic
consumers. But Prof Littlechild repeated charges that the generators are
pricing coal-based electricity too high in the contracts they are
negotiating with distribution companies. These contracts are crucial to
British Coal's future.
Yesterday's report investigated complaints by big industrial electricity
users about rising pool prices. Although Prof Littlechild finds no evidence
of malpractice, the report will add to pressure for a restructuring of the
generation market in England and Wales, where National Power and PowerGen
hold 72 per cent between them.
Review of Pool Prices. Office of Electricity Regulation, Hagley House,
Hagley Road, Edgbaston, Birmingham B16 8OG.
Sir Leon Brittan, EC competition commissioner, told the Trades Union
Congress yesterday he would investigate their complaint that the UK energy
market is unfair to coal.
Coal cost forecast 'revised upwards', Page 5
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1109</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Major urges caution on Bosnia: Bush and Clinton pressed to
accept gradual increase in pressure on Serbia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor and MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON, UNITED NATIONS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR last night urged President George Bush and President-elect
Bill Clinton to accept a gradual increase of pressure on Serbia rather than
immediate military action to enforce the no-fly zone over Bosnia.
As Mr Major joined Mr Bush in Camp David after a telephone conversation with
Mr Clinton, his officials voiced confidence that this weekend's talks would
result in the passage by Christmas of a United Nations resolution
authorising military action to ground Serbian flights. The resolution would
be accompanied by sanctions designed to reinforce Serbia's isolation.
Mr Major's talks came amid signs that western governments were preparing to
give full international recognition to the former Yugoslav province of
Macedonia which is also threatened by Serb expansionism.
At last week's Edinburgh summit, Greece blocked European Community
recognition of Macedonia because of objections to its name.
But senior British officials believe that the stalemate in the EC will not
prevent Macedonia securing full UN membership in the first two or three
months of next year.
The officials also stressed the 'deterrent' element in the new UN resolution
on Bosnia, adding that Mr Major remained firmly opposed to immediate
military action against aircraft breaching the no-fly zone. In hectic
negotiations in Europe this week both the US and France had pressed for a
tougher military response to Serbian violations, officials said.
In talks in Ottawa with Mr Brian Mulroney, Mr Major won the support of the
Canadian prime minister for his cautious stance. Both agreed that passage of
a resolution authorising enforcement of the no-fly zone could be followed by
a graduated response to violations.
Serbian aircraft might first be warned against taking off and then face the
prospect of being forced to land rather than being shot down.
In Sarajevo yesterday, Lord Owen, co-chairman of the international
conference on Yugoslavia, persuaded Bosnian Moslems to agree to attend
face-to-face local talks with Serbs and Croats. 'There is a readiness that
wasn't there in September to talk . . . Whether it is serious we shall see,'
he said.
Michael Littlejohns reports from the United Nations: The UN Security Council
yesterday authorised UN troops to escort an EC delegation bound for Bosnia
to investigate reports of the systematic detention and rape of Moslem women
by Serbian militias. In a unanimous resolution, the Council condemned 'these
acts of unspeakable brutality'.
Separately, the UN General Assembly, in a non-binding resolution, called for
the use of force and the removal of the arms embargo against Bosnia. All 12
members of the EC, plus Canada, were among 57 abstentions, in a vote carried
by 102 votes with none against.
The US supported the motion which was initiated by Islamic states.
New push for Gatt accord, Page 2
West blows hot and cold on Bosnia, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1110</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Hong Kong
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Jardine Matheson doubtless deplores being caught up in the cross fire
between Beijing and Mr Chris Patten. But one cannot resist a sneaking
admiration for China's adept manipulation of the Hong Kong stock market.
Although it leaves the Hang Seng temporarily vulnerable, it shows China has
a much more sophisticated grasp of capitalist ways than even the most ardent
Russian reformer. That may be to Hong Kong's advantage after 1997.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1111</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Television
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The market's response to Thames Television's failure to win the Channel 5
licence is puzzling, not least the 3 per cent rise in Carlton Communications
shares. True, Thames planned to roll out the new station in London. That was
bad news for Carlton, as holder of the London weekday franchise, and LWT.
Without a new competitor the available pool of advertising revenue will be
split fewer ways. But television accounts for only a modest percentage of
Carlton's profits. With television advertising revenue weak, the outlook for
Carlton Television is far from cloudless.
The 12 per cent slide in Thames shares follows a strong run on the
assumption that the licence was in the bag. It is not certain, though, that
Channel 5 was such a wonderful prize. Since Thames was the only bidder, it
can only be assumed that the rest of the industry took a sceptical view. The
company may be better off on the sidelines.
That is little help in valuing Thames shares. Talk of a judicial review
aside, Thames will be hard pressed to find a route back into mainstream
broadcasting. Its interest in the satellite repeats channel UK Gold is
promising but limited by the size of the satellite television audience. That
leaves Thames as a programming producer of undoubted quality but unproven
margins.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1112</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Asda Group
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Archie Norman must be something of a local hero in Asda's home town of
Leeds. In little more than a year he has turned round a grocery chain that
was heading for severe financial trouble. As yesterday's interim figures
revealed, Asda's trading decline has been halted, its debt mountain reduced,
and its profitability restored. Shareholders who backed Asda's emergency
rights issue at 35p must be feeling smug: the shares closed yesterday at
61p.
Sceptics will mutter that it is all too good to last. And they may well be
right. Although Mr Norman has undoubtedly made an impressive start, he has
yet to show a strategy for reviving long-term growth. It will be hard to pay
down borrowings of Pounds 472m from normal trading activities. A capital
expenditure budget of Pounds 130m looks inadequate to launch a discount
chain such as Dales. A further Pounds 200m of sales will be lost to
competitor openings this year.
The company's management may seek to exploit its shining reputation by
staging a second rights issue. The City may be inclined to back it. But
Asda's long-term survival is still not secure. That overhanging doubt may
takethe wind out of the share price's recent rise.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1113</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: UK equities
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Dramatic as it seems, yesterday's 50-point rise only brings the FT-SE 100
back roughly to where it was two weeks ago. The technical explanation is
that market-makers had been clearing the decks to absorb stock from
institutions which had been arbitraging the December index future. Since
that contract expired yesterday, the index again represents underlying
perceptions of value. If so, the market is taking a lot of recovery on
trust: witness the way buying has spread to cyclical second-tier stocks,
espec-ially capital goods issues which are under-represented in the main
index.
At another level the market seems simply to be anticipating a new year
rally, but at this rate it will quickly reach levels which brokers have
pencilled in for the end of 1993. Yesterday's M4 money supply figures,
showing a seasonally adjusted Pounds 600m fall in November sterling lending,
arguably point to doubt on the recovery. But the government is in no hurry
to cut interest rates further. Even if it did, the outflow of building
society funds suggests the fall would not be fully passed through to
mortgage rates.
To sustain its advance, the market will need some good news in the new year:
evidence, for example, that retailers really did have a bumper Christmas, or
an early cut in German interest rates. It would be rash to count on either.
Indeed, January might see the Bundesbank delaying rate cuts while the German
economy turns even more decisively down. Those who have been snapping up
cyclical stocks may yet burn their fingers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1114</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Tesco shops abroad
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Tesco's diversification into France represents a small step for the UK's
second-biggest food retailer but may be seen as a symbolic leap for the
industry. The move is one of the strongest signals that its leaders are
intent on diversification after the current surge of superstore openings
runs its course.
By the mid-1990s, the UK food retailing landscape will have a very different
feel. Sainsbury, Tesco, and Safeway will have added another 250 superstores,
exerting effective dominance at the upper end of the market. Their stores
will be generating large cash flows. Some of it will be ploughed back into
replacement stores; the remainder will probably be used to diversify.
Sainsbury will expand its US chain. Tesco has now set its sights on the
continent.
As a first step, the choice of Catteau can hardly be faulted. The purchase
is big enough for Tesco to learn about the French market and small enough to
limit the risks - Catteau's profits represent less than 3 per cent of
Tesco's. The intriguing question is what comes next. If the strategy is to
make any sense, a sizeable acquisition must surely follow. In spite of
Tesco's management skills, shareholders may yet wonder whether that would be
wise. In some countries food retailers are run as safe utility companies
with predictable earnings and high dividend payouts. UK grocers seem set to
chance their arm rather than do the same.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1115</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow climbs as triple witching
boosts trade
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
BLUE-CHIP stocks jumped sharply in heavy trading on US stockmarkets
yesterday after the expiration of stock and stock-index futures and options
generated huge demand for leading industrial issues, writes Patrick
Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 44.04 at 3,313.27, its
high for the day. The more broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 also ended
firmer, up 5.84 at 441.27, a new record close. Other indices were less
buoyant, with the Amex composite finishing 1.61 higher at 392.03, and the
Nasdaq composite up 2.83 at 661.29.
Because of the 'triple witching' of futures and options expirations, trading
volume on the NYSE totalled 371m shares, the busiest day on the Big Board
since the mini-crash of October 16 1989 when volume reached over 400m
shares. Rises outnumbered declines by 1,292 to 567.
After five consecutive days of decline, Thursday's 14-point gain in the Dow
was interpreted by some market observers as the prelude to a Christmas-week
and New Year rally.
Consequently, the market opened yesterday in a positive mood, with investors
keen not to be left out of what some analysts were labelling a significant
end-of-year mini-rally. Sentiment was aided by another strong showing from
stocks overseas. Wall Street has been worried recently about the slump in
European economies, so any sign of confidence from Europe's stock markets is
welcomed by US investors.
Among individual stocks, Thursday's recovery in IBM proved fleeting, with
investors returning to pummel the stock in the wake of the news earlier in
the week that its annual dividend may be threatened because of the cost to
the company of its radical restructuring plans. IBM fell Dollars 1 5/8 to
Dollars 51 3/8 , a new 11-year low.
Other big computer stocks were mostly firmer. Compaq was particularly
strong, rising Dollars  7/8 to Dollars 45 5/8 in turnover of 1.6m shares,
Hewlett-Packard edged Dollars  1/4 higher to Dollars 65 7/8 , and Motorola
gained Dollars  1/8 at Dollars 104 3/4 .
Minnesota Mining &amp; Manufacturing, which fell sharply on Thursday after the
company said that it was comfortable with new, lower estimates of its
forthcoming earnings, recovered all of its lost ground, jumping Dollars 2
1/2 to Dollars 103.
Van Dorn jumped Dollars 1 7/8 to Dollars 20 3/8 on the news that the company
is to be bought by Crown Cork &amp; Seal for about Dollars 175m, or Dollars 21 a
share. Crown Cork &amp; Seal fell Dollars  7/8 to Dollars 38 3/4 .
On the Nasdaq market, Varlen climbed Dollars 3 1/2 to Dollars 27 1/2 after
the company's principal shareholder dropped a proposed public offering of
stock, but agreed to sell a 30 per cent stake in Varlen for Dollars 17 a
share.
Canada
TORONTO share prices rallied late in the session to post a healthy gain
yesterday and on the week.
Based on preliminary data, the TSE-300 index was up 16.08 points, or 0.49
per cent, to 3,320.41, with advancing issues topping declines 354 to 283.
Volume was 49.077m shares valued at CDollars 464.8m compared with Thursday's
44.712m shares worth CDollars 375.7m. On the week, the index was up about 53
points, or 1.6 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1116</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): HK suffers again from
China comments
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BUYING by foreign investors and public funds, and short-covering and
arbitrage trading buoyed share prices and increased volume on the Nikkei
average, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The 225-issue index rose 242.83 to 17,680.74, a gain of 1.4 per cent on the
week, surpassing the 200-day moving average of 17,431 for the first time
since November last year. The index opened at the day's low of 17,508.02 and
rose to the day's high of 17,712.04 just before the close.
Volume rose to 300m shares from 234m. Advances led declines by 704 to 293
with 150 issues remaining unchanged. The Topix index of all first section
stocks rose 17.92 to 1,343.77 and, in London, the ISE/Nikkei 50 index rose
by 2.13 to 1,093.22.
While the 200-day average has been considered a technical resistance level,
some traders were cool over the Nikkei's rise. Mr Yasuo Ueki at Nikko
Securities said: 'The index closing above the 200-day moving average doesn't
have much technical importance, but will have some positive psychological
effects.'
High-technology issues were bought by foreign investors. Toshiba gained Y9
to Y645 and NEC rose Y11 to Y696. Traders said foreigners were adjusting
positions ahead of a possible cut in the official discount rate during the
Christmas holidays.
Investors were encouraged by reports that the Bank of Japan was supporting
Hyogo Bank, an ailing regional bank based in west Japan, as it reflected the
financial authorities' willingness to bail out troubled financial
institutions. Banks were higher despite denials of financial aid by the
central bank. Hyogo Bank rose Y100 to Y610, while Sumitomo Bank, a creditor
of Hyogo, gained Y30 to Y1,910.
Large-capitalisation issues were higher on purchases by public funds. Nippon
Steel, the most active issue of the day, rose Y5 to Y299 and NKK gained Y7
to Y266.
In Osaka, the OSE average rose 159.76 to 19,089.77 in volume of 39.7m
shares. The index closed above the 19,000 level for the first time in five
trading days on buying by public funds and foreign investors.
Roundup
HONG Kong again came under pressure following comments from the Chinese
leadership. Seoul was closed for the presidential elections.
HONG KONG fell sharply after China launched an attack on the Jardine Group
over its support for Governor Chris Patten's democratic reforms. The Hang
Seng index fell 136.80 to 5,192.66, 1.15 per cent down on the week, in
turnover of HKDollars 3.04bn. Jardine Matheson plunged 9.5 per cent on the
news before recovering slightly to close down HKDollars 2.75 or 6 per cent
at HKDollars 42.75, while Jardine Strategic was HKDollars 1.10 lower at
HKDollars 19.40.
SINGAPORE closed higher in late trading as foreign institutions came into
the market. The Straits Times Industrial index rose 23.49 to 1,491.80, a 3
per cent improvement on the week. KUALA LUMPUR's composite index gained 4.97
to 641.08 for a 0.9 per cent rise on the week.
TAIWAN eased on profit-taking ahead of today's parliamentary elections. The
weighted index lost 10.68 to 3,657.99, 2 per cent lower on the week.
MANILA closed lower in listless trading as the composite index shed 10.92 to
1,215.81, a fall of 1.3 per cent on the week. Combined turnover was 216.3m
pesos. PLDT gave up 20 pesos to 825 pesos.
AUSTRALIA was stronger, aided by a good performance from BHP, up 20 cents at
ADollars 12.84 following the release of interim results. The All Ordinaries
index put on 16.2 to 1,515.7, 0.9 per cent up on the week.
Westpac moved up 14 cents to ADollars 3.18 in reaction to the resignation of
the managing director on Thursday.
BOMBAY rose on hopes that the federal government would survive a
no-confidence motion. The BSE index closed 76.73 up at 2,476.89.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1117</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG recovered some of its early losses. The overall index, which
had earlier seen 3,203, ended 9 lower at 3,213. Industrials finished down 19
at 4,280 while the gold index shed 2 to 835. De Beers, down R1.75 at R57.25,
fell back on reports that Siberia will soon have a secondary market in
diamonds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1118</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Paris tells its own story as
senior bourses advance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE recovery on Wall Street, the strength of the dollar and the effect of
options and futures expiries were all advanced yesterday as reasons why
bourses moved up, writes Our Markets Staff. However, the French told another
story.
PARIS saw strong overseas institutional interest on the view that the franc
will be devalued in the near future. The CAC-40 index closed up 24.89 at
1,760.12. After a volatile week the index was barely changed, while today's
turnover was moderate at FFr2.4bn.
There was broad support for leading stocks with Bancaire showing one of the
day's best performances, mostly due to late buying, as it closed FFr22.9 or
6.5 per cent higher at FFr373.0.
Elsewhere Elf rose FFr10 to FFr334, Paribas gained FFr9.70 to FFr349.30,
Havas rose FFr18.50 to FFr418.00 and Suez improved FFr8.60 to FFr242.00.
Even Carrefour managed a rise of FFr4 to FFr2,206 in spite of reports of a
generally depressed French retailing sector, with volume down 10 per cent in
November.
FRANKFURT was lifted mostly by short-covering linked to the expiry of
options and futures contracts, described as seriously illiquid and choppy by
one senior DTB trader. The DAX index closed 15.87 higher at 1,492.04, 1.1
per cent higher on the week, as turnover mushroomed to DM10.4bn against
DM3.5bn on Thursday.
Prominent on the day were Allianz, DM40 higher at DM1,905 and a byword for
volatility at times like these; Hoechst, up DM3.40 at DM238 and extending
its run of relative strength against BASF and Bayer; and Degussa and
Metallgesellschaft, dollar sensitive and cyclical, up DM7.80 to DM330.80 and
DM8.50 to DM332.50 respectively.
MILAN recovered again, the Comit index ending 5.33 higher at 425.68, to
close a week initially depressed by political fears with a rise of 0.7 per
cent.
News of a higher rate at a key Bank of Italy money market tender took some
of the steam out of business. Fiat slipped on the kerb, ending at L3,740,
down L60.
ZURICH, which had its own options and futures expiry, liked the stronger
dollar and the positive trend in early Wall Street trading. The SMI index
closed 17.3 higher at 2,046.0, 2.6 per cent higher on the week.
UBS bearers topped the active list and rose SFr11 to SFr846.
AMSTERDAM went into the weekend on a strong note encouraged by neighbouring
markets. The CBS Tendency index closed 0.5 higher at 103.5, a week's gain of
1.1 per cent. DSM lost Fl 1.50 to Fl 70.50 after the group confirmed earlier
forecasts of a fall in fourth quarter earnings.
MADRID was positive on corporate news with the general index closing 1.92
higher at 215.66, for a 1.5 per cent gain on the week.
News that the government is to alter legislation allowing higher rents on
properties to be charged lifted the sector, with Metrovacesa gaining Pta185
to Pta2,855 and Vallehermoso up Pta60 at Pta1,325.
STOCKHOLM was lifted by lower interest rates, the weaker domestic currency
and a buoyant forestry sector. The Affarsvarlden index advanced 27.0 to
900.3, nearly 2 per cent higher on the week, in heavy turnover of SKr1bn
after SKr713m. SCA was among the most active stocks, rising SKr19 to SKr116
after an upward revision of its 1992 earnings forecast.
OSLO improved following a cut in interest rates and the all-share index
closed 3.61 higher at 375.79, a 2.6 per cent fall on the week, in turnover
of NKr470m.
HELSINKI saw further profit-taking and the Hex index closed 13.9 down at
816.7, down 4.7 per cent on the week.
VIENNA continued to weaken with the ATX, down 4.18 at 716.77, setting a new
year's low and down 3.5 per cent on the week.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE ACTUARIES SHARE INDICES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
December 18 THE EUROPEAN SERIES
Hourly changes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                         Open    10.30     11.00    12.00
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1044.50  1046.32   1046.45  1046.86
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1128.16  1130.14   1129.78  1132.71
                        13.00    14.00     15.00    Close
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1048.12  1048.43   1050.25  1050.25
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1133.24  1134.02  1 136.11  1136.56
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       Dec 17    Dec 16    Dec 15    Dec 14    Dec 11
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1034.41   1036.62   1038.14   1041.18   1044.03
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1119.02   1117.67   1115.23   1116.33   1117.72
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value  1000 (26/10/90)  High/day: 100 - 1050.80; 200 - 1137.74
Low/day: 100 - 1044.30  200 - 1128.16
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1119</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: Nasdaq index performs on US recovery
hopes - Big technology stocks have provided a lift to the market's recent
performance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It has been an impressive year for Nasdaq, the second largest stock market
in the US.
By Wednesday, the composite index of Nasdaq stocks had gained 12 per cent
since the beginning of the year, setting several new records in the process.
In contrast, the Dow Jones Industrial Average of blue-chip stocks had risen
only 2.8 per cent over the comparable period, while the Standard &amp; Poor's
500, the broadest measure of market performance, had advanced just 4.0 per
cent.
The Nasdaq's upward climb has seen interruptions, including a prolonged
burst of self-doubt among investors earlier this year, when they began to
question the wisdom of buying small-capitalisation stocks at a time when the
economic recovery appeared to have stagnated.
This produced a sticky patch during the second quarter and the early part of
the third. However, a powerful surge of buying during the autumn more than
wiped out those losses and propelled the index to new highs.
Nasdaq trading has been heavy, and consistently so. The first eleven months
of 1992 were the most active in the market's 21-year history, with a rise of
nearly 16 per cent in the number of shares traded to 43.5bn.
So strong has the demand for Nasdaq stocks been that market volume has often
outstripped that on the New York Stock Exchange, much larger by
capitalisation and established for 180 years longer.
The economic context of the Nasdaq's performance cannot be ignored. All
parts of the stock market have thrived in recent months, primarily because
investors have become increasingly convinced that the economy is heading for
a period of inflation-free growth.
While most on Wall Street expect growth to remain sub-standard compared to
previous post-recessionary periods, it is likely to be more than could have
been hoped for six or eight months ago, when investors despaired of seeing
an end to the 'growth recession' - a long period of anaemic growth coupled
with sustained weakness in the jobs market.
Meanwhile, fresh funds continue to flow into equities, thanks to low
interest rates, which lure money out of low-yielding short-term assets.
The new money has been more than enough to match the supply of fresh stock,
especially shares issued by newly public companies. By the end of October
more than Dollars 11.1bn had been raised on the Nasdaq market from initial
public offerings (IPOs) of stock, compared with Dollars 7.84bn in all of
1991.
Small-capitalisation companies are expected to benefit most from the
recovering economy. 'People are looking for growth, and they're finding it
in small companies,' says Mr David Shulman, chief equity strategist at the
securities house Salomon Brothers.
But a good deal of the composite's recent strength has come from big
technology stocks, which are anything but 'small-cap'. Three in particular,
Microsoft, MCI Communications and Intel, have done very well lately.
Microsoft is up almost 20 per cent on the year and MCI up 25 per cent.
Intel, which this week told investors that its fourth quarter earnings would
come in 25 per cent higher than the Dollars 1.43bn earned in the third
quarter, is up a staggering 73 per cent.
Why do these three stand out? 'They are all on the right side of the
technology wars,' says an analyst.
On the wrong side of the technology wars is IBM. Its dreadful performance in
1992 (it is currently down almost 50 per cent from its year-high) has, along
with another troubled giant of US industry, General Motors, artificially
depressed both the Dow and the S &amp; P 500.
Other measures of small-cap stock performance show that the secondary market
is thriving. The Russell 2000 index of small companies, for example, is
currently up 26 per cent from the end of 1991.
Even relatively high p/e ratios have failed to scare off buyers. The Russell
2000 may be trading at 24 times past earnings and the Nasdaq composite at 35
times earnings, but investors continue to buy, primarily because they are
focusing on the future. While the earnings outlook is good, some analysts
warn that Nasdaq stocks may be in for a technical correction over the New
Year, given the market's powerful performance in the closing months of 1992.
The more distant future, however, looks more positive. As Mr Shulman says of
the Nasdaq: 'Long term, that's where the growth in the economy will be.'
In the first 12 months of the two previous new, change-oriented Democratic
presidents (John F Kennedy in 1961 and Jimmy Carter in 1977) smaller
companies did much better than larger companies.
No one is quite sure why, but the soothsayers are not ruling out a repeat
under President-elect Bill Clinton. Moreover, there may be genuine reasons
to expect small stocks to benefit from a Clinton administration. Several of
the economic proposals in his campaign policy package were aimed at making
life easier for small companies, most notably his pledge to cut capital
gains taxes on small businesses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1120</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Takeover hints boost Sun
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO, CHRISTOPHER PRICE and STEVE THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SUDDEN burst of heavy buying interest in Sun Alliance, the composite
insurance group, triggered a strong rise in the shares as the market
responded to what was perceived as the whiff of stakebuilding, perhaps a
prelude to takeover moves.
The stock jumped 16 to 344p, within a whisker of the year's high of 350p.
Takeover speculation flared after several abnormally large individual trades
appeared on the Seaq ticker. Deals included 4m shares at 340p, 3.6m at 340p
and 4m at 340 1/2 p. A block of 4m shares would represent around 0.5 per
cent of the equity.
Turnover finally totalled 16m shares, the heaviest day's activity since
mid-September, when the insurance group sold its 60m share stake in
Commercial Union. Before that, turnover in Sun Alliance had never topped the
14m mark since the mid-1980s.
The strength of yesterday's buying interest led to stories of stakebuilding
moves. Favourite names for a move against Sun Alliance included French
insurance companies AXA, AGF and UAP and Germany's Allianz. Analysts doubted
the likelihood of a bid from either Allianz or UAP but saw strong
possibility that Eagle Star, subsidiary of BAT Industries, might strike.
Heavy trade in Asda
Food retailer Asda Group recorded its biggest ever daily turnover after
turning in results well ahead of market expectations, prompting a welter of
profit upgrades from analysts. Over 100m shares were traded, the price
lifting 7 1/2 to 61p, as dealers reported good two-way business.
Asda shares, which have risen from a low of 23p in early August, have
generated consistent high turnover as investors have been split between
those believing in the recovery potential and those deciding to take profits
on last year's rights issue price of 35p.
Yesterday it was the recovery story which found most favour following the
turnaround in Asda'a fortune from a Pounds 68.8m interim loss into profits
of Pounds 54.8m. The market had been expecting profits of around Pounds 40m.
Analysts lifted full-year forecasts from around Pounds 105m to a range of
Pounds 120m-Pounds 135m.
However, while applauding the group's performance, analysts also struck a
note of caution. Advising a hold on the shares, Mr Andrew Burnett at County
NatWest said that the difficult trading conditions in the food retail sector
would impinge on Asda's earnings growth potential over the next two years.
Others warned that it was also likely to be affected by its relatively low
capital expenditure on new stores.
The Ofgas recommendation for a break-up of British Gas continued to
stimulate demand for Gas shares which moved up 3 1/2 more to 276 1/2 p on
8.8m
BP, meanwhile, were aggressively bought by US investors amid stories that a
number of the leading US brokerages are about to issue strong buy notes on
the company. American investors speak for almost 22 per cent of BP shares.
US analysts see the company as one of the most highly geared recovery plays
in the oil sector, although this is not the view adopted by many UK oil
analysts. BP shares moved up 6 to 229p on heavy turnover of 12m. American
buying spilled over into Shell where the shares rose 7 to 551p on 3.7m
Burmah Castrol's strong run gathered pace with the recent BZW buy
recommendation uncovering a stock shortage and driving the shares up 19 to
722p.
Some sizeable switching operations, out of both classes of HSBC stock -
because of the recent bearish news emanating from Hong Kong and the sell
note from County NatWest - brought renewed pressure to bear on HSBC
London-registered stock, down 7 at 459p and the Hong Kong registered stock,
down 11 more to 442p. Standard Chartered also reflected the unease about
Hong Kong and dropped 4 to 546p. Barclays marked time at 379p as analysts
chopped current year forecasts.
But Lloyds, 10 higher at 508p, and NatWest, 7 firmer at 406p, were
beneficiaries of the switching, as were Royal Bank of Scotland, 11 higher at
210p.
Rumours surrounding Sun Alliance prompted good support for Commercial Union,
10 up at 608p, and General Accident, the same amount higher at 570p.
The building materials and contracting sectors of the market attracted
buying interest as institutions responsed to analysts' suggestions that the
turning point in the housing market could have arrived.
The Royal Institute of Chartered Surveyors has published a report suggesting
a more promising outlook for the housing market. Blue Circle, boosted by a a
mixture of takeover speculation and recovery hopes, jumped 15 to 201p.
Strong buying ahead of an anticipated economic recovery was seen in British
Aerospace. The shares jumped 14 to 167p.
Selling in the traded options led to a fall in Rolls-Royce shares in the
last half hour of trading. They fell 5 1/2 to 108 1/2 p, with sentiment
further weakened by a profits downgrading from broker Williams de Broe.
Discussions with analysts suggesting British Airways was unlikely to have a
rights issue to pay for its 25 per cent stake in Australian airline Qantas
led to strong demand for the stock. They jumped 15 to 296p, in trade of
4.7m.
The EC agreement on banana imports sent shares in Geest soaring. One analyst
estimated that earnings in the fruit producer could rise by as much as 50
per cent from 1994 as a result. The shares jumped 53 to 343p.
Heavy trading in Queens Moat Houses saw the shares move forward as several
houses turned buyer of the stock. The shares had been weak all week after
BZW, the hotel group's joint broker, downgraded. However, after a series of
presentations from the company, some felt the price fall to be overdone and
yesterday Paribas, County NatWest and Hoare Govett were among those
recommending the stock. The price rose 4 to 38p in turnover of 18m.
The decision not to award the Channel 5 licence to Thames Television sent
the shares reeling, down 22 at 158p. Carlton Communications was heartened by
the news, adding 21 to 739p.
London Share Service
We regret that, because of technical difficulties, last Saturday's Financial
Times showed closing London share prices for Thursday December 10 instead of
Friday December 11. We apologise to readers for this. Prices for December 11
were published in the FT of Monday December 14 as normal.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (170).
AMERICANS (6) Amer. Express, Bell Atlantic, Dana, Lowe's, Rockwell, Sun Co.,
BANKS (6) Bank Scot., Dai Ichi, Mitsubishi, NatWest, Royal Bank of Scot.,
Sumitomo, BUILDING MATERIALS (1) Wolseley, BUSINESS SERVICES (4) Brit. Data
Man., Inchcape, Johnson Cleaners, Salvesen (Christian), CHEMICALS (2) Croda,
Wolstenholme Rink, CONGLOMERATES (2) Brierley, Wassall, CONTRACTING &amp;
CONSTRUCTION (2) Barratt Dev., NSM, ELECTRICALS (3) Jones Stroud,
Mitsubishi, Toshiba, ELECTRICITY (2) Scot. Hydro- Elect., Scot. Power,
ELECTRONICS (13) Astec (BSR), Blick, CrayEl., Diploma, Eurotherm, GEC,
Learmonth &amp; Burchett, Lexicon, Linx Printing, Macro 4, Misys, Multitone,
Nesco, ENGINEERING AEROSPACE (1) Smiths Inds., ENGINEERING GENERAL (9) FKI,
Fairey, Halma, Protean, Rotork, Rotork, Siebe, VSEL Consrtm., Vosper, FOOD
MANUFACTURING (4) Assoc. Br. Foods, Nestle, Do. Reg., RHM, FOOD RETAILING
(5) ASDA, Argyll, Kwik Save, Morrison (Wm) 5 1/4 pc Pf., Sainsbury, HEALTH &amp;
HOUSEHOLD (3) AAH, Elan, UniChem, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (2) City Centre Rests.,
Vardon, INSURANCE COMPOSITE (2) Domestic &amp; Gen., Royal Insce., INSURANCE
LIFE (6) Britannic, Legal &amp; Gen., Refuge, Transatlantic, Do. B 6pc Pf., Utd.
Friendly B, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (32) Anglo &amp; O'seas, Brit. Assets, Fleming
Inc. &amp; Cap. Units, Broadgate, Electric &amp; Gen., For. &amp; Col., For. &amp; Col.
Enterprise, Gartmore Scot. Zero Div. Pf., Gartmore Value Zero Div. Pf.,
Greenfriar, Govett Amer. Smaller Co's, Henderson Highland, Kleinwort
Endowment Policy, Law Debenture, M &amp; G Cap, Merlin Intl. Green, Murray
Intl., Pantheon Intl. Part., Do. Warrants, Personal Assets, Primadona, Scot.
Amer., Scot. Eastern, Scot. Mortgage, Scot. Value, Selective Assets Ln., Do.
Ser. II, Sphere Zero Div. Pf., TR Tech. Stepped Pf., Temple Bar, Venturi
Cap. Index, Venturi Geared, MEDIA (14) Avesco, Carlton Comms., Central ITV,
Daily Mail A, EMAP, Flextech, Headline Book, Reed Intl., Reuters, TVS Ent.,
Do. 7.4pc Pf. 2008, Telegraph, Utd. News., Watmoughs, METAL &amp; METAL FORMING
(1) Johnson Matthey, MISCELLANEOUS (4) Airsprung Furn., BAT Inds., Danka
Bus. Sys., Lincat, MOTORS (3) First Tech., Lex Service, Trinity, OIL &amp; GAS
(1) Burmah Castrol, OTHER FINANCIAL (8) Caledonia, Cattle's, Prov.
Financial, Invesco MIM, Do. 9pc 1995-2000, S &amp; U, Tyndall Aust., Do.
Options, OTHER INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (10) BTR, Do. Warrants, Do. Warrants
1992/93, Do. Warrants 1994/95, Do. Warrants 1995/96, Charter Cons, Cookson,
McKechnie, Renishaw, Staveley Inds., PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (5) API,
Bowater, Do. 7 3/4 pc Pf., Macfarlane, St. Ives, PROPERTY (2) Lon. Merchant
Sec. Dfd., Southend Stadium 5 1/2 pc Pf., STORES (5) Asprey, Burton, Country
Casuals, Next, Smith (WH) A, TELEPHONE NETWORKS (1) Cable &amp; Wireless,
TEXTILES (3) Claremont Grmts, Courtaulds Text, Shani, TRANSPORT (4)
Dawsongroup, Forth Ports, Mersey Docks &amp; Harbour, Tibbett &amp; Britten, WATER
(3) Cheam A, East Surrey, Northumbrian, MINES (1) Antofagasta.
NEW LOWS (15).
CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1) BB &amp; EA, ELECTRONICS (1) Molynx, ENGINEERING
GENERAL (2) Torday &amp; Carlisle, Vortex Energy, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (1) Zetters,
INVESTMENT TRUSTS (1) Drayton Blue Chip, MEDIA (1) Home Counties, METAL &amp;
METAL FORMING (1) Sycamore, MISCELLANEOUS (2) Erskine House, Pittard Garnar,
OIL &amp; GAS (2) Bow Valley, New London, PROPERTY (1)Derwent Valley, TEXTILES
(1) Lister, TRANSPORT (1) IoM Steam.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1121</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Commodities (Week in the Markets): Options factor aids gold
price rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD MOONEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A TRUCE appeared to have been called yesterday in the battle between holders
and granters of gold options.
The theatre of operations in this week's conflict had been the area just
below Dollars 340 a troy ounce. Above that level many call (buy) options
written for the year's end would be 'in the money' - ie, holders would be
able to declare them and sell the gold warrants they received at a profit.
That began to appear a real possibility in the middle of the week when
modest buying in a very thin market helped the price to break out of its
recent narrow trading range and reach Dollars 339.05 an ounce at one point.
Alarmed options granters were quick to muster their defences, however.
Determined selling on Thursday afternoon capped the upsurge and by the end
of the day the London bullion market price was back to 338.35. That was
enough to persuade the buyers to take a back seat yesterday, and by the
close the price was Dollars 337.15 an ounce, down Dollars 1.20 on the day
but still Dollars 2.15 up on the week.
Traders did not rule out a renewed assault on the Dollars 340 barrier next
week, however, although they thought the fact that many operators had closed
their books for 1992 might result in this being delayed until the new year.
A breach of the resistance level could be followed by a quick rise to
Dollars 342 an ounce, or even Dollars 344, as holders declared their buying
options and granters were forced to cover, they said.
Platinum followed gold's lead until it was trimmed back yesterday. The price
reached Dollars 365.50 an ounce on Thursday before slipping to Dollars
363.50, down 25 cents on the week at yesterday afternoon's London fixing.
Chartists said platinum prices were consolidating and a challenge of recent
highs should occur in due course, with the longer-term objective at Dollars
380 to Dollars 385 an ounce.
The main feature at the London Metal Exchange this week was the aluminium
market's continued strength in defiance of further big rises in exchange
warehouse stocks, which saw the three months delivery price peak on Thursday
at Dollars 1,247 a tonne. News of a 17,750-tonne rise in stocks to 1,519,900
tonnes sparked a bout of profit-taking in early trading yesterday, but the
market quickly found support and the three months price closed Dollars 1 up
on the day at Dollars 1,244.25 a tonne, up Dollars 15.75 on the week.
Traders suggested to the Reuter news agency that the stock rise, which
followed one of 8,375 tonnes announced on Tuesday, was partly attributable
to a sizeable inflow of metal to LME-registered warehouses in the US, where
there are signs of economic recovery.
The upsurge in zinc stocks was also continued, with the total rising by
17,950 tonnes on the week to 450,125 tonnes. Prices held up well, aided by
aluminium's strength, until the abandonment of a squeeze attempt yesterday
allowed the three months price to subside Dollars 6 to Dollars 1,068.50 a
tonne, down Dollars 10.75 on the week. Robusta coffee prices built
cautiously on their recent strength before putting on a spurt yesterday at
the London Futures and Options Exchange to close at a 13-month high of
Dollars 1,055 a tonne for March delivery, up Dollars 21 on the week.
Dealers said some participants, who had been waiting for a dip to buy,
appeared to have run out of patience and entered the market early in the
day. They added that the next upside objective was for the nearby arabicas
price in New York to breach the psychologically-important 80-cents-a-lb
mark. That could encourage renewed buying interest among investment fund
managers, they suggested.
In contrast cocoa futures continued their downtrend, the March position
adding Pounds 13 to last week's Pounds 36 decline to test support at about
Pounds 657 a tonne. The price drifted to within Pounds 7 of that level
before staging a modest recovery and closed yesterday at Pounds 672 a tonne,
down Pounds 13 on the week. Dealers said talk of continued high West African
arrivals had helped to keep the market under pressure.
Oil prices regained some of their lost ground as a consensus began to emerge
that the market had bottomed, a view supported in midweek by the president
of the Opec. Traders were not looking for a strong recovery, however, until
the market saw evidence of actual production cuts by Opec members.
The price rise, which was aided by a Nigerian announcement of a 10 per cent
production cut, lifted the March crude oil futures price at London's
International Petroleum Exchange from Dollars 18.05 a barrel at the end of
last week to Dollars 18.64 at Thursday's close. Profit-taking trimmed
futures yesterday although the physical oil market remained firm.
 -------------------------------------
LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
(As at Thursday's close)
 -------------------------------------
tonnes
Aluminium    +17,750 to 1,519,900
Copper        +5,350 to   337,325
Lead          +3,375 to   212,800
Nickel           +96 to    67,194
Zinc         +10,350 to   450,125
Tin              +30 to    14,710
 -------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1122</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity Futures and Options Trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DERIVATIVES sector experienced a busy session as both the December
Footsie futures and the index options of the same month expired, and
economic recovery prospects led to good buying, writes Joel Kibazo.
Rolling out of the December futures contract on the FT-SE and into March
dominated the first half of the morning. At the expiry of the December
contract at 10.30am, it stood at 2,757 and some 3,383 contracts had been
traded ahead of its close.
Economic recovery prospects led to healthy demand for the March contract and
helped pull the underlying cash market higher. The contract traded at a
premium throughout the session and at the day's peak it recorded a premium
of around 35 points.
March closed at 2,815, around 7 points above its estimated fair value
premium to cash of about 19. Turnover was good, reaching 8,324 lots.
In the traded options, it was the expiry of the December index options which
led to increased turnover, reaching 43,515 lots by the close.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1123</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Footsie near peak on recovery hopes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A WAVE of optimism swept through the London stock market yesterday, brushing
aside all previous forecasts for the 1992 year-end and bringing about one of
the busiest trading sessions since Britain quit the ERM in mid-September.
The institutions jumped down off the fence and rushed to build 'recovery
portfolios' of stocks thought likely to respond quickly if the UK economy
achieves the expected recovery next year.
The FT-SE Index opened steadily but then surged ahead after the expiry of
the current stock index future contract was completed. At the close, the
FT-SE Index was 49.4 points up at 2,789.7, virtually the day's peak and
within three points of the all-time closing high achieved on December 2. The
March contract on the Footsie, which has now become the lead futures
security, moved above 2,800.
But a bigger rise, in percentage terms, was achieved by the FT-SE Mid 250
Index which jumped by 2 per cent to 2,783.6, outpacing the FT-SE 100 Index
for the second consecutive session. Confidence in economic recovery next
year prompted the institutions to buy a range of capital goods stocks which
feature in the FT-SE Mid Index list. Seaq volume increased to 940m shares
from Thursday's 825m.
Yesterday's gain in the stock market reversed the calmer trend seen earlier
this month as the institutions reduced equity trading ahead of the Christmas
break. Sentiment benefited yesterday from a favourable monthly report of
business opinion from the Confederation of British Industry, and from money
supply statistics regarded as supportive of interest rate optimism.
Last night's final reading showed a gain on the Footsie of 73.5 points or
2.7 per cent over the week. Many strategists admitted to bewilderment at the
sudden change of mood in the market, which appeared to overlook doubts about
the pace of any economic recovery.
The Footsie Index, having at present left far behind predictions that it
would close around 2,700 on new year's eve this year, is now within a few
points of many forecasts for new year's eve 1993.
The stress on second tier stocks, largely neglected early this year when
institutions feared being caught in stocks difficult to sell in bear
markets, appears particularly encouraging. But small losses in government
bonds yesterday reflected concerns over sterling and domestic inflation.
Retail business has increased strongly as the emphasis has turned to the
second tier stocks which feature in the FT-SE Mid 250 Index.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1124</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Money Markets: French futures rally
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A CLUTCH of gloomy economic pointers added weight to the belief that
European interest rates will have to come down and ensured a strong
performance in currency futures yesterday, writes Peter John.
In France, which has been dogged all week by devaluation worries as well as
continued commitment by Germany to higher rates, March Pibor recovered a net
12 basis points on the day to close at 90.57.
The reversal was partially prompted by disappointing news on French
industrial output which rose by a seasonally adjusted 0.8 per cent in
October from September.
The output rise sprang from higher energy production caused by cold weather
and masked a slump in manufacturing. There was also a feeling that the rise
was merely a 'dead cat bounce', a rebound based on nothing more than a
technical readjustment of positions and containing no fundamental optimism.
In the UK, M4 lending, the broad measure that includes bank and building
society lending, had dropped in spite of an expectation that it would
increase. The fall demonstrated that present low rates were still not
sufficiently enticing to tempt borrowers and gave heart to rate cut
enthusiasts.
The news was countered by comments from UK chancellor Mr Norman Lamont
pledging his support to the status quo. Short sterling's gain to 93.41 was
cut back to a net rise of 3 to 93.38, which was further eroded in
after-hours trading. Volume was thin with only 10,000 lots recorded compared
with 20,000 in the March Pibor and a similar amount in the March Euromark
contract, which firmed five basis points to 92.09. Germany has been
vociferous in its commitment to clinging to its high interest rates but most
economists are convinced that the perilous state of the West German economy
makes devaluation inevitable early next year.
Bank of England operations were more relaxed yesterday. The clearers, which
have been unwilling to take up offers of assistance which would upset the
year end balance sheet, were more responsive.
The central bank forecast a liquidity shortage of around Pounds 1.55bn. The
Bank provided early assistance of Pounds 569m, morning assistance of Pounds
378m and afternoon help of Pounds 465m. Finally, it gave about Pounds 170m
of late assistance bringing total help for the day to Pounds 1.582bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1125</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Franc shakes off attackers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FRENCH franc emerged shaken but not stirred yesterday following a week
of sniping and skirmishing by speculators. Understated rearguard action by
the Bank of France was enough to see off what amounted to little more than
renegade hunting parties, writes Peter John.
Much of the recovery reflected a shifting of technical positions in the
markets but there was some support from a statement by one member of the
right-wing coalition expected to take power in March. Defending the
government's strong franc policy, Mr Valery Giscard d'Estaing, the leader of
the UDF said; 'To consolidate this policy, I have asked the UDF shortly to
table a bill to reform the Bank of France's statute and guarantee the
central bank's independence.'
Although an independent French bank is expected one foreign exchange dealer
said: 'Anything which focuses market minds on a monetary move that will
strengthen the franc can only be helpful.'
Dealers added that the Bank of France was once again dipping into the
market, buying francs and selling D-Marks.
The franc, which had breached FFr3.42 against the D-Mark earlier, rallied
yesterday from FFr3.4190 to a more comfortable FFr3.4150 before closing at
FFr3.4160. It also dropped back from above the minus 75 percentage points
level on the ERM's divergence indicator, the level at which some believe
central bank intervention kicks in. In fact, there is no automatic response
generated by the 'magic' 75, it is merely a warning light.
There was a feeling by the close of trading in London that the week's
assaults had not been backed by a significant weight of money and were
merely a warm-up to a full scale attack in the New Year. Several economists
have said that currency traders are not prepared to jeopardise the hefty
bonuses earned during the sterling crisis in September. The situation is
expected to change in January when dealers return with a fresh page to their
trading books. However, one economist said; 'There has to be some limit to
the power of the speculators and when the fundamentals are strong they add
to the case for the defence.'
Elsewhere, currencies traded within recent ranges. The dollar recorded an
early one pfennig gain but there was no fundamental support and it closed 30
basis points up at DM1.5655. On the downside, the pound saw some impact from
the release of worse than expected lending figures and closed lower against
the dollar, D-Mark and franc.
The D-Mark was mixed, gaining against a number of European currencies but
easing against the yen and dollar.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1126</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: Isuzu may restructure domestic
production
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ISUZU Motors, the Japanese car maker with links to General Motors of the US,
is close to announcing a plan to withdraw from the domestic passenger car
market in order to concentrate on the production of commercial vehicles and
trucks.
Isuzu confirmed yesterday it was considering pulling out from passenger cars
to end two years of large losses. Isuzu reported a pre-tax loss of Y48.4bn
(Dollars 389m) in the year ended October 1991 and is expected to report a
loss of about Y30bn in the year just ended.
Isuzu said yesterday it would commission GM, which has a 37 per cent stake
in the Japanese maker, to produce medium-sized trucks in the US from early
1994 as part of an expanded partnership between the two companies. The
commissioned production at a GM plant in Wisconsin would initially be about
6,000 trucks annually, with Isuzu exporting the chassis and the cabs, and GM
providing the engine and transmission.
Isuzu's commissioning of production is intended to make use of excess
capacity in GM facilities and lift the Japanese company's profile in the US,
where its distribution network has been strengthened.
Passenger cars and vans account for about 10 per cent of Isuzu's sales,
while trucks and buses account for 57 per cent and engines, parts and other
products for the remaining 33 per cent. Passenger car sales have fallen
sharply over the past year in Japan and have remained weak.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1127</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: BA warning over US jobs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Airways yesterday accused Washington of putting nearly 100,000 US
jobs at risk by linking its Dollars 750m offer for 44 per cent of USAir to
liberalisation of the UK-US aviation market.
The warning coincided with a last minute effort by Mr John Major, the prime
minister, to win Washington's approval for the deal during weekend talks
with President George Bush.
Sir Colin Marshall, BA's chief executive, claimed the US government's
apparent determination to make approval of the bid conditional on UK
liberalisation was 'entirely to the benefit of the three major US airlines'.
American Airlines, United Airlines and Delta Air Lines have led the campaign
to block the BA-USAir deal unless the US government can secure greater
access for US carriers into the London market.
Sir Colin said BA hoped the bid would be approved. But BA was disappointed
it appeared to hinge on bilateral issues which had no connection with the
commercial deal between the two airlines. 'For the US government, the
upholders of belief in freedom of capital and freedom of movement, to be
rejecting this deal, which clearly puts at risk the future of USAir, its
47,000 employees, and a similar number who are providers of services and
products, boggles the mind.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1128</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: SCA, Weyerhaeuser plan exchange
of information
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TWO leading players in the world's packaging industry, Sweden's SCA and
Weyerhaeuser of the US, plan to co-operate in production technology and
product development.
The two companies will exchange technical and commercial information and
explore possibilities for joint research and development projects. The aim
is to reduce costs and develop markets through the pooling of expertise.
Mr Sverker Martin-Lo f, SCA chief executive, said the move would help the
group to meet the needs of the growing segment of packaging customers that
operate globally.
SCA Packaging is the leading supplier of corrugated board and containerboard
on the European market while Weyerhaeuser is the third largest supplier of
corrugated and containerboard in the US.
Mr Colin Williams, SCA Packaging president, said: 'SCA can reduce costs by
learning from Weyerhaeuser's cost-effective corrugated board production
while Weyerhaeuser can learn much from SCA about the application of recycled
fibre in its production.'
SCA also upgraded its 1992 earnings forecast yesterday, saying it now
expected to make profits of SKr300m-SKr400m (Dollars 44.4m-Dollars 59.3m).
This compares with the break-even result which it predicted in October when
it announced a SKr62m profit for the first eight months.
The company said it had benefited from the devaluation of the Swedish krona
and a fast implementation of cost reduction measures. It added that its
hygiene company, Molnlycke, had continued its strong development.
Sweden's forestry groups are believed to be among the main beneficiaries of
the weaker Swedish currency, and their shares have advanced strongly since
the krona was floated on November 19.
However, SCA noted there had still been no improvement in the market for
traditional forest industry products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1129</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Fruit and Vegetables
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Supplies of favourite Christmas fresh produce will be plentiful over the
festive period reports the FFVIB. Avocados at 40-55p each (60-70p) and
Honeydew melons at Pounds 1.30-1.60 each (Pounds 1.30-1.60) are traditional
Christmas starters. Christmas vegetables are reasonably priced this week
with Brussel sprouts at 15-25p a lb (15-25p), carrots at 15-20p a lb
(15-20p), leeks at 40-50p lb (45-50p) and parsnips at 20-25p a lb (20-25p).
Pecan nuts are Pounds 1.15-1.30 a lb and Monkey nuts are 60-70p a lb
(75-95p). Walnuts, Brazils and Hazelnuts will cost around 68-85p a lb
(Pounds 1.15-1.30).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1130</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: ABB acquires ESAB robotic
welding unit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE robotics division of Asea Brown Boveri, the Swedish-Swiss engineering
group has acquired the robotised arc welding business of ESAB, the Swedish
welding company.
The deal will strengthen ABB's position as a leading robot manufacturer in
Europe and North America. It is estimated that ABB Robotics' annual turnover
will grow by 30 per cent to Dollars 450m as a result of the acquisition. The
cost of the acquisition was not disclosed.
The two companies have worked closely together since 1974 in the development
of the welding robotics market. ESAB has provided a delivery service for
about 5,000 ABB-designed robots.
ABB Robotics and ESAB have operated separate organisations for production,
research and development, as well as sales and service. Mr Stelio Demark,
ABB Robotics president said yesterday that both companies saw a substantial
business opportunity to increase market share and volume in combining their
operations.
ESAB said the deal would provide cost advantages through more integrated
production and administration as well as better market coverage.
The company said its disposal of its robotics welding business would have a
substantial impact on its financial results. It added that ESAB's financial
resources would be helped by the agreement so that it could improve its core
business of welding product sales in Asia and eastern Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1131</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: Bronfman companies write off
CDollars 1.3bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Toronto Bronfmans' four property companies have written off a combined
CDollars 1.3bn (USDollars 1.01bn) from their balance sheets because of the
slump in North American real estate.
The biggest write-down was CDollars 939m pre-tax by Bramalea, which was hit
by its holdings of Ontario land acquired before the property market
collapsed. Bramalea is now restructuring its debt totalling more than
CDollars 4bn.
Because all four Bronfman companies are inter-related, the Bramalea
write-down had a ricochet effect through the other three companies.
Stock market listed Trizec, in which the Reichmann family has a minority
interest, reported a CDollars 544m loss for the year ended October, after
providing CDollars 668m pre-tax to cover its investment in Bramalea.
Carena, a company which owns 40 per cent of Trizec, posted a loss of
CDollars 245.5m for the year ended October, after total charges of CDollars
271m. Coscan, 56 per cent owned by Carena, warned that a restructuring
charge of nearly CDollars 100m was due.
Bombardier of Canada has confirmed an order for 108 subway cars for the
Ankara subway in Turkey worth Dollars 262m. They will be built in
Bombardier's Ontario plant.
The overall Dollars 660m four-year Ankara contract, covering phase one of
the Turkish capital's subway system, is held by a consortium of Bombardier,
SNC, the Canadian engineering group, plus Gama and Guris of Turkey.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1132</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: Shell abandons India partner
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL and R C MURTHY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI, BOMBAY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ROYAL Dutch/Shell is abandoning its Indian partner of 25 years' standing and
is pulling out of a planned Dollars 2bn petrochemicals venture in India
following disputes about the management of the project.
Even though Shell insisted the decision had nothing to do with the group's
view of India's economy or economic reform programme, the move will be a
blow to the Indian government. Ministers have frequently cited the Shell
project as an example of the extensive foreign investment India hopes to
attract as it opens its economy to the outside world.
Shell has had a long association with Arvind Mafatlal, a textiles and
chemicals group, which includes the joint ownership of National Organic
Chemical Industries (Nocil), a chemicals manufacturer. The two partners have
long discussed plans for Nocil to build a petrochemical complex on India's
western coast. The scheme was delayed by bureaucratic wrangles and by
protests from local environmental groups.
The partners seemed to have overcome these hurdles. But in the past year,
serious arguments have blown up over Shell's proposals to increase its stake
in Nocil from 33.3 per cent to 51 per cent. It is understood that Shell
wished to have management control of the project which would have been one
of the largest foreign investments in India.
News of Shell's decision was made public at a Nocil shareholders' meeting on
Thursday, attended by Mr F Berger, Shell's co-ordinator for Asia. Mr Berger
told the meeting that there were fundamental differences as to how the
company should be managed. It was evident that these differences could not
be resolved.
He added that 'the withdrawal from Nocil at this time should not be
construed as a reflection of doubt or disappointment in the progress of
economic reforms in India. Shell strongly supports them.'
Shell's move may have been influenced by the depressed state of the world
market in petrochemicals and the fact that several other proposed
petrochemicals complexes are under discussion in India.
Under the terms of an agreement between Shell and Mafatlal, Shell is
required to offer its shareholding in Nocil to Mafatlal for sale at a
mutually acceptable price. Mafatlal says there will be no change in existing
technology transfer agreements with Shell covering Nocil's present
operations, which include a naphtha cracker.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1133</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: Tapie puts Adidas stake up for
sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Bernard Tapie has put his controlling stake in Adidas, the troubled
sporting goods group, up for sale with a price tag of FFr2.085bn (Dollars
390m).
Adidas's future has been clouded by uncertainty ever since the collapse in
October of Mr Tapie's plans to sell control of the company to Pentland, the
UK consumer products concern.
Pentland had agreed to buy the Tapie shareholding - which centred on Bernard
Tapie Finance (BTF), Mr Tapie's master company - for FFr1.6bn, only to
abandon the deal three months later.
BTF has since bought Pentland's original 20.05 per cent stake in BTF and has
put its entire 78.05 per cent holding on the block. It has appointed Societe
de Banque Occidentale (SDBO), a Paris-based bank, to find a purchaser and to
orchestrate the deal.
Adidas is one of the world's best known brand names. However, it has had a
series of financial problems in the two years since Mr Tapie took control.
It has faced fierce competition from the US sportswear groups, notably Nike
and Reebok, which had strong links with Pentland. Adidas has also undergone
expensive rationalisation and a series of senior management changes since
the Tapie takeover.
Mr Tapie is said to be short of cash following the demise of the Pentland
deal and the failure of other proposed disposals, including the planned
sales of the Terraillon weighing machine business and La Vie Claire health
food chain.
On Wednesday he announced final plans to buy out the external shareholders
in BTF for FFr100 a share, against the FFr130 at which the shares were
suspended this summer. Only 5 per cent of the shares in BTF, valued at
FFr692m under the buy-back terms, are in public issue.
The decision to privatise BTF is believed to have been fuelled by Mr Tapie's
financial position and by his political ambitions. Mr Tapie, who has a
parliamentary seat, is one of the few French politicians to be actively
involved in business. He was forced this spring to resign from the cabinet
after only seven weeks because of his involvement in a fraud case concerning
past business interests. The case against him was yesterday dismissed by a
French court.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1134</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: BA issues USAir jobs warning
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Airways yesterday accused Washington of putting nearly 100,000 US
jobs at risk by linking its Dollars 750m offer for 44 per cent of USAir to
liberalisation of the UK-US aviation market.
The warning coincided with a last minute effort by Mr John Major, the prime
minister, to win Washington's approval for the deal during weekend talks
with President George Bush.
Amid growing signs that the Bush administration was unlikely to approve the
deal next week, Sir Colin Marshall, BA's chief executive, claimed the US
government's apparent determination to make approval of the bid conditional
on UK liberalisation was 'entirely to the benefit of the three major US
airlines'.
American Airlines, United Airlines and Delta Air Lines have spearheaded the
campaign to block the BA-USAir deal unless the US government can secure
greater access for UK carriers into the London market.
Sir Colin said BA remained hopeful the bid would be approved next week by Mr
Andrew Card, the US transportation secretary, following the talks between
President Bush and Mr Major.
However, BA was extremely disappointed that the deal appeared to hinge on
bilateral issues which Sir Colin argued had no connection with the
commercial agreement between the two airlines.
'For the US government, the upholders of belief in freedom of capital and
freedom of movement, to be rejecting this deal, which clearly puts at risk
the future of USAir, its 47,000 employees, and a similar number who are
providers of services and products, boggles the mind,' he said.
Sir Colin, in Sydney to complete BA's ADollars 665m (USDollars 458.6m)
purchase of 25 per cent of Qantas, the government-owned Australian airline,
confirmed BA had no plans to raise fresh capital to finance its expansion.
He said BA could finance the purchase of stakes in Qantas and USAir without
a rights issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1135</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: Isuzu may restructure domestic
production
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ISUZU Motors, the Japanese car maker with links to General Motors of the US,
is close to announcing a plan to withdraw from the domestic passenger car
market in order to concentrate on the production of commercial vehicles and
trucks.
The company confirmed yesterday that it was considering pulling out from
passenger cars to end two years of large losses.
Isuzu reported a pre-tax loss of Y48.4bn (Dollars 389m) in the year ended
October 1991 and is expected to report a loss of about Y30bn in the year
just ended.
Isuzu said yesterday that it would commission GM, which has a 37 per cent
stake in the Japanese maker, to produce medium-sized trucks in the US from
early 1994 as part of an expanded partnership between the two companies.
The commissioned production at a GM plant in Wisconsin would initially be
about 6,000 trucks annually, with Isuzu exporting the chassis and the cabs,
and GM providing the engine and transmission.
Isuzu's commissioning of production is intended to make use of excess
capacity in GM facilities and lift the Japanese company's profile in the US,
where its distribution network has been strengthened.
Passenger cars and vans account for about 10 per cent of Isuzu's sales,
while trucks and buses account for 57 per cent and engines, parts and other
products for the remaining 33 per cent.
Passenger car sales have fallen sharply over the past year in Japan and have
remained weak.
This has encouraged price cuts among leading vehicle makers which put extra
pressure on the already weak Isuzu.
The company has trimmed its force of temporary workers and streamlined its
component supply systems, but believes that a stronger emphasis on truck
production is the best means of ensuring a return to profits.
The agreement by NEC, the Japanese electronics company, to acquire a 4.99
per cent of Control Data Systems (CDS) of the US, involves an agreement
under which CDS will sell computers made by NEC on an original equipment
basis.
The computers are under development and are expected to be marketed during
the second half of 1993.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1136</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: Kerkorian group files fraud
lawsuit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A GROUP led by Mr Kirk Kerkorian, the investor who in 1990 sold Hollywood's
MGM to Mr Giancarlo Parretti, the Italian financier, yesterday filed a
lawsuit alleging fraud and conspiracy by Credit Lyonnais, the French state
bank that backed Mr Parretti.
The California legal action, which seeks Dollars 675m plus damages from
Credit Lyonnais, is a countersuit which follows a recent Dollars 500m action
against Mr Kerkorian by Credit Lyonnais.
The French bank provided loans that helped Mr Parretti to buy MGM for
Dollars 1.3bn from Mr Kerkorian in 1990. But last year the Italian financier
was forced out of the studio and Credit Lyonnais took control of MGM.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1137</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: BHP rises 23% to ADollars 502m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BROKEN Hill Proprietary (BHP), Australia's biggest company, yesterday
returned to profits growth with a 23 per cent rise in net operating profit
to ADollars 502m (USDollars 346.2m) for the six months to end-November.
The result was below market expectations, but the shares closed 28 cents
higher at ADollars 12.84, buoyed by the contrast with the year to May, when
net profit more than halved to ADollars 589m.
The group said it was performing soundly, in spite of subdued economic
growth in its main markets. 'It is a measure of BHP's success that most of
our businesses are continuing to operate at capacity,' the company said.
BHP said demand for most of its mineral products was higher and production
of copper, coal and iron ore had increased. The petroleum division was
continuing to generate good profits in spite of uncertainty over oil prices.
However, the group said the Australian recession had flattened domestic
demand for steel and warned that profit growth would depend on cost-cutting
and strategic marketing. The recession had forced the group to divert
production into less profitable export markets in which it faced escalating
competition.
At the operating level, the minerals divisions reported a 0.4 per cent
increase in profit to ADollars 333m, the steel division increased profit by
7 per cent to ADollars 104m, and petroleum was up 15 per cent to ADollars
257m.
BHP said revenue increased by 7 per cent to ADollars 8bn, partly as a result
of higher oil and gas prices and the inclusion of New Zealand Steel, which
was acquired during the year.
The group said export revenues were significantly improved by a decline in
the average exchange rate of the Australian dollar to 73 US cents from 78
cents in the comparable period of 1991-92.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1138</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Economic Diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TODAY: Start of two-day European Community fisheries council meeting in
Brussels. Taiwan holds general elections. Mr John Major, prime minister, on
private visit to meet Mr George Bush, US president, at Camp David.
TOMORROW: Serbian elections. Laotians go the polls to elect new National
Assembly.
MONDAY: Gross domestic product (third quarter) (including analyses of
expenditure, income and output components). European Community foreign
ministers meet in Brussels. Hungary Czechoslovakia and Poland are expected
to sign a free trade agreement that will slash duties on industrial and
agricultural goods by January 1 2001.
TUESDAY: Cross-border acquisitions and mergers (third quarter). Balance of
payments current account and overseas trade figures (November).
International banking statistics (third quarter). US real gross domestic
product (final release -third quarter); capital spending (third quarter).
Leaders of the Gulf Co-operation Council due to meet in Abu Dhabi for annual
summit. Final results from the Chrysalis Group.
WEDNESDAY: Capital expenditure and stockbuilding (third quarter-revised).
Institutional investment (third quarter). New construction orders
(October-provisional). Personal income, expenditure and saving (third
quarter). Industrial and commercial companies (third quarter). US durable
goods orders (November); personal income (November). Session of Gatt Uruguay
Round trade negotiations committee is expected to agree a political text
wrapping up the Round.
THURSDAY: Public hearing on Sagawa scandal at Tokyo district court; former
Sagawa executive Hiroyasu Watanabe to sit in court.
FRIDAY: Summit of the Commonwealth of Independent States to be held in
Belarus. Turkish parliament votes on 1993 budget bill.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1139</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Panel insists on bid for Buckingham
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Takeover Panel has ruled that Jemma Trust and Naaz Holdings must make an
offer for Buckingham International, the hotels and nursing homes group,
under Rule 9 of the City code on takeovers and mergers.
The Panel has required a bid of 2.75p per ordinary share and 27.5p for each
Pounds 1 nominal of stock for the secured convertible loan stock 1995. The
bid should be made by the end of February 1993.
On December 7, it ruled that Jemma and Naaz were acting in concert in
Buckingham's shares. Naaz is a company owned by a trust of which Mr Nurdin
Jivraj, Buckingham deputy chairman, and Mr Nick Jivraj, his son and chief
executive, and their families are beneficiaries. A close relation of theirs
is beneficiary of a trust run by Jemma.
Naaz owns 29.6 per cent of Buckingham and Jemma 8.6 per cent, together
exceeding the 30 per cent level at which a takeover offer becomes mandatory.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1140</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Wassall wins 0.23% Evode ordinary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Wassall, the mini-conglomerate bidding Pounds 94.3m in cash for Evode, had
won acceptances from only 0.23 per cent of the chemicals and plastics
group's ordinary shareholders and 0.33 per cent of its convertible
preference holders by the first closing date.
Wassall already owns 3.51 per cent of Evode's shares, bought when it
launched the bid last month. The offer has been extended to January 11.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1141</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Abtrust Preferred asset value declines
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Abtrust Preferred Income Investment Trust had a net asset value of 71.55p
per income share at November 30 compared with 78.86p a year earlier and
82.38p at the May 31 year end.
Net revenue for the half year was Pounds 683,000 (Pounds 817,000) for
earnings of 7.59p (9.08p) per share.
An unchanged second interim dividend of 2.90625p is declared.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1142</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Turkey Trust little changed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share of the Turkey Trust amounted to 148.06p at October
31, compared with 155.12p six months earlier and 148.97p at the previous
year-end.
After-tax revenue for the 12 months to end-October was little changed at
Pounds 601,000 (Pounds 605,000), equal to earnings of 6.13p (6.19p).
The dividend for the year is maintained at 5p, made up as to a same-again 4p
special and a 1p ordinary payment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1143</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Kleinwort Charter asset value ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
At November 30 the net asset value of Kleinwort Charter Investment Trust
stood at 191.37p per share, against 172.25p a year earlier.
Net revenue in the 12 months amounted to Pounds 4.17m (Pounds 4.44m),
equivalent to earnings of 5.14p (5.49p) per share. An unchanged final
dividend of 3.75p has been proposed for a maintained total of 5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1144</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Standstill extension at Control Securities
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Control Securities, the brewing, hotels and property group negotiating a
financial restructuring with its banks, has gained an extension until
January 29 to the standstill agreement with its banks first struck at the
end of June and extended at intervals.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1145</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Danae net assets little changed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per income share of the Danae Investment Trust stood to
51.79p at November 30. That was unchanged on the March 31 year-end figure
and marginally down on the 51.97p of 12 months earlier.
Per capital share the figures were 45.48p, 50.76p and 47.29p respectively.
Net revenue for the six months to end-November totalled Pounds 229,188
(Pounds 239,846), equal earnings of 3.24p (3.39p). The interim dividend is a
same-again 3.375p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1146</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Sycamore improves 13% to Pounds 620,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sycamore Holdings, the maker of foundry products, moisture testing
equipment, and kitchen and garden furniture, lifted pre-tax profits by 13
per cent, from Pounds 549,000 to Pounds 620,000, in the year to September
30.
However, Mr Bill Rhodes, chairman, said the results were below directors'
expectations and again no dividend is being recommended. Earnings came
through at 0.61p (1p) per share.
Turnover jumped to Pounds 20.9m (Pounds 9.5m) generating operating profits
of Pounds 1.25m (Pounds 654,000). Interest charges took more at Pounds
635,000 (Pounds 189,000).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1147</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Bankers Investment net assets higher
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Bankers Investment Trust reported net asset value at October 31 of
133.6p, an increase of 8 per cent on the 123.9p of a year earlier.
For the year to the end of October net revenue was Pounds 5.69m (Pounds
5.38m) for earnings per share of 3.64p (3.44p). A fourth interim of 0.86p
has been declared for a total payment of 3.44p, against 3.2p, an increase of
7.5 per cent.
The trust intends paying a total dividend next year of 3.6p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1148</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Electric &amp; General asset value ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share of Electric and General Investment Company stood
at 161.2p at November 30 against 139.1p a year earlier and 152.6p at the May
31 year end.
Net revenue for the half year amounted to Pounds 1.71m (Pounds 1.55m) for
earnings ahead to 1.89p (1.71p) per share. The interim dividend is being
held at 1.5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1149</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Offer for Simpsons goes unconditional
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Baldwin's offer for Simpsons of Cornhill, owner of the famous City chop
house, has been declared unconditional. The holidays, printing and property
company has received acceptances in respect of 2.82m shares or 62.8 per cent
and 450,000 'A' shares or 75 per cent.
The Baldwin offer is on the basis of 1-for-2 and values Simpsons at Pounds
1.68m. It had been accepted by the Simpson board and stockbrokers Raphael
Zorn Hemsley representing 54 per cent of the capital.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1150</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Trilion shares suspended at 3p
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The designation and recording of bargains in Trilion were temporarily
suspended yesterday at the company's request pending clarification of its
financial position. The shares were suspended at 3p.
The principal activities of the USM-quoted company are the provision of
television facilities, the production of television programmes and the
provision of services to the corporate communications market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1151</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Group Development asset value improves
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Group Development Capital Trust had a net asset value of 41.1p per share at
September 30, against 39.4p at the interim stage and 39.5p a year earlier.
Net revenue for the year amounted to Pounds 118,485 (Pounds 101,618) for
earnings per share ahead to 0.34p (0.23p). The single final dividend is
lifted to 0.3p (0.24p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1152</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Increased loss for United Industries
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Losses at United Industries, a maker of precision springs for aerospace,
automotive, electrical and engineering applications, edged ahead from Pounds
609,000 to Pounds 631,000 pre-tax for the six months to October 3.
Turnover totalled Pounds 16.14m (Pounds 16.53m). Losses per share emerged at
5.23p (1.93p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1153</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Net asset value rises at Brunner
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Brunner Investment Trust had a net asset value of 203.13p at November 30
compared with 174.74p a year earlier.
Net revenue for the year amounted to Pounds 3.47m (Pounds 3.5m), equivalent
to earnings per share of 5.43p (5.46p). A final dividend of 2.65p (2.55p) is
proposed for an increased total of 5p (4.75p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1154</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Jones &amp; Shipman cuts interim loss to Pounds
0.98m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JONES &amp; SHIPMAN, the Leicester-based machine tool company, yesterday
announced pre-tax losses down from Pounds 2.46m to Pounds 981,000 for the
half year ended September 30, after making 'significant progress' with its
new business strategy.
The loss is struck on turnover of Pounds 6.27m (Pounds 6.71m). Losses per
share were down from 17.7p to 8.2p and again there is no interim dividend.
J&amp;S announced in July that it would end the machining of components for its
grinding machines and dispose of non-core businesses. Mr Len Weaver,
chairman, said yesterday that the new strategy had 'yielded improvements in
our operating performances'.
Good progress had been achieved with the outsourcing of machined components
while partnership agreements with high-quality sub-contractors were being
carefully negotiated.
The company said in July that the main outcome of the completion of the new
strategy would be the halving of its 500-strong workforce. It has already
been reducedto 372 and would eventually fall to about 260.
Mr Weaver said J&amp;S had contained its gearing at 44 per cent through control
of working capital and the disposal of surplus machinery and plant. A heads
of agreement had been signed recently for sale of the engineers' small tools
business.
On trading conditions, Mr Weaver said there had been no evidence of positive
change in the deep recession engulfing much of manufacturing industry in the
UK and overseas. 'Although orders on hand are Pounds 2.7m compared with
Pounds 1.9m at the start of the period, the immediate outlook remains
uncertain and frustrating.'
Mr Weaver said full implementation of the new strategy would place the
company in an excellent position.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1155</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: L&amp;P staves off deb default
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A RARE default in the debenture market was staved off yesterday when London
&amp; Provincial Shop, the troubled property group, announced that it had
reached agreement with the trustees to the debenture.
However, the company still faces the possibility of a default early next
month when a Pounds 6.75m interest payment falls due on its debentures.
Holders of only two secured bond issues are thought to have lost money after
defaults in the past 25 years.
Law Debenture, trustee to the Pounds 135m of bonds, had written to London &amp;
Provincial alleging a breach of covenant two weeks ago. This concerned the
sale in 1990 of a property which had been charged to the debenture holders,
which Law Debenture said was conducted without proper consultation with the
bond holders.
The company announced yesterday that it had deposited Pounds 1m with Law
Debenture, representing the present market value of the property, although
it continued to insist that it had acted in accordance with the covenants
when it made the sale.
Although the security backing the bonds has fallen well below the 1.5
multiple required in another covenant, this cannot lead to a formal default
for at least six months, to allow the company time to make good the deficit.
A further danger of breach of covenant comes on May 6, when the next
half-yearly interest falls due on the debentures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1156</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Recovery plan lifts Asda to Pounds 55m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ASDA, the grocery chain, yesterday showed that it was starting to reap the
benefits of the three-year recovery programme introduced by its new
management with the announcement of sharp improvement in interim profits.
Before exceptionals, the profit of Pounds 46.1m for the 28 weeks to November
14 beat all analysts' forecasts. For the same period of the previous year
pre-exceptional profits amounted to Pounds 10.1m.
Exceptional gains this time of Pounds 8.7m (provisions Pounds 78.9m) raised
profits at the pre-tax level to Pounds 54.8m (losses Pounds 68.8m). Asda
also booked an extraordinary gain of Pounds 69.1m from the sale of its stake
in MFI, the furniture retailer.
The pre-tax figure compared with analysts' forecasts which averaged about
Pounds 35m. The shares rose 7 1/2 p to 61p.
Analysts had expected much of the rise to be accounted for by a reduced
interest bill following the company's Pounds 357m rights issue in October
1991, and other actions to cut debt. But the difference between forecasts
and the actual figures was largely due to a better-than-expected operating
profit for the Asda stores.
'It would appear that some professional managers have taken hold of the
business and are knocking it into shape,' said Mr Bill Myers, food retailing
analyst at brokers Henderson Crosthwaite. However, Mr Myers believed Asda
needed to do more than it was planning to enhance value for shareholders and
has suggested a rights issue is necessary to fund a widespread refit of its
core stores and boost sales.
Group turnover rose to Pounds 2.35bn (Pounds 2.3bn), and group operating
profit for the 28 weeks improved to Pounds 79.9m (Pounds 74m). That
reflected increased operating profits in the Asda stores division, to Pounds
91.9m (Pounds 84m), and a small reduction in the operating loss in the
Allied Maples carpet and furniture stores division to Pounds 11.9m (Pounds
13.2m).
Mr Archie Norman, chief executive, said like-for-like sales growth for the
Asda stores was significantly above the industry average, although sales at
Allied Maples continued to suffer owing to the stagnant housing market and
lack of consumer confidence.
Another encouraging sign was a reduction in borrowings from Pounds 677.8m in
May to Pounds 471.6m, bringing gearing down from 61 per cent to 39 per cent.
Earnings per share were 2.01p (losses 5.71p). The interim dividend is being
cut to 0.5p (1.25p) - a figure which disappointed some analysts. But Mr
Norman said this reflected the company's plan to have the dividend twice
covered by earnings.
He said three months of 'tough negotiation' had resulted in a new Pounds
300m syndicated bank facility, with softer covenants, more competitive
interest rates and involving fewer banks.
'That is an important move forward and gives us the green light to go ahead
with our plan over the next three years,' he said.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1157</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Banks give Isosceles time for refinancing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER A meeting of Isosceles' lenders and shareholders a standstill
agreement between the heavily indebted company, which owns the Gateway food
retail group, and its banks is expected to be signed before Christmas.
The standstill would give the group, which has debt of Pounds 1.3bn, time to
complete a refinancing designed to give it a suitable financial structure.
This is likely to involve swapping a large part of the debt into equity.
Without a standstill, allowing Isosceles not to pay interest or make capital
repayments of its debt, the group could go into receivership.
The problem has become more pressing as suppliers were nervous about giving
Gateway credit. Some suggested that they would not deliver stock for the
Christmas trading week without reassurance from the group's bankers.
One supplier said 'frankly we were all getting rather worried' but added
that with a standstill in place suppliers would be more relaxed.
It is also likely that Mr Alistair Mitchell-Innes, chief executive of
Isosceles and Gateway, will leave the group within the next two weeks. He
only took on the role at Gateway in October when Mr Bob Willett resigned.
Headhunters have already started the search for another chief executive.
The group's 38 banks, chaired by Midland Bank, which took over that role
from SG Warburg three weeks ago, met on Thursday at the offices of Hill
Samuel, the merchant bank which was appointed to advise the company last
month. The meeting lasted until midnight.
The mood of the meeting was said to be more pragmatic and constructive, with
shareholders accepting the need for dilution of their equity. Wasserstein
Perella, the New York firm which holds 30 per cent of Isosceles' shares in
its buy-out fund, is said now to accept that its stake will be diluted.
Many of the group's equity holders have already written off their
investments, although Wasserstein Perella has yet to do so. Last week 3i,
the venture capital group, wrote down its Pounds 28m mezzanine investment in
Isosceles too. Other mezzanine lenders are likely to follow.
The standstill will give Isosceles, formed in 1989 through a Pounds 2.1bn
takeover, time to review its trading strategy with Coopers &amp; Lybrand, the
management consultant which has already started work.
Isosceles has already had two refinancings. The first, completed at
Christmas 1990, added Pounds 150m of equity to the Pounds 200m put in
originally. A further Pounds 87m of equity was provided through the
conversion of part of the Pounds 375m mezzanine debt.
This summer a second restructuring allowed deferral of Pounds 48m of
mezzanine interest, the conversion of preference shares into ordinary
shares, and the resetting of the banks' covenants.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1158</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Sutcliffe Speakman keeps up momentum as
loss falls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MATTHEW CURTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SUTCLIFFE Speakman, the carbon filter and environmental protection systems
group rescued from bankruptcy early last year, continued its strong recovery
in the six months ended September 30, but failed to make it back to profit.
Pre-tax losses fell from Pounds 1.8m to Pounds 560,000, on lower turnover of
Pounds 13m (Pounds 14.6m).
Operating losses were reduced to Pounds 235,000 (Pounds 842,000) and an
improving cashflow helped to cut borrowings from Pounds 7.07m to Pounds
6.2m. Interest charges fell to Pounds 338,000 (Pounds 624,000). Losses per
share were 0.5p (1.6p).
Mr Shaun Mahony, finance director, said the group made an operating profit
in the second quarter which was maintained in October and November, despite
'poor trading conditions'.
There were encouraging signs of economic recovery in the US, where Barnebey
&amp; Sutcliffe improved profits and won new orders from the nuclear and water
industries.
An increasing contribution from the environmental protection division would
benefit second half results with the completion of Pounds 5.5m worth of
contracts in the UK and US, first announced in July.
Mr Mahony said Sutcliffe had recently restored links with Lanka Carbons.
The group will assist Lanka in developing and manufacturing a range of
higher-value carbons which would help Sutcliffe restructure its UK and US
manufacturing operations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1159</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Kleen-e-ze returns to profit with Pounds
86,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Kleen-e-ze Holdings, a distributor of consumer products, returned profits of
Pounds 86,000 pre-tax for the year to end-August compared with previous
losses of Pounds 1.14m.
The improvement reflected steps taken in prior years to eliminate
loss-making activities together with continuing progress in trading
conditions. The shares rose 10p to 66p.
Turnover was static at Pounds 45.5m.
Exceptional provisions accounted for Pounds 377,000 (Pounds 153,000) and
interest charges for Pounds 183,000 (Pounds 444,000). Earnings per share
emerged at 0.6p (losses 16.73p).
The exceptionals, together with extraordinary debits of Pounds 265,000
(Pounds 675,000), reflected continuing rationalisation of group activities.
Kleen-e-ze also announced that it had reached agreement for the sale of
Molly Housewares for about Pounds 950,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1160</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Canadian investor builds 3.6% stake in
Amstrad
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A CANADIAN investment company has built up a 3.57 per cent shareholding in
Amstrad, the consumer electronics group, following holders rejection of a
30p per share buy back bid from Mr Alan Sugar, the founder and chairman,
earlier this month.
Amstrad said yesterday that it was informed at the start of September that
Peter Cundill, which manages two Bermuda mutual funds, held 13.41m shares,
or a 2.31 per cent equity stake, in the group in its capacity as investment
manager on behalf of eight institutional accounts under its management.
On Thursday the investment company told Amstrad that it had increased its
shareholding to 20.75m shares on behalf of the eight managed accounts. Mr
Sugar holds a personal 35 per cent equity stake in Amstrad and had sought to
take the company private again with an unsuccessful Pounds 113m buy-back
bid.
Two other Amstrad directors sold their equity stakes in the company earlier
this week for 23 1/8 p a share. The shares closed  1/2 p lower at 24p
yesterday.
Cundill has built a reputation as a shrewd investor in difficult stocks on
both sides of the Atlantic.
Among its recent and most prominent investments in the UK, the company holds
a large preference share stake in TVS Entertainment, the southern TV
broadcaster which loses its franchise on January 1.
TVS is seeking shareholder approval for a takeover bid by US-based
International Family Entertainment, which is controlled by Mr Pat Robertson,
the television evangelist. Cundill, with more than a 15 per cent preference
share stake, has opposed the deal.
Cundill also emerged as a shareholder in Henlys Group, the motor trader and
bus and coach builder, during T Cowie's Pounds 32.1m unsuccessful hostile
bid in September.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1161</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Acquisition puts New London in Dollars
764,000 loss
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
New London, the UK-quoted oilfield services company, blamed its recent
acquisition, International Drilling Fluids, for its fall into pre-tax losses
of Dollars 764,000 (Pounds 503,000) in the six months to September 30,
compared with profits of Dollars 2.27m.
The company also announced the sale of its US oil and gas properties to a
Texas corporation. The net proceeds will be Dollars 7m against a book value
of Dollars 10m. An extraordinary provision of Dollars 3.5m has been taken
against the sale, leaving the loss for the year of Dollars 4.9m (profit
Dollars 1.14m).
Turnover for the six months was Dollars 69.7m (Dollars 38.7m), most of the
increase being due to IDF. Losses per share came out at 1.4 cents (earnings
1.1 cents).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1162</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Losses at Dwyer surge to Pounds 6.9m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DWYER, a property invest-ment company, yesterday announced a pre-tax loss of
Pounds 6.94m for the year to September 30, compared with a Pounds 3.89m
deficit the previous year.
Last month Mr Desmond Bloom, chairman and chief executive, resigned to cut
the company's overheads. Mr Joey Esfandi and Mr Peter Andrews, director of
Winglaw Group which owns 15.5 per cent of Dwyer, became chief executive and
property director, respectively. Mr Anthony Kirwan became non-executive
chairman.
The increased loss was largely due to a Pounds 5.39m exceptional item, which
included a Pounds 4.78m provision against the falling value of its
investment properties.
The results were also depressed by a rise in interest costs from Pounds
4.89m to Pounds 5.49m which helped offset a rise in operating profits from
Pounds 3.75m to Pounds 3.94m.
During the year, property disposals reduced group borrowings by Pounds 6m.
The company's net worth fell to Pounds 21.5m, or a net asset value of 83p
per share. The loss per share was 24.75p (13.27p). No dividend will be paid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1163</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / UK Company News: German licence for Glaxo
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GERMAN subsidiary of Glaxo, the UK drugs group, has received a licence
to market Imigran, its breakthrough migraine treatment, in Germany, the
world's third largest market.
The licence is for both oral and injectable versions of the drug which
generated sales of Pounds 43m in the year to June 30.
Imigran is one of Glaxo's three new products that have been labelled
'blockbusters' - capable of generating more than Dollars 1bn income a year.
Glaxo said it would launch the drug as soon as possible in the new year. It
declined to detail the drug's price in Germany, but it is likely to be
similar to that elsewhere in Europe.
It has been licensed in 32 countries and launched in 22.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1164</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Tesco goes shopping in France: The purchase of a continental
retailer by the UK supermarket chain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GUY DE JONQUIERES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The experience of British retailers which have acquired abroad in recent
years has followed a dismally familiar pattern. All too often, the initial
exhilaration which accompanied the deals has been abruptly punctured by a
series of nasty surprises, to the prolonged chagrin of the acquirers and
their shareholders.
So when Tesco, the UK's second-largest supermarket chain, announced
yesterday that it was moving into continental Europe by buying Catteau, a
family-controlled retailer in northern France, the immediate reaction in the
City was restrained enthusiasm. The first question on many lips was: 'Does
Tesco know what it's getting into?'
By the end of the day, the company appeared to have reassured most observers
that the acquisition made reasonable sense. However, unresolved questions
remain about what Tesco's continental foray says about its underlying
strategy at a time of growing doubts about the health of its UK business.
Though Tesco is the first large British food supermarket to establish a
bridgehead across the channel, its move is in line with a growing trend
elsewhere in Europe. In the past few years many continental chains have
begun to expand across borders in search of fresh markets.
As a result of acquisition or greenfield investment, leading groups such as
Ahold of the Netherlands, Aldi and Tengelmann of Germany and Promodes and
Carrefour of France today all have 30 per cent or more of their sales in
other European markets.
By this measure, Tesco's initiative is exceedingly modest. Catteau's annual
sales of Pounds 341m last year were a tiny fraction of Tesco's Pounds 7.1bn
turnover, while the Pounds 150m to be paid for 85 per cent of the French
group is a sixth of Tesco's investments in UK stores this year. 'It's a
toehold in Europe, which offers a test bed and a learning experience. There
are no great risks involved,' Sir Ian MacLaurin, Tesco's chairman, put it
yesterday.
Catteau operates a mixture of 90 convenience stores, supermarkets and
hypermarkets, mostly in the Nord-Pas de Calais region. In a country
notorious for fierce price-cutting and wafer-thin retail margins, it appears
exceptionally profitable. Its operating margin of more than 5 per cent last
year is double that of many larger supermarket groups. The explanation given
is a strong regional franchise, combined with keen pricing and tight cost
controls.
Nonetheless, the growth of national supermarket chains in France, coupled
with incursions by foreign newcomers such as Aldi, have raised questions
about the future of regional groups, some of which have already gone to the
wall. 'The Catteau family decided to sell because they looked ahead and
recognised that in the longer term, they would need an ally,' says Mr David
Reid, Tesco's finance director.
Catteau will continue under its present management but will benefit from
access to its new parent's expertise in distribution, marketing and product
innovation - areas in which UK supermarkets are acknowledged leaders in
Europe. There are also modest plans for the French group to expand its
geographic coverage.
For Tesco, which will have four directors on Catteau's board, the main
advantage of the deal will be the opportunity to gain practical experience
in an unfamiliar market. 'Over the next months and years, we will get to
know how a French retailer works,' says Sir Ian.
The big questions are what Tesco will do with this knowledge - and why the
company wants it in the first place. According to Sir Ian, Tesco has been
studying opportunities overseas for the past five years. After considering
the US, he said, 'we favour the European route'. However, he would not be
drawn on the likely timing or direction of Tesco's next step.
There are potential advantages to be gained from a moretrans-European
approach. Though leading supermarket chains across northern Europe have
grown steadily stronger in their home markets in the past 20 years, they
face a supplier industry in which the biggest brands are increasingly
concentrated in the hands of multinational manufacturers such as Nestle,
Philip Morris, Procter &amp; Gamble and Unilever. One reason why retailers have
expanded across borders in recent years has been to match these companies'
scale economies and bargaining power.
However, there is one vital distinction between British food retailers and
their continental counterparts: profitability. While thin margins at home
have been an important factor driving some French and German groups to
venture outside their home markets, those earned by the leading UK chains
have long been the envy of the rest of Europe.
As Mr Richard Hyman of Verdict, a retailing market research firm, puts it:
'In food, it is no coincidence that much of the European interest has
consisted of continentals eyeing the UK market. Expansion in the other
direction has always looked much less attractive.' Indeed, J Sainsbury has
long ruled out expansion on the continent, preferring to focus on the US.
How far the skills which have enabled UK supermarkets to achieve high
margins at home can be transferred across frontiers is an open question.
Certainly, their experience in the US does not offer much encouraging
evidence. The least that can be said is that finding the answer is likely to
be a lengthy process, which will require substantial investments of
resources and management time.
So what is Tesco up to? To some observers, the significance of yesterday's
announcement lay more in what it implied about conditions on this side of
the Channel than about future opportunities in France. 'It focused attention
once again on Tesco's UK growth prospects,' said Mr Nick Bubb, retailing
analyst with investment bank Morgan Stanley.
These have recently been the source of growing debate in the City, where the
company's price-earnings ratio stands at a substantial discount to those of
Sainsbury and Argyll. Some observers believe that it is under more pressure
than its big rivals, and that its huge investments in new superstores may be
running into a problem of diminishing returns. Tesco's marketing effort is
also compared unfavourably by some critics with that of Sainsbury.
Sir Ian stoutly rejects such suggestions, insisting that Tesco has plenty of
room left to grow by launching new store formats and capturing market share
from weaker competitors. However, the improved results yesterday from Asda,
until recently one of the most vulnerable supermarket chains, suggests that
market share gains may be becoming harder to achieve.
A proper judgment on Tesco's performance may have to wait until after the
end of the recession. But until the questions hanging over the company's
prospects are resolved, opinions are likely to remain divided. To some, its
continental shopping expedition marks the start of a bold expansion phase;
to others, it is a defensive response to difficult conditions at home.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1165</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Letter: Time to consider giving rather than just having a
chuckle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Ms CHERYL ST CLAIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I was somewhat dismayed by the article in the Observer column
('Unseated', December 15) relating to the Barbican's donations to Providence
Row. While it has a certain amusement value, it trivialises the true
situation, which is a tragic one.
The Barbican's director, Baroness O'Cathain, is helping Providence Row in a
personal capacity, to raise funds for improved facilities currently under
construction. Our work is needed now more than ever, as is demonstrated by
the numbers we have to turn away, because we are full up and our resources
are overstretched.
Thanks to the Barbican we can at least provide adequate outdoor clothing to
help protect those people who every night have literally nowhere to go.
Rather than chuckle over the bizarre items of lost property mentioned by
Observer, perhaps your readers might be encouraged to donate funds directly
to Providence Row in order that we can complete our new buildings on
schedule.
Cheryl St Clair,
director,
Providence Row,
50 Crispin Street,
London E1 6HQ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1166</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Letter: Better for British Gas shareholders to spin out
transportation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From ALAN R MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In the light of the strong views put forward by Ofgas on the structure
of British Gas in the UK, I would like to add my views as a big user of the
services provided by British Gas's transportation arm. Agas was the first
company to be formed in the newly competitive industrial and commercial gas
market in 1987. It needed direction from Ofgas for us to secure
transportation rights from British Gas in 1988 but since 1990 we have found
a developing spirit of co-operation with them.
We have previously argued that a separate transportation operation within
British Gas was all that was needed to help develop the services to all the
new entrants in this rapidly developing market.
Now, however, with several more years' experience we believe that it is in
the interests of British Gas shareholders, the users of the system, and gas
consumers to have a completely new and independent company running the
business.
Our reasons are as follows:
British Gas shareholders will unlock value through a separation because the
share price is currently being held back by the integrated nature of the
business, the frequent public disputes with Ofgas, and the recurrence of
government and quasi-government reviews.
All users of the transportation and storage system, including the marketing
arm of British Gas, will be treated equally and this will be demonstrable.
A range of commercial services - eg, timely meter reading, flexible
portfolio management facilities - will be likely to be developed in a
company in which the solo business focus is on services. This will give
customers greater flexibility and maximise the value of the asset to its
owners.
Transparency of asset values, costs and returns to shareholders will be
available which will remove the antagonism created by the current lack of
information available in this area and remove any suspicions of
cross-subsidy from the rate of return argument.
Customers will benefit through lower prices as a result of the more
efficient management of the system and the provision of a wider range of
services.
Alan R Marshall,
managing director,
Associates Gas Supplies,
59 Markham Street,
London SW3 3NR
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1167</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Letter: Too staid for coded clue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From R E HURST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Until I saw the letters column of December 15 I had innocently assumed
that David Cannadine's article ('The Royal dilemma that won't go away',
December 12) was a leg pull by your admirable crossword editor.
It seemed to be a coded clue: Contributor is one canned and avid colonial
(5,9) - (David Cannadine).
As a reader of 50 years' standing I should have realised you are much too
staid to include first year undergraduate humour; at least by intention,
even if execution goes awry every decade or so.
R E Hurst,
20 Esk Gardens,
Wetherby, W Yorkshire
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1168</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Letter: Environment not always harmed by making paper from
pulp
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr TIM BAYNES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, At last a more reasoned approach to paper manufacture and the
environment (Survey of Pulp and Paper - 'The green conundrum', December 14).
May I comment on just three points? First, most of the timber used for paper
manufacture comes from thinnings, so is a waste product of an
environmentally beneficial process planting and growing trees.
Second, although there is genuine cause for alarm at the short-term
exploitative forest activities overseas, here in the UK due regard is now
paid to the interaction with fauna and flora.
Finally, if from January 1 1993 no more trees were cut down to make paper or
board and most paper and board products were recycled every month, by April
production would only satisfy half the world consumption and not a single
sheet would be available by the summer.
It is our judgment that paper from virgin pulp is good for the environment
and should take its place alongside recycled paper on the shelf.
Tim Baynes,
investment manager,
Tilhill Economic Forestry,
Little Haseley,
Oxford
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1169</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / New bait to lure savers: Building societies face competition
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For years, UK savers have been wedded to their building societies. Interest
rates have been high, investment has been simple and they have had little
reason to move their money elsewhere.
All that may be about to change. With gross returns in most building society
accounts now at about 6-7 per cent, those who live off their savings have
seen their income fall by half in the past two years.
Savers have started to notice. In November, the building societies suffered
a net outflow of retail funds, to the tune of Pounds 187m. Over the year as
a whole, the inflow has been just Pounds 178m, compared with Pounds 5.8bn in
1991.
The rest of the UK savings industry thus has an historic opportunity to
attract investors. The US market has shown the way. As short-term savings
rates have fallen to about 3 per cent, US investors have been switching out
of cash and into bonds and equities.
UK investors have traditionally been rather less sophisticated than their US
counterparts. But new types of financial products may be able to persuade
Britons to move some of the approximately Pounds 330bn they currently hold
on deposit.
Societies are struggling to attract savers while at the same time
stimulating the much-needed revival in the housing market through reduced
mortgage rates. Mr Mark Boleat, director-general of the Building Societies
Association, said yesterday: 'The potential competition from longer-term
investment products means that building society savings rates are close to
their effective floor.'
There have already been signs that investors are prepared to shift.
National Savings proved so successful in attracting funds through its new
First Option Bond earlier this year that the building societies mounted a
successful campaign to force the government department to cut rates on the
bond in July.
Insurance companies have had considerable success in marketing 'with-profits
bonds' as a half-way house between the building society and shares - the
Prudential sold Pounds 350m of its 'Prudence bond' in the first half of this
year.
With-profits bonds have been so popular that some companies have stopped
selling them, because their reserves have not been adequate to back more
policy sales.
There has been a revival of private investor interest in the gilts market,
where long-term yields are now about 8.5 to 9 per cent. Long gilts now offer
a higher income than an instant access account for the first time in several
years.
Enthusiasm for bonds has spread to the unit trust market. The UK bond fund
sector has traditionally been tiny, but the recent falls in interest rates
and the prospect of low inflation has made such funds seem attractive -
Mercury Asset Management's Global Bond Fund, launched in early 1991, has
already attracted about Pounds 200m.
But what really interests the savings industry is whether the cautious
British investor can be lured into equities.
Privatisations have increased the number of individual shareholders to about
9.26m, compared with 3m in 1979, but failed to entrench the habit. Figures
from ProShare, the organisation which promotes wider share ownership, showed
only 200,000 of those who bought shares in privatisations have moved on to
purchase other equities.
Unit trusts were seen in the early 1980s as an ideal way for many people to
enter the equity market - since they offer a diversified portfolio to those
with small sums. Sadly, many investors only bought trusts at the top of the
market in the summer of 1987, only to suffer losses in the October 1987
crash.
But the clouds may be lifting at last. The personal equity plan (PEPs), a
tax shelter created to encourage wider share ownership, has grown
increasingly popular. All income and capital gains within a PEP are free of
tax.
This year's Budget relaxed the rules so that existing unit and investment
trusts qualified for the full Pounds 6,000 PEP limit. With equities yielding
about 4.5 per cent, a top rate taxpayer can now get a higher net return from
a PEP than from many building society accounts.
The tax-free label helped third quarter sales of unit trust PEPs more than
double year-on-year to Pounds 319m, while overall sales of unit trusts fell.
But PEPs are unlikely to widen the market for equities substantially; they
still carry the risk of loss of capital.
This is where a new breed of savings product may have the answer - the
guaranteed equity scheme. These normally offer investors the rise in a stock
market index, or their money back. This is usually achieved by investing the
bulk of the fund in fixed interest securities (which grow to repay the
capital) and the remainder invested in equity options and futures (to get
the exposure to share prices).
The products are not entirely without flaws; few pay income; they require
investors to subscribe for a fixed period (normally five years) for the
guarantee to apply; and the guarantee does not allow for the effect of
inflation. Recent falls in interest rates may also make it more difficult
for these structures to work, since more of the fund must be invested in
fixed interest and less in options.
Nevertheless, the marketing slogan for guaranteed products - stock market
investment without the risk - has proved attractive to savers. Midland Bank,
for example, recently raised Pounds 40m for a guaranteed equity bond in four
weeks.
The guaranteed market is still developing. But if a financial services group
can come up with the right equity-based product, many UK savers might be
persuaded, if not to lose all love for building societies, at least to opt
for a trial separation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1170</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Letter: Less costly treatment of arthritis
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From R E GUTCH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I was somewhat puzzled by your editorial, 'Health reforms' (December
15). Your first paragraphs appear to confirm what we know, that people with
the severe pain of arthritis have to wait too long for all kinds of
treatment. Yet in paragraph four you suddenly conjure up 'excess capacity'
in the 'world-famous hospitals' in London]
There is no excess capacity for the treatment of arthritis in London or
elsewhere; there is only a shortage of money to pay for it. If the needs of
people with arthritis for earlier diagnosis and prompt and efficient
treatment were met, the results in the long term would be less costly
surgery and fewer people with severe, and therefore costly, disabilities.
Surely the government and health authorities should be taking a long-term
view?
R E Gutch,
chief executive,
Arthritis Care,
18 Stephenson Way,
London NW1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1171</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Letter: Do what I say, not what I do
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr DAVID EDWARDS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Before the UK joined the European Economic Community, I sat next to a
Swiss businessman on a flight from Bangkok to Tehran.
I endured a long lecture from him on how Britain would benefit by joining
the Community.
When he paused for breath I asked him why, if the benefits were so great,
Switzerland was not yet an enthusiastic member.
He turned to me with a look of amazement and cried, 'We're Swiss. We would
never be fools enough to put our fate in the hands of such a crazy gang.'
Bristling with outraged indignation he turned his back on me.
I still think he knew a thing or two.
David Edwards,
Shenley,
The Drive,
Woking,
Surrey GU2 0JS
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1172</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Letter: Special interest lobbies given too much weight in
trade talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr STEPHEN LOCKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, It is interesting to read from your articles (World Trade News,
December 11 and 15) that 'consumer, citizen and environmental groups' have
been protesting about the Uruguay Round and the prospects for a Multilateral
Trade Organisation.
We, too, have been critical of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
negotiations, but for precisely the opposite reason to that given in your
report - because there has been far too much foot-dragging and far too much
weight given to protectionist special interest lobbies.
A number of question marks remain over the detailed operation of any future
MTO but these are completely dwarfed by the issues of the Gatt round as a
whole. Consumers have everything to fear from a collapse of Gatt
negotiations, and everything to gain from their success, which should help
to bring about increased competition, choice and value for money in most
product markets, as well as hopes for an earlier end to the world recession.
Consumers' organisations in the UK are joined in this view by many
counterparts overseas, under the umbrella of the International Organisation
of Consumer Unions which represents 170 consumer organisations in more than
60 countries.
The Gatt will not solve everything - big issues to be dealt with once the
round is complete will include the link between trade and environmental
policy, and the development of worldwide rules for competition policy.
But the trade war that would follow any failure to complete the Gatt would
obscure, rather than enlighten, these fundamental issues and ensure that
they never get tackled.
Stephen Locke,
Consumers' Association,
2 Marylebone Road,
London NW1 4DX
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1173</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / A lull in the battle for peace: Middle East talks hang in
the balance after the deportation of alleged Islamic militants from Israel
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This has been a miserable week in the Middle East. Against a backdrop of
rainstorms, snow squalls and dense fog, violence and recrimination have
pitched the region into its severest political crisis since peace
negotiations began in Madrid a little over a year ago.
The brutal deportation by Israel on Thursday of more than 400 alleged
Islamic militants, which followed a spate of attacks on Israeli troops in
the occupied territories by the Hamas Moslem fundamentalist movement, has
left the peace talks hanging in the balance.
Instead of inheriting a well-established process moving slowly, but
steadily, towards agreement, President-elect Bill Clinton and his yet-to-be
announced secretary of state must add the Arab-Israeli conflict to the list
of foreign trouble spots that require urgent and skilful attention when they
take over the US administration next month.
For President George Bush and Mr James Baker, his chief of staff, this
week's crisis must have been especially galling. The president had summoned
the Israeli, Palestinian, Syrian, Jordanian and Lebanese delegations to the
Washington talks to the White House on Thursday for what was meant to be a
congratulatory public reminder of his administration's achievement in
putting the peace talks together.
But instead of basking in compliments, Mr Bush was reduced to making appeals
that the negotiations should not now fall apart. Most bitter of all, the
president was confronted with an unexpected act of repression against the
Palestinians by Mr Yitzhak Rabin, the Israeli prime minister whose election
last June was greeted with gushing enthusiasm by the Bush administration as
a great step forward in the peace process.
Indeed, the advent of Mr Rabin's Labour-left coalition, with its commitment
to advance the peace talks, was widely seen in the Arab world, in Europe and
in the international community generally as a welcome relief from the
uncompromising rule of the right-wing Likud party which went before it.
Now, however, by deporting by far the greatest number of Palestinians from
the West Bank and Gaza Strip to be expelled at once since the occupation
began in 1967, Mr Rabin has outstripped the toughest punitive measures taken
by Likud's former prime ministers, Mr Yitzhak Shamir and Mr Menachem Begin.
Previously, 66 Palestinians had been expelled in the past five years of the
intifada, or uprising, in the occupied territories, an action widely
condemned internationally as a breach of the fourth Geneva Convention
governing the conduct of occupation authorities. But Israel does not
recognise the convention in the West Bank and Gaza.
On Wednesday night, about 410 prisoners were bound, blindfolded, loaded on
buses and driven to the Lebanese border. With the action veiled in military
censorship, civil rights lawyers had to rouse High Court judges from their
beds in a desperate attempt to stop it.
There was a temporary injunction. But eventually the High Court ruled that
the government could carry out the expulsions, which will last up to two
years, without giving the deportees - whose names were not even requested by
the judges - the right to prior appeal.
After about 24 hours confined in their buses, the deportees were given some
money, food and a blanket and dumped into no-man's land in south Lebanon
between the area controlled by Israeli forces and the areas controlled by
the Lebanese army. The Lebanese authorities refused to accept them, but
witnesses claimed Israeli forces had fired shots over their heads to prevent
them walking back into Israeli-controlled territory. Yesterday they remained
in a rain-lashed limbo, hoping the Red Cross would come to their aid.
Why did Mr Rabin, who continues to advocate a peace settlement based on
Israeli withdrawal from occupied land, take such a step? Why, too, did the
ministers of Meretz, Labour's left-liberal coalition partner, defy their
party's longstanding opposition to deportation and support the decision?
Part of the answer lies in the spate of violence in recent weeks in which
Qassam, the military wing of Hamas, stepped up the use of arms against the
security forces with an intensity not seen so far during the intifada.
Qassam has killed six soldiers this month - including a border policeman
kidnapped against a demand that Israel release Sheikh Ahmed Yassin, the
jailed Hamas leader. Previously, fewer than 20 soldiers had died in the
intifada.
The government and the army were anxious quickly to suppress this
development. There was some pressure from the right-wing opposition and the
public to react forcefully, but Mr Rabin seemed to need little prompting. He
has a long record of uncompromising actions against unrest. Since he took
office in July, the number of fatal shootings by soldiers in the territories
has increased markedly.
But both Labour and Meretz leaders admit the action will not eradicate
Hamas-inspired violence. In fact they are braced for an outburst of anger in
the territories. They appear convinced, however, that the deportations will
be understood as a necessary means to undercut the growing influence of
Islamic fundamentalists who oppose the peace talks and, indeed, the
existence of Israel. With an eye on tough anti-fundamentalist policies in
Egypt, Jordan and Algeria, they think Arab leaders, including the Palestine
Liberation Organisation, will privately applaud.
'This is the only way to win the battle for peace,' said a close associate
of Mr Rabin. 'The Palestinian negotiators are afraid of Hamas  - that is why
they are avoiding making progress in the talks. We have to eliminate this
fear to have peace in the region.' The deportations were deliberately timed
to coincide with a likely two-month hiatus in the talks while the new
American administration takes over. Mr Rabin believes the PLO will return to
the negotiations. 'We have no doubts about that,' an aide said.
But pro-PLO leaders in the West Bank are aghast at this argument. 'If that
is how they think, then I am really shocked,' said Mr Sari Nusseibeh, a
senior adviser to the Palestinian delegation. 'What they have done to Hamas
will undoubtedly strengthen its position in the territories. I think there
will be every reason now for those against the peace process to argue
cogently for their position. Public faith in the talks was already wearing
extremely thin. Now I am sure the majority would be against continuing. It
puts a great burden on the (PLO) leadership.'
The circumstances are all the more difficult for the PLO because of Israel's
refusal to allow it to play a direct role in the negotiations. Overt PLO
members and Palestinians from outside the occupied territories are not
allowed to be members of the Palestinian delegation. Nor does the PLO have a
direct dialogue with the US. Without these, the PLO leadership's room to
manoeuvre is limited.
Ministers from the Meretz party have sought to justify their support for the
action against Hamas, by saying it amounted to an explicit acknowledgement
by the Israeli government that it is happy to negotiate with the PLO. To
date, Mr Rabin has turned a blind eye to close co-ordination between Mr
Yasser Arafat, the PLO leader, his top officials and the delegation in
Washington. But he has repeatedly ruled out direct PLO involvement.
Where, then, do things go from here? In a statement from its Tunis
headquarters, the PLO said it would abandon the talks unless the
deportations were reversed. When the eighth round of talks in Washington
ended on Thursday, no date was set for a resumption.
But the process is not necessarily doomed. Significantly, the other Arab
parties to the talks, while bitterly condemning the Israeli action and
cutting short the last day of negotiations, reserved their positions. Mr
Mouwafak al-Allaf, Syria's chief negotiator, said at the White House: 'We
are not boycotting the peace process.'
The events of the past week - and the gloomy prognostications which went
before - have tended to obscure the fact that, for all the slow progress of
the talks, the participants still have a greater interest in pursuing a
negotiated settlement than abandoning it. Neither Israel nor Syria, for
example, can seriously contemplate another war over the disputed Golan
Heights; both need to cement relationships with the US and Europe, which
insist on a continuation of the talks, for strategic and economic reasons.
King Hussein of Jordan makes no secret of his desire to achieve an
agreement. The Palestinians are more inclined to think that no deal is
better than an agreement which falls well short of their aim of an
independent state. But most senior Palestinians still worry that failure to
secure a foothold now may mean their aspirations remain forever in the realm
of dreams.
Some progress has been made in the Israeli-Palestinian talks towards an
agreement on the interim period of self-government in the West Bank and Gaza
Strip which is planned to precede talks on a final settlement of the
territories' status.
Jordan and Israel have virtually agreed the format for a peace agreement
between them. Syria and Israel remain far apart on Syria's demand for a
complete Israeli withdrawal from the Golan Heights, but they have agreed
formulas on the need for mutual security provisions. Only the
Lebanese-Israeli talks have gone nowhere.
Yesterday in Israel, there was press speculation that Mr Rabin may soon move
to widen his coalition to include two small right-wing parties. But even if
that happens, Labour will stay the dominant partner. Mr Rabin's declared
willingness to undertake significant withdrawal from the Golan, the West
Bank and Gaza is still very different from the outright rejection of
territorial compromise of the Likud.
Nevertheless, in the Middle East reason can all too easily be supplanted by
miscalculation fuelled by decades of hatred and conflict. Much now depends
on the ability of the incoming Clinton administration to persuade,
pressurise and coax the participants into returning to the negotiating
table. Otherwise, the window of opportunity in the region that President
Bush levered open could slam shut before the warming of spring.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1174</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Leading Article: In the bleak midwinter
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IN LIVERPOOL, Cambridge and other far-flung parts of Britain, seven wise men
will spend the Christmas season staring at the economic stars. What gifts
might Mr Norman Lamont expect when these recently appointed wise men travel
to the Treasury early in 1993? Britain's embattled chancellor can hardly
hope for gold, while myrrh would be most unwelcome. Nor will medium-term
prophecies of looming current account or budget deficits please the
chancellor. Only news that an economic recovery is under way will give him a
happy new year.
The past week's economic news in the UK has been far from encouraging.
Output in November remained flat, business expectations for the coming
months are depressed, and unemployment rose by a further 41,000 last month.
Most worrying, there is little sign that banks and consumers have responded
to the 3 percentage point cut in interest rates which has followed Britain's
departure from the European exchange rate mechanism. Bank lending in
November fell by Pounds 600m compared with a predicted rise of Pounds 2.3bn.
Nor, peering further afield, will the wise men find much good news for the
UK economy. The OECD has revised its forecast for economic growth among its
24 industrialised country members to 1.9 per cent next year down from 3 per
cent last June.
The main cause of slow growth, according to both the OECD and the
International Monetary Fund, is the continued inability of Germany's
politicians, unions and the Bundesbank to discover how a cut in Germany's
high interest rates might be balanced by tighter fiscal policy and a
commitment to wage restraint. The OECD has already shaved half a point from
its over-optimistic 1.2 per cent growth forecast for Germany next year.
Dangerously unbalanced
Confirmation that German economic policy is dangerously unbalanced was
delivered this week from an unlikely quarter. When the managing director of
as orthodox and inflation-hating an organisation as the IMF calls for a two
percentage point cut in a country's interest rates, as Mr Michel Camdessus
did on Thursday, then something is amiss.
Presumably, Mr Camdessus was not only speaking for the IMF but also as a
Frenchman, a distinguished member of that brotherhood of French bureaucrats
which runs multilateral institutions. The force of the words he used in
criticising Germany's chokingly high interest rates and persistent budget
deficit testifies to the strain that the ERM is placing on the domestic
authority of the French ruling elite.
While a touch of the blues may have crept into Mr Lamont's bath-time
singing, he can rest assured that he will not have as tense a Christmas as
his French colleague, Mr Michel Sapin. With an election pending, and the
French franc languishing at the bottom of its bands within the ERM, the
French Treasury is assured of a nervous start to 1993.
The effort to sustain the French commitment to the ERM against the
speculative pressures of the coming weeks will severely test the
co-operative spirit and sense of common purpose of France and Germany.
Without either an open-ended German commitment to protect the French franc's
D-Mark parity or, alternatively, a sizeable cut in German interest rates,
the risks that the Franc will be forced out of the ERM are not negligible.
German inflation
Yet this week's uncompromising noises from the Bundesbank about the need to
target monetary policy on German inflation alone, and the apparent failure
of Mr Helmut Kohl's solidarity talks to deliver an agreement on wages and
tax increases, do not inspire confidence. Even Germany's famed consensual
approach may fail to avoid prolonged recession. The pain will not be
Germany's alone, as was confirmed by the news that French manufacturing
output fell by 1.7 per cent in October
All is not bleak and chilly in the OECD's Christmas message. Not only does
the report expect the US economy to grow by 2.4 per cent next year but the
OECD now believes, following recent news, that this forecast is half a
percentage point too low. These numbers should be taken with a heap of salt.
The OECD has, after all, been forecasting US recovery for at least a year,
partly because it underestimated the US credit crunch, but also in an
attempt to dissuade US politicians from using fiscal policy to boost
short-term economic growth. Any temporary fiscal expansion, the OECD says,
must be 'both temporary and accompanied by a credible commitment to unwind
it when the economy picks up', conditions that the US political system has
been unable to meet.
Encouragingly though, if the message from last week's economic circus in
Little Rock is genuine, President-elect Bill Clinton has been persuaded to
take a medium-term view, which emphasises deficit reduction over short-term
stimulus. It is a message that Britain's seven wise men will soon have to
send loudly and clearly to the UK Treasury, assuming, that is, that they are
men, not dwarfs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1175</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Man in the News: The coarse Mr Clean - Umberto Bossi
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Only one politician seems to be enjoying himself these days in Italy -
Umberto Bossi, the gravel-voiced leader of the Lombard League.
While Italy's traditional parties, overwhelmed by corruption scandals, are
searching for ways of reforming themselves, Mr Bossi has found a winning
formula. Mining the rich seam of anti-Rome sentiment in northern Italy, and
mixing this with populism and moralism, he has converted the League into the
most remarkable political phenomenon in Europe.
The results of this week's partial municipal elections have confirmed that
he now heads the biggest party in the north of the country and can muster
the second largest number of votes nationwide. Although Mr Bossi founded the
League in 1984, it has only burst on to the political scene in the past
year.
'We are the great iceberg floating amid absurd little groupings,' he said
this week with a flourish of customary hyperbole. 'The Socialists have
become as significant as a mere telephone prefix and the Christian Democrats
have been saved only by the Church.'
Part of the League's good showing, as well as its earlier success in the
April general elections, has been due to a protest vote against Italy's
unworkable political system and to the discredit of the traditional parties
such as the Christian Democrats and Socialists. The League is untainted by
corruption because it has not experienced power at either local or national
level.
Nonetheless, Mr Bossi's success in achieving a third of the northern vote is
a striking achievement in such a short time. All the more so, since Mr Bossi
is politically inexperienced, his movement has very little money, and it has
been treated with hostility by the political establishment and the bulk of
the media.
The enmity towards Mr Bossi is understandable. In his wilder statements, he
advocates a dangerous northern separatism, which sends shivers down the
spines of leading editorialists. His party offices are full of posters
boldly stating 'Republic of the North'. At gatherings, the League sells its
own currency as provocative souvenirs, and Mr Bossi has on one occasion
called on his supporters to boycott purchase of the Treasury bills that
finance Italy's huge debt.
He has nothing but contempt for the Rome politicians, whom he dismisses as
'all robbers'. Once asked about his wealth, he said he gave half his
senator's pay to the League, adding: 'As for my bank account, it is as empty
as a Rome politician's head.'
In appearance and behaviour he is the antithesis of the smooth Rome
politicians. His suits are always rumpled and his hair unkempt. Even by
Italian standards, he is unpunctual. He says what he thinks in crude
language peppered with dialect from his native Varese - his advisers have
told him to tone down his coarser comments.
Yet in the north he speaks to a genuine constituency - the artisans, the
factory workers, the small businessmen and shopkeepers who work hard, care
little about ideology and are incensed by the poor deal the wealth-earning
north gets from the state and by the corrupt political class. He is one of
the first generation of northerners to enjoy higher education.
His father was a textile worker, his mother of peasant stock who became a
concierge when the family moved to Milan. By all accounts he was an
indifferent student, failing to complete his medical studies. Folklore has
it that, to impress his first wife, he claimed to have a medical degree and
pretended to visit imaginary patients.
After separating from his wife, in 1982 he met his present companion,
Manuela Marrone, while both were attending a night-school course on Varese
dialect. They have two children. His political activism began at this time,
stirred by a mixture of ambition and a desire to dig into the past for
'Lombard' roots - the League's symbol is a 12th-century warrior with raised
sword, who rallied the Lombard communes against the invading army of Emperor
Frederick Barbarossa.
Having become the League's first senator in the 1987 general elections, his
vision of the north fending off the predatory demands of central government
was not taken seriously by his opponents until less than two years ago. His
message remains simple: Rome and southern Italy cannot live off the earnings
of the north, and the political system must become more federal. The north,
he believes, has no alternative but to press for separatism, moving 'closer
to Europe and further from Rome'. He talks of three federal units with wide
autonomy existing within one state, Italy.
Part of Mr Bossi's philosophy is akin to the spirit of Scottish nationalism;
part contains elements of the extreme right of the Le Pen type in France.
But much is simply protest against the system, which broadens his appeal
because it places him and the movement outside an easy ideological
classification.
Mr Bossi's main challenge now is to demonstrate he can convert the League
into a party that will last. He must also decide whether the League is to
remain a northern phenomenon or become a national party, either through a
countrywide organisation or via alliances with other groupings.
Although he likes to play the peasant who has taken over the farm, Mr Bossi
has begun to acquire some sophistication and awareness of his
responsibilities. This week he surprised opponents by coming out against
early elections, saying the Amato government should continue in office. To
force a government crisis now would merely bring down the whole political
edifice, he said.
His threat of separatism has to be taken with a pinch of salt. The League
constituency comprises pragmatic, solid citizens who vote with their hands
on their wallets and feet on the ground. Breaking away from the rest of
Italy would be a leap into the unknown, which few countenance at heart. Mr
Bossi himself uses the threat of separatism like a nuclear deterrent to
bolster his bargaining power with Rome. And no one has yet called his bluff.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1176</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Business failures rise by 48% in north-west
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN HAMILTON FAZEY, Northern Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RECEIVERSHIPS in north-west England were 48 per cent higher in the first 11
months of this year than in the same period last year and are likely to pass
550 by the end of December, according to Latham Crossley Davis, a firm of
accountants based in Chorley, Lancashire.
Construction, tourism, leisure, property, building materials and furniture
were the sectors hardest hit. The rate of increase, however, has been
declining during the year.
The month-on-month rise was 286 per cent last January, while the increase
for the first half-year was 63 per cent. The rate dropped back to 31 per
cent for the five months from July to November. There were fewer
receiverships last month than in November 1991.
The firm has also been questioning 500 business leaders since July and has
found a slight rise in confidence. On a scale of 1 to 10, confidence
averaged 5.5 between July and December, but had risen to 6.5 in November.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1177</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Building societies' outflow at Pounds 184m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BUILDING societies fared poorly on both sides of their business last month,
according to figures published by the Building Societies Association
yesterday.
There was a Pounds 184m net outflow of savings in November as depositors
found better interest rates elsewhere. November's figures reversed October's
net inflow of Pounds 281m and mean that there were net outflows in five of
the past 11 months.
Mr Mark Boleat, director-general of the Building Societies Association, said
the November outflow was not surprising 'against the background of a
generally disappointing pattern of savings this year'.
He said the November figures reflected recent cuts in savings rates but
thought that savings rates would go no lower. 'Potential competition from
longer-term investment products means that building society savings rates
are close to their effective floor,' he added.
There is some evidence to support this. National &amp; Provincial, the UK's
eighth-largest society, this week announced it would be raising rates by
0.25 of a percentage point on amounts of more than Pounds 25,000 on some of
its investment accounts from Monday. It is also increasing the rate paid on
its two Tax Exempt Special Savings Accounts.
Mortgage lending was also down. Net new commitments decreased to Pounds
1.85bn from Pounds 2.17bn in October - a drop of just more than 14 per cent
 -while gross mortgage advances increased slightly to Pounds 2.09bn in
November from just under Pounds 2bn the month before.
In spite of the fall, which was attributed to seasonal factors, Mr Boleat
expressed relative optimism about the housing market next year.
The BSA also released regional house price figures for the third quarter,
based on a 5 per cent sample survey of building society completions. The
sample included Abbey National, the UK's second largest lender, which is a
bank.
The average UK house price was Pounds 62,265 in the third quarter, down by 5
per cent compared with the same period last year. The greatest fall was in
Greater London, where prices were down 11 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1178</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Hoover stirs up PR dust cloud over free flights deal: A
troubled promotional scheme
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARY MEAD and MICHAEL SKAPINKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Hoover promotion offering free flights to customers may not have been
the marketing success the company intended. Sales have increased, but the
gloss has been taken off by bad publicity.
In September Mr Alex Mills, who lives in Glasgow, and four relatives bought
Hoover vacuum cleaners and planned to take advantage of the offer to to fly
to the Canary Islands next June for a holiday.
Hoover was offering two return flights to one of six European destinations
in return for purchases of more than Pounds 100. The Mills filled in the
application forms and sent them to JSI Travel, which Hoover is using for the
promotion.
'We have not heard anything since,' says Mr Mills. 'I'm fed up with it. My
eldest daughter phoned Hoover and asked what was going on. They told her
they were busy with the December promotion. That was the last we heard about
it.'
If Mr Mills' experience is common, it threatens to sour the public relations
goodwill the promotion was designed to generate.
Hoover is now running a similar promotion, offering two free return flights
to the US to either New York or Florida. Applicants are promised they can
take flights between next February and April 1994. It is too soon to tell
what consumer reaction to the US deal will be, as the offer does not close
until December 31.
Some within the travel industry doubt whether the promotions make commercial
sense. One senior travel industry executive said it was difficult to imagine
Hoover making anything other than a large loss on the promotion. 'What
profit is Hoover making on that Pounds 100 sale? They might be making a
tenner. Out of that they're paying for two tickets to America? It's
bonkers.'
The main brouhaha concerns the European-bound offer. What appeared to be a
magnificent sales, marketing and public relations promotion has turned into
a wrangle, particularly in Scotland, where both Hoover schemes have been
strongly promoted by retailers.
Ms Jenny Axelson, a director of JSI Travel, agrees there has been some
chaos, but only because 'the offer has been far more popular than any of us
anticipated . . . We have received 100,000 applications and expected no more
than half that. There is no cut-off date to the European offer and
applications are still coming in.'
JSI says so far more than 900 applicants for the European scheme have
successfully travelled to destinations in the Canary Islands, Italy,
Austria, Germany and Spain.
The sheer volume of applicants has forced Hoover to appoint two other travel
agents - Your Leisure and Free Flights Europe - to assist JSI.
Hoover yesterday said Free Flights Europe, like JSI and Your Leisure,
belongs to the Association of British Travel Agents, but that Free Flights
Europe is owned by a holding company, the identity of which Hoover is not
prepared to reveal 'until next week'.
Mr Keith Betton, director of corporate affairs at the Association of British
Travel Agents, says: 'Customers who get involved in such schemes need to be
fully aware that they are not financially protected by ABTA.' However,
Hoover has given an undertaking that all accepted applicants will get their
flights even if Your Leisure, JSI Travel or Free Flights Europe fold.
Hoover added that from next Monday it will run a free flight telephone
helpline.
Over the next few days applicants will receive a letter telling them which
of the three travel agents is handling their travel arrangements.
The US offer is being handled by Your Leisure. Mr Michael Dunkley of Your
Leisure denies there is a problem finding flights: 'There is plenty of
capacity . . . The media have exaggerated the problems concerning lack of
seats.'
Retailers involved in the scheme are very pleased. Dixons says: 'It has been
tremendously successful, with demand far outweighing supply. (Hoover) stock
is walking out the door as fast as it comes in, both for the European and US
offers. We have received no complaints from customers. It has been one of
the most successful promotions ever as far as we are concerned.'
The promotions appear to be prompted by a need to shift product. In October
Hoover's US parent, Maytag, reported pre-tax losses of Dollars 50.2m (Pounds
33m) in the three months to the end of September, compared with a Dollars
24.2m profit for the same period in 1991.
But a year from now the short-term advantages of shifting product may be
seen as a longer-term commercial blunder. One retailer said: 'We now have a
distressed market for electrical goods up here in Scotland. Open any
newspaper and ads for second-hand unused vacuum cleaners drop out.'
Who will benefit from the great Hoover promotion scheme? By the middle of
next year Maytag will be in a position to know.
JSI Travel promises that Mr Mills should hear from them by January. But
unlike vacuum cleaners, goodwill is not easily purchased.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1179</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Exodus from inner cities continues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN PIKE, Social Affairs Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN'S population map altered significantly during the 1980s, with
continuing movement away from the big cities.
The first detailed results of last year's 10-yearly census show that the
overall population counted on census night - 54,156.067 - had changed little
since 1981. Resident population, taking account of people who were absent
from home on census night, was 54,888,844.
Without exception, however, populations of the inner-urban areas had fallen.
East Anglia and the south-west were the biggest gainers. The East Anglian
population had the fastest growth rate - an annual average of 0.8 per cent
between 1981 and 1991 - finishing the decade with 154,500 more people in the
region.
The south-west gained 273,000 people - a 0.6 per cent annual increase -
almost the same number as the north-west lost. Of the 259,600 people who
left the north-west - the region with the sharpest population decline -
between 1981 and 1991, the biggest proportionate loss was from Merseyside.
England and Wales gained 177,300 people since the 1981 census, while the
Scottish population dropped by a similar amount - 168,583.
Last year's census included a question about ethnic origin for the first
time, providing the most accurate data ever available on Britain's ethnic
minorities. It shows that 94.5 per cent of the British population describe
themselves as white. Indians are the biggest ethnic group - 1.5 per cent -
followed by 0.9 per cent of black Caribbeans and a similar proportion of
Pakistani origin.
Most organisations representing Britain's ethnic minorities supported the
inclusion of the ethnic-origin question in the census. By combining the
results with answers to other census questions on issues such as housing and
employment, it will be possible for policy makers to access the particular
needs of ethnic minorities.
The national figure of a 5.5 per cent ethnic minority population - a little
higher than previous estimates - disguises a varied regional distribution.
Nearly 10 per cent of the south-east's population is from ethnic minorities,
rising to more than 25 per cent in inner London. By contrast, more than 98
per cent of the populations of Scotland, Wales, the south-west and the north
(covering the north-east) describe themselves as white.
One of the striking social changes of the 1980s - a sharp increase in home
ownership based largely on the sale of council houses - is confirmed in the
results. By last year 66.4 per cent of households owned their accommodation,
a 10.6 percentage points increase over 1981. The proportion living in
council rented accommodation fell by 9.7 percentage points.
More than a quarter of households - 26.8 per cent - consisted of one person
living alone. That is an increase of 4 percentage points since 1981, and is
another trend that is likely to continue. Most Britons - nearly 60 per cent
of households - live in semi-detached or terraced houses, while 20 per cent
live in detached ones and 17 per cent in purpose-built flats.
Measured in terms of amenities, the census points to improved lifestyles
since 1981. The proportion of overcrowded households fell by 2.1 percentage
points to 2.2 per cent of families, and by last year only 1.3 per cent of
households lacked baths and internal lavatories, compared with 4.7 per cent
10 years earlier. A third of households had no car available for their use,
but 23 per cent had two or more cars - up by 8 percentage points.
The Office of Population, Censuses and Surveys admits that a 'substantial
number of people', consisting mainly of men in their 20s, was missed out
last year. Although it believes its staff managed to track down almost
everyone aged 45 and above, estimates for men in their 20s suggest an
under-enumeration rate of up to 10 per cent.
 -------------------------------------------------------
CENSUS 1991: The changing face of Britain
 -------------------------------------------------------
                       Pensioners    % self    % owner
                            %      employed   occupation
 -------------------------------------------------------
Scotland                   18.2        9.9        52.1
North (remainder)          18.7       10.1        65.2
North West (remainder)     18.9       12.9        75.2
Greater Manchester         18.0       11.3        64.2
Merseyside                 19.1        8.8        63.1
Wales                      20.1       13.4        70.8
West Midlands              18.3        9.5        62.9
West Midlands (remainder)  17.9       14.3        72.5
South West                 21.7       17.3        72.9
Tyne &amp; Wear                19.4        7.3        53.1
Yorks &amp; H'side (remainder) 19.7       14.1        69.7
West Yorkshire             18.0       11.2        66.2
South Yorkshire            19.1        9.4        60.9
East Midlands              18.4       12.9        70.6
East Anglia                19.9       15.1        68.5
Greater London             16.8       13.7        57.2
Outer Metropolitan Area    16.9       15.0        73.9
Outer South East           20.5       15.7        73.9
 -------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1180</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Coal cost forecast 'revised upwards'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN assessment of possible production costs at 27 British Coal pits was
revised upwards by more than 15 per cent following a government request,
according to the company that provided it.
The John T Boyd consultancy reassessed its estimate of average potential
costs at these pits after being requested by its client, the Department of
Energy, to 'adopt a more middle-of-the-road approach'.
This resulted in a figure for potential coal production costs of Pounds 1.33
per gigajoule - the unit of energy from coal - appearing in the company's
unpublished April 1992 report. This figure was up from Pounds 1.15 projected
in an original draft dated December 1991.
Disclosure of the department's request, in written evidence from Boyd to the
all-party Commons trade and industry select committee, is likely to rekindle
debate over the coal industry's potential competitiveness.
British Coal has tentatively agreed contracts with the two main electricity
generators in England and Wales by which it would sell coal at Pounds 1.50
per gigajoule.
In its evidence, Boyd indicates that its Pounds 1.15 estimate was 'based on
a relatively unconstrained approach', assuming 'freedom to manage the mines
on a commercial basis'.
It continues: 'Considering the sweeping industrial and regulatory changes
incorporated into our estimate of potential cost, the Department of Energy
requested that we adopt a more middle-of--the-road approach which assumed
existing regulations (within the context of prevailing industrial practices)
were gradually modernised.
'This approach was used in our April 1992 report and produced the Pounds
1.33/GJ average cost at 100 per cent achievement-level conclusion.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1181</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Cash surge cuts deficit to Pounds 8.13bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SURGE in money flowing into Britain arising from companies' overseas
operations and from bank transactions has led to a large cut in the
current-account deficit for the first nine months of this year.
The Central Statistical Office said yesterday that the current account
deficit for the nine months was Pounds 8.13bn, against a previous estimate
of Pounds 8.68bn.
The revision results largely from new third-quarter figures for invisible
trade, which covers services, interest payments and financial transfers.
However, the CSO cautioned that the better-than-expected figures largely
reflected special factors related to the depth of the UK recession and
September's sterling devaluation. The figures could not be taken as a guide
to underlying trends.
On the basis of the new numbers, the UK had a surplus on invisible trade in
the third quarter of Pounds 1.07bn, as against a previous projection of
Pounds 300m.
The UK traditionally has a surplus in this part of the current account. This
normally partly compensates for a large deficit in visible items, comprising
merchandise goods and oil.
The new estimates are mainly due to a large surplus on net payments into
Britain in the third quarter of interest, profits and dividends. At Pounds
1.73bn, this is the biggest surplus for such items since the CSO started
records in 1963.
The surplus partly reflects a large net flow into Britain in the third
quarter of Pounds 2.16bn from earnings on company investments. In the second
quarter, the corresponding flow of cash into the UK was only Pounds 1.6bn.
The explanation for this figure was that the recession pushed down the
amount of cash flowing out of Britain arising from non-UK companies'
operations. Another factor was currency translations linked to sterling
devaluation.
The invisibles surplus also benefited from a reduction in the flow of cash
out of Britain arising from profits on banking transactions. In the third
quarter, this was Pounds 903m, as against Pounds 1.46bn in the second
quarter.
Less useful in helping the invisibles surplus was a reduction in cash earned
on services. In the third quarter, the surplus on service activities was
Pounds 842m, the lowest quarterly figure since late 1989.
The overall impact of the upward revision in the invisibles figure for the
third quarter was diluted by a new estimate for the invisibles surplus for
the second quarter. The CSO now puts this at Pounds 100m, as against a
previously estimated Pounds 336m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1182</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Building output falls 5%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE recession in the construction industry was underlined yesterday with
provisional figures showing that output in the third quarter of this year
fell 5 per cent to Pounds 7.48bn compared with the same quarter of 1991.
The Department of the Environment figures also show that output in July to
September was 1 per cent lower than in the second quarter of this year.
Total new work in the third quarter was Pounds 4.44bn, 2 per cent lower than
in the previous quarter and 3 per cent lower than a year ago. New private
housing work was 10 per cent higher than a year ago at Pounds 765m, while
new private commercial work fell 22 per cent to Pounds 1.17bn.
The figures are based on the value of construction work at constant 1985
prices, seasonally adjusted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1183</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Jelly ball toys are banned
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STOCKING-FILLER Christmas toys known as jelly balls were banned yesterday.
The brightly coloured golfball-sized toys are designed to be thrown at
walls, where they stick before slowly trickling downwards.
The government has served prohibition notices on 14 companies. Baroness
Denton, consumer affairs minister, said toddlers might mistake the jelly
balls for sweets.
Brand names covered are: Jelly Balls, Kung Fu Balls, Splat Balls, Splat
Eggs, Splat Tomatoes, Slime Balls, Sticky Balls, Tacky Wacky Wall Rollers,
Spike Balls, Sticky Flying Hammers, Hand Hammer Sticky Catchers, Sticky
Hand, Sticky Flicker and Sticky Troll.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1184</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Bank presses EC on supervision
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GAPPER, Banking Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BANK of England is pressing European Community countries to allow
outside regulators to review banking supervision arrangements once the
Second Banking Co-ordination is implemented in the new year.
Under the directive, branches of EC banks operating outside their home
market will no longer be primarily supervised by their local regulator.
Instead the regulator in the parent bank's home country will have
supervisory responsibility.
This will mean principal supervisory responsibility for branches of EC banks
in the UK will rest with their home country supervisors rather than the
Bank, though it will continue to monitor the branches' liquidity.
This supervisory system is the corollary of a new 'passport' given to EC
banks which will allow them to operate in any EC country so long as they
have been authorised to conduct banking business in at least one member
state.
There is concern that some EC bank supervisors could be less effective than
others. This would risk branches of EC banks in Britain not being supervised
properly - to the possible detriment of customers.
The Bank wants both EC and international supervisors among the G10 group of
industrialised countries to accept a system of 'peer group review'
recommended in the wake of the collapse of the Bank of Credit and Commerce
International.
Lord Justice Bingham recommended the idea of peer group review in his report
on BCCI. The suggestion was intended to help ensure common high standards of
bank supervision among EC countries.
The directive has caused some concern in the wake of BCCI because the bank
was incorporated in Luxembourg, and was supervised by a college of
regulators led by the Bank of England and Luxembourg bank regulators.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1185</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / American Express Bank curbs loans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN REECE and SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICAN EXPRESS Bank has suspended unsecured lending above Pounds 2,500 to
its 40,000 green card UK customers because of rising bad debts and the
recession.
Customers whose overdraft exceeds Pounds 2,500 have been told that their
facility has been suspended and that cheques made after receipt of the
letter will not be honoured.
A spokesman at the bank, a wholly owned subsidiary of American Express, said
its write-offs for bad debt provision during the past two years had been
'fairly harsh'. The bank's after-tax profits last year fell to Dollars 60m
(Pounds 39.40m) from Dollars 111m.
American Express bank halved the overdraft facility for its gold card
customers earlier this month to Pounds 5,000. It has now reduced the
overdraft limit for green card holders from Pounds 7,500 to Pounds 2,500.
American Express says the decision follows a strategic overview which has
concluded that unsecured lending should be left to customers' primary banks.
It is reviewing its lending policies worldwide.
Green card customers were told that the decision reflected several factors,
including the recession and 'uncertain economic conditions in the UK'. The
overdraft facility will be reviewed in six months' time.
The move has angered customers expecting to be able to use their overdraft
facility in the run-up to Christmas. American Express acknowledged that the
timing of the decision may not have been the best.
One customer said he was 'staggered' by the bank's attitude, which he
described as autocratic and arbitrary.
'I've been an American Express cardholder since 1984 and have never had a
dent in my creditworthiness with them,' he said. 'They've aggressively sold
me other cards and this higher overdraft facility and now I'm suddenly told
my cheques will be bounced.' He said he would be cancelling his gold card
because of the measure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1186</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Ulster crime figures rise 11%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE were 63,492 crimes reported in Northern Ireland last year, according
to government figures published yesterday. This was a rise of 11 per cent on
1990. The Royal Ulster Constabulary cleared up 36 per cent of offences last
year, compared with 30 per cent in the previous year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1187</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Scottish pit march arrives in London
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A GROUP of Scottish miners have arrived in London at the end of a protest
march against the proposed pit closures.
Nine miners set out from Glasgow on November 14, marching through several
communities where pits are threatened with closure. They were joined on the
way by other miners.
The Trades Union Congress will host a programme of activities for the miners
today.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1188</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Workers occupy Kirkby factory
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WORKERS have occupied the former Lyons Maid ice cream factory in Kirkby,
Liverpool, in an attempt to persuade the new owners, Nestle UK, to keep the
plant open.
The workers at Kirkby and at another former Lyons Maid plant at Greenford in
London lost their jobs in October after Clarke's Foods, which had bought the
plants, put the company into receivership.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1189</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Sacked women win leaflet ruling
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WOMEN who were sacked from a mushroom farm after refusing new contracts,
which they claimed cut their pay, were given permission yesterday by the
Court of Appeal to carry out a leaflet campaign to persuade shoppers not to
buy the farm's produce.
Three judges allowed an appeal by the TGWU general union, which represented
89 women sacked by Middlebrook Mushrooms, a subsidiary of food group Booker.
They lifted an injunction which had blocked the campaign.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1190</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Vehicle parts plant planned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOMMER, the French vehicle trim manufacturer, is setting up a second UK
production plant, John Griffiths writes.
The plant, at Burton-upon-Trent, Staffordshire, will employ about 300 people
with production expected to start in the summer. It will supply interior
parts to Toyota's nearby plant at Burnaston, Derbyshire.
Sommer already has a factory next to Nissan's car facility at Washington,
Tyne and Wear, to which it supplies interior trim on a just-in-time basis.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1191</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Home Office reverses prison pay decision
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRISON service staff who transfer to the private sector if the management of
Strangeways prison, Manchester, is contracted out will retain existing pay
and conditions, the Home Office conceded yesterday.
Unions say this is a further example of confusion in the contracting out
process created by the 1981 employment protection legislation, passed to
comply with a 1977 European directive. They say the government's efforts to
contract out the management of Strangeways are in disarray.
Strangeways has been rebuilt after suffering serious riot damage in 1990,
and the government has asked its prisons department and the private sector
to tender for the contract to manage it. If a company wins the Strangeways
contract, it will become the first established prison under private
management.
The Transfer of Undertakings (Protection of Employment) regulations mean
companies may not cut the pay and conditions of staff when an 'undertaking'
is 'transferred' between employers in acquisitions, mergers and when some
public services are contracted out.
Sir Clive Whitmore, Home Office permanent secretary, has told unions and
contractors the department had originally been advised that the regulations
would not apply to the Strangeways contract.
The Home Office said the new situation was that the regulations would apply.
It added: 'This stems from conflicting legal advice being received on what
appears to be a very complex issue.' It will consider whether the
regulations apply to future tenders on a case-by-case basis.
Unions say prisons will be far less attractive propositions to private
companies if they have to honour existing conditions of employment and union
recognition agreements.
Uncertainty over whether transfer of undertakings regulations apply to
contracting out of public services has caused confusion among councils,
public service unions, lawyers and contractors. Mr William Waldegrave, the
public service minister, last month dismissed the discussion about the
application of the regulations as 'a complete red herring'.
He said the regulations applied only when an undertaking was transferred.
Whether they applied when delivery of a government service was awarded to a
private-sector tender or when a council service was contracted out would
depend on the facts of the case.
York Crown Court was told yesterday that a remand prisoner was tortured and
injected with heroin by other inmates at the Wolds remand centre - Britain's
first privately managed prison. Judge Gordon Atkinson said he had received a
letter outlining what had happened to the man at 'this so-called up-to-date
prison'. He said it disclosed a 'deplorable state of affairs'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1192</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Moves to tackle grant claims fraud
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE government yesterday moved to tackle a fraud over student grant
applications. The Department for Education said it was in touch with all
London local education authorities about false claims.
Council leaders called in police after discovering thousands of faked grant
applications in London, with an average claim worth about Pounds 4,000.
Further cases are suspected in the home counties and other cities, including
Manchester.
The department has advised town halls how to stop fraudulent claims and
recover cash paid out. 'We are considering sending out further advice on how
to combat this kind of fraud to all authorities across the country,' it
said.
The London Borough of Brent said police and internal auditors were
investigating up to 200 bogus grant applications, which would have cost
Pounds 2.4m over three years - the equivalent of a Pounds 20 per head
increase in poll tax bills.
Other boroughs in the capital believed to be hit include Waltham Forest,
Kensington and Chelsea, Redbridge, Islington, Westminster and Camden.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1193</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / British Aerospace cuts 600 jobs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Aerospace yesterday announced it was cutting 600 jobs in its
regional aircraft operations in the Greater Manchester area because of the
recession in the commercial airline industry.
The cuts at BAe's Woodford and Chadderton plants follow a company warning
earlier this week that a further 650 jobs are likely to be lost next year at
its commercial aircraft plants at Filton in Bristol and Broughton near
Chester.
The latest cuts reflect the continuing pressures on BAe's commuter and
regional aircraft markets as well as the decision of the European Airbus
consortium to reduce production because of cancellations and order
deferrals.
BAe, which manufactures the wings for Airbus airliners, is having to scale
back production to match the reduced rate of Airbus output following recent
decisions by large customers such as Northwest Airlines to cancel big
orders.
Before the latest job cuts, BAe unveiled a radical restructuring programme
for its loss-making commercial aircraft activities, including the closure of
its aircraft manufacturing plant at Hatfield, the shedding of 3,000 jobs and
a preliminary agreement to join its regional jet activities with Taiwan
Aerospace. The restructuring also involved the transfer of turbopropeller
commuter aircraft activities to Prestwick in Scotland.
But BAe said it was reducing its commercial aircraft workforce further
because 'the effects of the recession on the airline industry are on-going,
with consequent deferment and cancellation of orders'.
The company, one of the UK's biggest manufacturers, has also made heavy job
cuts in its defence activities. It said that its latest market outlook
required it to adopt a 'more prudent' approach to its regional jet and
turbopropeller commuter aircraft production.
The restructuring moves coincide with the final round of negotiations
between BAe and Taiwan Aerospace for a joint regional aircraft venture. BAe
said the negotiations were making 'good progress'.
BAe and Taiwan Aerospace said in September they expected to complete the
deal by the end of the year. However, several aerospace industry analysts
expect the transaction to take longer.
The latest round of BAe job cuts were attacked by the Labour party and by
the engineering unions. Mr Frank Dobson, Labour's employment spokesman,
said: 'If we are to have an industrial future, these are the type of hi-tech
jobs we cannot afford to lose.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1194</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Auditors fail to meet all standards
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONLY ONE of four auditors to listed companies inspected by regulators passed
all the new audit requirements without any challenge.
The figure was given yesterday in the first annual report from the Joint
Monitoring Unit, the self-regulatory body jointly controlled by the UK's
three chartered accountancy bodies.
The report showed that, in all, only 11 of the 158 auditors randomly visited
in the six months to last October achieved full marks on 13 questions
devised by the unit in conjunction with the Department of Trade and
Industry. Inspections have been completed on only four auditors to listed
companies.
The unit concluded: 'While most firms have taken steps to comply with audit
regulations, many still need to improve their systems and procedures.'
Members of the audit regulation committees also stressed that the tests were
highly subjective, and that it would be very rare for any audit firm to go
unchallenged on all the questions. They said the tests were still being
refined.
Mr Colin Brown, chairman of the joint audit regulation policy co-ordinating
committee, said: 'It is too early to make any final judgments. We do not
have evidence to suggest the profession is falling apart at the seams. But
those areas in need of remedy are being remedied.'
The three institutes confirmed that audit registration fees - which have
been a source of concern to some firms - will remain frozen next year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1195</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Pensions may limit Post Office plans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN and ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RULES governing the Post Office pension fund may play a key role in
determining the timing of the government's plans for the organisation.
The rules limit the circumstances under which an estimated Pounds 80m
surplus in Parcelforce's pension fund may be transferred to a new owner.
The government may need to signal a clear intention to break up the Post
Office before selling its parcel delivery arm if it wants to be able to
transfer the surplus.
The surplus could act as a significant sweetener for prospective purchasers,
enhancing the attractiveness of the loss-making business.
According to actuarial advice in the Post Office's possession, the
proportion of Post Office pension scheme funds relating to Parcelforce
employees is 'most likely' to be assessed on a 'past service reserve basis'
in the event of the unit's sale and the absence of any special factors.
This means that enough funds would be transferred to finance members'
accrued pension rights but not to reflect any surplus resources. There is a
Pounds 1.4bn surplus in the main Post Office pension fund, suggesting the
proportion relating to Parcelforce could amount to Pounds 80m or more.
The government - which is reviewing pension regulations through its Pensions
Law Review Committee - announced in July that it intended to sell
Parcelforce. It is expected to announce the outcome of its review of the
Post Office's structure early next year.
According to the actuarial advice, 'special factors' might be deemed to
apply if this review resulted in the Post Office 'being split up into
various discreet segments'.
It adds: 'In these circumstances the trustees might well conclude that the
part of the fund attributed to each tranche of membership should include an
appropriate share of the surplus in the schemes.'
In an implicit reference to the possible use of the fund as a sweetener,
trustees are also advised to consider 'any provisions that there are or will
be in the purchaser's scheme for the possible repayment of any surplus
resources to the purchaser'.
Kleinwort Benson, the government's adviser on the future of the service, has
told ministers that the Royal Mail, the Post Office's letters division, is a
'classic candidate' for a flotation.
The less profitable Post Office Counters, which handles social security
payments, would be harder to sell separately. Kleinwort Benson believes the
division is fundamentally uncommer-cial.
The Post Office said discussions on how to handle the pension fund issue had
not yet started.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1196</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Merseybus sold to staff for Pounds 6m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN HAMILTON FAZEY, Northern Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MERSEYBUS, which operates a fleet of 1,000 publicly owned buses on
Merseyside, is to be sold to its workforce for Pounds 6m through an employee
share option scheme.
The deal, which the government approved yesterday, was supported by an
overwhelming majority of the company's 2,600 employees in a ballot last
month.
The company is one of the area's 10 largest employers and has been owned by
the county's five metropolitan boroughs through the Merseyside Passenger
Transport Authority.
The deal restricts Merseybus being sold again within three years and
requires the company to join all operator travelcard schemes run locally.
Merseybus is the 13th public transport company to be sold. There are 36 bus
companies still owned by local authorities.
Following the Autumn Statement, councils that sell bus companies by the end
of next year will be able to keep all the proceeds, instead of the 50 per
cent previously allowed, which will apply again from January 1994.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1197</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Safeway store to close on Sundays
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SAFEWAY, the food store chain, yesterday became the first retailer to feel
the effect of this week's European Court of Justice ruling upholding English
Sunday trading laws.
It has agreed to close its store at Newport, Shropshire, on Sundays from
December 27. The store will be open tomorrow.
The Wrekin Council took Safeway before the High Court. It was the first case
since the European court's ruling that the Shops Act in England and Wales,
which limits Sunday trading, did not clash with EC laws.
The High Court did not issue an order for the store to close. It said it
would wait for the European court's ruling to be considered by the House of
Lords.
Safeway said yesterday that it had agreed with the council that in the light
of the legal action it would close its Newport store on Sundays from
December 27 until any further court order, or until parliament changed the
law.
The agreement was approved by Mr Justice Morritt.
Safeway said it was taking legal advice on whether to continue Sunday
trading at other stores after tomorrow, although for the moment opening
would continue.
Other retailers, including J. Sainsbury and Tesco, said they would also go
ahead with plans to open tomorrow.
However, they would be taking legal advice and would be reviewing the
situation when the House of Lords had considered the European court ruling.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1198</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / GPT telephone factory to close
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GPT, a subsidiary of GEC, Britain's largest defence electronics
manufacturer, is to close a telephone equipment-making plant with the loss
of 250 jobs.
The company blamed recession and newer technology for the closure of the
factory at Kirkcaldy, Fife. It said it had reviewed all sites and decided to
cut capacity. The factory will shut on March 31.
Redeployment will be offered to employees 'where possible'. The company
added: 'Every effort will be made to assist people to look for alternative
employment.'
Consultations with employee representatives has already started.
GPT was formed in 1988 by the merger of the telecommunications operations of
GEC and Plessey. Several of its plants have since closed.
It once employed more than 3,000 people at the Kirkcaldy factory and a
defunct sister plant in Glenrothes, Fife.
The Kirkcaldy plant made computers for Amstrad, the electronics company,
until June last year when GPT pulled out of the venture.
GPT had earmarked the plant for several new projects, especially in the
mobile telephone market. The schemes, such as Telepoint which was intended
to be a cheaper alternative to the more flexible cellular telephone network,
failed.
Earlier this year GPT closed its research and development and engineering
centre at Newton Aycliffe, County Durham, where it employed 65 people, and
it made a further 250 people redundant at Beeston, Nottinghamshire.
The company still manufactures telecommunications equipment at Beeston,
where it has its headquarters, and at other sites.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1199</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Call to support enterprise body
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR IAN LANG, the Scottish secretary, was yesterday urged by Labour to
confirm that Scottish Enterprise, the official development body, still has a
long-term future. This follows an announcement by Scottish Enterprise that
it plans to make 60 of its 380 headquarters staff redundant.
Scottish Enterprise stressed that the redundancies, which it hopes will be
voluntary, did not result from financial stringency but from a desire to
'refocus' its activities and improve efficiency. Its budget for the next
financial year is virtually unchanged at Pounds 455m.
The headquarters in Glasgow funds the network of 13 local enterprise
companies in southern Scotland, carries out Scotland-wide functions and
helps selected sectors of the economy.
Mr Crawford Beveridge, Scottish Enterprise chief executive, said the
organisation would continue to focus on attracting inward investment,
assisting indigenous investment, helping selected sectors and developing
exports.
The enterprise companies are expected to reduce their administrative budgets
next year, Scottish Enterprise said. Recently Mr Lang told Scottish
Enterprise he wanted to see more decentralisation to the companies.
Scottish Enterprise was unable to name any sector of its activities that
would be discontinued, although it is believed that help to industrial
sectors which already have a strong trade association may be ended.
Mr Henry McLeish, acting shadow Scottish secretary, said the job losses were
'a disgrace which confirm our fears about the future of Scottish
Enterprise'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1200</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Moi warned over Kenya poll conduct
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HOLMAN and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NAIROBI, KINSHASA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Commonwealth observer group yesterday issued a second public warning to
the Kenyan government about its pre-election conduct.
A statement issued after a meeting with President Daniel arap Moi said the
Kenyan leader had been told of the group's 'concern about the continuing
dispute over (parliamentary) nominations'.
The leader of the group, Mr Justice Telford Georges, told the president the
nomination procedure 'is a crucial part of the election process'.
Earlier this week the observers said the election process would be 'severely
compromised' if opposition candidates prevented from presenting their
nomination papers in 45 seats were unable to contest the December 29
elections.
Yesterday Mr Justice Georges stressed the importance of the issue, telling
the president that 'blocking participation is tilting the table.'
Seventeen candidates of the ruling Kanu party have been returned unopposed,
but opposition parties are challenging the outcome in the high court.
Following a separate meeting with the chairman of the electoral commission,
the Commonwealth group said it had pressed for measures 'to strengthen the
integrity of the balloting procedure'.
Demonstrators blocked streets throughout Zaire's capital with burning tyres
and garbage containers yesterday in a mass protest against President Mobutu
Sese Seko, Reuter reports from Kinshasa. Troops fired into the air to
scatter the crowds, but the capital remained paralysed.
The protest was originally urged by Zaire's powerful Christian Lay
Committee, which called for a popular uprising to end Mr Mobutu's 27-year
rule.
The committee revoked the decision on Thursday,
but residents went ahead with an apparently spontaneous show of anger
against Mr Mobutu's efforts to cling to power.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1201</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / China hits at Hong Kong company
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON HOLBERTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA yesterday stepped up its campaign against Governor Chris Patten's
proposals for greater democracy in Hong Kong with a fierce attack on Jardine
Matheson, one of the colony's oldest trading companies.
The denunciation appeared to be intended to hit Jardine's share price, and
led to a steep fall in Hong Kong share overall. It prompted a rare statement
from John Swire, another leading trading company of British origin, which
sought to play down the attack.
The attack heightened anxiety among the colony's business leaders about the
rapid deterioration in Anglo-Chinese relations and the consequences this
would have for Hong Kong's long-term future.
The Hang Seng index ended 136.8 points, or 2.57 per cent, lower at 5,192.66.
Jardine's share price ended HKDollars 2.75 lower at HKDollars 42.75.
A despatch carried by the Xinhua news agency described an old British
conglomerate which once sold opium to China as 'a bad element in Hong Kong's
business community, a 'looter'.'
Jardine was not referred to by name, but the reference to opium - the early
19th-century trade which was the foundation of the company's fortunes - made
it the unmistakable subject of the article. It was also accused of actively
promoting Mr Patten's democracy proposals in Hong Kong and London.
But Xinhua's comments concerned other British companies in Hong Kong. 'It is
asking for it,' Xinhua said, forecasting further falls in its share price if
Jardine continued its political activities.
Jardine said yesterday it had no comment on the Xinhua dispatch, accounts of
which dominated the news media in Hong Kong yesterday. In contrast, Mr Peter
Sutch, chairman of Swire in Hong Kong, said: 'We see no reason why what has
been said has any significance for the Swire group or any other company in
Hong Kong.'
Although some analysts said they thought the Xinhua article boded ill for
British companies, most felt it was a warning directed solely at Jardine.
Nevertheless it heightened concern in the colony's financial community.
Mr John Mulcahy, director of research at Peregrine, a local brokerage, said:
'I think this is really going to worry people overseas. Jardine is seen as a
symbol of Hong Kong and the notion of it being under attack will not sit
easily with investors.'
Jardine has had an uneasy relationship with China since it was founded in
Macao in 1832. It lobbied Lord Palmerston for the annexation of Hong Kong;
this occurred in 1841 and was made legal by the Treaty of Nanking in 1842.
But it has been Jardine's more recent activities which have angered the
Chinese. It agitated in London for the removal of Lord Wilson, Mr Patten's
predecessor, and it has been conspicuous in its support for Mr Patten's
political proposals.
Mr Henry Keswick, Jardine's chairman, is head of the Hong Kong Foundation, a
London-based organisation, which has given unequivocal support to Mr
Patten's plans for more democracy in the colony.
World Stock Markets, Page 19; Lex, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1202</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Rebel-turned-insider wins Korean poll
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR KIM Young-sam of the ruling Democratic Liberal Party (DLP) last night
became the first civilian president to be elected in South Korea in more
than three decades.
With 93 per cent of votes counted, Mr Kim had 42 per cent of the ballot,
against 34 per cent for Mr Kim Dae-jung of the main opposition Democratic
Party. Mr Chung Ju-yung, the founder of the Hyundai industrial group, got 16
per cent.
Counting of the 24m votes was slow because officials used schoolgirls and
bank clerks to tally votes with abacuses, instead of relying on computers,
to avoid the charges of electronic fraud that clouded the 1987 presidential
election.
Voter turnout was 81.8 per cent of South Korea's 29m voters, lower than the
89.2 per cent who voted in the previous presidential poll in 1987 when Mr
Roh Tae-woo, a former army general, was selected.
Mr Kim Dae-jung announced after the result that he would retire from
parliament and political life.
Mr Kim Young-sam will be limited to a single five-year term from next
February.
He stood as an opposition candidate in the 1987 election but joined the
ruling party in 1990. He had been the front-runner since candidates were
nominated last spring.
But his campaign was thrown on the defensive in recent weeks by allegations
that the government was interfering on his behalf, although it had earlier
promised that it would stay neutral to ensure a fair election.
Mr Kim's victory appears due to the Koreans' conservative preference for
stability, since he represents continuity in government policy.
The threat posed by Mr Chung in attracting conservative middle-class voters
from Mr Kim proved less serious than had been predicted.
Mr Kim recently criticised Mr Chung, alleging that he was trying to 'buy'
the election.
Mr Kim's political base in the port city of Pusan, in the south-eastern
Kyongsang region, also benefited him. Regionalism is highly influential in
Korean politics and Kyongsang has produced all of the nation's leaders for
the last three decades.
There was little to distinguish between Mr Kim and his main opponents, as
all have centrist policies, including proposals to deregulate the economy,
which has faltered recently.
Mr Kim, who will be 65 tomorrow, has never hidden his ambition to become
president ever since he was elected as the nation's youngest ever MP at the
age of 25 in 1954.
He became known for his opposition to the country's military dictatorship,
which ruled from 1961 to 1987.
He was expelled from the National Assembly in 1979 and banned from political
activity in the early 1980s. He almost died from a hunger strike in 1983.
He and Mr Kim Dae-jung formed a pro-democracy organisation, but then became
bitter rivals after the downfall of the military dictatorship.
The two men could not agree on a single candidate to oppose Mr Roh in the
1987 election and they both ran, splitting the opposition vote and ensuring
victory for Mr Roh, who took 36.6 per cent of the vote.
Mr Kim Young-sam gained 28 per cent in that election and Mr Kim Dae-jung
27.1 per cent.
Mr Kim Young-sam decided to merge his party with the government in 1990
after his Reunification Democratic Party was reduced to third place in
parliamentary elections in 1988.
The move gave the government a parliamentary majority and Mr Kim was
promised the ruling party's presidential nomination in return.
Mr Kim was criticised for being a political opportunist in joining the
government, but he defended the decision by arguing that it broke a
legislative stalemate that was harming the country.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1203</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Keating's opponents fight back
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AUSTRALIA'S conservative opposition parties launched their campaign for the
next federal election yesterday by publishing a radical overhaul of their
proposed economic and social policies.
The announcement followed a dramatic recovery of popularity by the ruling
Labor government, which leads the conservatives by about 12 points in the
polls, compared to a deficit of 12 points in October.
Mr John Hewson, the conservative leader, acknowledged that he had been
unable to win widespread public support for the opposition's Fightback
manifesto, launched in November last year.
The revised version retains original proposals for a goods and services tax
(GST), tariff cuts, labour market deregulation and cuts in public spending
to balance the budget.
However, the opposition has responded to criticism by church and welfare
groups by exempting basic foods and child-care from the GST, dropping plans
to cut unemployment benefits, raising family allowances, and deferring cuts
to job creation programmes.
The revised package also includes cuts in personal income taxes, ADollars
3bn (Pounds 1.3bn) for public spending on infrastructure projects, and a
streamlined depreciation regime - swiftly welcomed by business
organisations.
The increased spending would be financed by bringing forward the
privatisation of Australia and Overseas Telecommunications Corporation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1204</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Pressure for higher US petrol taxes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A COALITION of fiscal conservatives, environmentalists, car-makers and
international economists has given new life to the proposal that the US
needs higher petrol taxes.
Mr Bill Clinton argued strongly during his election campaign against raising
petrol taxes, but at his economic seminar in Little Rock this week, he
appeared increasingly isolated.
Politicians who have made the mounting budget deficit the centre of their
message, such as Mr Ross Perot, argue there is plenty of room to raise the
relatively modest taxes imposed on petrol.
International economists at the International Monetary Fund and the
Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development have also favoured
petrol taxes as a way to reduce the US budget deficit, since every
additional 1 cent per gallon would raise around Dollars 1bn (Pounds 658m) a
year.
Environmentalists favour higher petrol taxes as a way of discouraging the
US's profligate fuel consumption, and so reducing exhaust emissions. With a
US gallon of unleaded petrol now costing anywhere from Dollars 1 to Dollars
1.25, fuel consumption ranges from 19.7 miles per gallon in Hawaii, the most
economical state, to 11.2mpg in Alaska.
Car companies are surprising newcomers to the cause, but Mr Harold Poling,
chairman of Ford Motor, backed higher petrol taxes at the Little Rock
summit, and Chrysler and General Motors, the other two big US car-makers,
have followed.
The car companies would gladly accept higher taxes in exchange for the
abolition of the current rules designed to discourage gas-guzzlers, which
oblige them to make small, fuel-efficient cars which customers have no
incentive to buy, because petrol is so cheap.
Mr Clinton left open the possibility of pairing a rise in taxes with income
tax cuts for the middle class. 'I don't think you ought to raise the heck
out of gas taxes unless you're going to give the middle class some kind of a
break somewhere else,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1205</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Malaysian sultans may have scored own goal: How a
bad-tempered hockey match threatens to lead to a constitutional crisis
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LIKE an approaching tropical storm, the early rumblings of a constitutional
crisis are being heard in Malaysia. At issue is the role of the sultans -
Malaysia's royalty - in the nation's life.
Dr Mahathir Mohamad, the country's tough-talking prime minister, seems
determined to tackle the privileged world of the country's nine sultans, who
take turns as king.
The present problems were originally caused by a hockey game. A son of the
Sultan of Johor, one of Malaysia's richest states, was playing against
another state team. He is alleged to have assaulted the opposition
goalkeeper and as a result, was banned from playing for five years.
Johor hockey teams were then withdrawn from various tournaments, apparently
on the orders of the sultan.
A Johor hockey coach, Mr Douglas Gomez, spoke out against the ban and was
summoned to the sultan's palace in Johor.
There, he told police, he was given a lecture by courtiers on royal
etiquette and how to ask the sultan's forgiveness. He was then ushered into
the sultan's presence and surrounded by a group of men, including military
police. Mr Gomez said the sultan became angry and assaulted him. The coach
later underwent medical treatment.
Malaysia's sultans have little political power, but they are one of the
symbols of Malay and Islamic identity in the country and as such still have
influence, particularly in rural, mainly Malay, areas. Under Malaysia's
constitution, the sultans cannot be brought before a court of law.
Dr Mahathir says sultans should not be above the law in cases where people
have been beaten up or murdered. The government says constitutional
amendments doing away with the royalty's legal immunity will be tabled
within a month.
However, any such amendments have to be approved by a Council of Rulers  -
consisting of the sultans themselves. If the sultans refuse to adopt the
changes a constitutional crisis will be the inevitable outcome. Yesterday Mr
Abu Talib Othman, attorney general, was quoted as saying he was confident
the sultans would support the move to end their immunity.
Earlier this year the government tried to make the royals agree to a code of
conduct which forbade their interference in business or political affairs.
But the code is not legally binding and a number of sultans, the Sultan of
Johor included, have not signed it.
Ten years ago a constitutional crisis was provoked by the king's refusal to
give the royal assent to constitutional amendments introduced by Dr
Mahathir's government. The changes would have limited royal power but
increased that of the prime minister. In the event both sides were forced to
find a compromise.
Dr Mahathir now feels in a stronger position. Malaysia, with its strong
economic growth, is becoming a more urban society. The sultans have little
influence in the towns and cities. People are perhaps becoming more cynical
about their erstwhile rulers.
Many of the sultans are very rich. Some have thousands of acres of valuable
timber concessions. The Sultan of Johor not only owns industrial development
land in his own fast-developing state, but is also one of the biggest
landowners in neighbouring Singapore.
In addition to their private wealth, the sultans receive handsome government
stipends. The Johor Sultan even has his own small army - paid for out of
central government funds. While the various business dealings and marital
affairs of the sultans are the subject of much private gossip, any open
criticism of the royalty has in the past been very carefully regulated.
Suddenly the palace gates have been thrown open. Government ministers, led
by Dr Mahathir, have unleashed a barrage of criticism against the Johor
Sultan. The media, given the green light by the government, have joined in.
Earlier this year the sultan of one state imported an expensive Italian
sports car. It was impounded at customs, pending payment of MDollars 2.1m
(Pounds 560,000) in import duties.
The sultan concerned went to the customs, told the officials he was taking
the car for a test drive - and drove it back to his palace. Though the
government says the matter has now been settled, the sultan has insisted he
has not paid, and does not intend to pay, any of the import duties.
The national news agency says a taboo on the reporting of royal abuses has
been lifted.
'Malaysia's rulers are living in absolute luxury even by the standards of
the British royal family, whose members are not only generally more
well-behaved but also lead a less lavish lifestyle and are more conscious of
the money they are taking from the privy purse,' said the agency.
Some years ago one of the sultans said Malaysia's royalty had to maintain
its credibility or the day might come when it would be condemned to the
museum. A bad-tempered hockey game may have brought that day considerably
closer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1206</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Winning is not enough for Singapore prime minister
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SINGAPORE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A BY-ELECTION in Singapore is not an earth-shaking occasion. But the ballot
today has sent nervous tremors through Singapore's body politic and prompted
government warnings about the dire consequences of any change.
The People's Action party (PAP) has been in power for more than 30 years,
for much of that time unopposed in parliament. Mr Goh Chok Tong, who took
over as prime minister from Mr Lee Kuan Yew in late 1990, went to the polls
in August last year to seek a popular mandate. The PAP won 77 of the 81
seats in parliament, polling 61 per cent of the vote - a result which
anywhere else would have politicians puffing with delight.
But to the PAP the result was little short of a calamity. Four opposition
MPs, more than ever before, had won seats in parliament. Mr Goh had lost a
two percentage point share of the popular vote.
This by-election, in the middle class area of Marine Parade, is, according
to the PAP, a general election rerun. Mr Goh is one of four candidates up
for election. Last time he was returned with 77 per cent of the vote.
Mr Lee Kuan Yew, speaking at an election rally this week, said if Mr Goh's
percentage of votes was reduced then the prime minister would lose his moral
authority to govern. Mr Goh would become like Mr John Major, with his
position challenged at every turn. A wave of uncertainty would sweep
Singapore. Foreign investors might stay away. The economy would suffer.
'He (Mr Goh) will lose that moral authority both in the government and with
the public. You put the whole of the government, his policies, his
credibility with investors, with foreign governments, in doubt,' said Mr
Lee, now Singapore's senior minister.
Though the opposition has been fragmented, the small Singapore Democratic
party (SDP) has made an unexpectedly strong showing, with thousands turning
up for its rallies.
There are very few who think Mr Goh will lose his seat today. But there are
many who feel the PAP has seriously misjudged the amount of discontent with
PAP policies, particularly over health care. Mr Goh might not achieve 77 per
cent of the vote. That, in the unusual world of Singapore politics, would
mean a defeat for the PAP.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1207</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Keating's opponents overhaul policies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AUSTRALIA'S conservative opposition parties launched their campaign for the
next federal election yesterday by publishing a radical overhaul of their
proposed economic and social policies.
The announcement followed a dramatic recovery of popularity by the ruling
Labor government, which leads the conservatives by about 12 points in the
polls, compared to a deficit of 12 points in October.
Mr John Hewson, the conservative leader, acknowledged that he had been
unable to win widespread public support for the opposition's Fightback
manifesto, launched in November last year.
The revised version retains original proposals for a goods and services tax
(GST), tariff cuts, labour market deregulation and cuts in public spending
to balance the budget.
However, the opposition has responded to criticism by church and social
welfare groups by exempting basic foodstuffs and child-care from the GST,
dropping plans to cut unemployment benefits, raising family allowances, and
deferring cuts to job creation programmes.
The revised package also includes cuts in personal income taxes, ADollars
3bn (Pounds 1.3bn) for public spending on infrastructure projects, and a
streamlined depreciation regime - swiftly welcomed by business
organisations.
The increased spending would be financed by bringing forward the proposed
privatisation of Australia and Overseas Telecommunications Corporation, the
government-owned carrier, which analysts say could raise ADollars 20bn.
Mr Paul Keating, the prime minister, dismissed the revisions as a desperate
gamble. He said the spending and revenue estimates did not add up, and
claimed the Australian capital markets would be unable to digest the
proposed privatisation programme. Mr Keating is believed to be working on an
economic statement to be delivered early next year, possibly as a
curtain-raiser to an election in February or March. He said he would not try
to match the tax cuts offered by the conservatives.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1208</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Hata launches Japanese faction to press for reform
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Tsutomu Hata, the former Japanese finance minister, yesterday launched
Japan's newest political faction, dedicated to a sweeping reform of the
country's scandal-ridden political institutions.
Mr Hata said the group's aim was to create a political system which would
enable Japan to play a larger and more responsible role in world politics.
The Hata group has attracted 33 members of the Japanese parliament who were
formerly in the Takeshita faction, the largest of the groups within the
ruling Liberal Democratic Party.
The launch of the Hata group yesterday marked the formal split of the
Takeshita faction, which has dominated the LDP, in one form or another,
since the mid-1970s.
The role of the Hata group is still unclear, but it plans to champion
political reform in the wake of the Tokyo Sagawa Kyubin scandal, in which
LDP leaders have been accused of enlisting corrupt businessmen to act as
intermediaries with organised crime gangs and far-right political groups.
Mr Hata said: 'In the past, scandals have been solved by the resignation of
a single person. We want a complete transformation of the political system.'
The group will campaign to replace the current system of large, multi-member
electoral constituencies in which candidates from the same party compete
with one another. The new faction will press for the introduction of
single-seat constituencies in which candidates from different parties
challenge one another.
Mr Hata said this change would promote the national debate about Japan's
political priorities which the current system inhibited.
However, there is little agreement within the Hata group over its strategy.
Mr Hata believes the faction should appeal for support among the opposition
socialist parties, and some of the group's younger members believe it should
form the nucleus of a new party to challenge the LDP. However many of the
group's senior members believe it should change the LDP from within by
providing a power base for Mr Hata to become the party's leader and prime
minister.
They believe Mr Hata's political reform programme will make him an ideal
candidate to revive the LDP's fortunes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1209</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Baker to face election inquiry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR William Barr, the US attorney general, has been obliged to appoint a
special prosecutor to investigate whether senior White House aides broke the
law in the examination of the passport files of President-elect Bill Clinton
before last month's election.
US newspapers yesterday reported that Mr James Baker, the former secretary
of state who moved in August to become White House chief of staff, was among
those to be questioned, along with two of his long-standing assistants, Mrs
Margaret Tutwiler and Ms Janet Mullins. All three, according to the New York
Times, have hired lawyers to represent them in the course of the
investigation.
Mr Barr is a vigorous opponent of the independent counsel statute, which was
enacted in 1978 for a five-year period and twice renewed but which expired
last Tuesday.
But evidence presented to Mr Barr by his own Justice Department was reported
to have found possible wrongdoing in the White House, forcing his hand under
of those provisions of the act covering senior appointed officials. He
approached three federal appeals court judges, who met on Monday, and
appointed Mr Joseph diGenova, a former federal attorney, to the job.
The Clinton passport affair came to light a month before the presidential
election, when it became known that Mrs Elizabeth Tamposi, a political
appointee at the State Department in charge of consular affairs, had
authorised searches of Mr Clinton's files in Washington and at the US
embassies in London and Oslo, for any evidence that he had considered
renouncing his US citizenship during the Vietnam war. No such evidence was
unearthed, but testimony to a subsequent state department investigation
suggested White House interest in the search.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1210</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / West blows hot and cold on Bosnia: There is a feeling of
guilt behind the latest manoeuvrings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT MAUTHNER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WAS a week that began with huffing and ended with puffing about the
rapidly deteriorating situation in the former Yugoslavia.
After a hectic round of conferences that started with the European Community
summit in Edinburgh last weekend and ended with the Nato Council in Brussels
eight days later, it was still not clear precisely what measures the
international community would take to end the bloody conflict in
Bosnia-Hercegovina.
What was again underlined is that nobody is talking of military intervention
in the broadest sense. Not a single western country, least of all the US, is
prepared to send ground troops to Bosnia to fight at the side of the Bosnian
Moslems.
The use of peacekeeping troops under the umbrella of the United Nations as a
protection for aid convoys, and possibly in future as a shield for any safe
havens that might be created for Moslems, is as far as anyone is prepared to
go.
The two measures discussed over and over by ministers were proposed adoption
by the UN Security Council of a resolution to 'enforce' October's flight ban
over Bosnia, probably involving only deployment of military aircraft, and
the lifting of the embargo on arms deliveries to Bosnian Moslems.
The second suggestion, advocated by Turkey and the group of Islamic
countries, was given short shrift.
If caution won the day, it was largely thanks to expert contributions by the
two co-chairmen of the Yugoslavia peace conference, Mr Cyrus Vance and Lord
Owen, and the military commanders of the UN Protection Force to the one-day
conference on Bosnia in Geneva last Wednesday. The 'Cy and David show', as
it has come to be called, 'brought some reality and good sense to the battle
front,' according to one western delegate.
Mr Vance's judgment that lifting the arms embargo would only encourage
delivery of more sophisticated and more destructive weapons to all the
warring parties and that it could lead to a widening of the conflict
throughout the Balkan region, convinced most participants and no
recommendation supporting such a move was made.
It was the proposed Security Council resolution enforcing the 'no-fly' zone
over Bosnia that caused all the arguments, though the issue had been
stripped of most of its military relevance by factual reports presented by
Gen Satish Nambiar, commander-in-chief of UN forces in the former
Yugoslavia, and Maj-Gen Philippe Morillon, commander of UN forces in Bosnia.
While the UN had monitored more than 200 violations of the flight ban, these
were mostly helicopter flights carrying personnel, and no combat missions of
fixed-wing aircraft had been reported, they told the ministers.
Why, then, all the fuss about the need for enforcement of a ban, violations
of which have been militarily insignificant? The answer is that enforcing
the air exclusion zone by attacking airfields and shooting down Bosnian Serb
aircraft has acquired a symbolic importance for an international community
desperate to show it is prepared to 'do something' while still unwilling to
contemplate full military intervention.
That feeling of guilt about the world's failure to stop the aggression and
the appalling atrocities committed in Bosnia also explains the great
emphasis placed by Mr Lawrence Eagleburger, US secretary of state, on the
need to bring those responsible for humanitarian crimes to trial by an
international war crimes tribunal.
Some countries have detected a bitter irony in the fact that a nation like
Britain, which has taken a leading role in so many wars over the past
century, remains deeply reluctant to endorse, let alone to participate in
even such a limited military air operation as the one now under
consideration by the UN.
They have contrasted the extreme concern shown by the government for the
safety of the 2,400 troops of the Cheshire Regiment in Bosnia with the
comparative insouciance exhibited by former prime minister Mrs Margaret
Thatcher in despatching troops to fight in sparsely-inhabited islands in the
South Atlantic.
The conclusion that the British government's cautious attitude is not
unconnected with its slim parliamentary majority and the fact that it has
had enough troubles recently without adding a foreign war to the list, has
been drawn by several diplomatic observers at last week's meetings. Yet it
is equally clear that the validity of some of the cautionary arguments
deployed by Mr Douglas Hurd, foreign secretary, has been acknowledged by
many delegates, including Mr Eagleburger.
Long before Mr Radovan Karadzic, the Bosnian Serbian leader, sent his letter
to prime minister John Major threatening retaliatory action against UN
forces if military measures were used to enforce the air exclusion zone over
Bosnia, Mr Hurd had repeatedly warned his colleagues that such a step could
endanger the safety of UN troops and international aid workers.
His contention that the whole humanitarian aid operation could be
undermined, received eloquent confirmation from Mr Eagleburger, who said
that humanitarian aid might have to be suspended 'hopefully for only a short
period' if measures to enforce the 'no-fly' zone were implemented,
presumably to ensure the safety of aid workers.
What has emerged clearly during the talks of the past week is that there is
no consensus even among France's western allies on the content of the
enforcement resolution it intends to table in the Security Council next
week, though Nato countries have undertaken to support any UN enforcement
measures if the resolution is adopted.
Nor is it a good augury that both Russia and China are reported to be
considering the possibility of vetoing such a resolution.
If that happened, it would end the exceptional post-cold war period of
co-operation that has given the UN such a central role in international
peacekeeping.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1211</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Germany may cut social spending
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARP CUTS in social spending and in tax allowances for the better-paid are
under serious consideration by the German government and opposition as part
of their negotiations on a 'solidarity pact' to finance the costs of
unification.
The aim is to minimise any future tax increases necessary to pay off the
burden of accumulated debt in east Germany and to keep essential subsidies
going to eastern enterprises and the unemployed.
Charges and counter-charges were flying in Bonn yesterday about the scale
and scope of the cuts being planned, after publication of a purported list
of social spending measures likely to be included.
On the list are cuts in unemployment benefit, student grants, children's
allowances, social security for asylum-seekers, rent rebates, maternity
benefits, and the like.
It also proposes an effective freeze on civil servants' salaries, to rise by
no more than 3 per cent a year, with a further one per cent deduction for
'social justice'.
Publication brought a furious reaction from opposition politicians, who said
the poorest would have to bear the brunt of the soaring costs of
unification.
Mr Theo Waigel, the finance minister, denied that the purported savings
plans came from his ministry, or from the Chancellor's office.
There was a strong suspicion in Bonn political circles yesterday that the
one-sided list of spending cuts had been circulated by colleagues close to
Mr Oskar Lafontaine, deputy leader of the SPD, who attended meetings with
Chancellor Helmut Kohl on Thursday. The Bundesrat, the upper house of the
German parliament, yesterday unanimously approved the Maastricht treaty on
European union, to complete the parliamentary ratification process in
Germany. A deal with the government means that the 16 federal Lander
(states) in the Bundesrat will have much greater involvement in the process
of European Community legislation enshrined in the German constitution.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1212</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / EC and US in new push for Gatt accord
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Community and the US last night sought to inject new momentum
into the stalled Uruguay Round of world trade talks by setting a January 15
target for agreement on the main outstanding issues at Geneva.
The joint decision was conveyed to Mr Arthur Dunkel, director-general of the
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, at the end of the EC-US summit in
Washington.
President George Bush, who hosted the talks with Britain's prime minister,
Mr John Major, and Mr Jacques Delors, the European Commission president,
said both sides now were firmly committed to early conclusion of the Round.
Earlier, there had been signs in Washington and Brussels that neither side
was willing to force the pace of negotiations before the inauguration of
President-elect Bill Clinton next month. But a senior member of the British
delegation said there was now a real prospect that the main obstacles in
Geneva could be settled at the high-level negotiating meeting set for
January 15.
Preliminary bargaining will restart in Geneva 11 days earlier, with the
negotiators given what the British official termed 'the clearest possible
instructions at political level.'
Mr Major, who was instrumental in settling the US-EC farm trade row which
had held up the Uruguay Round, was also heartened by the backing of Mr
Clinton for accelerated negotiations. In a phone conversation with Mr Major,
the president-elect gave his backing to the new target date.
Mr Major took the opportunity to urge Mr Clinton not to listen to calls for
the US to withdraw Most Favoured Nation trading status from China. MFN is
seen by the prime minister as crucial to the prosperity of Hong Kong.
Senior British officials said that, in the Gatt talks with Mr Bush, the US
acknowledged that all sides would have to give ground in Geneva if the
Uruguay Round was to be settled.
Mr Delors has accused Washington of blocking an accord by refusing to
compromise. But the US indicated it would reconsider its objections to the
latest draft agreement on the proposed Multilateral Trade Organisation,
designed to ensure multilateral arbitration of trade disputes. The US side
also showed signs of movement over other outstanding disputes, which include
differences over industrial tariffs and trade in services.
The British officials said Mr Major was now confident a deal could be struck
on the creation of the MTO, on the linked issues of market access and
tariffs, and on intellectual property rights.
The EC had rejected a US suggestion that yesterday's summit should include
detailed bargaining on outstanding bilateral issues, so the multilateral
procedures at Geneva could not be circumvented.
Mr Delors, who criticised the US for not responding in Geneva to the
concessions that the Community had made to resolve the farm trade dispute,
attacked the decision by Washington to impose countervailing duties on
imports of European steel. His officials said that the calculations on which
the duties were based did not take into account the sharp reduction of EC
steel subsidies over the past three years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1213</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Japan willing to open market more
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL, World Trade Editor
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN yesterday said it was willing to open its market further - including
the contentious financial services sector - in an 11th hour bid 'to
accelerate the process' towards a settlement of the Uruguay Round of talks
on global trade reform.
The proposal came as delegations from 108 countries involved in the Round
met for a stock-taking session in Geneva, many expressing disappointment at
slow progress and criticising the US for demanding that a number of issues -
including anti-dumping rules and proposals for protection of intellectual
property - be reopened for debate.
The US vigorously defended these moves, insisting in a statement to the
meeting of the top-level Trade Negotiations Committee that it had served
notice 11 months ago that these issues would have to be addressed, and
criticising 'those who would settle quickly for a minimum package'. Mr Rufus
Yerxa, heading the US delegation, said it would take 'further hard
bargaining to bring a successful end to the Round'.
Mr Noboru Hatakeyama, vice-minister for International Affairs in Japan's
Ministry of International Trade and Industry, told the FT that if present
disputes were carried into 1993, there was a danger of a 'chicken and egg'
deterioration that could lead to the collapse of the Round.
Mr Arthur Dunkel, director general of Gatt, warned negotiators they were
'now, more than ever, engaged in a race against time'. But he insisted the
talks were not stalemated and that they would continue until December 23. He
called another meeting of the TNC on January 15, giving scope for a
last-ditch breakthrough in the last weeks of the Bush administration in the
US.
Mr Hatakeyama said the Japanese proposal for 'acceleration' would involve a
suggestion that detailed discussions on market access and trade in services
should be hived off from the urgent need for a political commitment to the
Uruguay Round draft agreement tabled by Mr Dunkel a year ago.
This suggestion was dismissed as unrealistic by other negotiators, some of
whom nevertheless echoed Japan's fears over recent moves by the US to call
for substantial parts of the draft agreement, like that on anti-dumping, to
be opened up.
Mr Hatakeyama emphasised that any country trying to amend the Dunkel draft
'would have to win consensus from opposing parties.'
He said Japan was willing to make deeper cuts in its market access
negotiations - a stumbling block to progress for EC negotiators - noting at
the same time that Japan's line-by-line concessions, tabled in March, cut
tariff barriers by an average of almost 50 per cent. 'We can be very
positive on financial services,' he said, answering directly US and EC calls
for a more open market for financial services, securities and insurance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1214</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Financier gives Dollars 50m for Moslems
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SHEILA JONES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr George Soros, the man who made a billion dollars out of sterling's
retreat on Black Wednesday, yesterday turned over Dollars 50m (Pounds 32.8m)
of the profits to aid organisations in war-torn Bosnia-Hercegovina, saying:
'Yes, you could say I make my money in the west and spread it out in the
east,' writes Sheila Jones in London.
The 62-year-old financier's gift is the biggest single donation made to a
humanitarian cause by a private individual.
'What is going on in Bosnia today is genocide,' he said. 'I feel it
particularly strongly because as a Hungarian Jew I was myself a potential
victim of the holocaust. My heart goes out to the people who are being
raped, pillaged and murdered just because they are Moslems.
'I am privileged in having more money than most. I am doing what I can and
everybody else should do something.'
Four aid organisations - Oxfam, Save the Children, Medecins Sans Frontieres
and the International Rescue Committee - will receive an initial Dollars 1m
each. The rest will be divided up by the United Nations High Commissioner
for Refugees, which will administer the fund.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1215</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Yeltsin's Start treaty claim startles White House
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By YVONNE PRESTON, GEORGE GRAHAM and CHRYSTIA FREELAND
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIJING, WASHINGTON, KIEV
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RUSSIAN President Boris Yeltsin caused confusion yesterday by announcing in
Beijing that he and outgoing US President George Bush would sign a treaty on
the reduction of strategic nuclear weapons in January at a summit in Alaska.
At the State Department and at the White House, officials said they were
aware neither of a breakthrough on the issues that still divide Russia and
the US in the Start II talks, nor of plans for a summit meeting in Alaska.
'We're getting closer. We're hopeful, but that's the best we can say,' said
Mr Marlin Fitzwater, the White House spokesman.
Mr Bush and Mr Yeltsin settled the outlines of the Start II agreement at a
Washington summit in June, but the details of implementation have been more
difficult.
Russia agreed to destroy its multiple warhead SS-18 missiles, but does not
want the expense of destroying the silos that housed them. In addition, it
wants to convert its SS-19 missiles to single warhead carriers, rather than
destroying them outright.
The third issue dividing the sides is the US's freedom to convert B-1
nuclear bombers to carry conventional weapons.
The increasingly acrimonious dispute between the US and Ukraine over the
nuclear weapons stationed on Ukrainian territory is also proving an obstacle
to ratification of Start.
Mr Anatoli Zlenko, the Ukrainian foreign minister, said yesterday that
although Ukraine accepted the principles of the treaty and expected
eventually to ratify, his government resented western efforts to strong-arm
Ukraine into signing now.
On Thursday Mr Lawrence Eagleburger, US secretary of state, said the US was
'not particularly happy' with the delay in Ukrainian ratification, and this
would affect bilateral relations if it continued much longer.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1216</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / France sees output fall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FRENCH manufacturing output fell 1.7 per cent during October, the month
after the currency crisis which strengthened the franc against key European
currencies.
The news of the decline comes at a critical time as the government, which
faces legislative elections next March, is trying to protect the franc
against pressure from the foreign exchange markets.
The fall in manufacturing output was partly offset by a modest increase in
overall industrial production of 0.8 per cent in October compared with
September, according to Insee, the state statistics institute. This was due
to high demand for energy as fuel consumption rose in the cold weather.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1217</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Flynn has hard act to follow at EC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IRISH justice minister Padraig Flynn, appointed this week to succeed Mr Ray
MacSharry on the European Commission from January 5, will have a tough act
to follow.
He has neither the tough ministerial reputation of Mr MacSharry, whose
no-nonsense approach to cutting the Irish fiscal deficit in the late 1980s
earned him the sobriquet of 'Mac the Knife', nor the urbane financial skills
of Mr Peter Sutherland, current chairman of Allied Irish Banks, who preceded
Mr MacSharry on the Commission and held the EC competition portfolio.
A former schoolteacher and publican, Mr Flynn earned his political colours
as a dedicated representative of his rural Mayo West constituency in the
west of Ireland, and as a supporter of Prime Minister Charles Haughey during
his rise to power in the late 1970s and the turbulence of the latter's
leadership of the Fianna Fail party for more than a decade.
An arch conservative and devout Catholic, who has been prominent in opposing
liberalisation of Ireland's divorce and abortion laws, Mr Flynn is popular
in his constituency but has not built a reputation as a strong minister able
to fight his corner in cabinet.
He entered cabinet as trade minister in the short-lived Fianna Fail
government of 1982, when Mr Haughey was Taoiseach (prime minister). When
Fianna Fail returned to power in 1987, he became minister at the
high-spending Environment Department, responsible for funding the road
network and overseeing the work and organisation of local authorities. A
large part of EC structural funds to Ireland was administered through his
department.
He has been criticised for his department's apparent piecemeal approach to
road network improvement. His ministerial record is that of a bureaucrat
rather than a pioneering advocate of change. Proposals to establish an
environmental protection agency languished in his department for more than
two years, while much of the new environmental legislation in Ireland during
his period of office was EC-driven.
He held the environment portfolio until 1991, when he was sacked, along with
Mr Albert Reynolds, then finance minister, by Mr Haughey for having led a
backbench rebellion. After Mr Haughey's defeat last February, Mr Flynn
returned to cabinet as justice minister under Mr Reynolds as the new leader.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1218</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Nato agreement on joint peacekeeping
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT MAUTHNER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE NATO Co-operation Council, grouping 37 Nato members and former Soviet
and east European associated states, agreed yesterday to joint preparations
for peacekeeping activities, including joint planning and training sessions.
However, there was still a question mark over the extent to which France,
which is not a member of Nato's integrated military command, is prepared to
participate in such co-operative activities.
The final communique said the countries of the North Atlantic Co-operation
Council were ready to support and contribute on a case-by-case basis to
peacekeeping operations under United Nations authority or the responsibility
of the Conference on Security and Co-operation in Europe.
Earlier in the meeting, Mr Lawrence Eagleburger, the US secretary of state,
had indicated that France was still reserving its position on any joint
preparations by the members states and their associates for peacekeeping
missions.
But Mr Manfred Worner, the Nato secretary-general, maintained at a press
conference that this problem had been overcome.
What is certain is that, while France is fully prepared to participate in
any Nato peacekeeping activities at the request of the UN, it wants to avoid
giving the impression that it is rejoining the alliance's integrated
military command.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1219</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Russian budget deficit rises
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD and DMITRY VOLKOV
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RUSSIA'S budget deficit at the end of the year was officially said yesterday
to be Rbs1,160bn, or 6.5 per cent of gross national product, following
last-minute adjustments and extra commitments to spending by the Russian
Supreme Soviet.
Mr Vassily Barchuk, finance minister, warned parliament that, in approving
last-minute extra spending of over Rbs200m, it was breaking the limit of 5
per cent of GDP agreed between the government and the International Monetary
Fund and jeopardising further credits needed to pay foreign grain exporters,
now owed Dollars 300m.
However, foreign finance experts in Moscow said yesterday that the real
budget deficit - about which there are many estimates - was much higher and
had long since been far above IMF guidelines, though the government had
reined in spending this quarter.
Production is sure to continue falling and unemployment rising for two
months because of the recent credit squeeze.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1220</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Compromise sought on HDTV row
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS and LIONEL BARBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON, BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR John Major, the British prime minister, faced intense pressure last night
to agree a new compromise to unblock European Community funding for
development of high definition television technology.
Officials travelling with Mr Major and Mr Jacques Delors, European
Commission president, to the US-EC talks in Washington said the two held
private talks to try to resolve the row over HDTV which broke out on the
Canadian leg of their North American visit.
The two men discussed a Dutch proposal, expected to be tabled at a meeting
of the European Community's foreign affairs council on Monday. It is thought
the compromise, a combination of ideas from Dutch prime minister Ruud
Lubbers and Mr Delors, would assure significant backing for the HDTV
programme being run by Phillips of the Netherlands and Thomson of France.
The Dutch are understood to have agreed to incorporate British objections
that HDTV technology risks being overtaken by more advanced digital
television technology. A possible compromise is that the UK would commit
itself to the principle of a five-year spending plan; but it would restrict
funding to one year, pending a thorough review of technologies.
At a heated meeting of EC telecom ministers on Tuesday, the UK offered
Ecu80m (Pounds 63.8m) interim support. But the 11 other EC states, led by
the Netherlands and France, supported a commitment now of Ecu500m over the
next five years.
Despite talk of compromise neither Mr Major nor Mr Delors was willing
yesterday to withdraw from positions taken earlier this week on whether
Britain had reneged on an agreement reached at last weekend's Edinburgh
summit.
Mr Delors and Mr Lubbers insist the record of the summit shows that Mr Major
agreed to lift his veto on the long-term funding of HDTV. Mr Major is
adamant he offered no such commitment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1221</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -------------------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 -------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100:                         2,789.7           (+49.4)
Yield                                 4.38
FT-SE Eurotrack 100               1,050.25          (+15.84)
FT-A All-Share                    1,333.41           (+1.8%)
FT-A World Index                    141.89           (+1.2%)
Nikkei                           17,680.74         (+242.83)
New York:
Dow Jones Ind Ave                 3,313.27          (+44.04)
S&amp;P Composite                       441.28           (+5.85)
 -------------------------------------------------------------
US RATES
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds:                      2 1/2%        (2 15/16%)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld               3.199%           (3.25%)
Long Bond                        102 11/32         (102 3/8)
Yield                               7.423%          (7.420%)
 -------------------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 -------------------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank                      7 1/4%         (7 5/16%)
Liffe long gilt future:      Dec 100 17/32         (Dec 100)
 -------------------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (Feb)           dollars 18.55          (18.425)
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Gold
 -------------------------------------------------------------
New York Comex (Feb)         dollars 337.7           (339.2)
London                      dollars 337.15          (338.35)
 -------------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 -------------------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollar                               1.566          (1.5795)
London:
Dollar                              1.5655          (1.5735)
DM                                    2.45          (2.4575)
FFr                                 8.3675          (8.4025)
SFr                                 2.2075           (2.205)
Y                                   193.00          (193.75)
Pound Index                           80.4            (80.7)
 -------------------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 -------------------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM                                   1.564         (1.55755)
FFr                                  5.342           (5.325)
SFr                                 1.4085          (1.3975)
Y                                   123.08         (122.835)
London:
DM                                  1.5655          (1.5625)
FFr                                  5.345            (5.34)
SFr                                   1.41          (1.4015)
Y                                    123.3          (123.15)
Dollar Index                          64.9            (64.6)
Tokyo close                       Y 123.05
 -------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1222</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Share prices surge despite lending fall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN, Economics Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LENDING by Britain's banks and building societies to the private sector
unexpectedly fell by Pounds 600m last month, reversing a Pounds 5.1bn
increase in October and adding to uncertainty about UK recovery.
The drop, which was worse than the most pessimistic City expectations, was
shrugged off by the stock market and seemed not to worry Mr Norman Lamont,
the chancellor.
The FT-SE 100 index closed yesterday at 2,789.7, up 49.4 on the day and 73.5
on the week, while the FT-SE Mid 250 index of medium-sized stocks added 54.8
on the day to 2,783.6.
Prices rose on strong institutional buying which appeared to anticipate a
new year rally and economic recovery. Mr Lamont, told foreign newspaper
correspondents in London that he was looking forward to a 'more prosperous
year' and said the UK's 'may be one of the more buoyant economies next
year'.
The drop in lending, disclosed in provisional, seasonally adjusted figures
from the Bank of England, briefly triggered hopes of a cut in bank base
rates from 7 per cent.
Shortly before the figures were released, however, Mr Lamont made clear that
he was not in a hurry to ease monetary policy further. The 3 percentage
point cut in bank base rates since September had been 'substantial', he
said, 'so I think it would be wrong to rush into easing policy further
without firm evidence that this was necessary.'
The Bank also disclosed that growth of broad money in the UK was weaker than
expected in November. It said that M4, which includes bank and building
society deposits as well as notes and coins in circulation, fell by a
seasonally adjusted 0.2 per cent last month and increased by 4.7 per cent in
the 12 months to November. The M4 figure was at the lower end of the
Treasury's 4-8 per cent monitoring range announced in November. It was well
below City expectations of 0.4 per cent growth on the month and a 5.4 per
cent expansion against November last year.
The Treasury and the Bank were unable to provide a specific reason for the
poor figures. The Treasury suggested that the weak growth in M4 could
reflect lower inflation and a delay in the effect of recent interest rate
cuts.
Figures from the British Bankers' Association and the Building Societies
Association confirmed the depressed picture given by the Bank's lending
figures. The BBA said the nine biggest UK clearing banks increased their
lending to the private sector by a seasonally adjusted Pounds 572m last
month after an increase of Pounds 3.05bn in October.
'November saw demand for bank finance fade away again,' said Lord Inchyra,
BBA director general.
The only bright spot was in mortgage lending because of low-interest,
fixed-rate offers, Lord Inchyra said. But this rise may have been at the
expense of building societies which saw a decrease in net new commitments to
Pounds 1.85bn in November from Pounds 2.17bn in October.
Savings outflow, Page 5
New bait for savers, Page 7
London share prices, Page 13
So you thought 1992 was bad . . . Weekend, Page II
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1223</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Israel resists pressure to take back deportees: Palestinians
left stranded as UN debates resolution
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY, MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS and GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM, NEW YORK, WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ISRAEL came under strong international pressure yesterday to take back more
than 400 Palestinians whose expulsion threatens to derail the Middle East
peace process.
A strongly worded resolution condemning the Israeli government's action and
firmly opposing deportations was being considered by the United Nations
Security Council last night.
The deportees, all alleged Islamic fundamentalist extremists from the
occupied West Bank and Gaza Strip, were stranded yesterday in no-man's land
in south Lebanon after being left by Israeli forces just outside the
Israeli-controlled 'security zone'.
A few miles further north, Lebanese troops prevented them from travelling
deeper into the country on orders from the government in Beirut which said
it would refuse to co-operate with the Israeli move. The deportees trudged
back to Israeli lines but were turned away. Witnesses said warning shots
were fired over their heads.
The Palestinians remained in no-man's land in the rain, sheltering in tents
provided by the International Committee of the Red Cross. An ICRC official
in Lebanon said lamps and cookers would be supplied today but that the site
was unsuitable for a long stay.
Israeli security forces in the occupied territories were on high alert
against an anticipated wave of protests against deportation, one of the
punitive measures most hated by Palestinians.
Leaflets from Islamic and Palestine Liberation Organisation underground
groups called for '10 days of fire and exploding rage'. The West Bank and
Gaza Strip remained sealed off from Israel, with many areas under curfew.
Security Council members hoped that the US would support the draft
resolution being drawn up, which would declare the deportation of civilians
to be a breach of the 1949 Geneva Convention. It would demand the immediate
safe return of all deportees from the occupied territories. The US and
Britain, the latter speaking for the European Community, issued similar
calls.
However, Israel showed no sign of reversing the unprecedented mass
expulsion, ordered in retaliation for a recent spate of violent attacks by
Hamas, the Islamic resistance movement, which left six Israeli soldiers
dead.
The government said it did not expect the move to jeopardise the Middle East
talks which broke up in Washington on Thursday without setting a date for
resumption. The PLO said it would not return to the talks unless the
deportations were reversed.
PLO officials in Tunis said representatives of the organisation, Syria,
Lebanon, Jordan and Egypt would meet soon in Cairo to discuss the issue. PLO
supporters said the Israeli action had strengthened support for Hamas, which
is opposed to the peace process, and undermined their more moderate
position. No charges were brought against the deportees, who will be allowed
to return home within two years.
Mr Taher Shriteh, a prominent journalist in Gaza who was among 1,200 people
rounded up by the security forces this week, was released yesterday
following protests from human rights organisations and foreign
correspondents in Israel. Mr Shriteh, who works occasionally for the
Financial Times, was among those loaded on to buses on Wednesday.
George Graham in Washington writes: Mr Edward Djerejian, assistant secretary
at the State Department in charge of the Middle East, said the Palestinian
delegation to the Mideast talks had reaffirmed its 'serious commitment to
the peace process'.
Lull in battle for peace, Page 6
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1224</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLTALAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / London shares surge despite fall in lending
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN, Economics Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LENDING by Britain's banks and building societies to the private sector
unexpectedly fell by Pounds 600m last month, reversing a Pounds 5.1bn
increase in October and adding to uncertainty about whether the UK is
recovering from recession.
But the drop, which was worse than the most pessimistic of City
expectations, was shrugged off by the stock market and seemed not to worry
Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor.
The FT-SE 100 index closed yesterday at 2,789.7, up 49.4 on the day and 73.5
on the week, while the FT-SE Mid 250 index of medium-sized stocks added 54.8
on the day to 2,783.6.
Prices rose on strong institutional buying which appeared to anticipate a
new year rally and economic recovery. Mr Lamont, told foreign newspaper
correspondents in London that Britain was looking forward to a 'more
prosperous year' and 'may be one of the more buoyant economies next year'.
The drop in lending, disclosed in provisional, seasonally adjusted figures
from the Bank of England, briefly triggered hopes of a cut in bank base
rates from 7 per cent.
But shortly before the figures were released, Mr Lamont made clear that he
would not hurry to ease monetary policy further. The 3 percentage point cut
in bank base rates since September had been 'substantial', he said, 'so I
think it would be wrong to rush into easing policy further without firm
evidence that this was necessary'.
The Bank also disclosed that growth of broad money in the UK economy was
weaker than expected in November. It said that M4, which includes bank and
building society deposits as well as notes and coin in circulation, fell by
a seasonally adjusted 0.2 per cent last month and increased by 4.7 per cent
in the 12 months to November. The M4 figure was at the lower end of the
Treasury's 4 to 8 per cent monitoring range announced in November, and well
below City expectations of 0.4 per cent growth on the month and a 5.4 per
cent expansion compared with November last year.
The Treasury and the Bank were unable to give special reason for the poor
figures. The Treasury suggested that the weak M4 growth could reflect lower
inflation and a delay in the effect of recent interest rate cuts.
Figures from the British Bankers' Association and the Building Societies
Association confirmed the depressed picture given by the Bank's lending
figures. The BBA said the nine biggest UK clearing banks increased their
lending to the private sector by a seasonally adjusted Pounds 572m last
month after an increase of Pounds 3.05bn in October.
'November saw demand for bank finance fade away again,' said Lord Inchyra,
BBA director general. He reported a substantial reduction in consumer credit
and repayment of borrowings by most industrial sectors.
The only relatively bright spot was in mortgage lending because of low
interest, fixed rate offers, Lord Inchyra said. But this expansion may have
been at the expense of the building societies which yesterday announced a
decrease in net new commitments to Pounds 1.85bn in November from Pounds
2.17bn in October.
Taking the past three months together, bank and building society lending has
grown by only Pounds 1.2bn a month. According to Mr Don Smith, an economist
with Samuel Montagu, this is the lowest rate of increase since the figures
were first collected in 1982.
Building societies' outflow at Pounds 184m, Page 5
Currencies, Page 11
London share prices, Page 13
Lex, Page 22
So you thought 1992 was bad .
. . Weekend, Page II
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1225</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / City life continues to lose appeal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN PIKE, Social Affairs Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A CONTINUING shift in the UK population from urban to outer suburban and
rural areas was revealed in the first detailed results of last year's
10-yearly census, published yesterday by the Office of Population, Censuses
and Surveys.
The fastest-growing region, East Anglia, saw a 7.3 per cent rise between
1981 and 1991, while population fell in all metropolitan conurbations such
as London, the West Midlands, Greater Manchester and Merseyside.
Last year's census was the first to ask a question about ethnic origin.
While 94.5 per cent of the British population is white, people from ethnic
minority backgrounds make up a quarter of the 2.5m population of inner
London.
More than 20 per cent of the population comprises children under 16, with
the highest proportion in the north-west. The south-west has the largest
proportion of retired people.
A 'substantial number of people', consisting mainly of men in their 20s, was
missed out of the census last year, the OPCS admitted. While it believes
that census staff tracked down almost everyone aged 45 and above, estimates
for men in their 20s suggest an under-enumeration rate of up to 10 per cent.
There had been concern that some people would avoid completing census forms
because they feared cross-checking of records to detect poll tax evasion.
The OPCS says, however, that the scale of under-enumeration in the British
census is similar to other recent censuses in Australia, Canada and the US.
Exodus from inner cities continues, Page 5
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1226</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: Hagen asked to resign seat on
Nedlloyd board
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROTTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NEDLLOYD, the Dutch shipping group, said Norwegian investor Mr Torstein
Hagen had been asked by fellow board members to resign his seat on the
company's supervisory board, Reuter reports from Rotterdam.
Nedlloyd said Mr Hagen had been asked to resign because his recent actions
violated the terms on which he had been accepted as a board member.
Last Tuesday, Mr Hagen, who owns about 27 per cent of Nedlloyd's shares,
called for an extraordinary shareholders' meeting to agree to fundamental
changes to Nedlloyd's structure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1227</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / International Company News: Alcoa to take Dollars 1.2bn
charge
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ALUMINUM Company of America (Alcoa), the world's largest aluminium producer,
yesterday said it would take after-tax charges of Dollars 1.286bn, or
Dollars 15.06 a share, for the adoption of new accounting standards and for
restructuring.
Alcoa, in common with many other US companies, is adopting Financial
Accounting Standard (FAS) 106 and FAS 109 ahead of the first-quarter 1993
deadline.
Charges of about Dollars 1.183bn, or Dollars 13.85, for the adoption of FAS
106 will apply to the years before 1992.
Alcoa also announced 1,100 redundancies as part of a redesign of some
manufacturing and administrative processes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1228</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / ITC pulls plug on Thames' bid for Channel 5: Why a
consortium's proposals for a new national TV service were rejected
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Kenneth Blythe, secretary of the Independent Television Commission,
yesterday went to the London office of Mr Richard Dunn, Thames chief
executive, to deliver in person the commission's verdict on Channel 5.
The ITC executive said it did not want Mr Dunn to receive the news on his
franchise bid by fax, as happened last year when Thames found out it had
been outbid and would no longer be an ITV company.
This time, the news was bad all the same. Channel Five Holdings, the
Thames-led consortium which had submitted the only bid to run a new channel
capable of reaching 70 per cent of the population, had been rejected.
The ITC had accepted the consortium's proposals for retuning millions of
video recorders to get rid of interference likely to be caused by the
Channel 5 signal. This had been seen as the main barrier to the project
going ahead.
The commission also accepted the consortium's programme plans, in spite of
concern that they might be too London-oriented, at least in the early years,
to qualify as a national channel.
Channel Five Holdings was judged to have failed the quality threshold on two
counts:
The ITC was not satisfied with the business plan, particularly projected
costs, audience share and revenue projections.
It was also dissatisfied with the level of investor commitment.
As it is impossible to forecast advertising revenues accurately for 10
years, Channel Five was convinced it had made adequate provisions for what
was always going to be a minority channel starting out with a 5 per cent
audience share rising to 10 per cent or more over a number of years.
The consortium is even more angered about the decision on 'the level of
shareholder commitment'.
Thames Television was to take a 35 per cent stake in the venture, a stake
authorised by the board of Thames and its majority shareholder, Thorn EMI.
Time Warner International committed itself to 10 per cent because it has a
divisional investment limit of Dollars 25m (Pounds 16.4m). A recommendation
from TWI senior executives for a further 25 per cent stake has been
submitted to the main board of Time Warner, the world's largest media
company. It was due to be considered in the new year.
The US company sent a five-page letter to the ITC backing the project and
explaining the delay had been caused by a false start with another Channel 5
consortium. Three other large companies wrote expressing enthusiasm for the
venture.
Pearson, owner of the Financial Times, said it was interested, but first had
to get acceptance from its partners in British Sky Broadcasting because of
an understanding that shareholders would not invest in competing media
ventures.
Cox, the US media group with a turnover of more than Dollars 2bn, said it
was interested but was in the process of completing due diligence.
Capital Cities/ABC, the US network company, said it was interested in
investing but had to carry out due diligence on the business plan.
Associated Newspapers had also written to the ITC saying the company was
interested.
The ITC also received a letter from SG Warburg, the merchant bank, saying it
had no doubt the project could be 100 per cent funded.
The commission appears to have disregarded the interest from Pearson, Cox,
Capital Cities/ABC and Associated and the 25 per cent of possible Time
Warner investment which had not got main board approval.
Mr Peter Rogers, deputy chief executive of the ITC, said yesterday he had
wanted to see the 'great majority' of financing in place before the decision
was taken. Thames executives have been told 'great majority' meant 70 per
cent, although there was no such term in the applications to apply.
There is a 12-week gap between awarding the licence and granting it. Even if
the licence had been awarded yesterday it would have been subject to raising
the additional money needed, shareholder approval and licence terms.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1229</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Dana Andrews dies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Actor Dana Andrews, who starred in the films Laura and The Best Years of Our
Lives, died in Los Angeles. He was 83.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1230</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Rain lashes Britain
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Flood warnings were issued for rivers in Wales and motorists in southern
England were told to take care as heavy rain swept across the UK. Sleet and
snow are expected on high ground today. Weather, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1231</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4ADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Yeltsin cuts short China visit
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Russian President Boris Yeltsin cut short his visit to China and returned
home early today, the official Xinhua news agency reported. No explanation
was given.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1232</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4ADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: BHP 23% ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Broken Hill Proprietary, Australia's biggest company, reported a 23 per cent
rise in half-year net operating profit to ADollars 502m (Pounds 227m)
because of higher demand for its mineral products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1233</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4ADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Tesco buys retail chain in France
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TESCO, the food retailer, made the boldest foray yet by a UK retailer into
continental Europe when it agreed to pay FFr1.47bn (Pounds 175.6m) for
control of the 90-store Catteau supermarket chain in northern France.
The deal is a significant acquisition by a UK retailer, and will fuel
speculation that the largest UK retailers will be forced to expand into
other European countries as the UK market begins to approach saturation.
Of the FFr1.47bn Tesco is paying for the stores, 85 per cent will be payable
next year. It is being financed entirely from Tesco's internal resources.
Mr David Reid, finance director, said the acquisition would allow Tesco to
gain experience of retailing in other parts of Europe. But he would not
comment on Tesco's plans for European expansion. 'For the moment we will
have our heads down making sure that this works, but in the longer term
opportunities will arise,' he said.
Catteau, a family-owned chain, will continue under its present management,
supplemented by four members of Tesco's senior management. The Catteau
family will retain 24 per cent of the shares.
Tesco said it did not expect any redundancies as a result of the acquisition
and hoped it would create jobs.
Catteau operates 90 food stores in northern France - of which 56 have been
added in the past five years - mostly in the Nord-Pas de Calais region. Two
are hypermarkets operating under the HyperCedico name, of a similar size to
Tesco's UK superstores. The 63 others, under the Cedico name, are smaller
than Tesco UK stores. The chain also operates 25 convenience stores.
The Catteau chain was originally founded by the family as a coffee-grinding
business, based near Lille, Normandy, in 1915.
The family moved into food wholesaling in the 1930s, and began retailing in
the 1940s. The present chairman and chief executive are brothers, Mr Jacques
Catteau and Mr Jean Catteau.
Mr Reid emphasised that Catteau would continue to be run as a stand-alone
basis. He said Tesco's plans to continue expanding by opening stores in the
UK were unaffected by the acquisition.
Tesco plans to spend between Pounds 350m and Pounds 400m next year on
opening UK superstores, compared with the Pounds 150m it will pay for
Catteau.
Analysts' reactions to the announcement were mixed, although they said
Catteau's profits of FFr126m last year represented some of the best margins
among French retailers. But they added that the acquisition would focus
attention on Tesco's growth prospects in the UK.
Tesco goes shopping, Page 7
Recovery plan lifts Asda, Page 8
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1234</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921219
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 DEC 92 / Brussels set to restrict ice cream makers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Commission is set to impose restrictions on German ice cream
makers accused of trying to exclude Mars, the US group, from the German
market.
Officials yesterday refused to elaborate on the likely action against
manufacturers, which will be announced next Wednesday, and would not name
the companies involved.
Brussels issued a temporary order in March that ties between German
retailers and manufacturers should be cut to allow Mars to compete during
the summer. That decision may be converted into a definitive ruling next
week.
The Commission has been investigating complaints by Mars that Langnese-Iglo,
a subsidiary of Unilever, and Scholler, another big manufacturer, were
excluding competitors from retail outlets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1235</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Thai group to buy out its Danish
parent
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BANGKOK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHRISTIANI and Nielsen (Thai), the construction and engineering company,
announced yesterday that its shareholders had approved a plan to buy up to
100 per cent of its Copenhagen-listed Danish parent, Christiani and Nielsen
AS, for about Dollars 80m.
Thailand will become the headquarters for the group, and the Thai company
will control wholly-owned operations in Denmark, Germany and the UK.
Mr John Millard, the Thai group's chief executive officer, said the move was
logical because significant growth was occurring in Thailand and south-east
Asia.
Christiani and Nielsen (Thai) employs 4,500 staff and has an order book
worth Dollars 270m. It expects after-tax profits of about Bt350m (Dollars
13.75m) in 1992, more than triple the 1991 profits of Bt104m.
Mr Millard said that the group was 'experiencing tremendous growth at a time
when many other similar businesses in Europe are experiencing flat sales
because of major downturns in their respective economies.'
He added: 'Our growth is being fuelled primarily from Thailand.'
Mr Millard said that staff had already been deployed from UK and other
operations to projects in Thailand and China.
He said that this was the first time in Thailand's history that such a
cross-border transaction involving two listed companies had occurred. The
ailing Danish parent owns 42.17 per cent of the Thai company.
The Christiani and Nielsen group has been in Thailand for 60 years - among
other projects, it built the famous Democracy Monument - and has profited
from the country's rapid economic growth of recent years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1236</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: GE wins orders worth Dollars 380m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
General Electric of the US yesterday said it had won three new power
generation orders totalling Dollars 380m, writes Alan Friedman in New York.
They include a Dollars 240m order to supply three gas turbine-generators and
three steam turbine-generators to Mexico.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1237</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Construction Contracts: Equipping the National Grid Company
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
PEEBLES POWER TRANSFORMERS, a unit of Edinburgh-based NEI Peebles, and
REYROLLE PROJECTS, the project management business of NEI Reyrolle, of
Hebburn on Tyneside, have won orders worth a total of Pounds 8m for a
project being carried out by the National Grid Company.
NEI Peebles has won an order worth Pounds 5m for what is believed to be the
highest rated quadrature booster ever installed in the UK, and probably the
largest in the world. The 2,000MVA, 400kV unit will be delivered next year.
In addition, the NGC has placed an order worth more than Pounds 3m with NEI
Reyrolle, of Hebburn on Tyneside, to supply 420kV gas-insulated switchgear
for the same project.
The quadrature booster comprises a shunt unit and a series unit with a total
shipping weight of 500 tonnes. It will be installed at Stocksbridge, near
Sheffield.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1238</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Construction Contracts: Paint agreement
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MANDERS has won a long-term agreement to supply own brand paint to the
Wickes Group. The contract will be supplied from its new plant in
Wolverhampton.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1239</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Construction Contracts: Refurbishment
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
NICO CONSTRUCTION (EUROPE) has won four refurbishment and fit out contracts
in central London worth Pounds 10.3m.
The first includes the completion of the third phase of an upgrading
programme at BP Oil's Britannic Tower in the City and significant
refurbishment of building services and bespoke internal fitting out at
Devonshire House for Hamilton Oil Company.
The fit out contracts include a former listed church in Victoria for
Intergraph (UK) and restaurant facilities for the Royal Mail at Mount
Pleasant.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1240</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Bonds: Finland surprises market with SFr500m
8-year note
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRIAN BOLLEN, TRACY CORRIGAN and RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Republic of Finland made an early start to its 1993 international
borrowing programme yesterday, unexpectedly launching a SFr500m eight-year
bond, priced to yield just below 6 per cent.
Credit Suisse, which is arranging the issue, said that Finland took
advantage of the receptive state of the Swiss bond market, where interest
rates are thought to be heading lower, to launch its biggest issue in the
sector so far.
Bankers said that although the 6 per cent coupon is above the current market
rate, the pricing was a little aggressive, given Finland's heavy borrowing
requirements. The payment date is in February.
The four Swiss franc issues launched yesterday were worth a total of
SFr850m. The other three, for Shell Australia, Rabobank Nederland, and Total
of France, were all said to be swap-driven.
The European Community reopened the Ecu market with the first issue in the
sector since the summer. The Ecu80m third tranche of an issue first launched
in December last year was priced to yield three basis points over the bid
side of the existing issue and brings the total amount outstanding to
Ecu820m.
Lead manager BZW reported a warm reception for a deal which, it argues,
proves that reports of the death of the Ecu market have been greatly
exaggerated. Demand, it said, tended to be mainly from European
institutional investors.
The syndicate broke within 15 minutes of the launch.
Bankers said that the issue, though small, shows that the sector can still
attract new money. They said if stability returns to the currency markets
there could be further Ecu issuance in the new year.
The London branch of NordLB issued Dollars 100m of one-year paper under an
existing medium-term note programme, through Lehman Brothers. The notes are
puttable every three months, and were described by other banks as commercial
paper dressed up as bonds.
Barclays de Zoete Wedd has issued Dollars 143m of US commercial paper backed
by European trade receivables, the first asset-backed paper to be channelled
through its special purpose securitisation programme, Sceptre International,
writes Tracy Corrigan.
The Sceptre vehicle purchases diversified pools of trade receivables, with
an average size in excess of Dollars 50m equivalent, from high quality
European companies, and then sells asset-backed commercial paper rated
A1+/P1.
The Dollars 1bn programme allows for paper to be issued in both the US
domestic market, as in this case, and in the Euro-commercial paper market.
The first batch of receivables to be securitised under the programme
consists of close to 2,000 trade contracts sold to the vehicle by one UK
company.
However, Barclays has been discussing potential issues under the programme
with a number of continental European companies.
The London stock exchange's board agreed yesterday to proceed with links
between its own trade confirmation system, Sequal, and two rival systems,
writes Richard Waters.
Earlier suggestions from the exchange that it might not proceed with the
links had angered a number of institutional investors, since the links are
seen as important in developing an electronic network through which details
of international share transactions can be agreed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1241</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: SA group quits Australian deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SENTRACHEM, the South African chemicals group, will not proceed with its
proposed acquisition of Chemplex of Australia, writes Philip Gawith in
Johannesburg. Mr John Job, Sentrachem chief executive, said it was unable to
agree with the vendor, Mr Kerry Packer's Consolidated Press Holdings, on the
price and other aspects. Sentrachem will not now proceed with its R240m
(Dollars 49.5m) rights issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1242</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Short Bros in link with French
airframes group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHORT BROTHERS, the Belfast aerospace company owned by Bombardier of Canada,
yesterday forged a strategic alliance with Hurel-Dubois of France to
develop, produce and market engine nacelles to aircraft and aero-engine
manufacturers.
The companies have formed a jointly-owned company called International
Nacelle Systems (INS), which will be based in Paris.
The alliance, which the two companies say will strengthen significantly
their position in the nacelle market, reflects the increasing trend of
international collaboration and concentration in the aerospace industry.
This trend is expected to intensify as the industry continues to restructure
itself in the face of the post cold war decline in the defence sector and
the recession in the civil aircraft sector.
Shorts has already collaborated closely with Hurel-Dubois, a manufacturer of
lightweight airframe structures as well as nacelles and engine thrust
reversers controlled by the French Compagnie de Navigation Mixte
conglomerate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1243</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: A battle of beer giants brews in
Argentina - Brazil's Brahma is muscling in on Quilmes home territory
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS high summer in the southern hemisphere, the peak season for beer
drinkers. In Argentina, this summer will also mark the first battle between
two beer giants, Argentina's Quilmes brewer and Brazil's Brahma.
Brahma, which in September began trucking its beer in bottles all the way
from Brazil, is already reckoned to hold about 1 per cent of the Argentine
market, and is aiming for 3 to 4 per cent share over the next two years.
Imports began surging into Argentina last summer, when trade liberalisation
combined with local industry's lack of capacity, allowed foreign can sales
to take about 3.5 per cent of the market. But consumers' initial excitement
over a wealth of exotic new labels is fading, leaving Brahma and Quilmes to
do battle alone.
As well as defending its dominant 64 per cent of the market, Quilmes, whose
Bermuda-based parent company is 15 per cent owned by Heineken of the
Netherlands, also imports Heineken, sales of which are roughly equivalent to
Brahma's.
Mr Pedro Algorta, general manager of Quilmes' Argentine operating arm, says
Brahma does not bother him much: 'When the consumer is doing well, the
company does well. Our biggest project is to keep up with the demand.'
Beer production in Argentina has risen by about 50 per cent to 7.98m
hectolitres in 1991, from 5.45m hectolitres in 1986. Per head consumption of
24.6 litres a year is now comparable with other Latin countries.
The Bermuda parent - most of whose sales are in Argentina - reported sales
up 25 per cent in the first half of 1992 to Dollars 203.9m, and net income
up only 2.6 per cent to Dollars 20.1m. It had sales of Dollars 364.3m for
all 1991, up 34 per cent over 1990, while net income rocketed to Dollars
39.4m from Dollars 16.1m.
It is adding capacity with a new Dollars 70m brewery and is building a
Dollars 35m malting facility. It has invested Dollars 41m over the past five
years in upgrading plant. Foreign analysts rate Quilmes's management highly,
lauding its approach to widening margins by improving quality and
introducing new technology rather than raising prices.
Quilmes has spread itself abroad. Last year, it began tackling Chile's
monopolised market with a brewery in Santiago and now claims 15 to 20 per
cent of Chile's rapidly-growing market.
Quilmes also owns small beer and soft drinks companies in Paraguay and
Uruguay.
Understandably, Mr Algorta is non-committal on the possibility of entering
the troubled Brazilian market. But Quilmes could import Brazilian Kaiser
beer into Argentina. Kaiser is owned by its ally Heineken and Brazilian
Coca-Cola bottlers.
Many Argentine beer executives are deeply suspicious of Brahma's arrival on
the scene. They wonder how it can truck beer 1,600km to Buenos Aires and
still make money.
They claim that Brahma must be dumping beer that it cannot sell in its
depressed home market, or is receiving covert subsidies.
Mr Ingo Ostrovsky, Brahma's public affairs manager, tells a different story:
'Brazil always had a beer shortage, so we never had the opportunity of
exporting. Now we have projects to increase capacity and dedicate ourselves
to foreign markets. We would be exporting even without the crisis in Brazil.
The original idea is to export 10 per cent of output to (neighbouring)
countries.'
He says rebates on most of the 151 per cent in taxes it pays on factory gate
prices enable it to sell beer in Buenos Aires at about the same price as in
Brazil.
From a marketing point of view, Brahma is also helped by the fact its
bottles are one-third smaller than those of its local competitors which
means they sell for slightly less than Quilmes bottles of almost one litre
even though Brahma's beer is actually more expensive.
Brahma has started an advertising campaign and is working hard on
supermarket outlets. It already knows the Argentine market well through its
local partner, Londrina SA, with which it owns a malting plant in Buenos
Aires province.
Analysts speculate that if all goes well, Brahma will seek a firmer foothold
in Argentina, possibly by buying a smaller breweries. That should not be too
difficult. Brahma had net income of Dollars 73m on sales of Dollars 1.8bn in
1991, although sales this year are down by over 20 per cent.
The advance of beer in Argentina has come at the cost of dwindling wine
sales, with consumption halving to 50 litres per head in the last 20 years.
The dwindling appeal of wine is forcing some wineries to diversify into beer
and mineral waters. Mr Roberto Luka, managing director of winery Finca
Flichman, started a sideline distributing German Beck's beer two years ago.
This summer he will start selling American Coors beer.
Flichman could well increase its presence in beer. That is a fine
aspiration, but it will take many a long hard summer before it can take on
Quilmes and Brahma.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1244</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Italo-Franco cruise venture
formed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COSTA CROCIERE, the stock market listed Italian cruise group, has reached an
agreement with Chargeurs and Accor of France to create Europe's first
cross-border cruise venture.
The two French companies, which jointly own the Compagnie Francaise des
Croisieres, the parent of the Croisieres Paquet company, will buy a stake of
23 per cent in Costa Crociere through a reserved rights issue worth L80bn.
The combined cruise group will have 11 liners, offering almost 9,000 beds,
and annual sales of around L600bn (Dollars 429m).
The deal, which is expected to be concluded by the end of next month, is a
further step in Costa Crociere's shift away from the US market towards the
Mediterranean and northern Europe.
Istituto Finanziaria Italiano (IFI), the financial holding company of
Italy's Agnelli family, suffered a sharp drop in net profits to L146bn
(Dollars 104m) in the six months to September 30 from L212bn in the same
period the previous year.
The fall stemmed from the steep decline in dividends received from the Fiat
cars group, in which IFI has a stake of around 45 per cent both directly and
through subsidiaries. IFI's Fiat dividends fell to L91bn from L147bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1245</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Too strong a dose of medicine - Paul
Abrahams on tough new DoH proposals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ASSOCIATION of the British Pharmaceutical Industry will today request
the Department of Health to abandon proposals to extend blacklists of
products for which the National Health Service will not pay.
The surprise proposals, announced last month by the Department of Health,
could cost drugs groups up to 70 per cent of their National Health Service
turnover, according to figures compiled by the Financial Times.
The 10 therapeutic areas on the new blacklists include anti-diarrhoeals,
hypnotics and anxiolytics, appetite suppressants, contraceptives, topical
anti-rheumatics, as well as treatments for allergic disorders, vaginal and
vulval conditions, anaemia, ear and nose illnesses and skin diseases.
Full details of the individual drugs to be blacklisted are only likely to be
revealed in April.
However, the sector as a whole could lose sales of up to Pounds 450m,
jeopardising 5,000 jobs and Pounds 400m in capital investment, according to
the ABPI.
The drugs will still be available on private prescription instead of the
NHS, but this means additional costs to the patient, according to PA
Consulting, the management consultants.
Some of the drugs, but not all, could be marketed over the counter at
pharmacies without prescription.
Although, Glaxo, the UK's biggest drugs group, is most affected in absolute
terms - it could lose about Pounds 39m in sales - some UK subsidiaries of
non-British groups are proportionally likely to be far worse hit.
Stiefel, based in High Wycombe, could lose up to 75 per cent of NHS sales if
its skin treatments are included on the blacklists. The UK subsidiary of US
group Schering-Plough could lose 70 per cent of its sales.
Schering of Germany's British arm could experience a 37 per cent drop in
revenues if its three oral contraceptives, Femodeen, Logynon and Microgynon
are included on the list. However, the company believes is unlikely.
Marion Merrell Dow of the US could lose Pounds 16m if its NHS turnover of
its anti-histamine Triludan is included. The group is partly protected
because the product is already sold over the counter without a prescription.
About 625 products are affected. Other well-known products include Glaxo's
eczema treatment Betnovate, Bayer's anti-fungal Canestan, Wellcome's
decongestant Sudafed, Pfizer's anti-rheumatic Feldene and Wyeth's Beconase.
Mr Mike Wallace, managing director at Schering Healthcare, says: 'Whether in
the UK, the US or on the Continent, there is clearly a need for more
resources in healthcare. If they cannot come from tax revenues, then the
money must come from patients. Admittedly, any change in financing is
inevitably political. There must be some form of safety net for those
without resources.'
The industry would even be willing to negotiate price freezes or a reduction
on the return of capital employed governed by the Pharmaceutical Price
Regulation Scheme, the agreement that sets UK drugs prices, says Mr Peter
Martin, director of marketing at Schering-Plough.
The ABPI says the future development of medicines could be hit by the
black-lists.
It points out that since seven therapeutic categories were blacklisted in
1985, only three products have been granted licences in those areas. Drugs
groups see little point going to the expense of developing products that
will not generate NHS sales.
'The government's approach could cause a rethink about decisions to invest
in the UK,' says Mr David Alcroft at PA Consulting.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
       Drug revenues at risk from prescription reforms (worst case)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Company                   Revenues          Company's           % of
                           at risk           sales to      company's
                         (poundsm)      NHS (poundsm)      NHS sales
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Schering-Plough                8.5                 12             70
Marion Merrell Dow              16                 42             38
Schering                        18                 48             37
Wyeth                           13                 50             26
Bayer                           20                 87             23
Lederle                         11                 51             21
Glaxo                           39                280             14
Pfizer                           8                 60             13
Wellcome                        10                 95             10
SmithKline Beecham               1                140            0.7
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1246</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Merrydown shares rise 10% on listing news
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN Merrydown Wine jumped 10 per cent to 248p as the USM-quoted cider
company announced plans for a full listing and the purchase of the Schloer
and PLJ brand names for a minimum of Pounds 8.2m.
The group said it intended to move to the official list on January 19 under
the new name of Merrydown.
Mr Richard Purdey, chairman, said the transition had been inevitable, given
the likely closure of the Unlisted Securities Market next year.
The acquisition of Schloer would give the group 29 per cent of the bottled
fruit drink market, complementing its Piermont and Sorrelle products.
Merrydown will pay SmithKline Beecham an initial cash consideration of
Pounds 4.35m for the brand names, to be funded by the issue of 2.73m shares.
At 205p each, the share issue will raise Pounds 5.1m after expenses. A
further Pounds 3.4m will be paid over three years.
The share capital will increase by 34 per cent as a result of the deal. Mr
Purdey said the group would 'work hard to ensure that shareholders' faith is
repaid by a very considerable increase in earnings.'
The brands are expected to make a marginal contribution in the year to
end-March.
Mr Purdey said Merrydown would concentrate on expanding the ranges and
increasing marketing. Sales of Schloer in 1991 were about Pounds 6.6m, and
Pounds 817,000 for PLJ.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1247</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Morris Ashby
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Morris Ashby has acquired Burdon &amp; Miles from Silvermines Engineering and
Technology, a subsidiary of Silvermines, for Pounds 921,000 of which Pounds
70,000 has been deferred.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1248</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Receiver may act against Clarke Foods'
supplier
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RECEIVERS TO Clarke Foods, the ice-cream manufacturer, are considering legal
action against Alfa-Laval, the Swedish engineering company, in respect of
equipment supplied earlier this year.
Alfa-Laval has vigorously rejected any responsibility for difficulties
encountered by Clarke. The equipment had been 'delivered, installed and
commissioned on a time schedule agreed with Clarke Foods', it has stated
previously.
However, Robson Rhodes, the receiver, said it had evaluated potential claims
worth 'several millions' against the Swedish company.
Clarke Foods went into receivership in October with debts of about Pounds
40m. The group had experienced production problems in the early part of the
summer, which meant it was unable to manufacture ice-cream during the
hottest months. Ice-cream sales in the latter part of the summer were
depressed by record wet weather.
The receiver also announced that the transaction by which Nestle, the
Swiss-owned foods group, acquired the main assets and business of Clarke
Foods had been estimated at a value of Pounds 40.5m. Included in this was
the receiver's evaluation of potential claims against Alfa-Laval.
Mr Ipe Jacob, of Robson Rhodes, said he would be making a report to the
Department of Trade and Industry on the conduct of Clarke's directors, as
was his statutory duty. 'We are currently collecting information . . . from
those who have made various allegations.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1249</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Observer: Gafta's new pew
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
After three moves in one year, the UK's grain and feed merchants have found
a final resting place for Gafta, their trade association - a disused
150-year-old chapel on the outskirts of the City of London. Unfortunately,
the symbolism of this week's grand opening was spoiled when John Gummer,
Britain's saintly minister of agriculture, failed to turn up. He was
detained on EC business and left it to one of his deputies, Earl Howe, to
give the blessing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1250</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / People: Vardey and Balfour join exchanges
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A pair of investment bankers has slotted themselves into the hierarchy of
two very different stock exchanges - apparent further indications of just
how tough the climate in City firms has become.
Giles Vardey (left), who left his position as head of continental equities
at Swiss Bank Corporation in May, has joined the board of the London Stock
Exchange in the newly created position of markets development director,
while Charles Balfour (right), who until now has been a London-based
director of Italian investment bank Cragnotti, will become the next managing
director of the overseas arm of Nasdaq, the US over-the-counter market.
Turnover of senior management under London Stock Exchange chief Peter
Rawlins has been rapid, and the new job Vardey has plumped for is expected
to be tough. 'I think he will be under more pressure to deliver than he
expects,' was the comment from one market source. 'Why study history? -
there is not a great deal of future in it,' Vardey ripostes.
For the past couple of years, the exchange has come under heavy fire from
its members for failing to take much account of their views. Vardey's
appointment appears to be a, very belated, acknowledgement of this lack of
liaison as the institution moves towards the creation of a trading
infrastructure to house the UK national and so-called European
inter-professional markets. Vardey's assignment is to work through the
detail of members' trading and business requirements, and, above all, to
sell the changes to the industry.
Famous among other things for his flamboyant braces, Vardey, 36, had
previously been at Salomon - twice, the second time as head of continental
equities. He was at County NatWest in between the Salomon stints, including
as managing director of European equities. Asked why he did not move to
another investment bank after SBC, he stresses the importance of the
exchange taking on more market practitioners.
Meanwhile, Balfour, 41, who has been working at Cragnotti since 1991 as head
of mergers and acquisitions and corporate finance, points out that
cross-border business has been extremely slow. However, the 'mutual parting
of the ways' came, he claims, because he would have had to go to Italy 'for
it really to be a success and I didn't want to do that'. Of the 'three or
four job offers,' he received, Nasdaq appealed the most. He succeeds Lynton
Jones, who founded the London end of Nasdaq and is now with the Swedish
derivatives market OM.
Educated at Eton and the Sorbonne, Balfour had spells at Hoare Govett, Hill
Samuel and Dillon Read before joining Banque Paribas where he stayed from
1979 until 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1251</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / ProShare calls for 'MegaPep' tax change
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PROSHARE, the group which aims to promote wider share ownership, has called
for a range of tax changes to encourage investors to move into the equity
market.
In a submission to Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, ahead of next year's
Budget, ProShare argues that the current personal equity plan should be
replaced by a 'MegaPep'.
This would allow investors to place Pounds 80,000 into equities over an
eight-year period with, as now, all income and capital gains tax-free.
The current system allows the investor to put a maximum Pounds 9,000 into a
Pep in a tax year (Pounds 6,000 in a general, and Pounds 3,000 in a
single-company plan). The 'MegaPep' would allow those with lump sums
(perhaps as a result of inheritance or redundancy) to move all their capital
into equities immediately rather than stagger the investment over several
years.
ProShare also calls for an equivalent to the French 'loi monory' with savers
allowed to invest Pounds 1,500 in shares each year out of pre-tax income.
For a basic-rate taxpayer, this would mean the Pounds 1,500 investment would
actually cost Pounds 1,125.
The organisation also said capital gains tax roll-over relief should be
available on shares, and that self-administered Peps should be considered.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1252</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Fund managers handle Pounds 620bn
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Institutional Fund Managers' Association has estimated that the value of
funds managed by its members was about Pounds 620bn at the end of last year.
About three quarters of the association's 77 members replied to a survey
which also found that overseas clients accounted for more than 17 per cent
of total funds.
Fund Management Survey. IFMA, Garrard House, 31-45 Gresham Street, London
EC2V 7DN. Free.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1253</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Taiwan's KMT set to win poll - but victory could be hollo:
Expedient judgments are at core of support for a dissent-ridden party that
for 40 years has had it all its own way
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN Taiwan votes tomorrow in the most significant election of its 43-year
history, the result will already be certain.
But it could be a hollow victory for President Lee Teng-hui's ruling
Kuomintang party, as the election campaign shows growing dissension and
alleged corruption within his once authoritarian party.
The KMT has almost two official candidates for each of the 161 seats in the
parliament but these have been joined by 43 maverick KMT representatives who
are running without its official endorsement and are distorting the official
party line.
Even among the official candidates, there is such a broad spectrum of
forceful opinion that the KMT begins to resemble a loose alliance of vested
interests, united only in their desire to retain the patronage of a powerful
corporate and political empire.
This will make for more tempestuous government. President Lee should emerge
from the elections with core control of a ruling party which more fully
reflects the views of the Taiwanese people; but he will have to be prepared
to make concessions to pass its programme of economic and political reforms.
It is only the second time the entire parliament - which approves
legislation and the make-up of the cabinet - has been elected.
The first was in 1949, and it was only last year that the vestiges of its
'old thieves' - the surviving octogenarians who had rubber-stamped
government legislation for 40 years - were at last removed.
Convoys of colourful vans fill the streets, voicing the slogans of the two
main parties, the KMT and the opposition Democratic Progressive Party, along
with an assortment of independents ranging from a recently-jailed business
tycoon to a woman who bares her breasts for democracy.
A further incentive will come in the NTDollars 10bn (Pounds 250m) that is
expected to come out of the banking system to reimburse many of the 10m
voters who turn out on Saturday. Corruption will be a key factor.
One senior businessman said: 'Some politicians are spending NTDollars 500m
on buying their candidacy.' There have been 96 investigations into
vote-buying.
The KMT has the support of notable 'golden oxen' - rich businessmen who are
keen to exert political influence - to add to the earnings from its
corporate empire; this gives it a massive advantage. In addition, it holds
key cards, such as ownership of television stations and newspapers.
But the DPP is still expected to pick up more than 30 per cent of the vote,
while independent candidates could win another 15 per cent. This should put
across a clear message to Mr Lee: the public is tiring of money politics.
Mr Ting Tin-yu, chief consultant to Gallup in Taiwan, said: 'The phenomenon
of this election is that there will be a lot of angry voters. I think the
whole KMT will suffer from this, and their vote will fall below 60 per
cent'.
This is 10 per cent below the KMT's rating at last year's elections for the
national assembly, which amends the constitution and chooses the president.
The KMT was aided last year by the DPP's call for Taiwan's independence from
mainland China, which proved unpopular. A hotel worker said: 'If the KMT win
the election, the mainland Chinese will not be angry. If the DPP win the
election, I think the mainland will invade.'
The DPP has toned down its rhetoric with its new slogan 'One China, One
Taiwan'. It is scarcely a retraction, but a recent poll found more than 40
per cent of respondents did not believe it meant independence. The DPP also
gains strength from the fact that it has not put forward enough candidates
to control the government, but will only be able to impose checks and
balances on the KMT.
This is important, since they still lack credibility. Policies such as
lowering taxes but introducing a welfare state have unnerved economists and
the party retains its image of being warlike.
Legislative brawls have become less frequent than they were, but several DPP
candidates were arrested last week, one of whom allegedly tried to break
into the local KMT headquarters with a tank of gasoline and two torches.
Probably of greater concern to President Lee, however, is the opposition
coming from within his own party. At the liberal end of the KMT spectrum,
there are legislators with views identical to those of the DPP. At the
conservative end there remains the shadow of the mainland.
Chiang Kai-shek's nationalists and their direct descendants account for only
15 per cent of the population, but since they arrived on the island in 1949,
they have controlled its politics.
So far, they have partly withstood a backlash from the native Taiwanese. Mr
Lee's 'mainstream' faction (which is more reformist and pro-business) is now
primarily Taiwanese-born; with enough support from the electorate, it is
keen to purge the cabinet of many of its controlling mainlanders.
But the mainlanders will remain a powerful force. Two former cabinet
members, Mr Jaw Shao-kang and Mr Wang Chien-hsien, put themselves forward as
unofficial KMT candidates, and have run a successful campaign on an
anti-corruption banner.
They appear certain to be elected and to be a source of dissent in President
Lee's parliament. He will therefore have to proceed with caution in
implementing his reform programme, and also in any changes in policy towards
China.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1254</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Popular movement urged to meet the needs of children
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE United Nations Children's Fund yesterday called for a worldwide popular
movement - 'the basic needs movement' - to raise Dollars 25bn (Pounds
16.4bn) a year to meet children's needs for food, clean water and basic
health care.
Reaching this target would lower birth rates, and save the lives of more
than 4m children a year, Unicef said in its annual 'State of the World's
Children' report. This would create a breakthrough against 'the last great
obscenity - the needless malnutrition, disease, and illiteracy that still
casts a shadow over the lives, and the futures of the poorest quarter of the
world's children'.
'The time has come to banish in shame the notion that the world cannot
afford to meet the most obvious and basic needs of all its children,' said
Mr James Grant, executive director of Unicef, pointing out that Dollars 25bn
amounted to less than Europeans spend on wine each year, Americans on beer,
and Japanese on business entertaining. This contrasts with about Dollars
750bn spent every year on the military. He added that progress depends not
just on cash, but on sustained commitment and managerial competence by
governments.
'It is an unacceptable disgrace to humanity for millions of children to be
dying every year from diseases that can demonstrably be prevented and
treated at almost negligible cost,' the report says.
Unicef calls for two thirds of the Dollars 25bn needed to come from
developing countries themselves. This could be achieved if governments spent
20 per cent of their budgets on basics such as food, water, sanitation,
health care and family planning, the report says. It complains that at
present, more is spent on the military, and on debt servicing than on health
and education.
The rest could be met out of aid funds if donor countries raised to 20 per
cent the proportion of aid devoted to basic needs. At present, less than 10
per cent of the total Dollars 40bn provided as bilateral aid every year is
targeted in this way.
'The problem today is not that overcoming the worst aspects of world poverty
is too vast or too expensive a task: it is that it has not been seriously
tried,' the report says. It says that a combination of new technologies,
falling costs, and community-based strategies, is making it possible today
to tackle aspects of poverty that historically have been the most stubborn -
such as nutrition, clean water and basic education. For example, providing
clean water in Africa today costs about Dollars 20 per person per year, half
the cost of just six years ago.
Unicef calls for a worldwide popular movement because of concern that the
threat to children is a 'silent emergency' that passes unnoticed alongside
more dramatic crises such as those in Somalia or Yugoslavia: 'No famine, no
flood, no earthquake, no war, has ever claimed the lives of 250,000 children
in a single week,' said Mr Grant: 'Yet malnutrition and diseases claim that
number of child victims every week.'
The report points out that 60 per cent of the 13m child deaths every year
are caused by three diseases - pneumonia, diarrhoea and measles - all of
which can be treated at low cost. Treatment for vitamin A deficiency, which
can cause blindness and early death, can be controlled at a cost of about 10
cents per child per year, while iodine deficiency, which causes mental
retardation, could be eliminated at a total cost of Dollars 100m.
It is nevertheless encouraged by shifts away from military government,
singling out Ethiopia, where military spending fell last year from 60 per
cent to 30 per cent of the total spending, with health and education
spending rising from 12 per cent to 20 per cent.
A final critical concern is the 'financial famine' facing developing
countries because of high levels of debt, low inward investment, and limited
access to export markets. Developing country debt now totals Dollars
1,300bn, the report says, with capital and interest charges of Dollars 143bn
falling due each year - three times the total of aid received from all
sources.
State of the World's Children. Unicef, Unicef House, 3 UN Plaza, New York NY
10017 or Oxford University Press, Walton Street, Oxford OX2 6DP.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1255</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / A generation of young Africans is wasted by lack of
resources
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HOLMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NAIROBI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THEY HAVE little in common except their fate.
Young pickpockets in Nairobi, street urchins in Luanda, teenage bandits in
Mogadishu, Aids orphans in Kampala, child prostitutes in Kinshasa, young
'comrade' fighters in Soweto: they are part of Africa's wasted generation,
doomed to poverty, never to realise their potential.
Disease and deprivation are killing or crippling millions of Africa's
children. Compassion alone demands a response, but Africa's planners point
to a further imperative.
The scale of the toll is so great that it is imperilling the continent's
capacity to manage its development in the decades to come.
'Today's generation of African children will be largely consigned to lives
of poor health, and arrested growth. . . the hopes of the continent will be
frustrated well into the next century,' warns a Unicef report.
'Unless urgent action is taken. . . the human foundation for Africa's
progress in the 21st century will not exist,' it says.
The odds are heavily stacked against you if you are born on a continent that
has seen a decade of decline.
Nearly 5m under-fives die each year, usually of readily preventable
diseases, estimates the Unicef study, presented at a conference in Senegal
last month, co-sponsored by the Organisation of African Unity.
If you survive these hazardous years, you then have a one in three chance of
completing primary school.
And as you enter maturity you will run a gamut of risks ranging from
exposure to Aids to becoming a teenage conscript in a rag-army.
'The point has now been reached where not only the past progress but the
present survival, protection and future physical and mental development of
Africa's children are directly threatened by a critical scarcity of
resources.'
Around Dollars 12.7bn (Pounds 8.3bn) will be needed each year for the rest
of the decade, Unicef calculates, if basic targets in health, education,
water supplies and sanitation are to be met, Unicef calculates.
Raising the funds requires a combination of reallocation of existing aid
flows by donors, external debt relief, domestic measures including tax
reforms and user charges, the report suggests.
Only Norway currently channels 20 per cent of its bilateral aid to social
priorities. If all industrialised countries did the same, funds for this
sector would rise from around Dollars 1.2bn to Dollars 3.5bn.
'The tragedy is that for Africa, the 21st century is getting off on the
wrong foot,' the report warns, ending with a plea: 'The abandonment of hopes
for the continent would mean the writing off of the talents, aspirations and
potential of one eighth of mankind, both now and far into the next century.'
Africa's Children, Africa's Future. Unicef, 3 UN Plaza H-12G, New York, NY
10017.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                          AFRICA'S CHILDREN
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Of the estimated 642m people in Africa, roughly 47% are under 16
An estimated 4.6m African children under 5 died in 1990
About 34m (30%) young Africans are severely malnourished
Around 10%-12% are badly disabled
Maternal mortality is 630 deaths per 100,000 live births; it is under
20 in developed countries
About 165,000 African women die annually form childbirth-related factors
Primary school enrolment fell from 80% to some 72% in the 1980s
One child in three of primary school age is not attending school
Adolescent pregnancy is the biggest in the world - each year, 18% of
girls aged 15-19 become pregnant
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1256</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: De Beers 'no' to Canadian joint
venture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DE BEERS, the South African group which dominates the diamond market,
approached Lytton Minerals, a junior Canadian company, wanting to enter into
a joint venture on land staked by Lytton in the Lac de Gras area in the
North West Territories of Canada, said Mr Desmond Alexander, Lytton's chief
executive, yesterday.
Lac de Gras has become the scene of the biggest land rush in North America
for nearly 100 years since diamonds were discovered by Dia Met Minerals and
BHP of Australia in November last year. Monopros, De Beers' Canadian
exploration company, has already staked about 4m acres of land on its own
account.
Mr Alexander said the South African group had made a firm offer for a joint
venture on Lytton's 1.1m acres but 'we told them that it was in the best
interests of our shareholders for us to go it alone.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1257</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Navistar in tentative deal with
union over health care
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURIE MORSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CHICAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NAVISTAR International, the Chicago-based truck and engine manufacturer,
last night Wednesday announced it had reached a tentative agreement with the
UAW, the auto workers' union, to trim retiree healthcare costs. The
agreement is expected to reduce Navistar's liability for retiree health care
and insurance benefits to Dollars 1bn from Dollars 2.6bn.
The company said it would resume negotiating a collective bargaining
agreement with its unions on January 8 which was aimed at changing
post-retirement healthcare benefits for active employees.
The UAW has been leading negotiations with Navistar since mid-October, when
the union and the company agreed to set aside an Ohio lawsuit. The company
had contended that its retiree benefits put it at a Dollars 200m annual cost
disadvantage to its competitors, and that it would enter bankruptcy if the
cost burden were not reduced. A 1985 restructuring left the company with
three retirees for each active employee.
The deal with the union requires Navistar to issue 255m new shares of common
stock to a trust fund for current and future retirees. A new profit-sharing
programme will make payments into the same fund. The company has 251m shares
outstanding, and last quarter its sales translated into little more than 3.5
cents per share.
In turn, retirees will be required to share in the costs of their medical
benefits by paying premiums and deductibles.
Navistar said it was suspending the quarterly dividend on its series G
preferred stock until the legal process involving the benefits restructuring
was complete, and the new healthcare programme was implemented.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1258</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Delta cuts its dividend to 5
cents a share
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DELTA Air Lines, one of the three largest US carriers, is cutting its
quarterly dividend from 30 cents a share to just 5 cents, in an attempt to
ride out difficult conditions in the industry and the problematic
integration of transatlantic assets it acquired from the now-defunct Pan Am.
Delta also announced another big cost-cutting package, involving a Dollars
600m reduction in spending on facilities and ground equipment over the next
three years, deferrals of another Dollars 400m of aircraft orders over the
same period, and salary reductions aimed at saving around Dollars 180m a
year.
Earlier this year, Delta announced that it was slashing about Dollars 5bn
from its capital spending up until 2001, and implementing a 'profit
improvement plan' designed to prune Dollars 375m from operating costs in the
current financial year. The airline has shed around 5,000 jobs over the past
12 months.
The company, which has virtually doubled in size during the past five years
and has become a significant international airline via the Pan Am deal in
late-1991, said it was trying to avoid lay-offs among permanent employees.
Atlanta-based Delta has long been famed for its paternalistic approach to
employee relations. The carrier has talked enthusiastically about the 'Delta
family' and prided itself on a no-redundancy policy.
Mr Ron Allen, chairman, acknowledged that the salary reductions, which
involve a 5 per cent pay cut for all non-contract staff, was the first
company-wide pay reduction in the airline's history.
Delta gave no details of the aircraft order deferrals, but it has 162
aircraft on firm order and 259 on option.
Most of these are Boeing and McDonnell Douglas aircraft, and a spokesman
said that orders for nine Airbus Industrie A-310 aircraft, due in 1993, were
expected to go ahead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1259</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Councils to get Pounds 1.9bn for homes
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LOCAL authorities will get Pounds 1.9bn for housing investment programmes in
1993-94, Sir George Young, the housing minister, said in a Commons written
reply yesterday. The allocation for the Estate Action programme aimed at
inner cities will total Pounds 356m.
Sir George also set out guidelines for council rents in England, which
suggest a rise of 5 per cent in real terms.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1260</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Author focuses on credit 'crunch'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FINANCIAL deregulation enabled domestic financial markets to catch up with
international ones but also resulted in an accumulation of personal and
corporate debt, which is causing a credit 'crunch', according to a book
published yesterday.
Mr Christopher Johnson writes in New Players, New Rules, Financing the
1990s, that households and companies are saving more and borrowing less.
New Players, New Rules. Lafferty Publications, The Tower, IDA Centre, Pearse
Street, Dublin 2, Ireland. Pounds 545.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1261</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Clinton appoints housing chief
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT-ELECT Bill Clinton added two more members to his cabinet yesterday
with the nomination of Mr Henry Cisneros, the former mayor of San Antonio,
to be Secretary of Housing and Urban Development, and Mr Jesse Brown,
director of Disabled American Veterans, to be Secretary of Veterans Affairs.
Mr Clinton also named Mr Herschel Gober, who is in charge of veterans
affairs in his Arkansas cabinet, to be Mr Brown's deputy.
Mr Cisneros, perhaps the US's most prominent Hispanic politician, faces a
particular challenge at HUD. His predecessor, Mr Jack Kemp, has provided a
vision of urban renewal in the wake of upheavals such as the Los Angeles
riots, but is viewed in Washington as having only partly completed his
department's overhaul after the scandals of the Reagan administration.
Mr Brown, a 48-year-old former Marine, is expected to give particular
emphasis to the concerns of Vietnam veterans, who have often felt the
Veterans Administration was run largely in the interests of second world war
veterans.
Mr Clinton is expected to complete his domestic team soon. Mr Richard Riley,
a former governor of South Carolina, may be named education secretary today.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1262</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: TI, Samsung in chip venture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER WISE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LISBON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Texas Instruments (TI), the US high-technology company, and Samsung, the
South Korean electronics giant, yesterday signed a letter of intent for a
multi-million-dollar joint manufacturing investment in Oporto, northern
Portugal, writes Peter Wise in Lisbon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1263</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: Bush signs Nafta accord
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
President George Bush yesterday signed the North American Free Trade
Agreement (Nafta) designed to eliminate trade barriers between the US,
Mexico and Canada, Reuter reports from Washington.
Earlier yesterday the pact was signed by Prime Minister Brian Mulroney in
Ottawa and by Mexican President Carlos Salinas in Mexico City.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1264</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Craxi decision is postponed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The executive of Italy's Socialist party yesterday decided to postpone until
a special congress in mid-January a decision on the future of its leader, Mr
Bettino Craxi, following notice he was under investigation by Milan
magistrates for alleged corruption, writes Robert Graham in Rome. The party
now has a month to persuade Mr Craxi to step down and find a replacement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1265</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Fabius challenge in Aids blood row
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Laurent Fabius, the leader of the French Socialist party, yesterday asked
to appear before a High Court to face charges over a scandal involving the
distribution of blood tainted with the HIV virus, writes William Dawkins in
Paris. His move followed the criticism of Socialists yesterday when MPs
blocked an attempt to bring two of Mr Fabius's former ministerial colleagues
to justice over the scandal. Mr Fabius's gesture could reduce the damage to
the Socialists' image inflicted by the parliamentary block.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1266</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Backing for Polish miners
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Poland's steelworkers yesterday threw their backing behind the the stoppages
sweeping the industrial heartland of Silesia, as strikes spread to all but
five of the country's 70 coal mines, writes Christopher Bobinski in Warsaw.
The steelworkers declared a 'strike alert' to underscore their support,
enabling them to take action if the government refused to meet the miners'
demands. Protests began on Monday against government wage curbs on state
industries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1267</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Gaidar given advisory post
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
President Boris Yeltsin, striving to keep Russia on the free-market road,
has given his sacked reform chief Yegor Gaidar a new advisory role and told
the new prime minister to form a cabinet by next Tuesday, Reuter reports
from Moscow.
Mr Yeltsin's press office said Mr Gaidar, replaced as premier three days ago
by the more conservative Mr Viktor Chernomyrdin, had been appointed a
presidential adviser on economic policy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1268</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / EC takes last steps to single market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EC MEMBER states gave the final impetus yesterday to a barrier-free European
market and made preparations for lifting border controls on goods on January
1.
In their last meeting before the market is formally opened, EC internal
market ministers agreed 12 measures, bringing the total of 282 measures to
just short of the full programme of single market legislation proposed in
1985.
But European consumer groups are complaining that there will be no genuine
free market because of gaps, inadequate redress mechanisms and delays in
implementation of laws. In a report issued yesterday the Bureau Europeen des
Unions de Consommateurs, the European consumers' organisation, warned that
'substantial barriers' remained, and said there was a risk that safety and
quality standards would be lowered.
Mr Karel Van Miert, EC commissioner responsible for consumer policy,
admitted there were still some omissions, particularly in the field of
consumer protection, but added: 'It would be unfair to say that what has
been done isn't, globally speaking, in the interests of consumers.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1269</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Panic urges supporters to depose Milosevic
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
An old man gives the three-fingered Serb victory sign amid a 100,000-strong
opposition rally in Belgrade yesterday. The Yugoslav prime minister, Mr
Milan Panic, urged cheering supporters to depose his rival, Mr Slobodan
Milosevic, the president of Serbia, in elections on Sunday, writes Laura
Silber in Belgrade. Mr Panic said Mr Milosevic had 'built a Chinese wall
around Serbia' through war.
Stark choice, page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1270</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Barclays hit by provision
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN, JOEL KIBAZO, CHRISTOPHER PRICE and STEVE THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DISCLOSURE of the size of provisions that Barclays Bank will have to make
against loans to Imry Holdings, the property development group, surprised
the stock market. It reopened a long-running debate over the threat to the
bank's final dividend when it reports 1992 results at the end of February.
Barclays ended the day 8 lower at 379p with turnover increased to 19m.
The Imry provisions could well leave Barclays with a net loss for the year,
according to sector analysts. Before the Imry disclosures, analysts'
estimates of Barclays earnings for 1992 ranged from profits above Pounds
200m to losses of up to Pounds 165m.
Concern about Barclays' exposure to losses in property have dogged the
shares throughout this year. But they have rallied strongly since
mid-October as some analysts have highlighted the strength of the bank's
capital ratios.
The shares were additionally unsettled yesterday when Moody's Investor
Services, the US credit rating agency, downgraded ratings for Barclays'
senior debt and cut ratings of some subsidiaries.
HSBC weak
The latest tumble in the Hong Kong stock market, after China's foreign
minister apparently ruled out concessions in the dispute over the colony,
triggered renewed weakness in both classes of HSBC shares in London.
The UK-registered HSBC stock fell to 463p before stabilising to close 9 1/2
down at 466p on turnover of 9.4m, while the Hong Kong-registered stock ended
10 off at 453p on 5.2m traded.
A County NatWest 'sell' recommendation emphasised weakness in the shares. Mr
John Aitken at County described the shares as 'fundamentally overvalued and
15 per cent too high'. He pointed out that HSBC's inclusion in both London's
Footsie 100 index and Hong Kong's Hang Seng Index had left index tracking
funds underweight in the sector.
Glaxo hurt
Pharmaceuticals company Glaxo recorded the biggest percentage fall in the
Footsie list after agency broker James Capel opened the way for investors to
switch from defensive to cyclical stocks.
Capel reduced its rating for the group's new drugs, particularly Serevent,
its anti-asthma product, and Imigran, the migraine treatment. It cut
predictions for Imigran, arguing that the drug would generate sales of only
between Pounds 30m and Pounds 35m in the first half of the year. However,
Capel was formerly at the optimistic end of the range of forecasts. Hoare
Govett, for example, was predicting only Pounds 38m sales for Imigran in the
first half.
There were further doubts over the security of the US patent on Zantac, the
anti-ulcer drug which accounts for more than 40 per cent of Glaxo's sales,
although analysts seemed reassured after speaking to the company.
Investors also remain concerned about the announcement from Astra, Glaxo's
Swedish rival, on trials of its ulcer drug Losec. Glaxo shares fell 27 to
768p, making a slide of 44 since the end of last week.
ICI lost 24 to 1009p as securities house UBS Phillips &amp; Drew voiced caution
over the potential in the bulk chemicals sector, particularly in PVC and
polypropylene markets. UBS, which at Pounds 580m in 1992 and Pounds 700m
next year is at the high end of predictions for the group, is reconsidering
its forecasts.
Energy sector specialists registered surprise at the impact of the
announcement from Sir James MacKinnon, Ofgas chairman, that British Gas
should be broken up.
Nevertheless, British Gas made progress, closing 3 higher at 273p on good
turnover of 14m. Mr John Toalster, at Strauss Turnbull, saw little downside
for Gas shares whatever the outcome. 'If the break-up happened it would be
hard to interpret it as bad news for shareholders.'
An encouraging report on the housing market by the Royal Institute of
Chartered Surveyors triggered buying interest in construction stocks.
Bellway jumped 10 to 278p and Wilson Bowden 9 to 343p.
Building materials groups also progressed, with takeover stories and reports
of broker buy notes driving Blue Circle up 8 more to 186p and Tarmac 7
higher to 113p.
Reckitt &amp; Colman failed to show strength as the company warned analysts
that, in spite of encouraging economic news from the US, prospects remained
gloomy. The shares were steady at 603p.
US selling prompted SmithKline Beecham to fall 16 to 430p in the Units and
12 to 492p in the 'A' shares. Wellcome was also weak, closing 17 lower at
1011p and suggesting a possible move out of defensive stocks.
A buoyant brewery sector attracted attention. Allied- Lyons jumped 19 to
636p. Bass gained 10 to 622p, so too did Grand Metropolitan, at 453p.
Guinness rose 11 to 491p.
Cautious hints from the government that a national lottery's impact on
traditional forms of betting would be limited helped Ladbroke, up 3 at 178p.
Further negative remarks from Paribas on Euro Disney weakened sentiment, the
shares closing 10 off at 718p.
Profit-taking was seen in Tate &amp; Lyle, 4 easier at 395p. The shares had been
boosted after the company said that it had regained its sweetener contract
with PepsiCo.
A stock shortage in Booker sent the shares forward 11 to 367p. Unilever's
good run continued after a recent round of presentations, the shares adding
5 at 1075p. Meetings hosted by Argyll also brought a good response, the
stock advancing 6 to 395p.
Sparkling results from Shoprite Group spurred the shares on to 573p for a
rise of 45. The boardroom moves and trading statement at Amber Day again
boosted the stock, which put on 6 at 40p.
Seven-day trading at WH Smith was said to be producing optimistic soundings
from the company and the 'A' shares rose 8 to 504p.
The gas watchdog's call for British Gas to be split up raised the spectre of
further regulatory moves in the utilities areas, particularly the power
generators sector. But damage in the latter was relatively limited, National
Power slipping 6 to 264p and PowerGen losing 5 at 265p. Both stocks were
additionally unsettled by switching into British Gas, a move recommended by
Carr Kitcat &amp; Aitken.
Water issues opened marginally easier but then rose quickly to end the
session with good gains across the board. Anglian was the best performer of
the four Footsie water stocks, adding 3 at 488p. The best individual showing
in the sector came from Wessex Water, up 7 at 584p.
Regional electricity stocks were generally firmer, with Yorkshire 5 higher
at 473p after the near 15 per cent dividend increase.
British Aerospace continued to find takers after the announcement of orders
for Airbus aircraft earlier in the week. The shares climbed 6 to 153p with
turnover once again heavy at 7.2m.
Profit-taking after the recent run left Siebe 10 lighter at 401p in trade of
1.2m. Rolls-Royce appreciated 4 1/2 to 114p after the announcement of an
engine order from the Italian air force.
Conglomerate MB-Caradon rose 16 to 281p, with the stock said to have been
boosted by a James Capel recommendation moving it to a 'strong hold'.
Tiphook was greatly in demand and the shares forged ahead 26 to 340p.
A line of stock said to total about 1m shares was reported in airports group
BAA. The shares closed a penny easier at 788p. A squeeze helped P &amp; O to
jump 13 to 490p.
Associated British Ports was a 'good market', according to a trader. The
stock firmed 4 to 345p. British Airways closed 3 to the good at 281p on the
news that it was to acquire a 25 per cent share of Quantas, the Australian
airline. Turnover reached 4.7m shares.
MARKET REPORTERS:
Peter John, Joel Kibazo,
Christopher Price,
Steve Thompson.
Other market statistics,
Page 22
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (113).
AMERICANS (1) Amer. Express, BANKS (2) Bank Scotland, Sumitomo, BUILDING
MATERIALS (2) Rugby, Wolseley, BUSINESS SERVICES (1) Serco, CONGLOMERATES
(1) Wassall, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1) Barratt Dev., ELECTRICALS (2)
Jones Stroud, Menvier-Swain, ELECTRONICS (10) Cray, Diploma, Electrocomps.,
Eurotherm, GEC, ISA Intl., Lexicon, Linx Printing, Macro 4, Misys,
ENGINEERING AEROSPACE (1) Smiths Inds., ENGINEERING GENERAL (5) FKI, Fairey,
Halma, Siebe, VSEL Cnsrtm., FOOD MANUFACTURING (4) Acatos &amp; Hutcheson,
Nestle (Br), Do (Reg), RHM, FOOD RETAILING (3) Kwik Save, Morrison (Wm), Do
5 1/4 pc Pf., HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (3) AAH, Quality Care Homes, UniChem,
HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (2) Manchester Utd., Vardon, INSURANCE COMPOSITE (1) Royal,
INSURANCE LIFE (4) Britannic, Refuge, Transatlantic, Utd. Friendly,
INVESTMENT TRUSTS (19) Anglo &amp; O'seas, Drayton Blue Chip Zero Pf., Flmg.
Emrg. Mkts., For. &amp; Col. High Inc., Govett Amer. Smllr. Co's, Group Dev.
Cap., M &amp; G Inc. Zero Pf., Mezzanine Cap., Murray Enterprise, Murray Split
Cap. Zero Pf., Pantheon Intl. Wts., Personal Assets, Primadona, Scot. Natl.
Zero Pf., Scot. Value, Select Assets Uns. Ln. '13, Do Series II, Sphere Zero
Pf., TR Tech. Stppd. Pf., MEDIA (12) Central ITV, Daily Mail, EMAP,
Flextech, Headline, Independent, Reed, TVS Entr., Taylor Nelson, Telegraph,
Utd. News., Watmoughs, METAL &amp; METAL FORMING (1) Johnson Matthey,
MISCELLANEOUS (4) Airsprung Furn., Chemring, Danka, Norbain, MOTORS (2)
First Tech., Trinity, OIL &amp; GAS (1) Burmah, OTHER FINANCIAL (4) Caledonia,
Cattle's, Prov. Financial, S &amp; U, OTHER INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (8) BTR, Do
Wts. '92-93, Do '94-95, Do '95-96, Charter Cons., Cookson, McKechnie,
Renishaw, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (5) Bowater, Do 7 3/4 pc Pf., Dorling
Kindersley, Ferguson, St. Ives, PROPERTY (1) Slough 6pc Cv. '03, STORES (4)
Asprey, Country Casuals, Next, Smith (WH), TELEPHONE NETWORKS (1) Cable &amp;
Wireless, TEXTILES (3) Claremont Grmts, Courtaulds, Dewhirst, TRANSPORT (2)
Dawsongroup, Norex, WATER (2) Cheam, Northumbrian.
NEW LOWS (21).
AMERICANS (1) IBM, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Matthew Clark, BUILDING
MATERIALS (2) Baggeridge Brick, Needler, CONGLOMERATES (1) Goode Durrant,
CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1) BB &amp; EA, ELECTRICALS (1) Lec, ELECTRONICS (1)
Molynx, ENGINEERING GENERAL (1) SKF AB, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (3) Brazilian
Wts., Contra-Cyclical, German Smllr. Co's Wts., MEDIA (1) TV-am,
MISCELLANEOUS (1) Fitzwilton, MOTORS (1) Volkswagen, OIL &amp; GAS (1) Bow
Valley, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (2) Buhrmann-Tetterode, Stat-Plus,
PROPERTY (1) Derwent Valley, MINES (2) Anglo Amer. Gold, Niugini.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1271</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: FT-SE Mid Index in the limelight
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRIVATE investors seized the initiative in the London stock market
yesterday, leaving the big institutions to continue their cautious shuffling
of portfolios ahead of this morning's expiry of the December stock index
future.
Active trading in the second line issues brought a gain of around 1 per cent
in the FT-SE Mid 250 Index, while the FT-SE 100 Index (the Footsie) had to
be content with a rise of barely 0.3 per cent on the day.
The FT-SE Mid 250 closed 30 points stronger, but the FT-SE 100, after an
erratic session, ended only 7.5 higher at 2,740.3. Trading volume increased
sharply, with business in the second line stocks well outpacing that in the
FT-SE 100 listed issues.
Once again, the influence of the stock index future was clearly displayed in
the stock market by a sharp upswing when the futures opened. But the stock
market was impervious to the day's list of statistics on the domestic
economy.
A rise in November unemployment to an annual rate of 10.3 per cent, with the
total at a 5 1/2 -year high, changed little in market perceptions, nor did
the 5.5 per cent annualised gain in average earnings in October.
Tax-related deals played a significant role in the blue chip stocks. After
slipping by 7.4 on the Footsie in early trading, the market about-turned
abruptly to record a net advance of more than 15 points at midsession.
But the Footsie 2,750 level proved more than the market could manage and
share prices in the market leaders then turned back to reduce the final rise
on the FT-SE Index to 7.5 on the day. With several trading houses still
predicting a Footsie 2,700 close for the year, securities dealers were
cautious of being drawn into the market.
Seaq-reported volume jumped to 825m shares from the 676.3m of the previous
day, but on Wednesday retail, or customer, business was worth Pounds 1.25bn,
indicating the weight of overnight tax-related business in blue chip stocks
by institutions seeking to establish tax positions ahead of the calendar
year-end.
Views of the outlook for the UK stock market among the UK securities houses
continued to range between those who warn that pre-Christmas trading
sessions, when most of the institutions are no longer at full throttle, can
be a misleading guide to underlying sentiment, and the optimists who have
already pinned their faith in a further advance in the stock market next
year.
At the annual seminar held by Kleinwort Benson Securities yesterday,
investors were told that the UK merchant bank is holding its forecast for
the 1993 year-end to Footsie 3,000. While seeing the UK stock market as
offering the best risk/reward prospect of leading global markets, Kleinwort
has doubts over the likely pace of the recovery in UK corporate earnings
next year, the uncertain outlook for domestic inflation, and finally over
'where the money is going to come from' for an advance in share prices.
Among the brighter sectors yesterday, brewing shares stood out strongly as
Guinness continued its recovery from the doubts over international earnings
posed recently by UK brokers. GEC, traditionally seen as a defensive stock
because of its cautious cash policies, came in for renewed investment
support.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1272</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SHORTAGE of stock coupled with continued rolling forward of positions from
the December contract into March ahead of this morning's expiry boosted
turnover in stock index futures, writes Joel Kibazo.
The December contract on the FT-SE started its last full session of trading
at 2,733 and, but for a brief retreat two hours later, moved ahead
throughout the day.
Several dealers were said to have been caught short of December, although
others concentrated on moving into the March contract, which accounted for
the high turnover in that series. The day's high of 2,760 was reached just
before the opening of Wall Street, and although a bout of profit-taking
caused a retreat in December, the firmness in New York was said to have
prevented a greater decline.
Worse than expected UK unemployment figures had little effect on trading and
the December contract was at a premium to cash consistently throughout the
session. December finished at 2,747, up 7 from its previous close and at a
five-point premium to the underlying cash market. Turnover in the December
future was almost 9,000 contracts, while the volume in the March series
reached about 7,000 Lots.
The traded options saw heavy turnover of 38,138 lots. The FT-SE 100 option
had 12,481 contracts dealt and the Euro FT-SE 3,364 lots.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1273</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow stages recovery after
stock clearance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
IN SPITE of more bad corporate news, US share prices posted solid gains
yesterday after the big sell-off during the previous day, writes Patrick
Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 14.05 at 3,269.23,
resting at its high for the day thanks to a late surge of buying. The more
broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 finished 3.91 ahead at 435.43, the
American SE composite improved 1.12 to 390.42 and the Nasdaq composite rose
8.83 to 658.46.
Turnover on the New York SE came to 250m shares and rises outnumbered
declines by a ratio of almost two-to-one.
The near 30-point decline in the Dow on Wednesday was seen by analysts as a
welcome, and possibly final, clear-out of stocks before the end of the year.
Consequently, prices were expected to begin climbing back up again
yesterday, which they did in spite of unfavourable economic and corporate
news.
The economic news was mixed: the Labor Department reported a 22,000 rise in
weekly jobless claims, reversing the recent improving trend in the labour
market, and the Commerce Department announced a narrowing in the October
trade deficit from the previous month's Dollars 8.6bn to Dollars 7.0bn.
The most promising aspect of the trade figures was a sharp rise in exports,
although analysts cautioned that exports will continue to be held back by
the slump in the European and Japanese economies.
On the corporate front, the opening of trading in Minnesota Manufacturing
and Mining, known as 3M, was delayed after broking house Prudential
Securities lowered its 1992 earnings estimate for 3M from Dollars 5.70 a
share to Dollars 5.60 because of the slowdown in the company's overseas
markets. When trading started, 3M's shares dropped more than Dollars 3 1/2
to Dollars 99, but later recovered to end Dollars 2 1/8 down at Dollars 100
1/2 in active trading after the company said it backed Prudential's new
forecast.
Two days of heavy selling in IBM ended. The stock recovered Dollars 1 1/8 to
Dollars 53 in turnover of almost 6m shares as bargain hunters helped IBM
recover from losses linked to Tuesday's announced restructuring.
Storage Technology declined Dollars 1 to Dollars 20 3/4 in turnover of 1.6m
shares after warning that fourth-quarter earnings would come in below
analysts' estimates.
Procter &amp; Gamble rose Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 52 3/4 on news of its pact
with a Bombay-based company to sell detergents, soaps and other consumer
products in India.
Canada
TORONTO stocks extended Wednesday's gains in further heavy trading as the
big Canadian banks lowered their prime lending rates for the third time this
week.
The TSE 300 index added 8.2 at 3,304.3 and advancing issues led declines by
356 to 321. Volume amounted to 44.7m shares valued at Cdollars 375.7m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1274</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG revived in late trading, helped by a better performance from
gold stocks. The gold index put on 5 to 837, while the overall index shed 12
to 3,223. Industrials remained weak, finishing 14 off at 4,297.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1275</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: Recent fizz evaporates from Milan
bourse - The interest in privatisation candidates has largely petered out
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
After regaining some speculative fizz in October on privatisation euphoria,
Milan's battered bourse looks set to end the year well below the opening
levels of 1992.
The burst of interest in possible privatisation candidates, which helped to
drive the Comit (BCI) index up to almost 480 in October, has now largely
petered out. Though occasional tit-bits of news or gossip are enough to set
individual stocks such as Credito Italiano or the Nuovo Pignone engineering
group in motion, such movements have not been enough to enliven the overall
market, now 17 per cent down from its opening levels of last January.
Brokers take heart that the index has at least recovered from the depths of
late summer, when it sank to 354.93, and that daily turnover has recovered
from the lows of around L50bn to three or four times as much.
However, a new shadow has loomed following this week's regional election
results, involving around 1m voters, and the news that Mr Bettino Craxi,
leader of the Socialist party and a former prime minister, is under
investigation by magistrates involved in the country's spiralling political
corruption scandal.
Neither development was entirely unexpected. At the polls, the autonomist
Lombard League was the big winner, consolidating its position in the north
and stretching its tentacles into central Italy. La Rete, the clean
government party headed by a former mayor of Palermo, was the other big
victor, capturing a limited, but surprisingly high, share of the votes.
The investigation into Mr Craxi, whose Milan powerbase is the focus of
magistrates' attention, further weakens the Socialist party. Mr Gianni De
Michelis, its deputy chairman, is already under the magisterial microscope
for alleged misdemeanours in the Veneto region.
Some analysts suggest the poll results and growing troubles for the
Socialists could perversely help, rather than hinder, the bourse by playing
into the hands of Prime Minister Giuliano Amato's reform-minded government.
Although himself a senior Socialist, Mr Amato could benefit from the growing
disarray to push through further unappealing, but essential, legislation
cov-ering spending cuts and privatisation.
The argument has its merits. Not even the victors from this week's polls are
threatening to topple the government, in expectation of new electoral laws.
That gives Mr Amato more time to push ahead with essential changes to cut
the budget deficit and loosen the state's grip on the economy. Speaking to
MPs yesterday, Mr Piero Barucci, the treasury minister, said he hoped for
parliamentary approval for his privatisation plan before the end of this
year.
The upbeat political message has not yet penetrated the financial markets,
however. Instead, uncertainties about the government's stability have fed
through to the exchange rate, weakening the lira against the D-Mark.
In the absence of any good news on the corporate front, share prices look
vulnerable. Yesterday's 13.97 rise in the Comit to 420.35 was not fully
sustained in London after-hours' trading, and the outlook for corporate
earnings remains gloomy. While the lira devaluation, now running at almost
18 per cent against the D-Mark, should help Italian exporters, recession at
home and in major export markets such as Germany will depress sales and
margins.
Recent weeks have seen a dearth of upbeat corporate news. Announcements of
more job losses at IBM have refocused attention on the problems at Olivetti.
Its unions fear that the company, which they claim is now losing L2bn a day,
plans a further 6,000 redundancies in 1993.
An 11 per cent fall in the Italian car market in November - the first
double-digit drop for some years - has also put an unwelcome spotlight on
Fiat. Although the group has managed to arrest the decline in its share of
the domestic market to around 44 per cent, a shrinking overall cake means
production is set to fall further.
Meanwhile, worries continue to surround Ferruzzi, Italy's other
private-sector industrial giant, which controls the Montedison chemicals and
agro-industrial group. Analysts find it hard to imagine how the group can
talk about possible acquisitions of state assets, such as the Sme foods and
retailing concern, when it is swimming in a sea of debt.
Some special situations, such as Fiat's Rinascente and Cogefar-Impresit
subsidiaries, remain. Both are potential sale candidates as Fiat's bosses
turn their attention to possible one-off gains to boost profits.
Failing such spectacular events, the market looks set to mark time in the
weeks ahead, waiting for clearer information on privatisations to emerge,
perhaps by the second quarter of next year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1276</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Corporate news affects
individual ratings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOURSES were mixed, with individual company stories making their impact here
and there, writes Our Markets Staff.
PARIS took some comfort from comments by Prime Minister Pierre Beregovoy
that the franc would not be devalued, although this did little to ease
pressure on the currency in foreign exchange markets. The CAC-40 index
closed 1.46 lower at 1,735.23, having languished at a day's low of 1,707.05,
in turnover of some FFr2bn.
Rumous that BNP might become a privatisation candidate should there be a
change of government next year excited interest with the CI's advancing
FFr15.10 to FFr419.00. Other financials were generally firmer with Paribas
up FFr6.60 to FFr339.60 and Suez FFr1.90 firmer at FFr233.40 while Societe
Generale slipped FFr2 to FFr576.
FRANKFURT ended with an absence of Christmas cheer. Although the DAX index
ended 4.10 higher at 1,476.17, retailers were dejected with Asko DM40 down
at DM610 and Kaufhof DM5.50 lower at DM391.50 as stock market turnover fell
from DM3.5bn to DM3.0bn.
German retailers, who enjoyed a two-year boom after the opening of the
Berlin Wall in 1989, have been caught in a sharp downturn as rising
unemployment and uncertainties over future tax increases depress consumer
sentiment. Forecasts yesterday included falls in earnings per share of up to
10 per cent this year.
AMSTERDAM came to life again after a dull few days with Nutricia prominent
after forecasting lower than expected second half profits and reorganisation
plans after the close on Wednesday. Its shares ended the day down Fl 14.10
or 11.7 per cent at Fl 110.40. The CBS Tendency index eased 0.1 to 103.0.
Institutions seemed unimpressed by news that Daf had secured loans of some
Fl 190m from the Belgian and Dutch governments, and some analysts commented
that the truck manufacturer still faced serious long-term problems. The
shares, however, improved 40 cents to Fl 6.50.
Nedlloyd slipped 40 cents to Fl 30.20 after rumours, later denied, that Mr
Torstein Hagen, who holds some 25 per cent of the group's equity, might be
planning to force the sale of the shipping division.
BRUSSELS closed fractionally lower, failing to benefit from a technical
recovery in Petrofina and a surge in the steelmaker, Cockerill.
The Bel-20 index closed 0.36 lower at 1,105.99 in turnover of BFr850m.
Cockerill closed BFr10, or 11.8 per cent higher at BFr95 after an early low
of BFr79, and a high of BFr100 after it confirmed plans to pay an unchanged
1992 net preferred dividend of BFr9. The oil major Petrofina, hard-hit in
recent days after announcing a severe cut in its 1992 dividend, closed up
BFr100 at BFr7,540.
ZURICH recovered late on a firmer tone on Wall Street, the SMI index closing
4.8 higher at 2,026.7.
VIENNA fell sharply after steep falls in OMV and other blue chip stocks. The
ATX index closed 17.82 lower at 720.95 with OMV dropping Sch41 or 6.6 per
cent to Sch577 on heavy selling by foreign institutions. Some analysts said
that while the oil group had been weak over the last few days there was no
significant factor which sparked the fall.
Elsewhere, Strabag fell Sch30 to Sch920, Wienerberger lost Sch35 to
Sch2,805, while Creditanstalt preferred lost a further Sch8 to Sch413
following Wednesday's news that it planned to cut its dividend.
STOCKHOLM recovered some ground as buyers returned to Astra, which has been
under pressure following a disappointing analysts' meeting earlier in the
week. The Affarsvarlden Index advanced 6.5 to 873.3 in turnover of SKr713m.
Astra free shares rose SKr6 to SKr717 while SKF free shares lost SKr4.50 to
SKr67 on news that it expects a SKr1.8bn loss in 1992 after taking a
restructuring charge of SKr1.1bn.
HELSINKI fell on higher domestic interest rates and on continued
profit-taking after the sharp recovery this autumn, the Hex index ending
16.4, or 1.9 per cent lower at 830.6.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                   FT-SE Actuaries Share Indices
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
December 17                                        THE EUROPEAN SERIES
Hourly changes                 Open      10.30     11.00     12.00
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100           1035.11   1034.19   1033.73   1034.27
FT-SE Eurotrack 200           1116.38   1115.05   1116.26   1118.81
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                   Dec 16    Dec 15    Dec 14
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100               1036.62   1038.14   1041.18
FT-SE Eurotrack 200               1117.67   1115.23   1116.33
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes                 13.00     14.00     15.00     Close
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100           1032.81   1033.89   1033.99   1034.41
FT-SE Eurotrack 200           1118.20   1119.62   1119.20   1119.02
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                        Dec 11           Dec 10
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100                    1044.03          1049.63
FT-SE Eurotrack 200                    1117.72          1123.58
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value  1000 (26/10/90)  High/day: 100 -  1035.12 ; 200 -  1120.80
Low/day: 100 -  1032.56  200 -  1114.83
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1277</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei gains ground
asHong Kong falls back
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INDEX-linked buying, short covering, and demand from foreign investors
allowed the Nikkei average to gain moderate ground in spite of late
afternoon profit-taking, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The 225-issue average was up 169.20 at 17,437.91 after a day's high of
17,544.13 and low of 17,209.53, rising above the 200-day moving average of
17,468 in the afternoon, before slipping on light selling.
Volume decreased from 255m shares to 220m. Trading was led by technical
activity, with little participation from institutions ahead of the year-end.
Rises outpaced falls by 588 to 373, with 170 issues unchanged, and the Topix
index of all first section stocks gained 8.52 at 1,325.85. In London the
ISE/Nikkei 50 index firmed 3.45 to 1,078.88.
Reports that the Ministry of Finance intended to introduce a new weighted
index for the futures market supported equities. The Nikkei 225 index,
blamed for volatility on the Tokyo cash market, is a simple average of 225
stocks, and is said to be easily manipulated.
A positive reception for the new second-section listing of Ten Allied, a pub
chain operator, encouraged market participants. The company, which had been
traded on the over-the-counter market, closed at Y2,330, up from its public
offer price of Y2,277.
Yokohama Matsuzakaya, the department store, led rising issues for the third
day, surging Y56 to Y695 on increased speculative trading, after rumours of
share cornering had circulated the market earlier this week.
Foreign investors bought high-technology issues, with Toshiba, the most
active stock of the day, appreciating Y11 to Y636 and NEC Y20 to Y685.
Reports that bacterial infection within a hospital had claimed the lives of
80 people revived interest in 'clinical infection'-related shares. Terumo, a
syringe maker, jumped Y33 to Y873 and Sanden, a hand disinfecting machine
maker, rose Y14 to Y582.
Some financial issues rose on the asset revaluation theme, with the
authorities rumoured to be considering the introduction of accounting
reforms in which asset values would be re-evaluated at market prices on
corporate balance sheets. Tokio Marine &amp; Fire put on Y30 to Y1,210 and
Sumitomo Bank Y20 to Y1,880.
Mitsui Mining &amp; Smelting, which had previously gained popularity on rumours
of a new gold vein discovery, moved out of favour, retreating Y10 to Y485 on
profit-taking.
In Osaka, the OSE average improved 90.39 to 18,930.01. Volume remained high,
at 142.9m shares (against 117.9m), on cross-trading by financial
institutions.
Roundup
THE CHINA factor adversely affected sentiment in Hong Kong, while the
region's other markets were mixed.
HONG KONG fell after China's foreign minister ruled out any concessions in
its dispute with Britain over the future of the colony. The Hang Seng index
receded 86.50 to 5,329.46 in turnover of HKDollars 2.57bn.
Banking shares were active, while properties saw profit-taking following
strong gains on Wednesday. HSBC Holdings was the most active stock,
retreating HKDollars 1.50 to HKDollars 54.
AUSTRALIA overcame early weakness, helped by the stronger local dollar, and
the All Ordinaries index closed 2.4 up at 1,499.4 in turnover of ADollars
206.3m. Westpac rose a cent to ADollars 3.04 after news that the managing
director was to resign.
News Corp, which has lost ground this week on profit-taking, rallied 22
cents to ADollars 29.22. BHP added 6 cents at ADollars 12.56 ahead of
today's interim figures.
SEOUL saw intervention by the market stabilisation fund lift shares in late
trading. The weighted index improved 6.51 to 660.60 in turnover of Won703bn.
TAIWAN's weighted index lost 6.25 to 3,668.67 in TDollars 8.8bn turnover.
Late buying in blue chips pulled cement shares up, and textiles posted minor
gains.
MANILA was helped higher again by a strong US performance by PLDT, which put
on 5 pesos to 845 pesos. The composite index firmed 3.81 to 1,226.73 in
combined turnover of 261m pesos. SINGAPORE remained positive, with good
gains seen in leading stocks. The Straits Times Industrial index rose 11.69
to 1,468.31 in volume of 69m shares.
NEW ZEALAND featured forestry issues as the NZSE-40 index fell 11.67 to
1,509.52.
BANGKOK saw property companies advance strongly as the SET index gained 9.52
at 849.92 in turnover of Bt2.98bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1278</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Money Markets: French cash rates rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Bank of France decided not to raise official interest rates at its
Thursday repurchase operation in spite of continuing pressure on the French
franc on the foreign exchanges, writes James Blitz.
There had been much expectation in recent days that France would increase
the rates at which it offers cash to banks through the five to 10-day
lending window, in order to reverse the currency's fall to within a centime
of its ERM floor against the D-Mark.
The authorities yesterday left the intervention rate unchanged at 9.10 per
cent, while the five to 10-day repurchase rate stayed at 10 per cent. The
franc briefly fell below the FFr3.42 level against the D-Mark in the wake of
the move, but there were no signs of significantly greater pressure on the
French currency.
One London-based dealer suggested that the French decision was, tactically,
the right move. He said that a rise in rates would have created a new
atmosphere of crisis over the franc. The French authorities have realised
that the market is now putting a new premium on growth, and actually fears
that rate increases are fundamentally bad for the economy, he added.
Cash rates in the French franc market again firmed yesterday, with
three-month money rising as high as 12 per cent. In the franc futures
market, there was erratic trading in the March contract, which opened at
around 90.40 and fell back to 90.25 on fears of the rate rise. The
authorities' decision pushed the contract up again, to close a net 3 basis
points higher at 90.43.
Short-dated Euromark futures rose sharply yesterday in spite of what was
considered a hawkish monthly report from the Bundesbank. The March contract
rose 12 basis points to close at 92.05, a level which assumes that
three-month money in late spring will be at 7.95 per cent.
Rates in the German cash market softened a little yesterday, but remained on
the comparatively high side because of end-of-year pressures. Three-month
money averaged about 9.07 per cent yeasterday, having been at around 8.90
per cent last week.
In the sterling market, three-month money was unchanged at 7 1/4 per cent.
The Bank of England forecast a shortage of Pounds 400m, which was fully
removed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1279</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Tough rallying call on franc
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE French franc weakened momentarily against the D-Mark yesterday after the
Bank of France surprised some dealers by deciding not to change its official
rates at the weekly repurchase operation, writes James Blitz.
Foreign exchange dealing remained thin in the run-up to Christmas, and
exchange rates fluctuated sharply. The dollar fell to a low of DM1.5445 from
a previous close of DM1.5550. But upbeat US economic data later helped the
US currency to rebound, leaving a rise of  3/4 pfennig on the day at
DM1.5625. In New York it slipped back to finish at DM1.5575.
The market's focus remained firmly fixed on the potential weakness of the
French franc. In the European morning, the currency dipped below the FFr3.42
per D-Mark level, about a centime above its ERM floor, as dealers tried to
anticipate what Mr Pierre Beregovoy, the French prime minister, would say at
a much-heralded news conference. In the event, Mr Beregovoy swore to
maintain the current parity between the D-Mark and the franc and the
currency appreciated to around FFr3.4150.
The French and German central banks also helped to move the franc upwards by
intervening in its support. But, once again, the amounts deployed were
minimal.
The decision not to raise the five to 10-day lending window later in the day
surprised some dealers, and the franc again fell below FFr3.42, touching
FFr3.4210. But it later improved to FFr3.4190, just marginally easier on the
day.
Mr Jeremy Hawkins, senior economic adviser at Bank of America in London,
said the French authorities should be well pleased by the way the day's
events had gone. 'The onslaught on the currency, if it comes at all, may now
only happen in the new year,' he added.
However, others believe the pressures on the French currency will return
unless France lifts rates. Miss Alison Cottrell, an economics analyst at
Midland Global Markets, said the French authorities were playing 'a very
dangerous game' by not raising rates.
She claimed that a rise in official lending rates would have given the franc
a sharp boost and could have quickly been reversed next week. 'Why would the
Bundesbank want to come into the market and buy French francs through to
next spring unless the French also show their commitment to tightening
policy ?' she asked.
The D-Mark remained strong against most currencies, helped by what was
considered a hawkish monthly report from the Bundesbank. The Italian lira
weakened to below L900 to the D-Mark, before finishing mildly down on the
day at L898.7.
Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the Bundesbank president, helped to soften the impact
of the report by issuing a statement later in the day saying that the French
franc/D-Mark parity was inviolable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1280</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Chicago Board of Trade may
extend trading hours
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURIE MORSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CHICAGO Board of Trade, under pressure from overseas competition and
lagging agricultural volume, is considering changing the trading hours for
its grain and soyabean futures.
While the exchange's frenetic financial futures trading floor has undergone
a number of changes in its trading day over the last decade - including the
introduction of a night bond session - its 3 hour and 45 minute grain
trading session has been sacrosanct. CBoT traders have opened their grain
markets at 09:30 central standard time and closed them at 13:15 since 1885.
Plans to break with that tradition have not been favourably received, and
the new hours proposals were recently sent back to an exchange committee for
further study. 'Change for change's sake is not a good idea,' says Mr Kal
Hachem, vice president for Cargill Investor Services agricultural futures
group. 'Longer hours do not necessarily mean more volume.'
The CBoT's agriculture executive committee is proposing that grain futures
open 90 minutes earlier and close 45 minutes earlier, in a bid to garner
more European business. A second proposal, extending the session by six
afternoons a year to keep trading open during the US Department of
Agriculture's major crop reports, is also being considered.
While competition for global market share in financial futures is fierce,
the CBoT has enjoyed a near monopoly on maize and soyabean futures trading
throughout their history. However, CBoT officials see subtle changes coming,
and fear complacency may cost the exchange important business.
The Tokyo Grain Exchange this year introduced an import maize futures
contract that is rapidly building volume, and France's Matif is considering
a feed wheat futures contract. Chicago traders also have a healthy respect
for their London competitors.
Mr Michael Jenkins, who helped build make the London International Financial
Futures Exchange into the world's third-largest futures exchange, recently
took over the helm at London's Futures and Options Exchange. 'The Fox
intends to go after agricultural futures, and now they have Michael
Jenkins,' says one CBoT official.
Internal pressures may also dictate a change. Globex, the electronic
after-hours trading system that the CBoT owns in partnership with the
Chicago Mercantile Exchange and Reuters, will eventually list the CBoT's
grain and soyabean contracts. This has prompted traders to consider spending
more time in the pits, particularly to catch the fall-out from government
reports.
Critics say the proposed earlier openings would not expand European
participation in Chicago's grain markets significantly, and does not address
the potential challenge from Tokyo. West coast grain merchants would also be
inconvenienced by the hours. However, other traders say the change is
inevitable, and that east coast and midwest grain merchants who already
traded cash grain before the futures opened, would benefit from an earlier
opening, as would the CBoT's European customers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1281</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Turkey to resume wheat imports
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ISTANBUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FOR THE first time since the drought of 1989, Turkey is to import wheat for
the domestic market, a direct result of the more active exporting strategy
pursued by the country's grain board in 1992.
The decision, announced last week, is not a cause for alarm. However it does
underline the structural problems of the Turkish wheat market, where the
state is subsidising farmers to produce lower value grains unsuited to the
increasingly sophisticated tastes of the domestic consumer. In lifting the
restrictions on imports for a 6-month period, Turkey is seeking to make up a
domestic shortfall of hard wheats while continuing to export from its
reserves to poorer neighbours in the Caucasus and Central Asia.
The move is also the result of a poorer harvest this year and a radical
change in the way the government intervenes in the domestic market. Through
changes in pricing policy, the Turkish Soils Products Office (TMO), halved
the amount it bought from farmers in 1992, thus reducing the agency's burden
on the central government budget.
On June 1, the first day of the harvest, the TMO announced an average
support price for wheat of TL1,200 (9.5p) a kilogram. The official price was
to be increased by TL50 a kilogram a month to account for inflation. The
government promised to pay farmers in full on delivery rather than in
installments as before.
In 1991-92 Turkish production is estimated to have been between 14.5m and
15m tonnes, down from 16m tonnes in 1990-91. Under the price support scheme,
the TMO purchased 2.45m tonnes or 25 per cent of the 10.3m tonnes offered by
farmers to the market, compared with 4.5m tonnes in 1991. The balance of the
crop is made up of wheat retained as seed and animal feed, together with
harvest losses.
Equally important, the private sector granaries have been forced to become
more active in the cereals market. The move represents a rare example of a
state agency withdrawing from a commercial activity better handled by
private enterprise.
Moreover the change has been achieved without the government reneging on its
election commitment to help the farming sector.
For the last few years in supporting the farmers the TMO has paid well above
international prices. Worse still, in both 1989 and 1990 it financed these
purchases on the local market using foreign commercial borrowings. While
still higher than world prices, this year's support levels at 58 per cent up
on 1991 dropped in dollar terms, given an inflation rate of 70 per cent.
The catch was that the TMO also announced it would sell back the wheat on
the open market at 15 per cent above the support price. Merchants thus had
an incentive to go directly to farmers at harvest time, incurring the
warehousing costs but avoiding paying the TMO premium. 'Today it's the
private companies which have the stocks, not the TMO,' says Mr Ergun
Erzurumlu, the TMO deputy head and inventor of this new scheme.
Officials estimate the cost of the 1992 operation at about TL2,900bn, or
TL3,800bn if all grains are included. Part of the finance was provided by
direct support from the budget.
Two international tenders for a total of 1.5m tonnes raised a further
Dollars 213m. Traders say TMO managed the sale well, realising high prices -
Dollars 113 a tonne for the first tender in mid-May and Dollars 125 in
mid-June.
The TMO now has a contract for 1.1m tonnes with Azerbaijan - 500,000 has
already been shipped. Negotiations are continuing on a 2m tonne deal with
Uzbekistan, with a similar size offer to Turkmenistan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1282</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Oil market consolidates its
gains
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE OIL market consolidated its gains yesterday after Wednesday's rally with
the price of North Sea Brent crude oil for February delivery up 15 cents at
Dollars 18.45 a barrel.
Some traders believe the market could have reached a bottom after its recent
weakness, but there is unlikely to be a strong recovery in price until the
market sees evidence of actual production cuts made by members of the
Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries.
'It's too premature to say the market has bottomed, but I think it has
stopped going down for a while,' said Mr Andrew LeBow, market analyst at ED
&amp; F. Man, the international trading house in New York.
Strength returned to the crude market on Wednesday after Nigeria announced
it would make a 10 per cent cut in its oil output. Lagos has found
difficulty in selling its crude recently and had sold several cargoes on a
cut-price basis.
Nigeria said yesterday its cut in oil output would be effective from the
beginning of next year and not immediately as some traders had thought on
Wednesday night. This had a slight dampening effect on the market, but price
still managed to push upwards. The market was further strengthened by the
American Petroleum Institute's weekly report on Tuesday night which showed
that US oil refineries had cut their production runs by 500,000 barrels of
oil a day. Refineries had been producing a lot of oil products that had
built up as stocks while demand remained low. These stocks had, in turn,
depressed crude prices.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1283</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GOLD held above Dollars 338 a troy ounce on the London bullion market as
option-writers battled to defend positions. 'A lot of Dollars 340 calls are
written for the year's end. Therefore if we break above Dollars 340 a lot of
people would be forced to cover their short positions on options,' one
dealer said. Players defending their positions were selling to keep the
price down. Two big US commission houses might be forced to cover large
short positions if the price rises. A break above Dollars 340 was seen,
taking gold to Dollars 342 and possibly Dollars 344 to Dollars 345. On the
LME trading in base metals was mostly routine as the market wound down in
interest ahead of the holiday season. Three-month COPPER was effectively
stalled below Dollars 2,230 a tonne; three-month ALUMINIUM'S attempt to test
overhead resistance above Dollars 1,250 a tonne ran out of steam; and ZINC
failed to follow through Wednesday's gains. In Chicago WHEAT was mostly
lower by midday on commercial house selling after Russia missed another
payment.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1284</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Germany moves to end gold VAT
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DEUTSCHE BANK'S vice-president of precious metals Mr Fritz Plass yesterday
called for taxes to be lifted on gold in all major European Community
countries, including the large British market, as Germany moved to scrap
value added tax on the metal, reports Reuter. 'We want a level playing field
and are not looking for any competitive advantage over London, we are
seeking the London bullion market's support in negotiations with the EC,' he
said.
On Friday the Bundesrat is expected to pass a law freeing all gold bars,
granules, legal tender coins, paper-gold and derivatives from VAT.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1285</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: EC sets banana quota and
tariffs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GARDNER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN COMMUNITY farm ministers agreed yesterday to set tariffs on banana
imports from Latin America, with a fixed 2m tonnes quota at a reduced duty
of Ecu100 (Pounds 79.50), and a hefty Ecu850 tariff - about 170 per cent -
on imports above that level.
Ministers said the deal should remove one more contentious item from the
Uruguay Round world trade reform talks going on at the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade in Geneva, because the EC has moved from protecting its
market through quotas to tariffs, which can gradually be reduced.
But a lawyer acting for Latin American producers said he was 'shocked and
angry' at this 'worst possible disaster', and predicted the deal would be
challenged both in the European Court of Justice and within the Gatt.
The agreement is supposed to reconcile until now conflicting goals.
The EC was forced to act to complete the single market, by attempting to
unify disparate banana regimes across Europe. Yesterday's agreement will
come into effect next July, six months after the single internal market
starts up - if there are no legal challenges.
But the EC also has to honour treaty commitments to predominantly Caribbean
and African producers linked to it through the Lome convention. Lome has a
protocol saying the EC will not place its banana producers 'in a less
favourable situation than in the past or the present'.
The Lome countries, like Euro-banana suppliers from EC outlying territories
in Martinique and the Canary Islands, produce at near double the cost of
Latin American, 'dollar zone' banana producers. The former two groups share
two fifths of the 3.4m tonnes a year EC market, but 'dollar' bananas already
have 60 per cent and with their lower costs could fast extend market share
in a free-for-all.
The Caribbean producers, which earn up to three quarters of their hard
currency from bananas, would be wiped out in an open market and their
lobbyists have warned that they would become easy prey to drugs traffickers
using the eastern seaboard into the US.
Mr John Gummer, UK agriculture minister and current chairman of the EC farm
council, said yesterday that Caribbean and Lome producers 'will be
absolutely amazed at the excellence of this deal'.
In addition to the high tariff above the 2m tonne quota, the agreement would
distribute licences to sell about a third of the dollar fruit to traditional
importers of Lome and Euro bananas, enabling them to cross-subsidise their
own operations.
'This is taking away the right to import from the Latin Americans and giving
it to the Lome traders,' a spokesman for a dollar banana producer said.
Germany, along with Denmark and the Benelux countries, had been expected to
resist the plan. They consume cheaper and bigger dollar bananas and operate
more open markets for the fruit. Germany, in addition, has its own banana
protocol in the Treaty of Rome, guaranteeing unimpeded access to the fruit.
Bonn yesterday affixed a reserve to the deal, but cannot block it, unless,
as one lawyer suggested, it invokes its banana protocol.
The banana deal's passage was eased because it was put into a package of
measures, which in part resembled a Christmas stocking of concessions to EC
farmers protesting against Gatt and common agricultural policy price, output
and export cuts. The main features of the package, likely to cost some
Ecu2.5bn, were:
Retention for two years of the 'switchover' mechanism, compensating farmers
for currency movements, once monetary compensatory amounts are abolished
with the advent of the single market on January 1. The commission, which
also wanted to abolish switchover, estimates that the cost of the last six
month's currency movements would be Ecu1.6bn in a full year. One senior
Brussels official predicted switchover would push farm spending through its
allowed ceiling in 1994. At last weekend's Edinburgh summit, France, a
significant beneficiary, got a clause in to the conclusions more or less
sanctioning this.
More money for beef and durum wheat farmers in central and south-west
France, sheep and beef farmers in Ireland and sheep farmers in the UK.
A 900,000-tonne milk quota increase for Italy, provided it reduces its 2.5m
tonnes illicit excess by 1.6m tonnes.
Compensation to Spain for giving up protection against imports it still
enjoys as a latecomer to the EC. But Portugal will retain border protection,
having complained that compensation offered was insufficient. The commission
had estimated the cost of buying off both sets of controls at Ecu630m.
In the UK interim measures would be necessary from January 1 to ensure that
the UK could continue to fulfil its Lome obligations to traditional
suppliers in the Commonwealth Caribbean, Mr David Curry, junior agriculture
minister, said in a parliamentary written answer yesterday.
'Under our interim measures, a DTI import licence will still be required for
dollar bananas, including those in free circulation in another member state,
after January 1, 1993,' he said. 'It will continue to be an offence to
import dollar fruit into the UK without a licence.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1286</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: UK fishermen fear further cuts
in 1993
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH FISHERMEN are expecting to be granted a substantial increase in the
quantity of haddock they will be allowed to catch in the North Sea next year
when the European Community's fisheries council meets in Brussels tomorrow
to decide on quota allocations. But they are still looking forward to 1993
with foreboding because they fear that conservation measures to be brought
in under the UK government's new fisheries legislation will reduce their
fishing and cut their incomes.
The European Commission has been advised by independent scientists that
stocks of haddock in the North Sea have recovered from the low levels of
1990 and 1991. This should allow the UK's haddock quota to rise from about
43,000 tonnes this year's of to about 75,000 tonnes.
The cod quota is likely to be close to this year's at about 100,000 tonnes,
but there should be higher quotas for pelagic species - mackerel and
herring.
Both the UK government and the commission are anxious that the recovery in
stocks of haddock, one of the most popular fish among British consumers,
should not be dissipated by renewed overfishing. From early next year the
government will use new powers to regulate fishing under the Sea Fish
(Conservation) Act, which recently won parliamentary approval. This will
oblige fishing boats to spend many days of the year tied up in port, with
the each boat's restriction based on the amount of fishing it did in 1991.
The government believes this will ensure access to fishing is allocated
fairly and that supply of fish to the market will be more even, avoiding the
gluts which led to sharp price falls this year.
Fishermen fear they may have to spend up to 190 days a year in port, which
will prevent them catching their quotas. The government will not say what
tie-up time is likely next year but insists that all the UK's quota will be
caught.
Next year sees the UK introducing a small decommissioning scheme involving
Pounds 25m over the next three years, which would cut the fleet by between 5
and 7 per cent. Fishermen who last week staged a big demonstration in
Edinburgh against the EC's common fisheries policy say it is insufficient.
'The government has a blind adherence to effort limitation as the way of
conserving fish stocks, with a totally inadequate de-commissioning scheme.
It boils down to de-commissioning by bankruptcy,' says Mr Roderick McColl,
for the Scottish White Fish producers' association, which represents a large
part of the UK North Sea fleet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1287</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Fruit and Vegetables
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Supplies of favourite Christmas fresh produce will be plentiful over the
festive period reports the FFVIB. Avocados at 40-55p each (60-70p) and
Honeydew melons at Pounds 1.30-1.60 each (Pounds 1.30-1.60) are traditional
Christmas starters. Christmas vegetables are reasonably priced this week
with Brussel sprouts at 15-25p a lb (15-25p), carrots at 15-20p a lb
(15-20p), leeks at 40-50p lb (45-50p) and parsnips at 20-25p a lb (20-25p).
Pecan nuts are Pounds 1.15-1.30 a lb and Monkey nuts are 60-70p a lb
(75-95p). Walnuts, Brazils and Hazelnuts will cost around 68-85p a lb
(Pounds 1.15-1.30).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1288</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Austria's only aluminium
smelter to close
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ERIC FREY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   VIENNA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AUSTRIA'S ONLY aluminium smelter in Ranshofen is finally set to close at the
end of the year. The state-owned aluminium company Austria Metall (Amag),
which operates the smelter, has also put up for sale two international
smelting operations in order to reduce its mounting losses.
Over the past few years, Ranshofen's output has been cut to 30,000 tonnes a
year from 80,000 tonnes as falling world aluminium prices have made it
impossible to turn a profit. In addition Amag is trying to sell its 20 per
cent interest in the Australian smelter Boyns, which has an annual capacity
of 46,000 tonnes, and its 33.3 per cent stake in Aluminiumschmelze Hamburg,
a 46,000-tonnes-a-year smelter in northern Germany. No buyers have yet been
found.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1289</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Construction Contracts: Waste treatment
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SIMON-HARTLEY has gained orders worth over Pounds 2.5m for waste treatment
equipment. The contracts include: Pounds 1.5m for a number of stainless
steel sluice gates for Beckton Sewage Treatment Works, London; and Pounds
700,000 for the supply of electrical and mechanical equipment for a sewage
pumping station in Hong Kong.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1290</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Construction Contracts: Railway projects won by Mowlem
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MOWLEM MANAGEMENT has won two railway projects. The largest is a Pounds 10m
design, manage and construct contract for repairs, refurbishment and
upgrading of depots, sheds and sidings at 29 sites throughout the London
Underground network.
The work comprises the provision of staff facilities, offices, canteens,
storage and toilets. The buildings are between 15 and 100 years old; some
will be refurbished while others will be demolished and replaced by new
buildings.
All the train sheds will be refurbished and other work includes the
upgrading of safety, maintenance and cleaning equipment.
The second, at Upminster in Essex, is a Pounds 2.4m contract for a British
Rail signalling facility which will centralise and upgrade signalling on the
London, Tilbury and Southend railway. The two-storey 1,250 sq metre building
will be built on piled foundations, have a steel frame with metal cladding
and a roof of pressed metal sheeting.
After Mowlem has completed building works signalling equipment will be
supplied and fitted by GEC under a separate contract. Work is due for
completion by October 1993.
In Gibraltar Mowlem Management has been awarded a Pounds 3.5m contract for
the Europa Business Centre. This EC-funded scheme involves the alteration
and refurbishment of a former Ministry of Defence dockside warehouse to
create a small business centre comprising industrial units, office suites
and a training centre.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1291</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Construction Contracts: German power station generator order
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GEC ALSTHOM's Man Energie GmbH subsidiary has been awarded a Pounds 31m
order by RWE Energie AG to design and supply a 155MW steam turbine generator
for the KoBra combined cycle demonstration plant which is to be built at the
Goldenberg power station south of Cologne.
Man Energie already has overall engineering responsibility for the plant.
EVT, another GEC-Alsthom German subsidiary, has been selected to design and
supply components for KoBra's integrated lignite gasificafion plant.
The KoBra demonstration plant will be the first plant in Germany to produce
electricity using both coal gasification and combined cycle technology. It
is hoped that the project will lead to further orders for fullscale
commercial plants which would herald a new generation of clean,
high-efficiency power stations in Germany.
Compared with conventional power stations, the KoBra prototype is expected
to attain 30 per cent higher efficiency when it starts commercial operation
in 1996.
It will also reduce emissions of sulphur and nitrous oxides to well under
statutory levels whilst the improvement in efficiency will lower carbon
dioxide emissions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1292</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Construction Contracts: Aberdeen harbour scheme
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The development of a new multi-berth facility at Aberdeen harbour has taken
a significant step forward with the placing of the main construction
contract.
Valued at almost Pounds 8.5m, the contract has been placed by Aberdeen
Harbour Board with BIRSE CONSTRUCTION.
Work on the contract will begin early in 1993 for completion towards the end
of the year and will employ up to 100 workers at its peak.
The project includes dredging and removing 250,000 cu metres of material,
pouring more than 100,000 cu metres of concrete and the installation of
6,500 tonnes of steel piles.
The Pounds 11m redevelopment of the former shipyard site will create more
than 500 metres of quay and five deep-water berths, increasing Aberdeen's
capacity to handle shipping by 10 per cent.
A new transit shed will also be built as part of the contract.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1293</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Construction Contracts: Airport terminal
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Eglinton Airport near Londonderry is being given almost Pounds 5m by the
European Regional Development Fund to help build a new terminal building and
road access.
Derry City Council expects 120 new jobs to be created by the end of the
decade.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1294</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Construction Contracts: Supplying drilling module
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A contract worth abut NKr400m (Pounds 38.1m) for fabricating the drilling
module for the Heidrun production platform has been awarded to KVAERNER
ROSENBERG.
Placed by Conoco Norway Inc, the development operator for the Heidrun field
off central Norway, the contract will be executed by the Kvaerner Egersund
yard in Egersund south of Stavanger.
An average of 300 people will be employed on the module over an 18-month
period, with the workforce expected to peak at around 600 next summer. Work
will begin immediately and last until July 1994.
The Heidrun contract gives Kvaerner Egersund a good base workload up to
spring 1994, and raises the yard's order backlog to about NKr800m (Pounds
76.2m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1295</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: Barclays and NatWest
downgraded
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE senior debt ratings of Barclays Bank and National Westminster Bank, the
UK's two biggest banks, have been downgraded for the second time this year
by Moody's Investors Service, the US rating agency.
The move reflects the damage done by the UK recession to each bank's loan
book and profitability, as well as the long-term impact of greater
competition in banking.
Moody's new AA2 ratings, two notches below the top AAA ranking the banks
held until earlier this year, bring the banks into line with the AA accorded
them by rival agency Standard &amp; Poor's.
Moody's pointed to Barclays' 'extended profit and asset quality weakness,
and pressure on equity capital formation'. The protracted recession in the
UK has pushed the bank's problem loans 'to historically high levels'.
NatWest faces similar problems. 'Profitability and capital retention should
remain depressed until 1994.'
The ratings affect about Dollars 10bn of debt.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1296</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: Tokyo proposes new stock
futures index
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S Ministry of Finance is planning a new stock futures index in an
attempt to end local criticism of the negative effects of futures and
options trading, in which foreign brokers are particular active.
The move is the latest twist in a long-standing row over the weakness of the
Tokyo stock market caused by derivatives trading, which is blamed by the
Tokyo stock exchange and some Japanese brokers for undermining investor
confidence in stocks.
The ministry is proposing a capitalisation weighted index, which takes into
account the number of shares outstanding, to replace the Nikkei 225 futures
index, which is a simple price average of 225 stocks. The proposal goes some
way to addressing concerns about the Nikkei 225, which is seen as easily
manipulated. The ministry is also considering rule changes and introduction
of a circuit-breaker system.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1297</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Government Bonds: Beregovoy fails to stem weakness in French
issues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB and PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FRENCH government bonds fell yesterday as speculation over the French
currency persisted in spite of firm statements by the French prime minister
and finance minister that the franc would remain within the European
exchange rate mechanism and would not be devalued.
Mr Pierre Beregovoy, the prime minister, and Mr Michel Sapin, the finance
minister, held press conferences yesterday at which they stressed their
commitment to defending the franc/D-Mark parity. They said that the economic
fundamentals did not justify a lower exchange rate for the franc.
However, short-term money market rates continued to rise, and three-month
money was quoted at 11 1/4 per cent to 12 per cent against 11 per cent to 11
1/2 per cent on Wednesday. The franc held steady at 3.4178 to 3.4182 to the
D-Mark.
The March bond future settled at 110.70, down 0.40, while in the cash market
the yield on the 8 1/2 per cent bond due 2003 ended at 8.35 per cent,
compared with 8.28 per cent at the opening. Sentiment was not helped by the
auction of two- and five-year notes.
THE CONTINUED tensions within the ERM helped to lift German government bond
prices, although dealers noted that trading volume was thin.
The market paid little heed to the Bundesbank's monthly report yesterday in
which the central bank said that Germany's economic outlook had worsened
significantly but that monetary policies would remain tight because of
concern about inflation.
The Bundesbank also announced that the bond consortium of banks would meet
on December 29 to decide the terms of the new federal bond issue. The March
bund futures contract on Liffe ended at around 91.63, up from 91.57 at
Wednesday's close.
US TREASURY prices were flat-to-lower across the maturity range yesterday
after investors had mostly ignored the latest economic news.
The benchmark 30-year government bond was up  3/32 at 102 3/8 , yielding
7.420 per cent. The two-year note was slightly weaker, down 1/32 at 99 15/16
, yielding 4.641 per cent.
Trading was listless, with no particular bias, although the early pressure
on prices was primarily downwards. News that initial claims for jobless
insurance rose 22,000 in the week ended December 5, that the October trade
gap narrowed to Dollars 7.03bn, and that the Philadelphia Federal Reserve's
index of local business activity doubled in November failed to have much of
an impact on market sentiment.
Some dealers attributed the lacklustre nature of trading to an unwillingness
of investors to play the market ahead of next weeks' auctions of new two-
and five-year notes.
UK GOVERNMENT bonds ended firmer, gaining about  1/8 of a point at the long
end following the release of worse-than-expected unemployment figures. The
gilt market opened on a weak note, but news that unemployment rose by 41,100
in November lifted prices. The unemployment figures were higher than
expected, and raised hopes that there might be a cut in interest rates soon.
However, dealers pointed out that any rise in the market is likely to be
limited by the overhang of new stock.
The Liffe gilt future contract rose from 99.24 to 99.31.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1298</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: Japanese banks upset by
slowing of deregulation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPANESE commercial banks expressed dismay yesterday at the slowing of
financial deregulation, which has become a victim of the Tokyo stock market
collapse.
A package of long-awaited reforms announced yesterday by the Ministry of
Finance will keep banks out of stock trading for the indefinite future and
ensure that their role in bond markets is limited.
Japanese brokers had argued that the collapse of stock prices damaged the
industry's health, and that most houses were not fit to compete with banks
in the securities markets or to take advantage of opportunities in the
banking sector.
Under the deregulation plan announced yesterday, the country's 10 trust and
long-term credit banks will be able to establish securities subsidiaries
from next April to issue but not market convertible and warrant bonds, and
to deal in straight bonds.
The leading 11 commercial banks will have to wait at least another year for
the same, limited privileges, to be reviewed in two to three years by the
ministry, which suggested that further reforms would then be announced.
Officials at long-term credit banks, the Industrial Bank of Japan, the
Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan and Nippon Credit Bank, were frustrated by a
restriction on the new subsidiaries' dealings with companies for which they
are the main bank.
While Japanese banks have been made wary of the stock market by the collapse
of prices and trading volume over the past three years, they were hoping
that the many months of negotiation with finance ministry officials would
have brought more gains than were revealed yesterday.
The securities houses will be allowed to establish trust banking
subsidiaries with greater freedom to deal in investment trusts and currency
instruments, but they were denied access to special large-lot securities
trusts and special loan trusts in which public funds are often invested.
Several Japanese securities houses have indicated that they may not bother
to apply for trust banking licences. They are awaiting information from the
ministry on the costs of entry to the business and a timetable for the
further easing of restrictions.
In an attempt to establish a 'fire wall' between the banks and their new
subsidiaries, the ministry indicated that board members of the subsidiaries
will not be allowed to return to the parent company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1299</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Arthur Andersen paves way for
Japanese merger
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ARTHUR ANDERSEN, the worldwide accountancy firm, announced in Tokyo
yesterday an affiliation agreement with Asahi Shinwa, Japan's second-largest
auditors, in a move that paves the way for a full merger of the two firms
next year.
Asahi will immediately begin to share fees and receive referrals of work
from Andersen's international network and from its Japanese audit firm,
Inoue Saito Eiwa.
Mr Richard Measelle, managing partner of Andersen, said he hoped the
agreement would led to a merger of the two firms as early as the middle of
1993. The new firm would be called Asahi Shinwa.
Asahi had until now been affiliated with Ernst &amp; Young. Direct links with
this firm, including several joint ventures, will be terminated.
The merger is unusual because Andersen is the only truly global accountancy
network and has tended to grow organically rather than through acquisitions.
In 1985 it merged with SGV, a large Asian accountancy practice based in the
Philippines.
Mr Measelle said agreement on the final terms of a merger was still under
discussion, and was subject to approval from Japanese regulators. He said it
would not amount to the firm buying out Asahi.
Andersen's total fee income in Japan for the 12 months to August 31 last
year was Dollars 115m. That includes income from Andersen Consulting and its
separate tax firm, which will be included in the merger.
Asahi's 1991 audit income was Y15.2bn (Dollars 122m), according to the
International Accounting Databook. It employs about 1,700 staff and audits
about 50 of the leading Japanese 1000 companies including NTT, Sumitomo
Bank, Daiwa Securities and Mazda Motor.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1300</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Phillimore goes in Minorco
shake-up
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ROGER Phillimore, a joint managing director of Minorco, the Luxembourg
quoted overseas investment arm of the Anglo American Corporation of South
Africa, is to leave the company, having lost a contest for the chief
executive's role.
Minorco effectively has had three managing directors. Mr Phillimore, 42, and
Mr Tony Lea, 42, were joint managing directors, and Mr Hank Slack, 41, was
president. The company has opted for a simplified management structure, with
Mr Slack as chief executive. He will operate with a management committee and
be based in London.
Mr Lea remains on the Minorco board and will be taking a senior position -
so far unspecified - with Anglo in Johannesburg next year.
Analysts noted that Mr Julian Ogilvie Thompson remains chairman of Anglo,
its sister company, De Beers, and Minorco, in spite of some recent criticism
from the investment community.
Mr Lea, Mr Phillimore and Mr Slack took over at Minorco in 1988 with a plan
to change it into a 'hands on' operating group. They launched a Pounds 2.9bn
(Dollars 4.4bn) bid for Consolidated Gold Fields of the UK and, since this
failed, have been using the Pounds 1.5bn raised from selling Gold Fields'
shares for less adventurous acquisitions.
Minorco is also renewing links with SG Warburg, broken at the time of the
1988 Gold Fields bid because Warburg faced a conflict of interest. Mr Peter
Wilmot-Sitwell, chairman of S G Warburg Securities, is joining the Minorco
board as a non-executive director. Mr Peter Burnell, formerly managing
director of Anglo's South American operations, is also joining the Minorco
board.
See Observer
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1301</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Westpac facing new uncertainty
as MD is fired
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTPAC Banking Corp-oration, the troubled Australian bank, was yesterday
facing further uncertainty after the board fired Mr Frank Conroy, managing
director, after only 14 months in the job.
Mr John Uhrig, who took over as chairman following an earlier board
reshuffle in October, said a new managing director would be appointed from
outside the bank within a month.
Mr Uhrig said that Mr Conroy had resigned following agreement among
directors that the bank's restructuring programme needed to be controlled by
'someone who comes fresh to the task'.
This contrasts starkly with the strong support for Mr Conroy expressed by Mr
Uhrig and the rest of the board when the bank's restructuring plan was
announced last month.
Yesterday's board meeting was the first attended by Mr Kerry Packer, the
publishing entrepreneur, who acquired a 10 per cent stake in Westpac in
November through Consolidated Press Holdings (ConsPress), his private
company.
Analysts said it was clear that Mr Conroy had refused to bow to pressure
from Mr Packer and Mr Al Dunlap, ConsPress managing director, for bigger
cuts in staffing and assets.
Similar suggestions have been made by the AMP Society, Australia's biggest
financial institution, which owns 15 per cent of Westpac and also has two
seats on the board.
Westpac, once Australia's biggest bank, has faced growing problems over the
last two years as a result of bad debts which culminated in a loss of
ADollars 1.56bn (USDollars 1.07bn) for the year to the end of September.
The bank was humiliated by the failure of a ADollars 1.2bn rights issue in
October, which closed 72 per cent under-subscribed, leaving nearly 300m
unwanted shares in the hands of sub-underwriters.
Five directors resigned shortly after the rights issue debacle, including
Sir Eric Neal, chairman.
Mr Conroy's frank approach to the bank's problems appeared to have won the
support of the markets, reflected in an improvement in the share price from
a low of ADollars 2.39 in November to ADollars 3.03 on Wednesday.
However, the shares rose 1 cent to ADollars 3.04 after the announcement of
Mr Conroy's resignation, suggesting that investors share Mr Packer's view
that restructuring could be accelerated.
The programme announced by Mr Conroy included cutting costs and increasing
revenue by ADollars 300m this year; cutting the expenses-to-income ratio
from 70 per cent to 58 per cent over three years; and reducing corporate
risk assets by ADollars 10bn by 1995.
Westpac has confirmed that the cost-cutting programme could include a
reduction of up to 60 per cent in head office staff.
The bank is also reviewing its regional operations in the south Pacific and
North America.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1302</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Qantas adds piece to BA's global
jigsaw - Paul Betts and Kevin Brown assess the UK airline's deal with the
Australian carrier
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS and KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SIGNIFICANT piece of the British Airways global jigsaw fell into place
yesterday.
The Australian government's acceptance of BA's Pounds 291m (Dollars 442.32m)
bid for a 25 per cent stake in Qantas, the Australian national carrier due
to be privatised next year, has fulfilled the UK airline's ambitions to
forge a strategic partnership in the fast-growing Asia-Pacific market.
Both Lord King, BA's chairman, and Sir Colin Marshall, BA's chief executive,
have long stated their intent to negotiate a series of partnerships to
enable BA to become a truly global airline.
The strategy has involved a series of simultaneous moves this year in three
different markets.
In Europe, BA has expanded its base in anticipation of next year's European
single airline market by acquiring large minority stakes in the French
regional carrier TAT and the newly-established Deutsche BA venture in
Germany.
Its takeover of the ailing UK independent carrier, Dan-Air, has further
strengthened its presence in the UK and Europe. And it now expects to launch
next year, or possibly in 1994, a new Moscow-based joint venture airline
called Air Russia which will initially operate services from Moscow to
European cities using western-built jets.
In the US, BA is fighting to win US government approval for its proposed
Dollars 750m acquisition of a 44 per cent stake in USAir, the sixth-largest
US carrier. This is perhaps the most important deal in BA's expansion
strategy, since it would consolidate BA's strong position on the busy North
Atlantic market and give it broader access to the domestic US market - the
world's single biggest airline market.
The USAir deal is entering a vital phase. Mr John Major, the UK prime
minister, will tomorrow put pressure on President George Bush during talks
at Camp David to approve the BA investment before the deadline for the
proposed transaction expires on December 24.
The US government has come under pressure from other big US airlines to
oppose the deal if it fails to secure greater access for US carriers into
the UK, and especially London's Heathrow airport.
The UK has tabled a three-stage proposal to liberalise the UK-US air
transport market, but has insisted the US first approve the BA-USAir
transaction. This has so far been rejected by the US and unless a
breakthrough is secured over the weekend, BA's partnership ambitions in the
US could be frustrated.
But the Australian government will have provided some consolation. By
winning the Qantas bid against tough competition from Singapore Airlines, BA
has strengthened its position in the Asia-Pacific region.
The UK airline has produced a 32-page document detailing the benefits of its
association with Qantas. Among the key advantages are: access on the Pacific
market to the west coast of the US; greater access into fast-expanding
south-east Asian destinations such as Hong Kong, Bangkok, Singapore and
Jakarta; and a significant opportunity to tap the domestic Australian
market, since Qantas has now absorbed Australian Airlines, the
government-owned domestic carrier.
Although Qantas will remain independent, there is likely to be close
integration of the two airlines' schedules, especially on the competitive
London-Bangkok/Singapore-Sydney route.
The two carriers also have a common culture, with solid reputations for
aircraft maintenance and passenger service, although Qantas has been
burdened by financial problems over recent years. The two airlines also
operate similar fleets, using the Boeing 747-400 as the backbone of their
long-haul services.
But BA had to fight to the very end to clinch the Qantas deal. It had to
increase its offer at the last minute yesterday to fend off Singapore
Airlines, which had been led to believe it was the favoured candidate.
BA is thought to have added about ADollars 50m to its initial offer of about
ADollars 600m, but still paid less for its 25 per cent stake than many
analysts had expected. Mr Ralph Willis, the Australian finance minister who
handled the sale, insisted that BA had paid a premium for its strategic
stake, suggesting that the airline's value is somewhere between ADollars 2bn
and ADollars 2.6bn (USDollars 1.79bn).
However, a final judgment on the winners and losers from the deal will have
to await the Qantas flotation next year, which the government hopes will
raise between ADollars 1.5bn and ADollars 2bn. If the sale goes well, BA
will be seen to have bought a bargain, and the government will exceed its
targeted return of ADollars 1bn after recapitalisation costs of ADollars
1.35bn. If the return is at the lower end of the range, BA's stake will look
more expensive.
One clear winner from the deal appears to be Mr Bill Dix, Qantas chairman,
who argued strongly for a bigger infusion of fresh capital than the ADollars
1bn suggested by the government. The ADollars 1.35bn provided by the deal is
less than Mr Dix had sought, but sufficient to reduce the airline's ratio of
debt to shareholders' funds from 75:25 to nearly 50:50.
Mr Dix may turn out to be a loser in a more personal sense, however, since
the agreement to form a new board means he is not guaranteed a place. Qantas
returned to the black last year with a pre-tax profit of ADollars 148m, and
is believed to be operating profitably in the current year, in spite of the
effects of continuing slow economic growth. The airline will receive a
substantial cash flow boost from its merger with Australian, although it has
only recently begun to integrate international and domestic services.
Qantas has shed several thousand staff over the last two years in
preparation for privatisation, and analysts say it has significantly
improved efficiency. It also owns one of the world's newest airline fleets
and boasts an excellent safety record.
However, the Australian airline industry has been in turmoil since a
nationwide pilots' strike in 1989-90 was followed almost immediately by
deregulation of domestic aviation.
This triggered a price war which caused the collapse of one independent
airline and heavy losses at Ansett Australia, the domestic market leader,
which is owned by TNT and News Corporation. Qantas/Australian Airlines has
suffered less, but has been exposed to tough competition and tight margins
on domestic routes.
Competition is expected to intensify over the next two years as moves
towards a common aviation market with New Zealand are completed. But through
its partnership with BA, Qantas expects to increase significantly its
international market reach, especially in Europe and North America.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1303</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: P&amp;G disposals to bring in
additional Dollars 600m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PROCTER &amp; Gamble, the US consumer products giant, yesterday said it expected
to complete the sale of its commercial pulp businesses early next year,
bringing the total price for its pulp plants and timberlands to Dollars
1.2bn.
The company had previously announced the sale of pulp mills, saw mills and
175,000 acres of Georgia timberland to Weyerhaeuser for Dollars 600m.
The additional Dollars 600m comes from the sale of its Memphis, Tennessee,
cotton linters plant to an investor group led by Mr Robert Cannon, former
head of P&amp;G's pulp operations, and the sale of 665,000 acres of timberland
in north Florida.
It also includes the formation of a limited partnership with the Cannon
group to operate a pulp plant in Florida.
The company said the sale would have no immediate material effect on
earnings.
The gain from the sale will be offset by the reduction in pulp sales to
outsiders.
About half its pulp output is sold to P&amp;G itself.
In March, P&amp;G said it was selling its large interests in the pulp business
to concentrate on its core consumer businesses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1304</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Amax issue raises Dollars 340m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURIE MORSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMAX, the US metals and mining company, has sold 7m shares of series A
convertible preferred stock in a private offering, raising about Dollars
340m.
Proceeds will be used to reduce debt. The company has Dollars 2.2bn in
long-term debt and other obligations.
After 60 days, the preferred stock will be convertible into Amax common
stock at a rate of 2.5197 shares of common for each share of preferred.
The shares have an annual dividend rate of Dollars 4.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1305</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: American Express may sell
control of Shearson Lehman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICAN EXPRESS, the financial services and travel group searching for a
successor to Mr James Robinson, chairman and chief executive, is considering
the sale of majority control of its wholly-owned Shearson Lehman Brothers
stockbroking and investment banking unit.
The group declined to comment yesterday, but executives are said to have
prepared a plan under which shares in Shearson could be offered to the
public.
A company insider, who asked not to be named, warned yesterday the plan was
not the only option for Shearson, which has proved an expensive albatross
for the American Express group.
The share plan is likely to be discussed by the board of American Express in
January. If it is approved, it could result in a one-time write-off charge
by American Express of between Dollars 1bn and Dollars 2bn.
Although Shearson made Dollars 43m of net profits in the first nine months
of 1992, it suffered a Dollars 25m third-quarter loss compared with Dollars
63m net income in the third quarter of last year.
The only comment American Express would offer yesterday was to say its
strategic goal was to bring Shearson back to where it could achieve a
single-A credit rating as a stand-alone company. The present rating of its
senior long-term debt is single-A3.
The board is also wrestling with the question of a replacement for Mr
Robinson, who earlier this month said he would give up his job as chief
executive during 1993.
The American Express board is believed to be divided over the choice of Mr
Robinson's successor with some directors in favour of Mr Harvey Golub, the
group's president, and others opposed. Mr Golub is believed to be the
personal choice of Mr Robinson, who is heading the search committee.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1306</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: US Pru to take over O&amp;Y's Aetna
Centre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRUDENTIAL of America is due to file a motion in an Ontario court today to
take over Toronto's Aetna Centre from Olympia &amp; York Developments.
Prudential holds a CDollars 185m (USDollars 144.5m) first mortgage on the
building.
Lawyers for Prudential said an agreement was struck between both companies.
The insurance company wants to take back the building immediately and try to
replace a tenant moving out next spring.
O&amp;Y on Wednesday filed with the court its revised restructuring plan, which
allows senior creditors to seize their collateral. Creditors vote on the
plan during the week of January 11.
The Ontario Securities Commission halted trading in CDollars 325m of bonds
secured on First Canadian Place, O&amp;Y's biggest Canadian property.
O&amp;Y failed to meet a deadline for filing First Canadian's financial
statements. The company said it would do so within the next few days. The
delay was due to the effort required to put together the detailed
restructuring plan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1307</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Short Bros in link with French
aero group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHORT BROTHERS, the Belfast aerospace company owned by Bombardier of Canada,
yesterday forged a strategic alliance with Hurel-Dubois of France to
develop, produce and market engine nacelles to aircraft and aero-engine
manufacturers.
The companies have formed a jointly-owned company called International
Nacelle Systems (INS), which will be based in Paris.
The alliance, which the two companies say will strengthen significantly
their position in the nacelle market, reflects the increasing trend of
international collaboration and concentration in the aerospace industry.
This trend is expected to intensify as the industry continues to restructure
itself in the face of the post cold war decline in the defence sector and
the recession in the civil aircraft sector.
Shorts has already collaborated closely with Hurel-Dubois, a manufacturer of
lightweight airframe structures as well as nacelles and engine thrust
reversers controlled by the French Compagnie de Navigation Mixte
conglomerate.
The two companies were selected last month by BMW Rolls-Royce, the
aero-engine joint venture between the German carmaker and the UK aero-engine
group, to provide nacelles for their new BR700 aero engine family.
The two companies are also in the process of establishing an aero engine
podding facility at Toulouse, in south-west France, where the European
Airbus consortium is based. This facility will fit nacelles to engines and
supply airframe makers, especially Airbus, with complete powerplants.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1308</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Reebok writes off Dollars 135m
for restructuring
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
REEBOK International, the US sports shoe maker, unveiled a substantial
fourth-quarter restructuring charge and said it would put its Boston Whaler
and Ellesse USA subsidiaries up for sale. Reebok is also writing-off the
carrying value of its Avia unit.
The company said it would take after-tax charges of about Dollars 135m, or
Dollars 1.45 a share, against fourth-quarter earnings. This will more than
offset one-time gains of Dollars 29.6m recorded in October on the sale of
Reebok's CML Group.
Reebok earned Dollars 74.4m, or 80 cents, in the 1992 third quarter and
Dollars 49.7m, or 53 cents, in the 1991 fourth quarter.
Reebok said the restructuring charges were mainly non-cash in nature and
operating income should stay on target.
Mr Paul Fireman, chairman and chief executive, said Reebok had also
considered divesting Avia but decided that its strategic value and improving
prospects were sufficiently strong to retain the business.
Reebok also plans to move its international headquarters in the UK to London
from Bolton.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1309</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Daf seeks additional financial
aid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAF, the financially-troubled Dutch truckmaker, has secured additional loans
of Fl 190m (Dollars 108m) and has begun negotiations to obtain yet further
financial aid.
The company also said that the weakening west European truck market had
forced it to reduce its profit forecast.
At the time of the interim results, Daf forecast a net loss of Fl 100m. The
group yesterday said that the loss would be greater, but gave no details.
It also warned that it may be necessary to make provisions in this year's
accounts if the restructuring proposals are put into effect in the new year.
Daf is in renewed talks with the Dutch and Belgian governments and its banks
which could lead to any of the parties taking or expanding equity stakes in
the group.
While no details have been given, these proposals are intended to lead to
further significant cost-cutting and involve further substantial job losses.
While Daf would not comment yesterday on the precise amount of the extra
funds it is seeking, its main trade union, Industriebond FNV, claimed that
the loans could only guarantee Daf's survival until February.
Some industry analysts suggest that Daf is seeking up to Fl 500m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1310</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Pepsi wins battle with Perrier
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PEPSICO, the US soft drinks group, has won its long-running battle to
reclaim control of the marketing and distribution of its brand in France
from Perrier, the French mineral water company recently taken over by Nestle
of Switzerland.
The battle between Pepsi and Perrier began three years ago when Pepsi sought
to rescind the contract struck in 1962 which gave the mineral water company
full control over the production, bottling and sales of Pepsi-Cola in the
French market.
Perrier started a legal fight to try to prevent Pepsi from ending the
contract. However, Pepsi claimed it needed to regain control of its brand in
France because Perrier was not managing it properly. Pepsi said its volume
share of the French market had fallen from 17 per cent to 7 per cent over
the past 10 years.
The companies yesterday announced an agreement whereby Pepsi will regain the
rights over marketing and distribution, but Perrier will continue to produce
and bottle Pepsi-Cola in France.
Pepsi recently struck similar deals in Spain and Germany although it
stressed that it would not pursue the same strategy in every country and
that marketing and distribution would continue to be organised according to
the different requirements of individual markets.
Meanwhile, Nestle has closed the final chapter in the Perrier takeover by
taking full control of Demilac, the investment vehicle through which it
orchestrated the bid last spring. This involved Nestle buying the 50 per
cent of Demilac owned by Indosuez, the French bank that partnered it in the
bid, for an undisclosed sum.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1311</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Spain secures deal from KIO
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE SPANISH government says it has persuaded the Kuwait Investment Office to
prevent any further corporate collapses in its troubled Spanish empire and
to reverse its nomination of the accountants KPMG Peat Marwick as 'special
representatives' to replace Kuwaiti management at the KIO's Spanish holding
company, Grupo Torras.
Mr Claudio Aranzadi, industry minister, also told parliament the KIO had
promised to inject Dollars 45m into the failed Torras chemicals group,
Ercros.
Madrid had been trying to block the KIO's decision to withdraw from its
direct investments in Spain.
It failed when, on December 5, Torras called in receivers. Kuwaiti managers,
who had been running the group for six months, left Madrid and appointed
KPMG to replace them while court-appointed receivers wound up the company.
A few days after the Torras filing, its large property group, Prima, also
applied for receivership, prompting fears that Spain's biggest paper
producer, Torraspapel - which is 90 per cent owned by Torras - would also
collapse.
Mr Aranzadi said he had been assured by the KIO that Torraspapel would not
go into receivership. It has debts of around Dollars 1bn.
He said the KIO had also promised to replace the KPMG partners running
Torras with a new board comprising two Spaniards and two Kuwaitis.
The receivers may decide not to place it into bankruptcy, as more than 70
per cent of Torras' debt is to the KIO itself. KPMG urged the KIO to convert
this debt into equity a year ago and receivers may take the same view.
It is also not clear, and KIO and Torras representatives and advisers were
not available to comment yesterday, whether the Dollars 40m promised is new
money or part of an earlier offer to pump Dollars 80m into Ercros to help
pay salaries.
Three months ago, the KIO promised to inject Dollars 1.4bn into its troubled
Spanish companies but later decided to withdraw. A recent article in the FT
on the KIO's investments in Spain referred to the Bank of Kuwait and the
Middle East as 'troubled'. This bank, like most Kuwaiti banks, has had
difficulties recovering from the Iraqi invasion.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1312</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: SKF sees SKr1.8bn loss as
European markets worsen
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SKF, the world's leading roller bearing manufacturer, yesterday said it
would make a SKr1.8bn (Dollars 264m) loss in 1992 as it announced an
intensification of its job reduction programme in the face of worsening
conditions in key European markets.
The Swedish group said the major part of the loss would arise from a
SKr1.1bn provision connected to a plan to cut 4,000 jobs next year and a
further 1,000 in 1994.
The cutbacks represent an increase of 2,000 on figures announced in October,
and will bring staff levels (excluding the planned disposal of CTT Tools)
down to 42,000 by 1995.
Market conditions for SKF's products have deteriorated sharply in the past
few months as the group was expecting a profit for the full year as recently
as August.
It noted yesterday that its new rationalisation programme had been prompted
by a continuing fall in European demand in the final quarter, with many
customers announcing production cutbacks during December and January.
'European demand for the group's core product, roller bearings, will decline
even further in 1993,' it stated.
Europe accounts for 60 per cent of SKF's sales so the prospect of an upturn
in the US, where it sells 20 per cent of its output, is insufficient to
compensate.
SKF, which announced a SKr361m loss for the first nine months, said it was
continuing efforts to reduce its inventories, which have fallen by SKr2bn
since 1990.
It said this, together with reduced investment, would enhance cash-flow and
reduce net borrowing.
The group's financial figures for 1992 have been exacerbated by a SKr150m
currency loss on an ECU convertible loan, and by SKr100m in other charges
relating to the sale of CTT Tools and restructuring of Ovako Steel.
Ovako, the special steels operation which SKF bought last year, has been a
drain on its resources, posting a SKr407m loss over the first nine months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1313</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Lehel goes ahead as demand rises
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LEHEL, the Hungarian refrigerator producer owned by Electrolux of Sweden,
yesterday forecast that 1992 profits would strengthen 16.6 per cent to
Ft950m (Dollars 11.5m) before tax on sales little changed at Ft12.1bn.
The performance of Lehel, bought outright for about Dollars 60m in 1991 by
Electrolux, Europe's largest producer of household appliances, contrasts
with the generally frustrating experience of western multinationals with
east European acquisitions.
The performance comes mainly as a result of a dramatic improvement in
productivity and an upturn in local demand.
Lehel said productivity, as measured by volume per manhour, rose 72 per cent
between April 1991, the first month after Electrolux agreed to buy the
factory, and September 1992.
'The potential for productivity improvement was amazing,' said Mr Heikki
Takanen, Electrolux vice-president in charge of the group's refrigerator
business. 'We found hidden potential.'
Lehel has increased efficiency by rapidly implementing profit centres;
divesting peripheral activities; reducing the workforce by 32 per cent over
18 months to just over 3,200; and making more careful use of materials.
Electrolux executives describe their successful approach to restructuring as
at once 'aggressive' in implementing changes rapidly and 'pragmatic' in
allowing joint working groups of foreigners and Hungarians to come up with
the solutions.
Electrolux also believes that its experience in making acquisitions and
international character helped it to absorb the alien business culture it
found at Lehel.
At the same time as boosting production volume, the company has cut costs,
overcoming weak prices and demand in western Europe, Lehel's most important
market, and the Hungarian forint's continued appreciation in real terms.
Sales have also benefited from a rebound in domestic Hungarian demand for
refrigerators since May as the economy shows signs of having bottomed out.
Electrolux does not, however, subscribe to the common view among
multinationals that investment in one east European country can provide a
springboard for the rest of the region, believing the strategy to lack
substance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1314</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: German TV stake for CNN
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AP-DJ
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BERLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CNN, the international television news network, has acquired a 27.5 per cent
stake in N-TV, which operates Germany's only all-news television station,
AP-DJ reports from Berlin.
Mr Karl Ulrich Kuhlo, the founder of N-TV, said the deal resulted from
'short and intensive' talks, and expressed satisfaction that CNN 'will be a
component of our future planning'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1315</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Ciments Francais told to make
bid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CIMENTS Francais, the troubled French cement group, is being forced by the
French stock market authorities to mount a bid for Guintoli, the
construction company embroiled in the recent scandal over Ciments Francais'
off-balance sheet dealings.
The Conseil des Bourses de Valeurs, the body that regulates the Paris stock
market, yesterday announced that it had instructed Ciments Francais to make
the bid after considering a report by the Commission des Operations des
Bourse, the market watchdog, into the cement company's investment in
Guintoli.
The critical issue in the Guintoli affair was whether the Ciments Francais
stake in the company was raised above the 33.3 per cent level at which,
under French law, any investor must mount a full bid.
The official reports have concluded that Ciments Francais did acquire more
than a third of Guintoli's equity and therefore must make an offer.
Ciments Francais has been clouded by controversy since October when the
scandal over its off-balance sheet dealings first surfaced. Mr Pierre Conso,
who chaired the company at the time of the transactions, has resigned.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1316</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Kolbenschmidt hit by
restructuring
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KOLBENSCHMIDT, the vehicle components maker, plans to shift parts of its
manufacturing capacity out of Germany and close unprofitable divisions in an
attempt to stay competi-tive.
The company, which yesterday announced losses of DM89m (Dollars 57.23m) for
1992 after barely breaking even in the previous year, said the deficit
stemmed mainly from restructuring measures, including the loss of 500 jobs.
It expected performance in the new financial year to be affected by the
increasing signs of falling sales and production in the automotive industry.
The attractions of Germany as a manufacturing site were endangered by high
wages, short working hours and heavy taxation.
The group had also to adapt to changing demands from vehicle makers intent
on reducing the number of suppliers and components.
This meant companies such as Kolbenschmidt would have to supply
fully-assembled modules and systems rather than individual parts.
The company, part of the Metallgesellschaft group, makes engine blocks,
pistons, steering wheels, airbags and bearings.
Group sales rose marginally to DM1.5bn, although turnover in all divisions
except airbags and steering wheels fell.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1317</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Electra lifts pay-out in 'difficult year'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ELECTRA Investment Trust, the largest trust in the venture capital sector,
announced a 6.3 per cent increase in its final dividend, despite suffering a
fall in its net assets over the year to September 30.
Mr Michael Stoddart, chairman, said 'It has been a particularly difficult
year for organisations such as Electra whose investment strategy has been to
invest in small and medium-sized listed and unlisted companies. These in the
main have borne the brunt of the worst recession since the 1930s.'
In recent years, recession has forced a number of trusts in the venture
capital sector, such as Drayton Consolidated and Ensign, to make substantial
write-downs on their unquoted holdings.
This has aroused considerable disquiet among investors about the way that
trust managers value their unquoted holdings - as a result, venture capital
trust shares stand at substantial discounts to their asset values.
Fully diluted net assets per share fell to 277.87p from 304.53p at
end-September 1991.
Mr Stoddart said 'there was an increase in the value of the North American
unlisted portfolio, which has been offset by a further deterioration of our
UK unlisted portfolio and a substantial reduction in the value of our
unlisted portfolio.' He would not give details of the size of these shifts,
but said they would be given in the trust's annual report and accounts.
During the year, Dollars 40m (Pounds 26.3m) of promissory notes were
converted into ordinary shares, substantially reducing gearing.
Earnings per share rose from 7.351p to 7.526p and the final dividend is
increased to 3.4p, making a total of 6.7p (6.4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1318</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Bromsgrove advances 25% but remains
cautious on outlook
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT, Midlands Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BROMSGROVE Industries, the Birmingham-based specialist engineering group,
increased pre-tax profits by 25 per cent on the back of recent acquisitions
but remained cautious about its immediate prospects.
The increase to Pounds 4m (Pounds 3.2m) for the six months to September 30
came on turnover ahead to Pounds 54.1m (Pounds 39.4m).
Earnings per share, on capital enlarged last March by a 1-for-4 rights
issue, were 4.07p against 5.41p. The interim dividend goes up 10 per cent to
1.65p; Mr Bijan Sedghi, chairman, said the group would 'look to an increase
in the final dividend.'
Although Mr Sedghi described Bromsgrove's medium to long-term performance as
'a sound prospect', he observed that the short term depended 'upon there
being no interruptions to customer schedules.' Bromsgrove is already
experiencing sharp fluctuations in the schedules of automotive customers
like Ford and GM.
Mr Sedghi would go no further in predicting the second half's outcome than
saying 'we aim to be cash generative, more profitable.'
The acquisition of Thornton, a precision forgings company, and of companies
to form an environmental engineering division at the end of the 1991-92
financial year contributed Pounds 1.6m to the first half outcome. Businesses
owned by the group at the end of last year's first half reported pre-tax
profits 15 per cent lower.
Of the group's other five divisions, automotive and industrial reported a
downturn in first half profits compared with 1991-92, while there were
increases from aerospace, marine and offshore and, especially, from plastics
where the Trisport subsidiary introduced with great success into the US a
new range of systems for golf footwear.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1319</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Bradstock falls 7% in tough trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A CONTRACTION in the London reinsurance market and the costs of expansion
depressed Bradstock Group in the year to September 30.
The insurance broker reported a 7 per cent fall in pre-tax profits from
Pounds 8m to Pounds 7.43m.
Although earnings per share fell to 8.5p (8.9p), the total dividend is
increased to 5.1p (4.75p) via a final of 3.65p.
Turnover rose 11 per cent to Pounds 24.4m (Pounds 21.9m), but expenses rose
by 16 per cent to Pounds 20.3m (Pounds 17.5m).
Turnover from broking of direct business was 25 per cent up at Pounds 12.8m,
but reinsurance broking revenue fell to Pounds 11.6m (Pounds 11.7m), despite
underlying growth in original currencies.
Investment income fell to Pounds 3.34m (Pounds 3.58m).
Mr Robin Gibson, chief executive, said that the departure of a number of
Lloyd's syndicates and companies from the London market had increased
competition among brokers. 'Every time a reinsurance underwriter goes,
someone loses a bit of his business.'
Growth in direct business had been fuelled by a strong performance by the
group's insolvency business. This specialised in finding insurance for
insolvent companies when they were taken over by liquidators.
However, costs arising from a new Southend office, devoted to this area, as
well as a recent head office move and new premises for a bloodstock broking
business had cut into profits.
Mr Gibson said that on an underlying basis expenses had grown at a rate of 9
per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1320</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Recovery continues at MS Intl
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
RECOVERY continued at MS International, the Doncaster-based engineer, in the
six months to October 31 with pre-tax profits of Pounds 250,000, against
Pounds 175,000.
Mr Michael Bell, chairman, said that the figures demonstrated that the
company was 'firmly established on the recovery path'.
Turnover was 8 per cent lower at Pounds 13.8m (Pounds 15m) reflecting the
depressed economy. Earnings per share were 0.6p (0.4p) and the interim
dividend is held at 1p.
The company said that the defence-related industries had made an encouraging
start to the year and there had been a marked improvement at MSI-Hughes.
Net borrowings over the period fell from Pounds 782,000 to Pounds 203,000 in
spite of making the penultimate payment of Pounds 500,000 to the purchaser
of the Laurence Scott companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1321</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Gold Greenlees falls to Pounds 2.17m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARY MEAD, Marketing Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Gold Greenlees Trott, the advertising group, yesterday reported pre-tax
profits for the six months ended October 31 of Pounds 2.17m, down from
Pounds 2.49m last time before exceptional credits of Pounds 482,000.
Earnings per share were down 30 per cent at 8.2p (11.63p), but the interim
dividend is maintained at 3.3p.
Operating profits were Pounds 2.96m, down 9.9 per cent. However, with
turnover up by 1.8 per cent to Pounds 105m and revenue increased by 1.3 per
cent to Pounds 21.88m, the group showed some resilience, although it
suffered from depressed trading levels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1322</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: TR Technology up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Total net assets of TR Technology, an investment trust, rose 8 per cent to
Pounds 200m over the half year to October. Net income was Pounds 1.48m
(Pounds 1.65m) and earnings per share 1.04p (1.64p)
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1323</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: First Technology rises sharply to Pounds
807,000
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FIRST TECHNOLOGY, the car safety business which makes crash test dummies,
continued to lift profits after the reorganisation of its balance sheet
earlier this year.
Mr Fred Westlake, chairman, said the group hoped to return to the dividend
list with a final payment for the current year.
For the six months to end-October pre-tax profits increased from Pounds
83,000 to Pounds 807,000 on sales down 29 per cent at Pounds 11.4m
The interest charge dropped from Pounds 425,000 to Pounds 181,000 as gearing
fell from 150 per cent to about 100 per cent. The group expects this to fall
to 85 per cent by the year-end, depending on the exchange rate of the
dollar.
Mr Westlake said there were signs that the fall in car sales in Europe had
flattened out while in the US, the big three car makers were reporting a
return of sales growth.
'Future trading prospects are bright and the improvement in profitability
should continue,' he said.
In both the sensors and dummies businesses, the group was winning new
business from existing customers, Mr Westlake said.
First Technology has recently won orders to supply to General Motors a new
accelerometer, a device that will help Cadillac's suspension system create a
smoother ride.
Fiat also said recently it would fit First Technology's fuel cut-off
switches to its new model, code-named the Tipo B, and Honda would be fitting
the device to the new Accord at its Swindon plant.
Earnings per share were 4.2p (0.3p losses).
COMMENT
Chastened after its unsuccessful trip down acquisition lane, First
Technology appears to be back on track in a much slimmed-down version. The
four-fold increase in the share price since the company nearly collapsed
might suggest the recovery story is over. But First Technology's particular
niche in sensors appears to be growing with big orders coming through from
Fiat, General Motors and Honda. And with more focused marketing, the dummies
business, which has been held back by recession, should make a greater
contribution. Shareholders have had a rough ride since the shares hit 500p
in 1990 and may yet have to participate in a strengthening of the balance
sheet. But they should now be sanguine that future growth will be sought
from new customers and new products rather than from acquisitions. Pre-tax
profits are likely to be Pounds 1.7m this year, giving 8.4p of earnings, and
a prospective multiple of 12 that is still undemanding.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1324</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Gestetner improves 21% to Pounds 27m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GESTETNER Holdings, the international office equipment distributor which has
recently been the subject of bid speculation, yesterday reported a 21 per
cent increase in full year pre-tax profits to Pounds 27.2m.
Turnover for the 12 months to October 31 was flat at Pounds 900.3m (Pounds
898.3m).
A maintained final dividend of 6.4p makes an unchanged 8.2p total. Basic
earnings increased to 22.2p (16.4p); fully diluted the figure was 12.1p
(11.6p).
Mr Basil Sellers, chairman, would not comment on the bid rumours which have
helped underpin a rise in Gestetner's share price in recent months.
Yesterday the stock closed up 2p at 152p.
Last year he persuaded Ricoh, the Japanese office equipment manufacturer, to
pay 250p per share for a 24.2 per cent stake in the group.
Commenting on the results Mr Sellers said that trading conditions in
Gestetner's European markets had continued to be difficult. However, sales
in its international and North American regions were 'pleasing.'
Second-half earnings were more than double those in the first half
'reflecting a continual improvement in the trading performance of the
group.'
The group's core office automation products business reported a marginal
increase in sales to Pounds 733.9m (Pounds 725m) and trading profits of
Pounds 41.3m (Pounds 34.1m). Gross margins continued to slip reflecting
reduced sales of older high margin products and the group's policy of
reducing product prices to maintain market share. However, cost cutting in
1991 resulted in significantly lower operating expenses.
Copiers now account for 62 per cent of office equipment sales although
digital duplicator sales are also rising.
The group's photographic products business suffered the effects of the
recession with sales, adjusted for currency translation effects, falling 6
per cent to Pounds 166.4m and trading profit dropping to Pounds 4.7m (Pounds
8.9m).
The camera business, which is being sold, had sales of Pounds 81.4m and
trading profits of Pounds 1.1m. Mr Sellers said the sale of this business,
announced in September, should be completed next month. The photographic
supplies business, which is being retained, had sales of Pounds 85m and
posted trading profits of Pounds 3.6m.
The effective devaluation of sterling in September had little impact on
shareholders' funds, which rose to Pounds 262m (Pounds 250.2m) although
gross assets and gross liabilities increased significantly. Net debt,
including Pounds 37.9m of convertible unsecured loan stock, increased from
Pounds 64.4m to Pounds 94.7m. The Pounds 30.3m increase mainly reflected a
translation adjustment of Pounds 29.4m on net foreign debt.
COMMENT
Gestetner's results were somewhat better than expected although there are
still a few black spots like Canada. Revenues from service contracts and
supplies have provided some protection from the recession, as has the
opening up of new markets in Latin America and Asia. With almost 95 per cent
of its sales outside the UK the group is especially vulnerable to currency
fluctuations. If rates stabilise around current levels the profit and loss
account should be a big beneficiary this year, even without an economic
upturn in Europe. Currency translation accounts for all of the 12 percentage
point increase in gearing to 36 per cent at year end. Results for this year
are difficult to predict, but Pounds 35m pre-tax and fully diluted earnings
of 15p are at the top end of expectations.
At those levels the stock is trading on low prospective p/e of 9.8, but if
no real bidder emerges the stock may not go much higher.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1325</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Restructuring lifts Devenish
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A RESTRUCTURING and expansion of its pub estate helped JA Devenish, the West
Country-based pub operator, overcome a disappointing holiday season in
Cornwall to increase its operating profits from pubs to Pounds 16.8m (Pounds
16.5m).
Devenish withdrew from wholesaling and brands at the time of the failed bid
from Boddington last year and used the Pounds 25m proceeds to buy an extra
45 pubs.
After leasing 115 pubs from Whitbread for eight years it increased its
estate from 376 to 532 houses. Earlier in the year it bought 28 Roast Inns
and Henry's Cafe Bars from Whitbread for Pounds 16.9m.
Capital expenditure rose from Pounds 8.5m to Pounds 33m.
Devenish believes its operating profits from pubs would have been Pounds
700,000 greater if had not been for the disappointing summer in Cornwall,
where a third of its estate is based.
Profits from property disposals fell from Pounds 1.78m to Pounds 763,000.
Devenish's 30 per cent stake in the wholesaling businesses sold to
Freetraders was responsible for increasing its share of profits from
associated undertakings to Pounds 478,000 (Pounds 208,000).
Extra provisions of Pounds 1.4m put aside at the time of the sale were not
needed and therefore gave rise, after defence and aborted disposal costs, to
an extraordinary credit of Pounds 446,000 compared to a Pounds 5.14m charge.
Borrowings increased from Pounds 14.8m to Pounds 34.5m, giving gearing of
24.6 per cent.
COMMENT
Devenish's decision to refocus its business and concentrate on pubs produced
a satisfactory result in a difficult year. It would be hard, even for its
potential adversary Boddington, to fault the strategy - not least because it
argued for it last year when it made its failed bid. Investors will have to
decide whether to take the more charitable view, that the present management
can build on its performance, or the more cynical, which suggests that it
has produced a one-off improvement in the face of another possible bid.
Whichever view they take the shares look good value. Either the
concentration on pubs will continue to boost profits or Boddington will make
another bid. With forecast pre-tax profits of Pounds 14.5m, excluding
property disposals, the shares - which rose 5p to 259p - are on a
prospective multiple of 13.5, a slight premium to the sector average.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1326</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: TGI sharply lower at Pounds 0.35m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pre-tax profits of TGI, a designer and manufacturer of loudspeakers and
related equipment, fell from Pounds 671,000 to Pounds 348,000 over the six
months to September 30.
The corresponding figure included exceptional gains of Pounds 451,000 on the
disposal of the Havant property.
Turnover was little changed at Pounds 16.1m (Pounds 16.82m). However, the
prior year figure was boosted by an Indonesian contract.
Earnings declined to 1.5p (2p) but the company is resuming interim dividends
via a distribution of 0.5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1327</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Shoprite progress pushes shares up 8%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Shares in Shoprite Group jumped 8 per cent, from 528p to 572p, as the
grocery and vehicle retailer announced record pre-tax profits of Pounds
2.71m for the year to November 1.
The Isle of Man-based group, which also has property interests, reported the
rise from a previous Pounds 1.11m on sales well ahead at Pounds 87.5m
(Pounds 45.4m).
The progress was attributed to its performance in Scotland. However, the
rapid expansion there pushed gearing to 66 per cent, breaching the group's
ceiling of 60 per cent.
Earnings per share jumped from 8.7p to 18.9p. The final dividend is
increased to 5.5p, which together with the maiden interim of 2p makes a
total of 7.5p (5.2p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1328</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Barcom back in black with Pounds 0.7m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In a year of change and development, Barcom, the civil engineering and plant
hire concern, maintained its recovery to finish the 12 months to September
30 with a pre-tax profit of Pounds 702,000, against a restated Pounds 4.82m
loss.
Sales totalled Pounds 11.5m (restated Pounds 6.34m) and earnings per share
were 9.2p (235.5p losses). A dividend of 1.25p (nil) is recommended.
Exceptional credits came to Pounds 204,000 (Pounds 1.71m debits) comprising
profits on sale of freehold properties. Last year's figures were restated to
account for the disposal of Venture Plant (Scotland) as an extraordinary
charge instead of an exceptional item.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1329</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Amberley incurs Pounds 79,000 loss
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Amberley Group, a provider of building preservation services, ran up a loss
of Pounds 79,000 pre-tax for the half year ended September 30. That compared
with previous profits of Pounds 75,000.
First half turnover totalled Pounds 1.62m (Pounds 1.59m). Losses per share
were 1.44p (0.59p earnings).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1330</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: GWR more than doubles to Pounds 721,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pre-tax profits of GWR Group, the USM-quoted independent radio contractor,
more than doubled from Pounds 339,000 to Pounds 721,000 in the year to
end-September.
The result was struck on turnover up by Pounds 1.14m to Pounds 8.64m.
Earnings rose by 95 per cent to 15.6p per share and the final dividend of 4p
(3p) raises the total for the year to 7p (4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1331</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Optometrics falls to Dollars 29,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Optometrics Corporation, the USM-quoted optical systems specialist based in
Massachusetts, saw pre-tax profits for the six months to September 30 fall
from Dollars 77,000 to Dollars 29,000 (Pounds 19,000).
The company also announced the acquisition of Intercon, a US distributor of
scientific instruments. No price was disclosed.
Turnover for the half year was Dollars 1.76m (Dollars 1.56m) and earnings
per share came out at 0.05 cents (0.6 cents).
The company has called an extraordinary meeting to increase the authorised
share capital from Dollars 120,000 to Dollars 200,000 and allow the company
to buy up to 10 per cent of its capital in any fiscal year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1332</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Multitone little changed at Pounds 875,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Multitone Electronics yesterday reported little changed pre-tax profits of
Pounds 875,000 against Pounds 864,000 in the first half to October 31, in
what it described as further worsening trading conditions.
Sales of the paging systems and equipment maker, rose 6 per cent to Pounds
12.1m (Pounds 11.4m) and development expenditure was increased to Pounds
1.11m (Pounds 946,000).
A higher interim dividend of 1.5p (1.25p) is payable from earnings per share
of 4.03p (3.73p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1333</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Tinsley Robor reduces losses
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Tinsley Robor, the specialist printing and packaging company, reduced its
pre-tax losses from Pounds 398,000 to Pounds 132,000 in the six months to
September 30.
This was struck after a rise in operating profits to Pounds 226,000 (Pounds
30,000), a fall in interest charges to Pounds 358,000 (Pounds 428,000), and
a provision for a single bad debt of Pounds 195,500.
Mr John Rose, chairman, said that trading conditions had remained 'difficult
across the whole group with continued severe pressure on margins'. However,
turnover advanced 15 per cent to 12.4m, with most of that growth coming from
the music sector.
Losses per share shrank to 0.38p (1.37p) and there is no interim dividend
(0.75p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1334</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Westport returns to the black
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In a 'difficult business climate' Westport Group, the USM-quoted exhibition,
photographic services and markets specialist, turned round from pre-tax
losses of Pounds 373,000 to profits of Pounds 111,000 in the half year to
October 30.
Turnover improved by 9 per cent to Pounds 7.98m (Pounds 7.31m). Earnings per
share amounted to 0.09p (0.12p losses).
Looking ahead, Mr Ralph Kanter, chairman, said he anticipated the group
returning to profit for the full year. Losses were Pounds 925,000 in
1991-92.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1335</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Overseas boost for Learmonth Burchett
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A buoyant performance overseas and steady results from the UK, enabled
Learmonth &amp; Burchett Management Systems to report pre-tax profits of Pounds
753,000 for the six months to October 31, compared with losses of Pounds
281,000.
The USM-quoted supplier of information technology services also announced
that it was raising a net Pounds 3.8m by a 1-for-4 rights issue of 3.47m
shares and a subscription for 585,000 shares. Both offers are at 100p a
share. The shares gained 10p to close at 129p.
The proceeds would be used to redeem the cumulative convertible redeemable
preferred ordinary shares and the cumulative redeemable preference shares
and to eliminate most of the group's borrowings.
Turnover in the period under review rose 6 per cent to Pounds 10.7m (Pounds
10.1m) of which the overseas contribution increased from 30 per cent to 40
per cent. US sales advanced by 30 per cent.
Earnings per share were 3.1p (losses 1.7p). The company said it was not in a
position to pay an interim dividend, but if the expectations for the full
year were realised it would be able to recommend a payment at the year end.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1336</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: SEP jumps and plans Pounds 3m placing
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SEP Industrial Holdings, the USM-quoted group which has interests in
manufacturing, distribution and international trading, reported a sharp jump
in pre-tax profits from Pounds 214,000 to Pounds 830,000 for the year to
September 30.
The group also announced a placing and open offer of 23.4m new ordinary
shares to raise Pounds 3.2m and said that it planned to seek a full listing
for its shares.
Mr Paul Formby, chairman, said the result reflected the improved
contribution from the distribution activities, loss elimination and interest
savings arising from a reduction in group indebtedness. It was achieved on
reduced turnover of Pounds 24m (Pounds 49.5m) but the interest charges were
just Pounds 577,000 (Pounds 1.57m).
Earnings per share came to 1.42p (0.27p) and a proposed final dividend of
0.35p (0.2p) brings the total to 0.65p (0.2p).
Proceeds from the placing would assist the funding of the group's expansion
programme, Mr Formby said, as well as any requirement for additional working
capital. The shares will be placed at 14 1/2 p on the basis of one new share
for every two held.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1337</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: EIO plans to take up to 75% of St Andrew
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ECCLESIASTICAL Insur-ance Office is making a bid for St Andrew Trust, an
investment trust specialising in smaller companies, which is managed by
Martin Currie.
However, the bid is a technical one designed to leave Ecclesiastical with a
holding of more than 50 and less than 75 per cent.
The move is designed to allow EIO to meet the EC's Third Council Directive
on Non-Life Insurance, which was adopted on June 18. Regulations needed to
implement the directive are expected to come into effect on July 1 1994.
The impact of the regulations will be that, for capital adequacy purposes,
Ecclesiastical will need to have a majority holding in the trust. It
currently has a holding of 40.3 per cent, some of which was acquired as part
of a similar bid in 1985.
The Takeover Code requires Ecclesiastical to make a full offer for all the
remaining shares of the trust. It is accordingly making an offer in cash,
equivalent to 93 per cent of the trust's formula asset value (in essence,
the net asset value minus expenses).
At present, the bid is worth about 215p per share, and values the 59.7 per
cent of St Andrew which Ecclesiastical does not own, at Pounds 44.1m.
Ecclesiastical does not want to accumulate more than 75 per cent of St
Andrew, as this would threaten its investment trust status. It wants Martin
Currie to continue to manage the trust.
St Andrew yesterday put out a holding statement noting the offer. The shares
were unchanged at 211p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1338</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Yorkshire Electricity advances to Pounds
42m - Pounds 13m customer rebate and largest dividend rise of regional
companies announced
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YORKSHIRE Electricity is to rebate each of its tariff customers Pounds 5
after announcing sharply higher profits and dividends for the six months to
September 30.
Mr John Tysoe, chairman, said yesterday that the refund would cost the
company Pounds 13m. 'But we want to share the results of our good
performance between our shareholders and our customers.'
Yorkshire closed the electricity season with a 28 per cent increase in
profits before tax to Pounds 42.5m (Pounds 33.1m). Earnings jumped 29 per
cent to 14.8p.
The interim dividend is increased by 15 per cent to 6p, the largest increase
announced by a regional company.
Mr Tysoe said: 'Viewed against a background of the continuing deep recession
throughout the country, this is an excellent result.'
Although turnover and units sold fell in the period, there was an
improvement both in cost control and in the number of bad debtors. Operating
costs fell 7 per cent and staff numbers were reduced by 150.
There was a deterioration in both main activities. Operating profit from
distribution fell to Pounds 57.4m (Pounds 59.6m), and the supply business
loss rose to Pounds 18.3m (Pounds 17.9m). Offsetting this was a sharp
improvement in non-core businesses such as retailing and contracting, where
operating profits amounted to Pounds 1.7m compared to losses of Pounds 7.4m.
Provisions in both years distorted these figures.
Yorkshire expects the recession to continue to affect its results for the
remainder of the financial year, though further cost reductions should
contribute to a growth in profitability.
Mr Tysoe said that Yorkshire was unlikely to sign any long-term electricity
deals with the power generators until the uncertainty created by the coal
review was removed. If anything, he would prefer an interim arrangement that
would tide the industry over to 1994 when a fresh review of pricing
arrangements is due.
COMMENT
The numbers were not quite as rosy as they looked. The deterioration in both
the supply and distribution businesses - though not indicative for seasonal
reasons of the full-year outturn - showed how hard the recession is
impacting, and the management's assessment of the outlook was not madly
encouraging. Some analysts also thought that Yorkshire was not driving down
on costs as hard as it had promised. The refund was a bit of a red herring
because the regulator would have obliged Yorkshire to return the money
anyway next year. But the result was good enough to preserve Yorkshire's
reputation as the investor's most favoured rec. The estimated prospective
yield of 5.6 per cent is the lowest in the sector, despite the thumping
dividend increase.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1339</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Acatos boosted by sale of loss-makers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MATTHEW CURTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN Acatos &amp; Hutcheson jumped 15p to 170p as the manufacturer and
supplier of edible oil products turned in a 13 per cent increase in pre-tax
profits from Pounds 6.68m to Pounds 7.56m for the year to September 27.
The group reaped the full benefits of pulling out of its loss-making Spanish
joint venture and selling its unprofitable UK plastics operation in the last
year.
Although turnover fell to Pounds 200.9m, compared with Pounds 228.5m, net
borrowings were slashed from Pounds 16.4m to Pounds 10.1m at the year-end
because of sharply improved cashflow.
Lower interest rates helped interest charges fall to Pounds 1.37m (Pounds
3.1m).
Mr Ian Hutcheson, chairman, said that with results ahead of expectations,
the group decided to bring forward capital spending plans. It made an
exceptional charge of Pounds 1.5m to cover the depreciation provision for
the accelerated replacement of buildings and plant.
He said the group had restored foundations for longer-term growth, and would
concentrate on improving efficiencies to win back UK market share lost to
European competitors in the past few years.
Earnings per share advanced from 13.3p to 15.2p. A proposed final dividend
of 4p makes a total of 6.5p, compared with 5p last time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1340</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Low take-up for HunterPrint rights issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HunterPrint's investors have given the troubled specialist printer's Pounds
20m rights issue an unenthusiastic reception.
The company had offered investors one share for every 10 held at a placing
price of 50p to raise a net Pounds 18.3m.
However, the board said yesterday that at the close of the offer,
applications had been received for only 8.87m shares, representing 22.18 per
cent of the shares on offer.
Out of the placing proceeds, Pounds 15.6m in cash will be used to pay
lessors of printing equipment, which along with the Pounds 5.2m convertible
preferences would eliminate HunterPrint's Pounds 36m lease obligations.
The lessors also agreed to take up to Pounds 3.9m of the placing shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1341</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Joint venture helps Wessex Water rise by
11% to Pounds 44.3m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WESSEX WATER, supplier of water and sewerage services from Bristol to
Bournemouth, announced a 11 per cent rise in interim profits helped by the
first full contribution from its joint venture with Waste Management of the
US.
Pre-tax profits rose from Pounds 39.8m to Pounds 44.3m in the six months to
September 30, despite lower interest earnings as capital investment
eliminated cash holdings.
Mr Nicholas Hood, chairman, described the results as'sparkling' and said
they reflected tight control of operating costs.
Turnover increased 8.3 per cent to Pounds 102.3m, mainly reflecting average
price increases of 8 per cent. Recession led to an estimated 1.5 per cent
fall in metered income from business and factories.
Operating profits rose 24 per cent to Pounds 42.1m as costs were held steady
at Pounds 44.9m, reflecting restructuring advantages and tighter cost
control.
Net interest earnings fell to Pounds 600,000 (Pounds 6.1m) as Wessex went
from net cash of Pounds 15m to net borrowings of Pounds 9m. Capital
expenditure totalled Pounds 74m (Pounds 52m) and is forecast to reach Pounds
130m for the full year.
Wessex Waste Management, the 49.9 per cent owned joint venture with Waste
Management, made trading profits of Pounds 3.2m and remained on target, Mr
Hood said. Five smaller waste businesses were acquired during the period at
an initial cost of Pounds 6.3m.
Earnings per share increased from 36.2p to 40.6p. The interim dividend goes
up to 7.3p (6.6p).
COMMENT
Wessex is one of the best regarded water companies, both in terms of its
core business management and the unregulated waste venture, and there was
nothing in these figures to challenge that reputation. The jewel to provide
Mr Hood's sparkle was control of operating costs. This flowed from reduced
central overheads and cost control among individual business units, although
overall costs were slightly flattered by a one-off reduction in
depreciation. Outside the core, Wessex Waste Management continued to make
progress and looks set to beat initial forecasts of a Pounds 6m
contribution, which would be more than 7 per cent of trading profits. Full
year forecasts of Pounds 85m put the shares on just under 8 times with a
yield under 5 per cent. That is expensive relative to the sector, especially
given yesterday's 7p rise to 584p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1342</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UK Company News: US consortium buys Astra's remaining assets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LAST remaining assets of Astra Holdings, the munitions and fireworks
maker which went into receivership earlier this year, have been sold.
The disposal to a US consortium, led by Lion Holdings Corporation, has saved
about 1,000 jobs.
The businesses involved are: Astra Holdings Corporation, the US holding
company. Tennessee-based Kilgore Corporation, which makes infra-red decoy
flares and ammunition. Accudyne Corporation of Wisconsin, which makes
armament fuses for the defence industry; and Acculyte of Virginia, which
makes electronic circuitry.
Astra, which is being investigated by the Department of Trade and Industry,
went into receivership in February, owing Pounds 50m to five banks.
Its principal UK subsidiary, BMARC, was sold to Royal Ordnance, in April for
just under Pounds 10m. Its other UK subsidiary, Haley &amp; Weller, was sold to
Chemring Group in July. The other US business, Astra Precision Products, was
sold to a US fund in June.
The disposals to date have raised about Pounds 30m. Although more money will
be raised from selling some properties, the total will be short of the
banks' exposure, so shareholders will receive nothing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1343</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Companies in this issue
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 ------------------------------------
UK
 ------------------------------------
Acatos &amp; Hutcheson           16
Amberley                     17
Astra 16
Barclays Bank            22, 15
Barcom                       17
Boddington                   15
Bradstock                    18
British Airways           21, 1
British Gas                  15
Bromsgrove Inds              18
Clarke Foods                 16
Devenish (JA)            17, 15
Ecclesiastical Ins           16
Electra Inv Trust            18
First Technology             18
GWR                          17
Gestetner                    17
Gold Greenless Trott         18
HunterPrint                  16
Imry                         15
Learmonth &amp; Burchett         17
MS Intl                      18
Merrydown                    17
Morris Ashby                 16
Multitone Elect              17
National Westminster         22
Optometrics                  17
Ransomes                     10
SEP Industrial               17
Shoprite                     17
St Andrew Trust              16
Steel Burrill Jones          10
TGI                          17
TR Technolgy                 18
Tinsley Robor                17
Wessex Water                 16
Westport                     17
Yorkshire Elect              16
 ------------------------------------
Overseas
 ------------------------------------
Alfa-Laval                   16
Amax                         20
Arthur Andersen              21
Asahi Shinwa                 21
BfG Bank                     15
CNN                          19
Chemplex                     21
Ciments Francais             19
Credit Lyonnais              15
DAF                          19
De Beers                     20
Delta Air lines              19
Electrolux                   19
Guintoli                     19
KIO                          19
Kolbenschmidt                19
Lehel                        19
Minorco                      21
N-TV                         19
Perrier                      19
Procter &amp; Gamble             20
Qantas                    21, 1
SKF                          19
Sentrachem                   21
Shearson Lehman              20
Short Bros                   20
Westpac                      21
 ------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1344</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Lyonnais-BfG bank deal in trouble
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CREDIT LYONNAIS' proposed acquisition of a majority stake in the BfG Bank,
the financially troubled German bank, has run into last-minute difficulties.
The purchase of the stake in Germany's sixth biggest bank, potentially one
of the largest cross-border deals in European financial services, was first
announced at the beginning of last month with the aim of completion by the
end of the year.
The failure of the deal, which valued the German bank at DM2.1bn (Pounds
860m), would be a big embarrassment for the state-owned Credit Lyonnais as
well as for BfG's shareholders, Aachener und Munchener Beteiligungs,
Germany's second biggest insurance company, and the BGAG trades union
holding company.
It would also unscramble a related agreement between AMB and Assurances
Generales de France, the large French insurance company. The two companies,
at loggerheads for months after AGF bought a 25 per cent stake in its German
rival, had reached a peaceful co-operation agreement on the condition that
AGF helped find a buyer for AMB's stake in BfG, as it did in the form of
Credit Lyonnais.
The difficulties are reported to centre on guarantees that BfG's current
owners are being asked to provide to the purchaser in respect of the bank's
balance sheet liabilities, a difficult point given the rapidly deteriorating
credit environment in Germany.
Another problem is believed to be that Credit Lyonnais is seeking an
'opt-out' clause which would allow it to pull out of the deal if the French
government failed to give it approval to raise capital to inject into BfG.
Bankers said that negotiators failed to reach agreement on these issues in a
round of talks which took place in Paris and finished on Tuesday this week.
A banker advising on the transaction said that the negotiations were
extremely difficult and that all sides involved were playing 'a last-minute
game of poker'.
The pressure to complete the deal has mounted as AMB has called a special
supervisory board meeting for tomorrow. It is likely this meeting would
cancel the transaction if no agreement had been reached.
Companies involved limited their comment on the developments yesterday to
saying that they hoped that agreement would be reached.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1345</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Devenish says 17% rise will bolster it against Boddington
bid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JA DEVENISH, the West Country-based pub operator, yesterday said its 17 per
cent increase in pre-tax profits for the year ending September 30 put it out
of reach of its rival Boddington which last year launched an unsuccessful
bid.
Profits rose from Pounds 11.6m to Pounds 13.6m on increased sales from
continuing activities of Pounds 72.7m, against Pounds 62.4m for the same
period last time.
Mr Michael Cannon, chairman, said he regarded Boddington's decision to hold
on to its 19.5 per cent stake as 'hostile' and said Devenish had already
prepared its defence against a possible second bid from Boddington.
'I think our result has made it too expensive for Boddington to try for us
again. But we are prepared to fight off any cheap bid,' he said.
Mr Denis Cassidy, Boddington's chairman, said he could draw no 'particular
significance' from Devenish's full-year results. Boddington is to keep its
19.5 per cent stake in Devenish for 'strategic reasons'.
He said Devenish's operating profit was only marginally ahead in spite of an
increase in the number of pubs from 376 to 532.
'I guess Devenish's management must be a bit disappointed with only a small
increase in operating profits from pubs given the large increase in its
estate,' said Mr Cassidy.
Devenish's pre-tax profits were boosted by an increase in the share of
associated undertakings and a Pounds 1.2m fall in the interest charge to
Pounds 3m.
The withdrawal from wholesaling and brands realised around Pounds 25m which
was used to acquire more pubs.
Mr Cannon said he was opposed to Boddington's diversification into hotels
and nursing homes in spite of the group's recent 50 per cent rise in pre-tax
profits for the half-year to June 27, from Pounds 7.52m to Pounds 11.3m.
He said the Ashdown family, which owns more than 10 per cent of Devenish and
could be instrumental in deciding the outcome of another bid, had told him
they were pleased with the company's results.
The final dividend is to be increased to 6.35p, from 5.05p, giving a total
of 7.85p - a 25 per cent increase on the previous year. Fully diluted
earnings per share increased to 18.73p, against 16.02p last time.
Details, Page 17
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1346</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / German takeover rules criticised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE chief of Germany's leading fund management company yesterday called for
an overhaul of his country's corporate takeover rules.
Mr Christian Strenger, chief executive of DWS, the Deutsche Bank fund
management arm which has DM58bn (Pounds 23bn) under management, said that
shareholders in German companies were disadvantaged because of the lack of a
takeover code.
He said German banks and companies should devise a code of practice on such
issues as disclosure and the treatment of minority shareholders in
takeovers. The call comes a week after Calpers, the big US pension fund,
condemned voting rights restrictions at many large German companies,
including Deutsche Bank, DWS's parent company. Companies said they needed
these rules in the absence of formal takeover regulations.
Mr Strenger said that once his proposals were adopted, it would be possible
for companies to abandon their voting restrictions, which would be welcomed
by domestic and foreign shareholders as a way of enhancing share prices.
There are very limited rules for takeovers in Germany. Shareholdings need
only be disclosed when they reach 25 per cent - in contrast to 3 per cent in
the UK - nor is there is a requirement to treat all shareholders equally.
This means that it is standard practice for companies to seek effective
control of another company by acquiring a simple majority of shares or a
blocking minority. There is no requirement for companies to pay a premium
for corporate control, which Mr Strenger believes is to the detriment of
shareholders.
'It would cost very little for companies to comply with such proposals, in
relation to the damage that is done to the equity market as a result of the
current state of affairs,' he said.
Mr Strenger's remarks reflect his concern, as head of Germany's leading
provider of investment funds to private individuals, that Germans are averse
to investing in equities. Germans prefer buying bonds and only 10 per cent
of DWS's DM58bn is invested in equities.
Approximately half the shares in all Germany's quoted companies are owned by
banks, insurance companies, families and other long-term shareholders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1347</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Barclays writes off Pounds 240m on Imry debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BARCLAYS Bank has provided Pounds 240m to cover possible losses on its
Pounds 422m exposure to Imry, a property group, in one of the largest
individual debt write-offs in UK banking history.
The provision, of which Pounds 196m has been written off entirely, resulted
from Barclay's role in financing a highly leveraged takeover of a quoted
property company in 1989, just before the commercial property market went
into its sharpest decline in living memory.
The announcement of the record provision, which had been expected by the
City, accompanied details of a financial restructuring in which Barclays
swapped some of Imry's debt into preference shares and also became owner of
the business.
Barclays' involvement in Imry dates from 1989, when it lent Pounds 214m to
Marketchief (later renamed Chester), a consortium which paid Pounds 314m for
Imry. Two years later, it increased its exposure to Pounds 440m. Barclays
has written off its entire Pounds 196m exposure to Chester. Total provisions
including this write-off are Pounds 240m, of which Pounds 75m was taken in
its results for the first half of 1992. Barclays has also converted Pounds
100m of debt in Imry into redeemable preference shares.
Barclay's exposure to the Imry Group, excluding the preference shares, is
now Pounds 76m of drawn facilities, Pounds 30m of undrawn facilities and
Pounds 20m of guarantees.
Mr Martin Myers, chief executive of Imry, blamed the company's difficulties
wholly on its acquisition by Marketchief, which drained about Pounds 115m in
interest and capital payments from the Imry subsidiary. 'If Marketchief had
never happened, we would not be in any trouble whatsoever,' he said. He
added that the restructuring gave Imry a 'positive and stable base from
which to go forward'.
Imry's net assets, which include a shopping centre in Leicester, total about
Pounds 70m. Mr David Davies, chairman of Johnson Matthey, the metals group,
will be Imry's chairman, a post he occupied before the 1989 takeover. Mr
Wolfgang Stolzenberg, former chairman of the group, resigned six weeks ago
after selling his equity to the Imry management. He controlled Castor
Holdings, an international finance group, which collapsed last summer.
Banks' downgrade, Page 22; Lex, Page 14; London Stock Exchange, Page 34
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1348</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / British Gas seeks fortune abroad as home front sours:
Deborah Hargreaves reports on how a privatised utility confronts a break-up
threat
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It was a neat coincidence that British Gas should buy control of Argentina's
largest gas distribution company on the day that Sir James McKinnon, its
regulator, called for the break-up of the company.
The announcements show both the tightening grip of UK regulation and British
Gas's drive to shift an increasing amount of business out of that grasp into
growth markets overseas.
In the Argentine deal, for instance, a consortium headed by British Gas
acquired Distribuidora de Gas Metropolitana for Dollars 300m (Pounds
197.30m), giving British Gas a majority stake in the privatised utility,
which it will run. Other overseas activities include plans for exploration
in Kazakhstan, a gas distribution company in Canada and some gas networks in
eastern Germany.
The push overseas is not surprising. Ever since British Gas was privatised
in 1986, it has faced increasing pressure from the regulatory authorities.
Now its future is being decided by an inquiry by the Monopolies and Mergers
Commission.
In his submission to the inquiry, Sir James McKinnon has argued for a
break-up: British Gas's UK pipelines business, which represents 85 per cent
of the company's assets, should be transferred into a new company, he said
on Wednesday.
'The key to British Gas's monopoly is its ownership and control of the gas
transportation and storage system,' he said. Effective competition could not
be introduced into the UK gas market while British Gas owned the pipelines -
even if it separated them into a subsidiary.
Sir James's views are backed by many of the independent gas marketing
companies that have sprung up in the past five years. They suspect they are
charged more for transporting their gas through British Gas's pipelines than
the company itself pays.
'I'm very concerned that competition with British Gas as a marketer be on an
even keel. I'm not sure I believe in Chinese walls,' said Mr Norman Ellis,
managing director of Kinetica, the only UK company that has managed to build
a rival pipeline.
British Gas has expressed its irritation with Sir James for making
'inappropriate' statements while the issue is under review. But it must be
facing up to the fact that it is unlikely to emerge intact from the
monopolies commission inquiry.
The Office of Fair Trading recommended the wholesale sell-off of the
pipelines in its report on the gas market in October 1991. The OFT backed
off from this demand in return for British Gas's co-operation with the rest
of its recommendations, which included a gas release programme and the
reduction of British Gas's monopoly in the domestic sector. But British Gas
was required to place its pipelines in a separate subsidiary.
'It is not a new issue and to the extent that we are going to discuss it,
our discussions will be with the Monopolies and Mergers Commission,' Mr
Philip Rogerson, British Gas's managing director of finance, said.
British Gas is extremely keen to retain the Pounds 16bn-worth of assets that
are tied up in the pipelines business. The rest of its UK business is purely
a marketing operation, with about Pounds 3bn in assets, which should see
margins eroded severely as intense competition builds. For this reason,
British Gas has insisted on a higher rate of return for its pipelines than
Sir James will allow. It was this that forced the monopolies commission
inquiry. Sir James wanted the rate of return to be between 2.5 per cent and
5 per cent while British Gas pushed for 6.7 per cent on its existing
pipelines and 10.8 per cent on new investment.
The City is not sure how to evaluate the threat of break-up: 'Many
shareholders see it as a positive move in unlocking value', said Mr Nick
Antill, industry analyst at Hoare Govett, 'but I think it's a myth.
Investors would get a one-off payment from the sale of one of the companies
or two shares in separate companies, one of which would not do very well
financially.'
The monopolies commission could go further and break up the company into
regional marketing units, as in the electricity industry and as was
suggested at British Gas's privatisation.
The row over the break-up of the company goes some way to explain the vigour
with which Mr Cedric Brown, British Gas's chief executive, is pursuing
investments abroad. It will be a long time, however, before this part of its
business catches up with profits from its UK monopoly.
British Gas receives less than a quarter of its overall profit from overseas
operations. It had set a target for 60 per cent of its profits to come from
its two international divisions - Exploration and Production and Global Gas
 -by 2000, but has recently backed off from this goal.
'We want to be part of developing gas businesses where we can build markets
and be a key player,' said Mr Russell Herbert, managing director of Global
Gas. But its international strategy is under review by McKinsey, the
management consultants.
The City has not understood British Gas's move into gas distribution
overseas: 'Many investors are pretty negative about Global Gas. They're not
happy about the company putting money into regulated businesses abroad,'
said Mr Antill.
British Gas's involvement in Argentina will be subject to scrutiny by a
regulatory body. But the company stresses the positive effect the
acquisition will have on its revenues and the possibility of spin-off
business.
With a turnover of Dollars 610m (Pounds 384m) a year, British Gas expects
Distribuidora de Gas Metropolitana to add to its profits immediately. The
Argentine market has been growing at 6 per cent a year.
Mr Herbert also expects British Gas to gain around Dollars 160m of
associated business such as providing consultancy services for Argentina's
newly privatised gas industry as well as engineering and pipeline services
for the country's water industry.
Argentina provides as much comfort to British Gas's critics, however, as it
does to the expansion-minded management. In Argentina the gas pipelines
business is run separately from local distribution - by design, not
coincidence. The Argentine government set out to learn from the strengths
and weaknesses of the UK's gas privatisation before drawing up its own
plans.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1349</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Major and Delors in row over HDTV plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OTTAWA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR was last night embroiled in an extraordinary row with Mr
Jacques Delors, the European Commission president, over Britain's decision
to veto an Ecu500m (Pounds 405m) European Community programme to fund high
definition television.
The row, which broke out as both men travelled on the same aircraft to North
America for the EC-Canada and the EC-US summits, centred on allegations that
Mr Major had reneged on an agreement at last week's Edinburgh summit to
support the HDTV programme. It threatened to sour their joint meetings later
today with outgoing US president George Bush.
Mr Delors said the British veto on the project, a prime element in the
Community's research and development effort, should be lifted at a meeting
next Monday of EC foreign ministers.
Confirming the contents of a private letter he had sent to the British prime
minister, Mr Delors said Mr Major had broken the terms of an Edinburgh
agreement. At that meeting, Mr Ruud Lubbers, the Dutch prime minister, is
said to have made his agreement to a deal on the siting of EC institutions
conditional on approval of HDTV programmes.
Mr Delors said: 'My understanding is that Mr Major gave his agreement.'
Senior British officials said Mr Major had explicitly stated his objectives
in Edinburgh and had given no undertakings to Mr Lubbers. They contradicted
Mr Delors, who sat only a few feet away, saying the record of the summit -
held on tape - backed Mr Major's version. Britain judged the HDTV technology
the Commission wanted to develop was 'outdated'. HDTV represents the next
generation of television technology and is expected to enhance picture
quality.
Earlier, Mr Delors said he had made a 'careful note' of proceedings in
Edinburgh. He said it was 'his duty' to see the agreement was implemented.
Old allies ponder future, page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1350</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Currencies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Pierre Beregovoy's verbal support for the franc yesterday was, curiously,
not reinforced by any move on official lending rates. Perhaps the pressures
in a thin pre-Christmas market are not great enough to warrant a more robust
response. The success of any defensive move depends heavily on choosing a
time when a squeeze on the speculators will inflict most pain.
Then again, Germany is also under pressure. If France decided it could not
take any more deflation, it would be more likely to suspend its ERM
membership than just to devalue. The former course would be the only way to
regain freedom over interest rate policy. But the French fundamentals are
better than Germany's in so many ways - inflation, growth, current account
and public finance - that, after a while, the franc could start to
appreciate against the D-Mark. The cherished image of the D-Mark as the
European currency which never depreciates would then be shattered.
Even the Bundesbank might prefer to cut rates rather than be blamed for the
collapse of the ERM, not to mention damage to the Franco-German
relationship. The timing, though, remains delicate. It would take a
significant Bundesbank relaxation to let France off the hook before its
elections in March. The foreign exchange market may decide to have a go
anyway.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1351</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Pension funds
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Regardless of the compensation scheme eventually recommended by the Goode
committee, a minimum solvency requirement for pension funds is sure to
follow. The limited compensation scheme proposed by the National Association
of Pension Funds yesterday does not actually require underpinning by a
solvency standard. But a safety net which also covered poorly-managed
pension funds most certainly would. The NAPF is not alone in conceding that
a solvency standard is overdue. The danger is this could be a double-edged
sword.
Solvency tests which assume the pension fund continues to operate are hardly
adequate. Measures based on the fund's ability to cover benefits in the
event of winding up are closer to the mark. For example, Professor Goode
might demand - as actuaries traditionally have - that pension funds can
cover minimum benefits if there is a winding up by buying annuities. But
should the cost of annuities rise - as it has since 1990 because of the
parlous state of the insurance industry - pension fund managers would have
to change investment policy. That might mean buying bonds to safeguard
capital at the expense of long-term performance.
Alternative tests might be a better bet, such as one which demands assets
are available to protect minimum benefits if members switch to personal
pensions in the event of winding up. But any guarantee of solvency will
carry a price. The challenge is to find a measure which safeguards minimum
standards without putting potential benefits at risk.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1352</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: British Airways
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
British Airways is flying high in its quest to be global. The airline's
victory in the auction to buy 25 per cent of Qantas is a welcome fillip,
although bad news about its proposed Dollars 750m investment in USAir may
sour the party.
Qantas is undoubtedly desirable. It has a productive young fleet compatible
with BA's. It still has to squeeze significant benefits from its acquisition
of Australian Airlines. And although Qantas's European traffic is unlikely
to rise heavily over the next few years, it has attractive routes in the
lucrative Bangkok-Singapore-Hong Kong triangle.
But BA is paying a full fare. A cash outlay of Pounds 291m looks expensive
for an investment that would have generated profits of just Pounds 9m last
year, before financing costs. The deal is likely to be dilutive before
contributing usefully by 1995. BA is in for the long haul. It helps, though,
that the Australian government's ADollars 1.35bn recapitalisation plan for
Qantas will sweeten the national carrier's profits by about ADollars 120m.
As for the USAir deal, that appears to rest with Mr John Major's negotiating
skills over the weekend. If the two deals were to come off, BA's
debt-to-capital ratio would rise to nearly 70 per cent which is close to its
limit. A rights issue at the current stage of the cycle would represent poor
timing. But airline industry investors must have realised by now that
unpredictability is its only certainty.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1353</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Bad checks at Barclays
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It almost beggars belief that a once great bank like Barclays could have run
up an exposure of Pounds 440m to a single customer on the basis of little
more than an expectation of indefinitely rising property values. Had its
loans to Imry been syndicated, the bank would not be in the embarrassing
position of making a Pounds 240m provision - enormous by any banking
standard, except perhaps on sovereign debt.
If the recriminations are likely to reverberate, the bank has at least found
an orderly way of sorting out the mess. Having written off the money it lent
to Marketchief to buy Imry in 1989, it is left with an exposure of Pounds
176m to a property company with sound management, net assets of Pounds 70m
and a portfolio worth about Pounds 300m which is pretty well fully let.
Since Barclays is now the beneficial owner of Imry, it stands to benefit
from any property market recovery.
Liquidation would have been a more likely result had Imry borrowed from a
syndicate. Cynics would say Barclays, too, could have chosen this route but
it would then have had to make an even larger provision. It may look silly
yet again if the property market continues to fall, though the existing
provision covers a quarter of its remaining exposure.
Besides, there are some more immediate consequences. To restore confidence
in its management, Barclays must find a banker of stature to work alongside
Mr Andrew Buxton. Its 1992 dividend decision has also become even more
agonising. The Pounds 165m provision to be charged in the current half is
larger than the market had generally expected. Since there has been no
discernible improvement in the lending climate since Black Wednesday,
provisions may tip the bank into pre-tax loss for 1992 instead of allowing a
small profit. That would make a maintained payout harder to justify.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1354</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / IMF chief urges German rate cut: Camdessus calls for more
global co-ordination of economic policy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMAN interest rates need to be reduced by about two percentage points as
part of a strategy to reduce 'intolerable' levels of unemployment in Europe,
Mr Michel Camdessus, the managing director of the International Monetary
Fund, said yesterday.
And in a rare intervention in US politics, he urged the incoming Clinton
administration to seize a 'great opportunity' to reduce the structural
budget deficit by raising taxes as well as cutting spending.
Mr Camdessus said more effective global co-ordination of policies was needed
to address a 'crisis of confidence'. The IMF, like the Paris-based
Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development, has cut its world
growth forecasts and expects a 1 per cent growth in European Community
economies next year.
At the National Press Club in Washington, he said abating demand and wage
pressures in Germany had made a 'progressive lowering of interest rates'
possible.
'But let me be blunt . . . what is needed is not a half-percentage point
reduction of the key interest rate of the Bundesbank - welcome as that may
be - but a more substantial cut in real interest rates, say of two
percentage points.'
He said the responsibility for achieving a big cut in rates lay more with
European governments, that had allowed large public-sector deficits to
develop, than with the Bundesbank and the other central banks. He said
Germany and Italy should take stronger steps to cut deficits.
A lasting reduction in European unemployment from its 'intolerable level of
10 per cent', would also require structural reforms to increase the
flexibility of labour markets.
The US had to address the 'Achilles heel' of its economy which was the
'continuing and alarming weakness of its saving and investment performance'.
The US had the lowest ratio of net national saving to gross domestic product
in the industrialised world. This had led to one of the lowest levels of
private investment and a lack of attention to public infrastructure.
Bold medium-term consolidation of the budget was the only reliable way of
boosting sustainable growth. With the cyclical recovery from recession
gaining momentum, the US had a great opportunity 'to set fiscal policy
unambiguously on the course of deficit reduction'.
The scale of the needed fiscal adjustment required 'the adoption of both
revenue and expenditure measures'. Tax reform was also needed to increase
incentives to save and invest and to reduce consumption.
Mr Camdessus praised Japan for taking monetary and fiscal action to revive
its economy. But he noted renewed signs of weakness and warned that further
policy actions might be needed.
Revised IMF forecasts to be released later this month will show growth of
barely 2 per cent in industrial countries next year against a forecast of
2.9 per cent at the annual meeting in September.
Bundesbank resists cut, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1355</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Nato wary of military response in Bosnia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT MAUTHNER and PHILIP STEPHENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS, OTTAWA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FOREIGN MINISTERS of the 16-member Nato alliance last night reached a shaky
compromise on further action to be taken against the Bosnian Serbs, but
their final declaration papered over deep differences on the nature and
severity of that action.
The declaration said the United Nations Security Council would 'shortly
consider' the adoption of a resolution on the enforcement of the ban on
military flights, which France originally hoped to propose on Sunday or
Monday.
But, following tense talks between ministers, the declaration became much
weaker than originally intended by a small group of countries led by France
and the US.
Britain and other countries were instrumental in inserting the proviso that
a UN resolution on the enforcement of the flight ban should 'bear in mind
the need to continue the current humanitarian effort in Bosnia'.
However, Mr Lawrence Eagleburger, US secretary of state, warned that
humanitarian aid might have to stop if the UN took steps to enforce the ban.
Britain had earlier warned that military action against the Bosnian Serb
militias could provoke attacks on aid convoys.
A further note of restraint was struck in the subsequent phrase that 'should
such a resolution be adopted, and should violations (of the flight ban)
continue thereafter, we would be prepared to support the UN in enforcing
that resolution'. That fell short of calls for action by some countries.
Earlier in the negotiations, Mr Roland Dumas, the French foreign minister,
supported by his US, Dutch and Turkish colleagues, proposed that the
Security Council vote as early as Sunday or Monday on a tough resolution
enforcing the no-fly zone in Bosnian air space, imposed by the council in
October.
However, the 12 other Nato members, opposed any steps which could endanger
the lives of troops of the UN protection force and humanitarian aid workers.
Those countries supporting military measures all said they were thinking in
terms of action by aircraft. All members of the alliance agreed that the
enforcement measures should not involve new ground troops.
The prospect of the adoption of tough new measures provoked Mr Radovan
Karadzic, the Bosnian Serb leader, to warn of retaliatory action should the
ban be enforced by military measures.
Philip Stephens reports from Ottawa: British officials said that Mr John
Major would seek to bridge differences over Bosnia at his meeting today and
tomorrow with President George Bush in Camp David.
Mr Major was proposing a UN resolution that would allow military enforcement
of a no-fly zone but would first give Serbia a warning to stop the
violations.
Serbia's stark choice, Page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1356</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / It's a wonderful life: In 1992 Major snatched defeat from
the jaws of victory, yet his new year prospects look rosy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr John Major's political career looks far more promising this Christmas
than it did a year ago. Oh yes it does. A brief recapitulation will make the
point.
In December 1991 the prime minister was rightly given credit for his part in
negotiating the then newly minted Maastricht deal. Against all expectations,
he achieved terms that had been agreed in advance by the entire cabinet. He
thought that the package had therefore been pre-sold to parliament and the
people. It was, he said, 'game, set and match' for Britain. That should have
given him a warm glow.
If so, it did not last. Before Christmas day dawned Mr Christopher Patten,
then chairman of the Conservative party, had warned Mr Major that he could
lose the forthcoming general election.
What was worse, the Treasury thought so too. The contest could not be
postponed for more than six months. There was scant reason to assume that
the recession would end before the government's time was up. Without some
indication that an economic upturn was on its way the Conservatives' chances
of survival seemed to the party's leaders to be slim. There was no precedent
for a fourth election victory in a row. It did not look like one would be
set in 1992. Labour was apparently more popular than it had been since 1979.
Its leader, Mr Neil Kinnock, was confident; its shadow ministers looked like
winners. In contrast, the government appeared tired, devoid of new ideas,
ready to be replaced after nearly 13 years in office.
We may therefore conclude that the prospect for Mr Major last Christmas must
have seemed awful. It was just a year since he had stepped into Number 10
Downing Street. The prime minister had conducted himself well during the
Gulf war, but had achieved little else, apart from the necessary abolition
of the poll tax. Losing the election would cost him his job as Conservative
leader. He faced an ignominious end to a brief spell as the unknown prime
minister. If history remembered him for anything, it would be for failing
his party.
As we know, the nightmare did not come true. The triumph was Mr Major's. On
April 9 the electorate demonstrated, conclusively, that it would not
contemplate a Labour government, not even one formed by Mr Kinnock's
remodelled party. Less than 35 per cent of the votes cast were for Labour.
That is a smaller proportion than was achieved after the winter of
discontent in 1979. No wonder it now looks like the party of permanent
opposition. Even a Clintonesque change of policy following a report from the
its new Commission for Social Justice might not save it. The Tories scored a
fraction under 42 per cent in April, virtually the same as in 1987 and 1983.
The events of the recent autumnus horribilis aside, theirs is now becoming
the party of permanent complacency.
This simple arithmetic transformed the outlook for Mr Major. He became
Conservative prime minister in his own right, not merely the fortunate
victor of a party leadership contest. He could appoint his own cabinet,
promote his own policies, and lead Britain towards Europe in the manner of
his own choice, rather than that of his predecessor. He could look forward
to being prime minister in the year 2000, presiding grandly over
celebrations financed in part by the proceeds of the new national lottery
announced yesterday.
He can still do so, in spite of everything that has happened since the
election. His reputation has been torn to shreds during the 13 weeks since
Black Wednesday, but he is still there. To those who live by power, that is
what counts. Mr Major continues in possession of the levers uniquely
available to a British prime minister - the patronage, the ability to make
or break the careers of his colleagues, the loyalty of (most of) his party.
His popularity has vanished, but much of it can be won back. His authority
has dwindled, but most of it can be recovered. He can repair his reputation,
if not completely, then in sufficient measure for him to be able to do his
job.
More to the point, he can assume that most people will feel better off next
Christmas. When the measures of economic optimism are once against positive,
some of his popularity will be regained. The press has (so far) failed to
dislodge the chancellor; for his part Mr Norman Lamont, who looks
understandably tired, can tell himself that the economic cycle has not been
abolished, that the September 16 devaluation, plus lower interest rates,
plus a US recovery, must have a beneficial effect on the British economy.
Most of Mr Major's colleagues believe that the government's recovery began
six weeks ago, following the prime minister's parliamentary victory by a
majority of three in the celebrated vote on the bill to ratify the
Maastricht treaty. If you accept this, the period of maximum demoralisation
is seen to have been only seven weeks. It began when Britain fell out of the
exchange rate mechanism on September 16 and ended on November 4, when the
Tories scraped home late at night in the Commons. During all that time no
minister or official apologised for the sudden collapse of the government's
European and economic policies. The administration has simply reasserted
itself. If fate has no more shocks in store, Mr Major's second Maastricht
success, in Edinburgh last weekend, will be seen to have closed a chapter
that, in time, could shrink to a footnote.
Yet we have all, the prime minister included, learned a great deal. Mr Major
and his colleagues have been given the roughest possible lesson in the
realities of governing with a majority of only 21. Since any dozen Tories
can, in cahoots with the opposition, topple the government, the Cabinet must
proceed with caution. This suits Mr Major's temperament. The chancellor's
Autumn Statement introduced a cautious incomes policy for public sector
workers, with hopes of a knock-on to the private sector. It threw in a timid
U-turn towards an industrial policy. When Mr Michael Heseltine has completed
his review of pit closures it will doubtless contain a careful reference to
'energy policy', an interventionist phrase until recently abhorred by Tory
ministers. Social security remains sacrosanct, and uncut. Thus have Mr
Major's Conservatives moved to the left of, say, Mr Bill Clinton's
Democrats.
The country now perceives the prime minister's principal weaknesses, which
include a stubborn defence of what has become indefensible, a reluctance to
move ahead of his party, and an assumption of grandeur combined with a
deficiency of grand ideas. It is also aware of his strengths, which lie in
the area of one-to-one negotiations, deal-making, attention to detail, and
willingness to consult his colleagues. Once the unknown Mr Nice Guy, Mr
Major has become the all too well-known flawed politician. He cannot be cast
in the heroic mould of his predecessor, which is a great relief. He is down
to size: an ordinary chap who made a dreadful mess of his extraordinary job
a month or so ago and is now recovering. We are getting to know him better.
That is just as well. He could be around for many Christmases to come.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1357</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Letter: Statistical change-over
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr W MCLENNAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I would like to correct some impressions given in Economics Notebook
(December 14) about trade statistics.
First, Intrastat, the new trade system, is a European Community-wide system
developed by the European Community. Decisions were taken Community-wide not
to overlap the new and the old customs-based trade statistics systems. The
reason for doing so was not to impose a very onerous reporting burden on the
bigger companies which will now be filling out the monthly trade statistics
returns.
Second, it is grossly unfair to infer that this decision not to overlap the
two systems is in any way related to what has happened to the UK economy at
the moment. I simply draw your attention to the fact that this pause in
publication of economic trade statistics was first announced in February
this year.
Third, to be certain that statistical returns of the Intrastat system are
complete and accurate, the period up to June will be used to check
intensively that the data meet our usual high-quality standards, including
checks against equivalent VAT returns. If other member states actually do
publish statistics before the UK, users would be advised to check their
quality very carefully.
W McLennan,
director,
Central Statistical Office,
Great George Street,
London SW1P 3AQ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1358</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Letter: Zero rating would unlock cash and cut out red tape
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Dr BERNARD JUBY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The government could unravel a veritable Gordian knot of red tape (The
Growing Business: 'Untying the tangle of red tape', December 15) by
extending the principle of zero rating value added tax on imports from EC
member states - due to be introduced on January 1 - to credit transactions
between registered traders in the UK.
This would not only unlock the many millions of pounds currently churning
back and forth in the system (since the only time that Customs and Excise
collects and keeps the money is at the final point of sale to a
non-registered trader) but would also radically reduce the potential fines,
penalties and imprisonment currently inherent in the system, even for
simple, unpremeditated error.
Who knows, the money thus unlocked could even help to stimulate Britain's
sluggish economy.
Bernard Juby,
chairman, trade and industry policy unit,
Federation of Small Businesses,
140 Lower Marsh,
Westminster Bridge,
London SE1 7AE
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1359</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Letter: Carlton TV committed to current affairs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr PETER IBBOTSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, As a one-time member of the This Week production team, I share some of
Christopher Dunkley's sadness at the passing of the programme ('Sad goodbye
to long-term survivors', December 16). A pity, though, that despite
information made available to him on This Week's final edition, he sketches
a less-than-accurate picture of the plans of Carlton, which takes over from
Thames on January 1.
The Good Sex Guide is not Carlton's 'top-ranked' factual programme. As he
knows, the major current affairs programme which we will supply to ITV is
Storyline, commissioned from a former World in Action producer of
considerable experience. It will be broadcast at 19.30 on Thursdays for the
first seven weeks of 1993, returning later for a further six editions, and
we hope thereafter on a more regular basis. That decision is for the
network, and not for Carlton to make. And the Cook Report has not been
scheduled for this slot.
Last, it seems that nostalgia breeds anachronism. It is a long time since
any UK current affairs programme found it editorially or financially
sensible to base its agenda on flying out crews 'to cover any trouble spot
in the world'. As successive editors of Panorama and This Week have
discovered over the past 15 years, the revolution in satellite
news-gathering and the multiplication of other news-based factual programmes
have made instant reaction a rare feature of the flagship titles.
That is, of course, part of a broader debate about the role and scheduling
of factual programmes. Suffice it to say that Carlton has every intention to
offer current affairs programming of quality and substance from January
1993.
Peter Ibbotson,
director of corporate affairs,
Carlton Television,
101 St Martin's Lane,
London WC2N 4AZ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1360</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Observer: No comment
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In search of an economical way of preparing your Christmas gifts in this
recession-hit year? Homes and Gardens magazine has a festive tip in its
January edition: 'Try using pages of the Financial Times tied up with
upholstery webbing for a stylish and economical wrapping idea.'
According to Observer's calculations, using the FT for wrapping paper works
out at around 3p a sheet, or less than half the cheapest available on
London's Oxford Street.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1361</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Observer: Family affairs
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Minorco may be a publicly quoted company but it has been wrestling with a
common family problem for some time - whether to choose Harry Oppenheimer's
former son-in-law or his godson to run the business.
Harry O is 84 and long since retired from Anglo American Corporation, which
controls Minorco. But his family company still effectively controls Anglo,
South Africa's biggest business, and no important decision is taken without
sounding out his opinion. So it would not be surprising if the old man had a
hand in ensuring that former son-in-law Hank Slack, 41, is made chief
executive of a streamlined Minorco. Slack has been chairman of its
management committee since 1989.
Roger Phillimore, a 42-year-old godson, has decided to call it a day and go
off 'to dabble in the arts', something he has long wanted to do. Tony Lea,
who along with Slack and Phillimore, had been dispatched from Anglo in 1988
to shake up Minorco, has been offered a job back at Anglo's headquarters in
Johannesburg.
The three young Turks arrived at Minorco with a bang - making a Pounds 2.9bn
bid for Consolidated Gold Fields. But after this failed, they lost their
adventurous spirit. Minorco's shares remain at a discount of about 40 per
cent to net asset value - the same ratio as when they started out. Having,
in effect, three managing directors couldn't have helped.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1362</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Observer: Dreaming spiral
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Oxford must be mortified by the Universities Funding Council's assessment of
research quality. Oxford lags far behind Cambridge, and barely nosed ahead
of University College, London, in the number of its centres judged to be
conducting research of an international standard.
The dreaming spires house the largest history and French departments in the
country. Both are judged inferior to their Cambridge counterparts. Oxford's
historians are even ranked behind the hoi polloi at Birmingham.
In politics and international relations, Oxford is outscored not just by the
LSE and King's, London, but by Essex, Hull and Manchester. It is a similarly
sorry tale in sociology, statistics, music, agriculture, education and
business/management studies.
Cherwell sources were quick to point to excessive teaching loads, and were
none too polite about the assessment exercise itself. They may have a point
there.
Alas, whingeing will not get the Campaign for Oxford far in its quest for
business and alumni millions. Perhaps the accumulated reserves should be
spent on a Brummie historian or two . . .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1363</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Observer: Easy come
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
So what does the man who beat Europe's central banks during the autumn
currency crisis do with his money? Today George Soros, the Hungarian-born
American financier, will give away Dollars 50m to help Bosnia. It will be
administered by the UN High Commissioner for Refugees.
While it is impossible to think of a more generous single donation by a
private individual, the sum of money is overshadowed by the profits that
Soros and his fellow investors are rumoured to have made on Black Wednesday.
Forbes magazine estimates that Soros made Dollars 1.5bn in September's
currency upheavals by selling Dollars 7bn of sterling short and buying
Dollars 6bn of D-Marks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1364</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Observer: Busting the opposition
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Elections in east Asia are assumed to be very much male affairs. Hence no
surprise that posters for the seven presidential candidates in today's South
Korean election depict one middle-aged politician after another - all short
hair-cuts dressed in business suits.
The only hint of femininity in the placard for Kim Ok-sun is her pink tie. A
former opposition MP, the 58-year-old Kim is making history as the first
woman to run for president in her country. Ever since she entered politics
in the 1960s, she has donned masculine attire in an attempt to blend in.
'Men's suits and ties are the uniform of politics,' is her view.
Contrast the approach of Hsu Hsiao-dan, a candidate in parliamentary
elections tomorrow, this time in conservative Taiwan, where breasts - her
own - have featured at the forefront of her campaign, which is running the
slogan 'let Taiwan be as firm as my breast and politics as honest as my
body'.
Accused by an opponent of having starred in a pornographic movie, Hsu
exposed a breast at a political rally to demonstrate she did not have the
film star's prominent mole. In her first, unsuccessful, election race in
1989, she bared her breasts for democracy more regularly, but has since
toned down the act. However, she still pledges to strip off in parliament if
it would aid the passage of a bill.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1365</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Letter: Prof Godley's uncanny record of economic forecasting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ANDREA BOITHO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Professor Wynne Godley's forecasting record stretches beyond having
been uncannily right about Britain's balance of payments, unemployment and
growth in the 1980s (Monday Interview, December 14).
In 1972, when editor of the OECD's Economic Outlook (and hence responsible
for forecasting), I was visited by Prof Godley, who predicted that the OECD
area would soon face a massive term of trade deterioration, with serious
consequences for inflation and real incomes. The hypothesis struck me, and
several of my colleagues with whom I checked it, as utterly implausible -
the terms of trade had hardly moved for some 15 to 20 years and even if they
were going to worsen on this occasion, the impact of any change could only
be small.
I wish I had listened to him - the OECD secretariat would have been able to
warn member countries more forcefully of the impending 1973 inflation
instead of underestimating it by the then very large margin of nearly 4
percentage points.
Andrea Boitho,
fellow and tutor in economics,
Magdalen Collage,
Oxford OX1 4AU
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1366</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Letter: Merit of positive manufacturing trade balance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr MICHAEL WILMOT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In a detailed account just published of policy changes which have taken
place since sterling's exit from the ERM, the Treasury states that, prior to
this, there was a clear and unambiguous target for policy to aim at -
sterling's position within its ERM bands. Now, though, the new regime is of
necessity more judgmental.
I have two points to make:
It was not true that the unambiguous target for policy was sterling's
position within its ERM bands. The unambiguous target was the reduction of
inflation, and the method used was the holding of sterling's position in the
ERM bands.
It is not true that the new regime has to be of necessity more judgmental;
indeed, it is especially important now that a new clear goal for policy is
put in place.
It has been heartening to see that the regeneration of manufacturing in
Britain is now almost on the government's agenda, but it is too vague a goal
currently stated.
I suggest that what is required is a new central objective to create a
positive and sustainable trade balance in manufacturing by the end of this
parliament. The merit of such a target is that, as the trade balance
improves, so will money market perceptions of sterling improve, in turn
leading to a reduction in inflation as sterling improves.
Michael Wilmot,
33 Beaufort Gardens,
London SW3 1PP
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1367</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Leading Article: Deal in the air
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ALTHOUGH British Airways yesterday secured one big advance in its global
strategy, the purchase of a stake in Qantas, the prospects are not bright
for its plan to buy 44 per cent of USAir, the sixth largest American
carrier.
The proposed deal is on Mr John Major's agenda for his talks this weekend
with President George Bush, but the signs are that insufficient progress has
been made at lower levels to permit the two leaders to provide the final
push. BA and USAir have said the bid will lapse on December 24 if it is not
approved by then.
If the bid falls, it will be a pity. Opportunities to shift the logjam
preventing Britain and the US from securing what they both say they want - a
liberal agreement on transatlantic air services - do not present themselves
every day. The UK government's desire to see BA establish itself in the US
market should have been and perhaps still can be the occasion for Washington
to prise open the British air market to the advantage of consumers in both
countries.
The three largest American airlines have led resistance to the deal because
they fear that BA, which is gaining increasing freedom to operate within the
EC, is skilfully aiming to establish itself, from its powerful Heathrow
base, as the world's leading airline.
This, they say, is not fair since US airlines are restricted in Britain and
the rest of the EC. They also argue that the BA-USAir deal would be illegal
in allowing effective control of a US carrier to pass into the hands of
foreigners. This latter issue is of the type which makes lawyers rich, since
both sides have a plausible case.
The UK's latest bid to advance the argument is to offer a three-stage
liberalisation, first involving immediate access for US carriers to
Britain's regional airports, conditional only upon approval of the BA-USAir
deal. This would be followed by the opening up of transatlantic routes to
Gatwick and Stansted airports, in return for the US easing its rules on
foreign ownership of US airlines. Finally, at an unspecified date, the two
countries would complete an 'open skies' agreement, in which US carriers
would have unrestricted access to Heathrow.
Although the US airlines have overstated their argument, there is no doubt
that they have a case on the most crucial issue, access to Heathrow, where
congestion is so great and BA's grip so firm that even a formal lifting of
restrictions would not guarantee access to adequate take-off and landing
slots. Although BA regards its Heathrow position as non-negotiable, Mr Major
should not hesitate to place it on the table. If the BA-USAir deal can be
the trigger for a big bang in liberalising transatlantic air services, it is
worth fighting for. If not, not.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1368</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Leading Article: Monopoly game
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS EASY to understand why the British government is setting up a national
lottery. If people are keen to play a game which leads to cash being
channelled to a variety of good causes, this has obvious attractions over
raising money through direct taxation.
What is much harder to understand is why a Conservative government, which
has pioneered privatisation and liberalisation, plans to set up the lottery
as a quasi state monopoly. The experience of other industries from
telecommunications to airlines is that state monopolies are inefficient,
unimaginative and lead to the government controlling a larger proportion of
national life than is desirable.
Advocates of the national lottery may say that it does not amount to
nationalisation by the back door because operating it will be contracted out
to the private sector. But the government will still pick the franchisee and
the money for good causes will be channelled through a fund controlled by
the National Heritage secretary.
Advocates of the lottery may also try to argue that it will not be a
monopoly, because charities and local authorities are allowed to run their
own small lotteries, while football pools provide punters with an
opportunity for a flutter very similar to the one which will be provided by
the national lottery.
The snag is that both charity lotteries and the pools will be competing on a
playing field tilted sharply in the national lottery's favour. The maximum
prize for a charity lottery at Pounds 25,000 pales in comparison with the
prizes of Pounds 1m and more that the national lottery will offer.
Meanwhile, pools companies pay out roughly half their takings in tax and
donations to good causes and are tightly regulated in how they can promote
their games.
It would be far better for the government to throw open the market to any
competitors which could show they would run lotteries honestly and fairly.
Applicants could include pools companies, charities and perhaps even
government departments.
At the same time, the government should create a level playing field. One
way of doing this would be to set a standard tax rate of, say, 50 per cent
on all lottery takings. Any donations to charities or other defined good
causes would be fully deductible from this tax and the profit or loss (after
donations, tax, prize money and administration costs) would accrue to the
private operators.
One could expect three main advantages from such a competitive market in
lotteries. First, the profit motive would drive down administration costs.
Second, a free market would allow punters to choose where their money went
by playing those games which sponsored their favourite causes. Finally,
since the money for good causes would not flow through a fund controlled by
a government minister, there would be no danger of the Treasury
consolidating it into public funds at some future date.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1369</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Serbia's stark choice: Sunday's elections could determine
whether the Bosnian conflict spreads into a wider Balkan war
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
After more than a year of war and economic decline, Serbs are facing a
choice between continuing international isolation and a chance for a fresh
start.
Sunday's parliamentary and presidential elections in Serbia and Montenegro,
which comprise the unrecognised Yugoslav federation, could determine whether
peace can be returned to Bosnia; they could also determine whether the
conflict spreads into a wider Balkan war.
The contest for Serbian president appears simple. Some 6.9m voters will
chose between Yugoslav Prime Minister Milan Panic, the Belgrade-born
California millionaire who promises peace and prosperity, and Mr Slobodan
Milosevic, the incumbent. Mr Milosevic promises the same, but since coming
to power in 1987 his aggressive territorial expansionism has led to the
disintegration of the former Yugoslavia and pushed Serbia relentlessly into
war and economic chaos.
If Mr Milosevic is re-elected, his policy of confrontation in Bosnia is
unlikely to change, possibly provoking ethnic violence in Serbia itself. If
Mr Panic is elected he will try - however improbably - to negotiate a peace
in Bosnia by disavowing Mr Milosevic's ambitions of creating a 'greater
Serbia'.
The alternatives facing voters should therefore be clear. But in Serbia's
distorted political landscape, where paranoia and a sense of victimisation
prevail, the race is wide open.
Amid mounting international demands to prosecute Serbian leaders as war
criminals for their 'ethnic cleansing', Mr Milosevic will cling to power at
all costs. If he fails to gain the 50 per cent majority required to win
outright in the first round of elections, western diplomats fear Mr
Milosevic will provoke ethnic violence in Serbia to rally Serbs around him.
If he is defeated in the run-off, he could refuse to cede power and unleash
a wave of violence which could spill into Kosovo in southern Serbia where
Serbs and ethnic Albanians are in conflict, and even beyond the rump of
Yugoslavia.
Clashes in these regions could draw in neighbouring Albania, Macedonia or
Hungary, and could even touch off a chain reaction eventually affecting
Greece and Turkey. By stoking unrest, Mr Milosevic would be throwing down a
blatant challenge to any successor regime.
If Mr Milosevic and his so-called Socialists (the former communists) with
their ultra-nationalist allies win a controlling majority in parliament, the
war in neighbouring Bosnia will continue and ethnic cleansing will gain
momentum in Serbia.
The Serbian president can call on the support of officials, police and
bosses of state companies who will lose their jobs if he is defeated.
Well-armed fighters loyal to the Serbian president stalk the streets of
Belgrade with impunity. If Milosevic's regime is deposed the tens of
thousands of paramilitaries would join the 40,000-strong Serbian police
force in its defence. The top echelon of the Yugoslav army has given support
to the federal government in Belgrade under Mr Panic.
State television is Mr Milosevic's most important weapon. Praise for the
Serbian president, coupled with vicious attacks on Mr Panic, have bolstered
Mr Milosevic and spread the notion that his rival is a CIA agent, conspiring
to tighten United Nations sanctions and give away Kosovo - seen by Serbs as
the seat of their civilisation - to Albania.
Few know of Mr Panic's dynamic campaign, partly because independent
television, the only service to which he has access, does not broadcast
beyond Belgrade. He tells cheering crowds he will make them rich, so he can
hand over their taxes to the state. This slogan would not win votes in the
west, but it offers a semblance of normality in a climate of fear.
Predictably, state television paints a fanciful picture of Serbia's economic
recovery under the embargo. Mr Milosevic fills the screen each night,
boasting of oil discoveries and defiantly pledging that Serbs will never
bend to the will of the international community.
Except for a flourishing arms industry, the real economic picture is a grim
contrast with Mr Milosevic's claims. Living standards have plummeted and
industry is on the brink of collapse. Inflation is running at 30 per cent a
month and the average monthly salary is about Dollars 60, a tenth of what it
was five years ago in real terms. In an effort to lure voters, workers have
been given holiday bonuses, and pensions have been paid out in full for the
first time in many months.
Before the election campaign, the Serbian opposition, disorganised and
quarrelsome, had been a thin reedy voice, defending itself against the
charge of betraying Serbia. Now, Depos, the main opposition coalition, and
the Democratic party, a centrist group, have rallied behind Mr Panic but
they, too, suffer from lack of access to the state media. The opposition,
working on a shoestring budget, is optimistic, however, saying they will
split the vote with the Socialists.
Opinion polls, many of which are unreliable because polling is still
undeveloped, predict Mr Panic will coast to victory on the back of support
in the opposition stronghold of Belgrade and a few other cities, and among
national minorities, which make up a third of Serbia's population.
For all the risks of civil war, the stark choice facing Serbia is embodied
in Mr Panic's campaign slogan: 'It's now or never.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1370</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Leading Article: French franc and D-Mark
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IS THE franc fort policy going to collapse? This hitherto unthinkable
question is gaining greater force and in the process is becoming less and
less unthinkable. Yet should the relationship between the French franc and
the D-Mark fail, far more than just the exchange rate mechanism would be
endangered.
The weakness of the French franc this month - the first such weakness since
after the ERM's 'Black Wednesday' - is not explained by the economic
fundamentals. The problem is the slow growth imposed on France by the
Bundesbank's disinflationary policies. French unemployment is expected to
have risen in 1991, 1992 and 1993. Investors doubt whether the commitment to
the ERM parity will stand the strain, especially with a parliamentary
election due next March.
How can France respond?
Realignment would be folly. A small realignment would do nothing to lower
French interest rates, while providing a trivial gain to competitiveness. A
big realignment on its own might be still worse for interest rates, would
destroy credibility and would improve economic performance too slowly.
Waiting a few more months for lower German interest rates would be far more
sensible.
Floating the exchange rate would allow lower interest rates. Given the sound
fundamentals of the French economy, floating might lead to no more than a
trivial depreciation, even with lower interest rates. The franc might even
strengthen. Granting early independence to the Banque de France would
reinforce that possibility. Yet floating the exchange rate, while
economically justifiable, would destroy the logic of the Maastricht treaty.
Given long-standing French detestation of floating exchange rates, agreement
to a float is unimaginable.
Alternatively, the link with the D-Mark could be tightened. This would at
least help lower French rates of interest to German levels. But that link
could not be made more credible by France alone. The Germans would have to
make an open-ended commitment to support of the franc. That, in turn, would
demand a joint monetary policy, which would represent an immediate move to
economic and monetary union (Emu).
Unfortunately for France, Germany will not concede Emu tomorrow, which
leaves soldiering on as the least bad choice. This is not a hopeless course.
German inflation is falling, as is German output. Provided monetary growth
slows, German interest rates should also fall, perhaps quite sharply, during
1993.
Soldiering on has an important additional advantage. Up to now Mr Kohl has
been able to have his pro-European cake and eat it. But if the French franc
were in imminent danger of crashing out of its bands, he would have to make
some choices. He could promise the Bundesbank the fiscal policy it demands
before lowering interest rates; he could commit Germany to an immediate
mini-Emu; or he could let the franc depart.
France is doomed to play its present risky game. It could yet be saved by
German recognition that its closest ally cannot be allowed to fail.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1371</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Not such a bleak midwinter: Many US retailers feel
optimistic about the Christmas season, but the longer-term outlook is still
uncertain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Tony is selling Christmas trees on New York City's West Side docks in a
makeshift stall he built just after Thanksgiving Day. Trade, he claims, has
been steady so far. But suddenly a freezing sleet storm descends. 'Just what
we don't need,' he mutters grimly, from the depths of a large sou'wester.
A Manhattan tree-seller is a minuscule part of the vast US retail sector,
but such sentiments could have come as easily from the nation's largest
store chains. They are putting a brave face on the holiday season - the
month between Thanksgiving and Christmas Day, during which retailers make up
to 40 per cent of their annual sales and 50 per cent of profits. But
lingering hopes that 1992 would be the year when holiday shoppers returned
in force have now largely been abandoned, and everyone is hoping that
vagaries, such as the weather, do not work against them.
Even if the holiday season meets retailers' expectations, the longer-term
outlook is mixed. On the plus side, the wave of bankruptcies and
reorganisations in the late 1980s and early 1990s means that some companies
are now more efficient, while pressure from the discount-store sector has
forced all chains to examine their operating practices and cost structures.
On the minus side, the retail industry is oversupplied with space, while
consumer confidence, which is closely associated with the shaky jobs market,
is at a delicate stage of recovery.
Progress for much of the past year has been patchy for the nation's
shopkeepers. According to a Salomon Bros index, monthly same-store sales
growth - that is, at stores which have been operating for more than a year -
ranged from only 1.6 per cent to 9.6 per cent in the first 11 months of
1992.
Nevertheless, the figure has topped 5 per cent in seven of these months, a
rate of underlying sales improvement not seen last year. Given that the US
inflation rate has been less than 4 per cent all year, this suggests that
some headway - albeit modest - is being made. By contrast, however, in the
early 1980s comparable store sales growth during the Christmas period
reached double-digit figures.
Individual retailers, releasing their own monthly sales figures, provide
more details. After the weak 1991-92 holiday season, most started this year
in fairly cheerful fashion - partly because their sales looked good compared
with the same period of 1990-91 when the Gulf war was about to begin.
Same-store sales growth flagged during the summer, but picked up with
'back-to-school' purchases in September. It remained relatively buoyant in
October and November.
Sears Roebuck, one of the largest and oldest US retailers, which sells
everything from furniture to fashion, exemplifies the trend. In January and
February, monthly comparable sales growth ran at 7 to 8 per cent, but by
June and July the retailer was posting declines of 2.6 per cent and 2.2 per
cent respectively. In August, matters turned positive again, and over the
past three months there has been an average comparable store sales gain of
almost 5 per cent - a revival which Mr Arthur Martinez, the new head of
merchandise operations, described as an encouraging portent for the holiday
season.
In the more specialised fashion sector, The Limited also moved from
comparable sales gains of 9 and 5 per cent in the first two months of the
year to declines in May, June and July. It, too, found autumn more clement,
and by November underlying sales growth was 8 per cent.
In large part, this pattern can be attributed to trends in the US economy,
rather than any retailing initiative. Unemployment rose early in the year,
and then declined modestly in the autumn. Consumer confidence, which sagged
mid-year, perked up last month. Consumer credit has been falling steadily;
by October, instalment debt accounted for 16.5 per cent of personal
disposable income, compared with 18.5 per cent three years ago.
But retailers are aware that results to date fade in importance compared
with those achieved in the holiday season. This began encouragingly -
despite the torrential rain which poured down on Macy's Thanksgiving parade.
One of the largest US cheque acceptance companies - which verifies and
guarantees cheque payments - calculated that day-after-Thanksgiving retail
sales were up by about 5.1 per cent nationally.
Since then, the retail industry has been waiting expectantly - largely
because, with Christmas Day falling on a Friday, the selling period starting
at Thanksgiving is two days longer this year than last. And as
Minneapolis-based retailer Dayton Hudson points out, this means that some
promotional releases, in newspapers and other media, have been delayed. As a
result, reliable assessments of trading cannot be made until after this
weekend.
Even so, some geographical nuances are already apparent. Virtually all the
'national' chains say that the west coast is proving to be worse than
expected, while the south-east is beating expectations. Carter Hawley Hale,
the Los Angeles-based fashion-store chain, which has just emerged from
bankruptcy with an approved reorganisation plan, makes 87 per cent of its
sales in California. Conditions, it says bluntly, are 'extremely tough'.
Macy's, the large New York-based department store group, sends the same
message: Florida and Georgia are buoyant, and New York City and Washington
DC are encouraging. But California remains 'very poor', because consumer
confidence remains even lower there than in many other parts of the country.
But even if, nationally, holiday sales growth turns out to be merely
respectable, Wall Street expects many retailers to see more significant
progress in profit terms. Most chains have assumed that holiday sales growth
will be modest and have therefore ordered stocks conservatively. There are
even tales of big catalogue operators scrabbling for merchandise, because
there are not enough goods to go round.
Retailers also believe that price-cutting, although still prevalent, is
slightly less fierce than a year ago. Nevertheless, savings of 40 to 50 per
cent on a wide variety of merchandise were being touted by A&amp;S, the east
coast department store chain, and Macy's. Earlier in the season, some
retailers concentrated on promoting modestly priced items. The classy Neiman
Marcus catalogue, for instance, began with several pages of 'gifts under
Dollars 25' and 'gifts under Dollars 50' - which bought anything from a
cloisonne egg box to a leather compact disc carrier.
In addition, three years in a tough trading environment have made most store
chains acutely conscious of their cost-base - they recognise the need to
employ no more than the minimum of additional staff at Christmas, time
promotions better, achieve better stock control and so on. 'Even if they
only get 3-4 per cent sales growth, I think it's going to be a good
Christmas for most retailers,' predicts Ms Barbara Wedelstaedt, analyst at
McCarthy, Crisanti and Maffei, the high-yield securities specialist.
So, assuming there are no unpleasant surprises between now and the new year,
does this mean that the US retail sector - which led the nation's economy
into recession - is heading for a robust 1993?
Not entirely. First, most store sector analysts say that there is still an
oversupply of retail space in the US. Although expansion has slowed since
the 1970s and early 1980s, consultants at Deloitte &amp; Touche calculate that
retail space has increased by 17 per cent since 1985. 'More space will have
to go out of the market,' comments Mr Irwin Cohen, a partner at Deloitte and
chairman of the accountant's retail and distribution services group.
Again, this is partly a regional problem, and in certain areas the battle
for space is still fierce. Only last month, two medium-sized discount
retailers, Caldor and Bradlees, fought in a bankruptcy court for the leases
on half a dozen stores formerly occupied by Alexander's, the now-defunct New
York City department store group - a battle won by Caldor.
Second, although sizeable retail groups such as Federated Department Stores,
Revco and Carter Hawley Hale have emerged from bankruptcy protection during
the past 12 months after restructuring their operations and balance sheets,
several retailers still have to complete this process.
Macy's, which filed for bankruptcy protection at the beginning of 1992, is
perhaps the best known. The company recently presented a business plan to
its creditors. It called for a leaner operational structure, more focus by
specific stores on local customer demands, and sharper retailing techniques.
Most retail observers warn that these measures will do little more than
bring the group up to date with rivals such as Dillard, which employ more
sophisticated retailing methods. Creditors, meanwhile, reckon that it could
be another 18 months before the bankruptcy shield is shed.
But Macy's situation is better than that of a handful of other store groups.
For example, Ames Department Stores, a general merchandise chain which now
has 369 outlets, has floundered in bankruptcy for more than two years,
closing more than 300 stores in the process. In the face of continuing
losses, its board asked for the chief executive's resignation earlier this
month as part of a management shake-up.
More fundamentally, perhaps, the challenge to the rest of the retail sector
from the discount chains shows no sign of easing. Discount chains such as
Wal-Mart and Kmart have significantly lower cost-structures and offer
cheaper prices. Some observers, however, believe that the department stores
have begun to get the measure of their opponents. Last autumn, these more
traditional retailers ran limited, discount-chain-style promotions of
'back-to-school' goods, to entice price-conscious shoppers into their
stores.
Finally, even if the recession has ebbed in the US, retailers are not
certain that consumer demand will pick up significantly next year. The
optimists argue that households have been postponing spending decisions for
several years, so that a large amount of 'pent-up' demand is waiting to be
released.
Some big retailers are much more cautious. 'I see 2, 3, 4 per cent growth
for the next couple of years,' says Mr Joseph Antonini, head of Kmart. 'I
don't see a robust economy and the reason for that is the job situation. I
think it's improving, but I don't think you're going to see 6, 7 or 8 per
cent growth rates. As retailers we have to accept this and make money within
that type of environment.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1372</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Arts: Bad picture made good
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
'And When Did You Last See Your Father?' is one of the great anomalies of
British art. Everyone knows the picture, but few could tell you who painted
it. As art it is undistinguished and was presumably always considered so,
given its unenthusiastic reception at the 1878 Royal Academy. Yet the
picture became a household favourite and remains firmly lodged in the
collective consciousness of the nation.
Madame Tussaud's waxwork tableau after the painting was dismantled only in
1989. Contemporary satirists and cartoonists such as Posy Symmonds and
Nicholas Garland still rely on readers instantly recognising any allusion to
the picture. It has never seemed to matter that this is a history painting
that records an event that never even happened.
The phenomenon of 'And When . . .' is now under examination at the Walker
Art Gallery in Liverpool (until January 10). William Frederick Yeames's
canvas is the centrepiece of this exhibition which not only places it in the
context of Victorian fascination with the Civil War but also charts its
march to fame.
'And When . . .' was a truly popular picture from the start. It was bought
by the fledgling Walker Art Gallery in 1878 as part of an acquisitions
policy that intended to appeal to 'the numerous visitors to the gallery who
are uninterested in the higher forms of Art'. The image's rapid
dissemination which, began after the turn of the century was primarily the
result of new and inexpensive photographic printing techniques. Collins was
the first publishers to use the painting to illustrate mass-market school
textbooks.
Parodying the picture in cartoons seems to date from the 1920s. In 1932
Wills issued a series of 'sectional cigarette cards' based on famous
paintings, which offered the Walker picture alongside Millais's 'Boyhood of
Raleigh' and Hals's 'The Laughing Cavalier'. Madame Tussaud's tableau was
erected the following year. A play of 1934 recreated the circumstances of
'And When . . .', as did a 'quota-quickie' film of 1936.
It is fascinating to chart the change in the Parliamentarians' critical
fortunes. For Thomas Carlyle, the Puritan revolution was the 'last glimpse
of the Godlike vanishing from this England'. Ford Madox Brown's intense
portrait of the young Cromwell emphasises Cromwell the radical and visionary
destined to uphold the literal word of God. And in his 1859 'The Night
Before Naseby', Leopold Augustus Egg accords him near divine status,
applying the imagery of Christ's Agony in the Garden for Cromwell praying
outside his tent. But by 1898, when the songwriter Frederic Weatherly
('Roses of Picardy', 'Danny Boy') based 'The Young Royalist' on Yeames's
picture, the Royalist boy is lip-tremulously heroic and the Roundhead
captain no more than a brute.
Changes similarly occur in the remodelling of the Tussaud tableau. In
1933-80, the boy - true to the picture - is represented as a nine or 10 year
old. His is therefore an adult moral dilemma: is it permissible not to tell
the truth? In the 1980-89 version he has become a little boy of five, and
the Roundheads are simply big bullies.
A recurring theme is the triumph of human kindness over sectarian loyalties.
Thus William Shakespeare Burton portrays a young Puritan woman helping a
wounded Cavalier while her brother/husband disapprovingly looks on. More
often that not, however, these genre scenes are no more convincing than
costume dramas; Frederick Goodall's chocolate-box 'Puritan and Cavalier'
seems absurd enough to be a parody of the genre at its worst. As history
paintings in the noble sense they fail miserably. This fascinating show
reveals how the fame of 'And When . . .' became self-perpetuating. What it
cannot explain is why this picture, rather than any other, should have
assumed its position of national icon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1373</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Arts: The Gift of the Gorgon - Theatre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALASTAIR MACAULAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Peter Shaffer is author of some of the most celebrated plays of our time -
The Royal Hunt of the Sun, Equus, Amadeus, Lettice and Lovage. These treat
very different subjects, and his latest, The Gift of the Gorgon, differs
from them all in that it is about a recently dead playwright, his wife and
his adult son by another woman.
The play begins with the news of Edward Damson's death. His widow Helen
(Judi Dench) is in mourning, and his son Philip (Jeremy Northam), a scholar,
pursues her in order to discover and record his father's story. At once we
are in an absorbing nexus that feels quite new in Shaffer's output. The
Damsons' marriage was one of muse and artist, whereas Philip is both a son
who never knew his father and an academic enthusiast for his father's work.
It is with the entry of the late Edward (Michael Pennington) that we
recognise that this is actually a very Shaffer play after all. Shaffer
relishes, on the one hand, dialectic, and, on the other, melodrama. The
dialectic is between the rational and the irrational, the Apollonian and the
Dionysiac: Salieri and Mozart, Miss Schoen and Lettice, and, here, the
ordered Helen and the wild Edward. Though Helen calls herself Edward's muse,
she is really his chief critic and editor. He is rebellious and adulterous.
She sacrifices her life to his career; he accuses her of castrating him.
Love turns to resentment.
I enjoyed The Gift of the Gorgon on three of the most basic levels: I wanted
to know what would happen next, I cherished several of its good lines, and I
was riveted by Judi Dench. But once the dialectic-cum-melodrama combination
became clear (during Act One), it began to feel formulaic. And not only is
the playwright wild and melodramatic (he dances an ancient Greek dance in
his bathtowel, pours red wine over his head and so on), but the whole play
is also planned to prepare you for a lurid melodramatic climax: ie How He
Died.
As Helen unfolds her story, each act ends with a climax whose real
importance we do not comprehend until Act Three. But oh] we know what's
involved. The paper] The blade] The olive-green soap] These ingredients are
so prominent in passing that we know they will return with a vengeance.
Then, at the start of Act Three, Edward arrives, paler than before: 'I slept
little last night.' Helen replies, warningly: 'And less tonight]' It is a
credit to Dench that the audience does not guffaw.
A niggling problem for the observer is the degree to which The Gift of the
Gorgon means to be autobiographical. Like the Dionysiac characters in so
many Shaffer plays, Edward is a florid theatrical conception, entertaining
but not persuasive. And so one wonders unprofitably: why does Shaffer need
to present such characters?
Peter Hall directs, and shares responsibility for the play's flaws and
virtues. Pennington is engagingly vivid as Edward, but he leaves us always
aware of his virtuoso vocal technique. Northam's Philip is expert but
deliberate. Only with Dench does art become transparent. Her playing blazes
with truth and simplicity. She is both still and intense, detached and
immersed.
At the Pit until March 11
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1374</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Tonight brings the last episodes in three dramas. In ITV's studiously odd
Gone To Seed the villainous Wesley (Peter Cook) thinks that the triplets'
garden centre is finally within his grasp (8.00). In Framed, the saga of a
super grass, Detective McKinnes (Timothy West) tries to tempt his squealer
into making a break for the spondulicks (9.00 ITV). In Son Of The Morning
Star (9.30 BBC1) General Custer fights Little Bighorn again, with Rosanna
Arquette looking decorative as his wife. ITV offers more human interest
journalism with hints of the 'Crimewatch' formula. Missing (10.40 some ITV
regions) aims to find missing people, and in addition to appeals for
information there is a record of a police sweep for young runaways in
London. A good deal of pretentious nonsense has been written about Triumph
Of The Will (12.05 BBC2), Leni Riefenstahl's notorious film about the 1934
Nazi party congress in Nuremburg. Whatever Riefenstahl herself may have
said, it obviously is propaganda, and very polished propaganda. Most of the
techniques were not new, but they were used more cleverly here than ever
before (12.05 BBC2).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1375</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Arts: The Adventures of Mr Broucek - Max Loppert on the
ENO's new production of Janacek's opera
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Janacek's fifth opera returns to London after a gap of nine years, in a
brand-new English National Opera production - the second such to be mounted
by the company in its tenure at the Coliseum. Most important opera-cities
have yet to see and hear even a single staging of this glorious and
remarkable opera. We owe our good fortune to ENO's undimmed enthusiasm for
this composer, shared by former Director of Productions (Colin Graham) and
current (David Pountney) alike, and to the continuing presence of Charles
Mackerras as our foremost Janacek conductor.
The Adventures of Mr Broucek is comedy, romance, satire, fantasy and
historical epic all in one, not sustained for long on any of those levels
but a magically elliptical and unpredictable voyage through them all. The
plot-point is simple - Broucek, a petty-bourgeois Prague landlord,
prosperous and small-minded, gets drunk at his local, and finds himself
transported out of his stupor, first to the Moon (the first part) and then
(the second) to the 15th-century Prague of the Hussite Wars.
On the Moon he encounters a gaggle of arty poseurs and Style Counsellors,
who display their wares (pretentious artefacts, fancy political nostrums)
and, in turn, mock his philistinism and carnivorous appetites. In the 15th
century, Broucek shows a distinct lack of enthusiasm for the battle against
the Germans still enveloping the city, and is condemned to death for
cowardice - yet, waking up head-first in a beer barrel, he soon brags of
having liberated the city 'single-handed'.
The realisation is complex, and studded with potential pitfalls of
background and foreground understanding. On the Moon the problem is a
combination of incoherence and excessive generosity in the choice of
satirical targets - and, indeed, their speed of delivery: the whole episode
goes at a cracking pace. In the 15th century, it is the copious references
to important but possibly unfamiliar figures and events of Czech history.
And yet, in the actual experience, problems recede and magic takes over.
Janacek's idiosyncratic dramaturgy is grappled together by the title
character - always comprehensible in his foibles, prejudices and limited
moral sense, not exactly lovable, perhaps, but utterly human; by a love of
Prague which links every image and event and infuses every note; and above
all by Janacek's score, pithy and muscular, filled with bursts of elating
visionary radiance.
With this new Broucek Pountney completes his British production-cycle of the
mature Janacek operas. In the programme he writes lucidly of the composer's
'cinematic' ie 'fast-moving, non-linear drama created by juxtaposition and
collage'. The staging, designed by Stefanos Lazaridis (sets) and
Marie-Jeanne Lecca (costumes), is a characteristically intelligent,
forcefully argued attempt to realise that peculiar dramatic modernism by
commanding every area of space and type of stage action.
Film, drop-cloths, the spin of the central revolve, the trollying on and off
of quirkily shaped props, the use of chorus in complex dance formations
(choreographer: Quinny Sacks) - all this, and much more, is set in motion
for a show that seeks a bold, fantastic foreshortening of dramatic and
visual perspective. The influence of the 1920s cinema, of Rene Clair comedy,
Vigo poetry and the magical surrealism of early Bunuel, is strongly
apparent.
In the second part, rather easier to stage, the presentation of knights and
huge caparisoned horses on stilts pinpoints exactly the time-travelling
mixture of martial grandeur and Broucek's own fuddled response thereto. In
the first, Pountney, with the aid of his own new translation (packed with
sallies enjoyable on the printed page that too often go unheard), embarks on
a virtual re-writing: the time and place are 1992, a mad whirl of
contemporary modes and manners. Starry-Eyes, Wonderglitter, Rainbowbrush and
all the other lunar aesthetes are banished; jokes about David Hockney,
feminism, political correctness, surtitles, and even some of the house's own
'interventionist' operatic fashions tumble out in quick, jolly succession.
The production has been paid for by the Coliseum audience itself, as a
result of the Pounds 100,000 sum elicited on appeal. This is a source of
justifiable pride and gratitude. Watching the opening-night account of it,
however, I wondered whether for Pountney's purposes either too much or too
little money had been raised. Much of the Moon scene looked a fearful mess,
a pudding over-egged, over-spiced and over-sugared, with technical means
constantly overstretched.
In my no doubt hopelessly old-fashioned way I yearned for a more loving,
less physically caricatured treatment of the principals, for more romance,
picturesqueness: for more matter, in sum, with less art. Two features were
securely preserved: the lyrical effulgence of the tripartite leading soprano
role, beautifully taken by Vivian Tierney; and the majesty of that
extraordinary Act 2 'vision of the author', here presented as a Vaclav Havel
figure - the production is dedicated to him - and nobly, if near-wordlessly,
delivered by Alberto Remedios.
Otherwise, the cast, which includes such company stalwarts as Bonaventura
Bottone, Paul Napier-Burrows, Arwel Huw Morgan and Christopher Booth-Jones,
tended not to make a strong impression with words and notes. This seemed
true even of Graham Clark in the title role, a wonderful tenor singing-actor
already at home with bloated-stomach and wonky-umbrella routines but not yet
wholly inside the music.
Of course this may well alter with practice and wearing-in; and no
opera-lover in search of unstaled operatic pleasures should dream of staying
away. Already, Mackerras paces the two parts as though their shape and
content were as simple as Boheme's; the wealth of knowledge, experience and
simple 'knack' in the musical unfolding is summed up in the blissful quiet
enchantments of the Act 1 curtain-close. If there were no other reason to
praise the new ENO Broucek, ENO's great Janacek conductor and his splendidly
responsive orchestra would provide reason enough.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1376</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Arts: Arts Council shares out its meagre Christmas presents
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Arts Council distributed Christmas presents yesterday in the form of
1993-94 grants to its shrinking group of clients, and managed to share out
the misery fairly equally.
The Council's grant from the government of Pounds 226m was a mere 2 per cent
increase over the current year, but by cutting its operating overheads to
the bone, it has managed to give some clients slightly more than that.
The Big Four - the Royal Opera House, Covent Garden (with Pounds 19.5m), the
RSC, (Pounds 8.47m); the Royal National Theatre (Pounds 11.16m) and the ENO
(Pounds 11.65m) - get a 2.5 per cent rise in grant: indeed there is a even a
little addition for Birmingham Royal Ballet. The South Bank receives a 2 per
cent lift to Pounds 13.42m.
The conclusion of successful funding deals with local authorities has
ensured more substantial grant increases for the Birmingham Rep (up 10.2 per
cent); the Belgrade Coventry (9.6 per cent); and Watford Palace (a 13.6 per
cent gain) while the Hampstead Theatre in London gets a rise of 17.5 per
cent to Pounds 234,400, thanks to a recent Arts Council appraisal.
In contrast, the Royal Philharmonic Orchestra is frozen at Pounds 440,000
while the Council waits to see how its new management team works out.
The Bournemouth Orchestras (6.9 per cent more at Pounds 1.48m) and the Royal
Liverpool Philharmonic (6.9 per cent extra to Pounds 1.48m) gain because
they face particular challenges next year. The LPO benefits by 6.3m, to
Pounds 1.13m, to ease its residency at the South
Bank.
Dance seems favoured, with substantial gains for Northern Ballet Theatre (up
7 per cent to Pounds 879,800) and for the companies led by Siobhan Davies
and Shobana Jeyasingh.
The Arts Councils of Scotland and Wales receive just 2 per cent more.
The fight is now on to raise the Government allocation for 1994-85 which, at
the moment, is set to be a reduced grant.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1377</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Arts: Janice Watson - Recital
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD FAIRMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Unfair penalty is paid by singers whose recitals are timed to fall in the
closing days of the Edinburgh Festival, as visitors already tend be leaving
the city. I missed Janice Watson's recital there this year and was doubly
sorry when she went on to win several awards for it - a particular
distinction, given that 1992 was such a good year in that department.
Whether her programme in the Purcell Room's Song Series was the same, we
were not told. But it was so well tailored to what this young singer does
best that one imagines some of the items at least must have travelled down
from Scotland. As we know from her operatic appearances, Janice Watson is a
soprano who has a warm lyric voice with plenty of appeal on its own account
and this recital, by and large, was used to put it in the limelight.
In the opening group of Liszt songs those awkward German consonants which
can get in the way of a singable vocal line were surreptitiously tucked
aside. This is one way to sing a piece like 'Kennst du das Land?' (not the
favourite version, but its alternative) though Goethe's poetry gets rather
short shrift. It was on the level of pure singing that she was operating and
the choice of the Three Petrarch Sonnets to follow confirmed that priority.
For these are technically demanding songs, which stretch the voice. The
young Margaret Price used to sing them with a fearless, shining beauty; Miss
Watson is a less individual talent, but she has the fullness of emotion in
her voice and hits a particularly well-controlled area right up on the top
notes where other singers struggle. The close of the first song soared to
its apex with grace, leaving her time to make music as well as get the
notes.
That was a facility which came in useful for her Russian songs after the
interval, notably a delectable Rakhmaninov 'By the window', given a properly
sensuous piano accompaniment by Iain Burnside. Here and in the Tchaikovsky
items a heart really started to beat in words and music alike. Janice Watson
will be singing Tatyana in Tchaikovsky's Eugene Onegin for Welsh National
Opera next year and the character was clearly in embryo already here.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1378</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / People: Keys departs from SBJ
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Tony Keys is to part company with Steel Burrill Jones, the insurance broker
whose recent expansion he has helped to orchestrate. Keys, now 51, leaves
SBJ in May next year, after over four years with the group. He says the
departure is entirely amicable and is part of an overall management and
boardroom reorganisation designed to equip the company for a period of
slower growth and consolidation.
David Beresford Jones, group chairman, is also retiring to devote more time
to interests outside the city. Clive Richards, currently a non-executive
director, takes over as chairman, and Michael Blackburn and Oliver Stocken
join as non-executive directors.
SBJ, which was listed in 1985, initially earned most of its profits from
broking in the controversial spiral reinsurance market - in which Lloyd's
syndicates and companies reinsure each other's exposures to catastrophe
losses. Keys and George Boden, who took over as finance director and chief
executive, respectively, in 1988, managed the group's successful
diversification, buying subsidiaries in other commercial insurance broking
businesses.
However, as trading conditions have become tougher, growth has slowed and
one recent acquisition - that of the Regis Low energy brokerage - has not
gone according to plan. 'I'm good at doing deals, developing systems,
winning new business,' says Keys, 'I don't enjoy repetition and
consolidation which are now necessary to deliver results for shareholders.'
Next year he plans to set up a consultancy but recognises that competition
could be tough; he is relaxed about prospects. 'I'll set up a little office
in EC3. But if the phone doesn't ring it will be a sweet shop in Somerset.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1379</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / People: Kerridge, new Ransomes chairman
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
John Kerridge, who left Fisons, the pharmaceuticals and scientific
instrument group, for reasons of ill-health, has found enough energy to
extend his interests in gardening.
Having already been deputy chairman, he is now to become chairman of
Ransomes, the lawnmower group, which is based in Ipswich near his home. He
succeeds Astley Whittall who will retire at the agm next April.
Kerridge left Fisons, troubled by difficulties with the US Food and Drug
Administration, last January. At that time, the company said his departure
was due to a heart condition.
Bob Dodsworth, Ransomes' chief executive, says there is considerable
difference between the stress of being a chief executive and a non-executive
chairman.
Kerridge will have an interesting challenge helping turn Ransomes round;
last year it made a loss of Pounds 4.5m. During the first half of this year
it returned to the black, making pre-tax profits of Pounds 2m, but passed
its interim dividend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1380</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / People: Non-executive directors
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ian Vallance (above), chairman of British Telecommunications, at the ROYAL
BANK OF SCOTLAND; Lord Airlie, chairman of General Accident, and Ranald
Noel-Paton, a director of General Accident, are to resign because of a
conflict of interest between General Accident and RBS's Direct Line.
*****
Anthony Barry, chief executive of CRH, at GREENCORE, replacing William
Attley, who has resigned.
*****
David Dare and Frank Edwards have resigned from BIMEC INDUSTRIES.
*****
Stephen Sherwood at BLACKLAND OIL.
*****
Stephen Lewis, an associate of Shaw and Co, at EXPLAURA.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1381</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Technology: Bingo lingo - Worth Watching
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PERHAPS you'd like to give your employers language lessons for Christmas.
Language teacher Bruce Nicol has developed a way of teaching English, French
or German in a high-tech method based on the game of bingo. BI-LINGO teaches
grammar and a minimum of 3,000 words through repetition and exploiting the
individual's desire to win.
Nicol adapts the game to suit a company's individual needs. Nicol: UK, 0424
431376.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1382</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Technology: Screens have never looked so good - Worth
Watching
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE computer buff who is having problems with his or her bifocals may
appreciate a pair of clip-on spectacles that convert fuzzy vision into clear
vision.
The designers, Direct Perception of London, say that by clipping
Compu-vision over normal distance glasses, bifocals or varifocals, they can
be brought to focus accurately at the special distance of computer screens -
about 60 to 80cms.
The lenses cover just the top half of the glasses and cost Pounds 8 a pair.
Direct Perception: UK, 081 518 2685.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1383</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Technology: Medieval fantasy - Worth Watching
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN Japan, video games are the order of the day, writes Emiko Terazono.
Earlier this month, the entire stock of one software game - 900,000 copies -
was sold on the first day it appeared in the shops.
Final Fantasy V, from software group Square, is for use on Nintendo's Super
Famicom or Super NES handheld computers. It is set in medieval times with
four knights trying to conquer a monster.
Square expects the game, priced at Y9,800 (Pounds 51.85), to have final
sales of 3m. Square: Japan, 03 5488 1525.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1384</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Technology: Japanese in your stocking - Worth Watching
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE perfect gift for the international business person who has everything
could be the latest English-to-Japanese and Japanese-to-English translation
system.
On sale in Japan from December 2, the Duet Qt notebook computer from
electronics group Sharp is no larger than an A4 file folder yet has a basic
dictionary of 79,000 Japanese words and 70,000 English ones.
The machine uses a translation algorithm known as the parallel sentence
structure system, which analyses the structure of the sentence rather than
just translating individual words. Translations performed on the machine,
which runs under the Unix operating system, can be fed into most office
computer systems for further editing.
At Y3,280,000 (Pounds 17,354) for a basic model, however, the Duet is only
likely to appear in the most exclusive of stockings. Sharp: Japan, 06 625
3007.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1385</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Technology: Jingle bells of the mobile kind - Worth Watching
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS year's high-tech Christmas present in the UK could well be the personal
mobile phone. Exploiting the low-use consumer tariffs introduced earlier
this year by the two cellular operators, Cellnet and Vodafone, both Motorola
and Sony have developed mini phones intended for personal rather than
business use.
The big advantage for the consumer is the price - Pounds 249.99 for the
Motorola model and Pounds 325 for the Sony one - and the ability to purchase
them off the shelf in high-street shops. The Motorola phone has even gone as
far as using standard long-life batteries, rather than the heavy-weight
rechargeable packs used with older mobile phones, in order to make it
appealing to the consumer.
Add a cable to attach the phones to the cigarette lighter and both can be
used in the car. Motorola: UK, 0500 555555.
Sony: UK, 0635 873322.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1386</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Technology: Drugs that lighten depression - Paul Abrahams on
why the market for anti-depressants is growing so fast
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Christmas is not the season of goodwill for all men and women. A recent
study in Birmingham suggests that on Christmas day attempted suicides
increase by 25 per cent.
Depression is a fatal illness - nearly three quarters of suicides are linked
to it. Clinical depression, the persistent and sustained feeling that the
self is worthless, the world meaningless and the future hopeless, is the
most common emotional disorder.
There is, however, no agreement about the disease's incidence because only
about 25 per cent of those depressed visit a doctor. Roger Bickerstaffe,
research director at the Belgian group Solvay Pharmaceuticals, reckons a
third of the population will need treatment at some time in their lives and
that at any one time 5 per cent will be receiving treatment.
The costs of depression are immense. The American Psychiatric Association
estimates depressive illness costs the US Dollars 27bn (Pounds 17bn) a year,
including Dollars 12.7bn through hospitalisation, out-patient treatment and
drugs. The Office of Health Economics, a UK think-tank, says the direct
costs to the National Health Service are about Pounds 333m a year.
The anti-depressant drug market is changing and growing rapidly. Although 9m
prescriptions are issued in the UK every year, most are for old and cheap
generic products.
But these older drugs, called tricyclics, are giving way to a new, more
expensive generation of medicines called selective serotonin re-uptake
inhibitors, or SSRIs. Smith New Court, the UK broker, estimates the
worldwide market has grown 20 per cent a year over the last three years from
Pounds 700m a year to Pounds 1.2bn. Geoffrey Dunbar, director of SmithKline
Beecham's central nervous system therapeutic unit, reckons the market could
quadruple by the year 2000.
Growth is partly being driven by the increased incidence of the illness,
according to a study published in this month's issue of the Journal of the
American Medical Association. General practitioners may also be more adept
at diagnosing and treating the illness which is under-recognised,
under-treated and stigmatised, according to the OHE.
There are two main categories of depression. Exogenous or reactive
depression is related to outside events such as a close death or losing a
job. However, clinicians remain unsure of the causes of endogenous
depression not linked to outside events.
'The plain fact is that nobody really knows the causes of depression,'
admits Bickerstaffe. However, he says the biological infrastructure of the
central nervous system appears to affect mood.
The hypothesis is that a shortage of naturally occuring neurotransmitting
chemicals - known as monoamines - may lead to depression, says Dunbar.
Between each nerve in the central nervous system is a gap, known as a
synapse, he explains. So that a nerve impulse can pass across the synapse
between a presynaptic nerve to a postsynaptic nerve, neurotransmitting
chemicals are released by the presynaptic nerve into the synapse. The
chemicals in the synapse then trigger a signal in the receiving postsynaptic
nerve.
A lack of these chemicals such as serotonin, noradrenalin and dopamine,
appears to suppress neurotransmitter stimulation and be linked to
depression, says Gary Tollefson, executive director of psycho- pharmacology
at Lilly Research Laboratories.
Tricyclics, the most common anti-depressants, are believed to work by
correcting the shortage of monoamines in the synapse.
Normally, once the monoamines have done their job, a proportion is
reabsorbed into the presynaptic nerve. The rest is broken down by enzymes.
Tricyclics work by hindering the reabsorption. This increases the
concentration of monoamines in the synapse and therefore stimulates the
post-synaptic nerve for longer. The drugs are effective for about 70 per
cent of patients.
The problem with tricyclics is two-fold, explains Tollefson. First they
affect the postsynaptic nerve as well as the presynaptic nerve. They
influence other neurotransmission systems, including those for dopamine,
histamine and noradrenaline. The result is a series of significant
side-effects, such as dry mouth, blurred vision, drowsiness and
constipation. Many patients fail to complete the course.
But more important is the toxicity of tricyclics. By taking five to six
times the normal dose, patients can kill themselves.
A second class of anti-depressants was developed in the 1960s called
monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs). The MAOIs work by binding with the
enzymes in the synapse that break down the monoamines. This raises the level
of monoamines and increases activity in the central nervous system.
However, these drugs also have unwanted side-effects. MAOIs are
irreversible, which means the enzyme has to be replaced, which can take four
weeks. One problem is that the enzyme which is bound to the MAOI has other
jobs including the breaking down of tyramines, chemicals found in some
cheeses and wine. Without the enzyme, levels of tyramine can build up. This
can lead to increased blood pressure, heart failure, even death.
Recent market growth has been driven by the new generation of drugs, SSRIs,
of which four are currently marketed. They are Fluvoxamine developed by
Solvay; Prozac sold by Eli Lilly, the American group; Lustral, also known as
Zoloft in north America, which is marketed by Pfizer of the US; and Seroxat,
discovered by Novo Nordisk in Denmark and marketed in most of the world by
SmithKline Beecham, the Anglo-American company.
SSRIs also work by inhibiting the amount of serotonin taken back into the
nerve terminals and so increasing its availability in the synapse. They are
no faster and no more effective than the tricyclics and considerably more
expensive. According to the OHE the cheapest tricyclic costs about 82p for
30 days treatment, compared with Pounds 33.90 for the most expensive SSRI.
They are, however, far more selective than the tricyclics and do not affect
other neurotransmission systems. Dunbar at SmithKline Beecham says clinical
trials suggest the drop out rate for SSRIs is 10 per cent less than
tricyclics. In addition, they are far less toxic than tricyclics, meaning it
is almost impossible to overdose on them.
The leading SSRI is Prozac. Its sales were hit badly in 1990 after the
Church of Scientology claimed it induced violence and suicidal tendencies.
The allegations were dismissed by the US Food and Drug Administration but
the drug's market share fell from 25 per cent in July 1990 to 21 per cent in
April the following year. Nevertheless, Prozac's sales reached Dollars 910m
last year and may reach Dollars 1bn this year.
Prozac's rivals are building up sales fast. Zoloft was launched in February
but already has sales of about Dollars 185m. Seroxat is not yet marketed in
the US where it will be known as Paxil, but had 20 per cent of the UK market
by value during the first six months of this year.
Meanwhile, drugs groups are investing heavily in the area. Bickerstaffe at
Solvay reckons 11 anti-depressants are ready to be or have been submitted to
licensing authorities. A further 30 are in development. Two SSRIs, from
American Home Products and Bristol Myers Squibb, will shortly be launched in
the US.
A number of companies, including Roche and Ciba-Geigy of Switzerland, are
working on a new class of MAOIs, called reversible inhibitors of monoamine
oxidase type A (RIMA). Unlike earlier generations of MAOIs, they do not bind
irreversibly to the enzymes necessary to break down tyramine and can be used
without dietary restrictions.
Researchers are also looking to synthesise drugs that affect only targeted
receptor cells. In addition, they are searching for compounds that replicate
or block the neuro-peptides capable of modulating the neurotransmitters.
The attractions of the anti-depression market are not limited to its size
and rapid growth, says Tollefson. Research on the central nervous system for
depression will have spin-offs in other illnesses, such as Parkinson's,
Alzheimer's and schizophrenia.
This series on new drugs looks next month at combating skin problems.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1387</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Management: Fashionable federalism - Christopher Lorenz
casts a critical eye over new theories of how businesses should be organised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER LORENZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Ever since the Maastricht treaty was negotiated a year ago, federalism has
been a thorny subject in the world of European politics. At last week's
Edinburgh summit, 'success' was achieved by evading the issue. But it will
bounce back on to the British and Danish agendas in the new year, to
universal consternation.
In the world of business, however, federalism is suddenly in high fashion
virtually everywhere.
On the academic front, the latest issues of two of the world's leading
management journals, California Management Review and the Harvard Business
Review, contain long articles by top scholars extolling federalism as the
only effective way for companies to be organised.
Countless companies, from ABB to Benetton and BP, and from Coca-Cola to
beleaguered IBM, have adopted a variety of new structures which academics -
and sometimes the companies themselves - are dubbing 'federal'.
But how federal, as opposed to just fashionable, are they? And is there
anything that corporate practitioners can teach Europe's sparring
politicians about the realities of international federalism?
First, the sore subject of definition. To Charles Handy, Britain's premier
professor of business organisation and the author of a 'new federalist
paper' in HBR*, federalism is the best way to combine the autonomy of
individual countries, states or business units with the scale benefits of
co-ordination.
The principle of federalism, says Handy, implies that power resides
fundamentally with the constituent parts. They cede some of that power to
the centre for the benefit of all. As such, federalism is distinct from
decentralisation, which implies a delegation of power from an all-powerful
centre.
Californian professors James O'Toole and Warren Bennis, authors of 'Our
Federalist Future' in the latest issue of the California Management
Review**, make a similar point. The ideal federation is non-centralised,
they say, rather than decentralised: power is withheld from the centre by
constituent units, not handed down from it.
It is not surprising that federalism is now the trend in business, say the
duo. For it allows constituent units to maintain their own integrity while
they unify for common purposes. They can reap the advantages of smallness
and independence on some issues (such as sales and service) with the
benefits of scale and integration on others (such as finance and
purchasing).
Hence the flood of business organisations which are breaking themselves down
into small units. At the same time, their corporate head offices are giving
up many of the powers they used to yield when, as at IBM, they treated
'their' whole company as a unitary organisation.
Which brings us to the first of several limitations to the federal metaphor
as applied to business.
In most corporate cases cited in both articles, the process of
'federalisation' - if such a word exists - is occurring through the very
process of decentralisation that is disparaged by the Californians. How
could it be otherwise when the centre of an established, centralised company
hands power out to the periphery?
In the case of a newly-designed entity, such as ABB, the Californian duo's
preferred notion of non-centralisation could, in theory, apply. But Handy
and the Californians - specially the latter - underrate the degree of power
held by the ABB centre in Zurich. Percy Barnevik, the group's Swedish chief
executive, may make a point of talking about central 'reporting', rather
than 'control', but the fact remains that his central 'business segment'
heads have tremendous muscle to coax, mould and, if necessary, control
people elsewhere in ABB.
A different type of new, supposedly 'federal', organisation cited by the
Californians is Benetton, the Italian clothing combine. This consists partly
of subcontracted production (by suppliers) and retailing (by franchisees),
plus centralised finance, design, development, purchasing and planning.
In current management jargon, such a structure is certainly a 'network'. But
can it really be called a federation when the main task of the suppliers is
to serve the centre? Most franchisees are also controlled with iron
authority by the central organisation. Is that 'federal'?
O'Toole and Bennis also weaken their case by confusing federations with
confederations. Handy avoids this studiously. He points out that in
confederations, unlike federations, individual states yield virtually no
authority to the centre.
A further limitation of the federal metaphor as applied to business is in
the degree of clarity and constancy of the separation of powers between
centre and periphery.
Most political federations have written constitutions, which are hardly ever
changed. So do some companies. But this does not mean that, as business
conditions alter, the balance of power cannot shift informally between the
central authority and the units. It must be able to do so, within outline
parameters, if a company is to be capable consistently of striking the
optimum balance between integration and autonomy.
In business, power-sharing with the centre will need to vary not only over
time, but also as between business units, depending on their changing
competitive, technological and financial circumstances.
Even within a business unit, different value-adding activities - such as
design, development, purchasing, production and marketing - will need, over
time, to have different degrees of international integration or national
differentiation (and semi-independence).
As Handy says, federalism is a complex mix for a complex world: 'federalism
is and must be flexible; it can never be static'.
The list of distinctions between business and political 'federations' does
not end there. Another, at least between a model business federation and the
sort now envisaged by some European politicians, centres on the core federal
concept of 'subsidiarity' - what sensible US academics prefer to call the
principle of 'localness'.
Unlike all the advocates of business federations, and some of their
corporate practitioners, few European politicians outside Germany are
prepared to apply the federal principle consistently right down their
'organisation'. The British government is the prime example, but there are
others.
Such inconsistency in a business organisation would render it ineffective,
according to Handy, O'Toole and Bennis. For a company to be able to act
quickly in today's climate, responsibility and power really do have to be
kept at the most 'local' (lowest) level possible.
As the foregoing makes clear, the meaning of federalism in a business
context is at least as hotly argued as it is in the world of European
politics. Depending on your point of view, it is either a pure term which is
applied far too loosely, or a broad one which comes in various forms.
Either way, the most sensible approach is to define exactly what one has in
mind. Some academics distinguish, for instance, between 'decentralised
federations' (such as Unilever for many years) and 'co-ordinated
federations' (typified traditionally by Procter &amp; Gamble).
The final point must be a highly practical one: that federations may be the
best (or least bad) form of business organisation for the future, but that
they are 'devilishly hard to manage', as O'Toole and Bennis aptly put it.
Barnevik at ABB recognises only too well that though power-sharing is a very
necessary act within today's organisation, this does not make it a natural
one. It has to be worked at - hard.
Barnevik clearly has plenty to teach the British and Danish governments.
Perhaps, despite Swiss voting proclivities, the next summit should be in
Zurich.
* Balancing Corporate Power. HBR Nov-Dec 1992. Reprint no 92604. Fax (US)
617-495-6985. ** Summer 1992. Fax (US) 510-642-1318.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1388</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / The Property Market: Little movement
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The total return from commercial property in 1992 will probably be close to
zero - about half a point better than the total return for the previous
year, according to Investment Property Databank, an independent research
company.
In the year to November, total returns were 0.3 per cent, while rental
values fell by 9 per cent and capital values fell by 8 per cent.
The IPD monthly index recorded little movement in November. The overall
equivalent yield remained at 9.9 per cent and the total return for the month
showed only a slight improvement, rising to 0.1 per cent. Both rental and
capital values continued to fall, by -0.9 per cent and -0.7 per cent
respectively.
Retails posted the best results of the three sectors, both in terms of the
monthly and year-on-year total returns. The retail sector remains the
preferred investment area.
In November, retail yields edged downwards from 9 per cent to 8.9 per cent,
while capital values fell by 0.3 per cent and rental values by 0.5 per cent.
Office returns have remained relatively stable, albeit low, over the year.
The current year-on-year total return is -6.3 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1389</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Managment: Flirting with danger at the office party - Jan
Winster warns that employers may be legally liable if festive celebrations
go too far
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAN WINSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The office Christmas party is the one time during the year when hierarchical
barriers between company employees are traditionally lowered.
Later, cases of innocent flirtation induced by too much alcohol and good
cheer often assume legendary status in the unofficial annals of companies
large and small.
But there are cases where the recrimination can be based on more than
embarrassment. Charges of sexual harassment can follow, and there are
circumstances in which employers can be held liable.
The Equal Opportunities Commission describes sexual harassment as 'unwanted
verbal or physical behaviour which, on grounds of sex, adversely affects the
victim or threatens the victim's privacy, dignity or self-respect in the
workplace'.
Sexual harassment can include sexual advances or remarks, or threatening,
patronising or humiliating behaviour which affects the victim's work
performance or creates a stressful working environment.
But the legal definition of the 'work environment' has been broadened. It is
increasingly clear, for example, that employers can be brought into cases in
which the alleged actions took place while employees were undertaking a
broad range of expected duties.
Normal duties such as training fall in the category. But so too do social
events, including Christmas parties. The key is whether employees were
expected to attend such functions.
That can obviously be a grey legal area. But it may not require evidence of
written or verbal orders to staff to attend such a function to show that
employees were expected to participate in a particular activity.
Employers are also liable for the actions of employees during the course of
their employment, even if they are not aware of the behaviour of those
employees. There is a prima facie responsibility against which the
employer's only defence is that appropriate preventive action has been
taken.
It might not be only politically correct, but also cost effective, for
companies to develop a sexual harassment policy. A clear written policy
statement needs to be accompanied by appropriate procedures to make clear
that all forms of harassment are unacceptable in the work place.
Such policies need to specify that sexual harassment includes unwanted
behaviour such as touching, offensive language, jokes and graffiti. Staff
training to prevent sexual harassment and counselling for any victims will
give a positive message to employees that the company intends to pursue an
anti-discriminatory policy. Companies also need to devise measures to ensure
that victimisation does not occur to anyone who reports such incidents.
The Equal Opportunities Commission publishes a free Guide for Employers to
the Sex Discrimination Acts of 1975 and 1986, which will fit neatly inside
any company Christmas card.
The measures it suggests might frustrate some proposed party games, but they
might also protect employers from becoming the unwitting third party in a
seamy court case.
The author is a social worker in the East Midlands with wide experience in
equal opportunities issues
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1390</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / The Property Market: Cracks became chasms - Vanessa Houlder
on 1992's litany of business failures
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It is more than three years since the UK commercial property sector went
into decline, but 1992 was undoubtedly the year when the cracks became
chasms.
The past year produced a litany of disastrous corporate news. In March,
Randsworth, a West End company bought by US investors at the peak of the
market in 1989, went into receivership with debts exceeding Pounds 350m.
In April, Speyhawk disclosed that its liabilities exceeded its assets by
Pounds 70m and that it was in talks with its bankers. So too did Heron, the
property, finance and trading group, with net debts of Pounds 1.3bn.
In May, Mountleigh, a small wool manufacturing company that was transformed
into one of the most audacious deal-makers on the stockmarket, went into
receivership with debts of Pounds 400m. Rosehaugh, another notable developer
and trader, later went into receivership with debts of Pounds 350m.
But undoubtedly the most devastating collapse was that of Olympia &amp; York,
the world's largest developer. In May, O&amp;Y filed for insolvency protection
in Canada and the US. Within days, Canary Wharf, O&amp;Y's Pounds 1.5bn
development in London's docklands was put into administration.
In absolute terms, the downturn is the worst the UK has ever experienced. An
estimated Pounds 90bn has been wiped off the total value of commercial
property in the UK, which in 1989 stood at Pounds 250bn, according to
figures from surveyors Hillier Parker and the London Business School.
Some 32m square feet of office in central London is unoccupied. Bank debt to
property companies stands at more than Pounds 35bn. Since April 1990,
property businesses have been going bankrupt at the rate of one every 36
hours, according to figures from accountants Touche Ross.
But however cataclysmic this recession may be to its victims, it is worth
recalling that the market has been through some spectacular ups and downs
before.
The unbridled capitalism of the 19th century unleashed booms and busts every
quarter of a century. The break-neck expansion of London was periodically
interrupted by mass bankruptcies among property developers. The problems
experienced by John Nash, the Prince Regent's architect, to get Regent's
Street and Regent's Park built and let 'make Canary Wharf seem a passing
local difficulty', said Simon Jenkins, the ex-editor of the Times, in a
lecture broadcast in London last week.
In the 19th century London was littered with new developments which, like
Canary Wharf, appeared to be white elephants. Parts of Notting Hill, for
example, became a ghost town when they were developed in the mid-1800s. It
was described by the journal Building News as 'a graveyard of buried hopes'.
There has been no let-up this century in London's expansion or the cycles of
boom and bust. The oldest property slump in living memory was the depression
of the 1930s, when the UK economy shrank by a third and property values fell
by a quarter, according to a surveyor working at the time.
The second world war also precipitated a 'sudden and sweeping' decline in
values, according to The Property Boom by Oliver Marriott. One prominent
casualty was Jackie Phillips, one of the biggest pre-war developers, who
died on Christmas day 1939 'impoverished, his banking accounts overdrawn and
his credit stopped'. Widespread disaster in the sector was only averted by a
moratorium on loans by insurance companies, building societies and other
lenders.
One of the market's biggest upheavals was in the 1970s. This was due in part
to the post-war introduction of a planning system which restricted supply
and encouraged prices to overheat during periods of prosperity.
In the period of heady development in the early 1970s, property profits rose
to a level which Lord Barber, the then chancellor, described as 'obscene'.
In 1973, Clive Jenkins, a trades union leader, said the activities of
property developers were 'destroying the middle classes, encouraging petty
crime and had led to a decline of investment in manufacturing industries'.
The downturn, when it came, was abrupt. 'It was equivalent to walking out of
the house and, before you reach the corner, there is an earthquake', said
Willie Stern, a developer whose bankruptcy in 1978 with debts of more than
Pounds 104m propelled him into the record books.
When Margaret Reid assessed the 1970s property crash for her book The
Secondary Banking Crisis 1973-75, she described it in terms that makes the
present downturn seem tame.
'Never since the South Sea Bubble (in the 18th century) had there been such
a massive evaporation of speculators' expectations as at that time in the
previously euphoric property market.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1391</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Lottery bill does not allay fears
of voluntary sector leaders
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN PIKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE bill has not allayed the fears of voluntary sector leaders that the
lottery will damage charities' fund-raising activities, Alan Pike writes.
Ms Judy Weleminsky, director of the National Council for Voluntary
Organisations, said the lottery was an ambitious and bold scheme, but a
number of safeguards for the voluntary sector must be addressed by MPs.
Charity managers have two related concerns. One is that the lottery will
reduce their income, particularly from sources like street collections and
small charity lotteries. The other is that national lottery proceeds will
not compensate for such a loss because charities will be only one of several
causes to benefit.
Some charity managers believe the voluntary sector's income will be reduced
unless 50 per cent of distributed lottery proceeds go to charities.
Mr Frank Flannery, managing director of UK Charity Lotteries - a
charity-owned organisation that runs lottery games - said provisions in the
bill to increase prizes in charity lotteries were a 'totally inadequate
safeguard.'
There was a grave danger that Pounds 260m currently raised by charity
lotteries would be completely wiped out by the national lottery.
The Institute of Charity Fundraising Managers said the voluntary sector
would be able to support the Bill only if the government provided
compensation for the potential downturn in charities' income.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1392</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Quotes of the year
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
'There is no point in going back to 1987 and 1988. The question is who's
going to get the economy moving, and anyone who thinks its the Labour party
must be stark staring bonkers'
Norman Lamont 1 April
'I am humble enough to recognise that I have made mistakes but politically
astute enough to know that I have forgotten what they are'
Michael Heseltine 3 April
'People in a democracy respect a leader who will say: 'I have not been right
all the way down the line; I have no monopoly of wisdom''
Neil Kinnock 3 April
'I am consulting with colleagues to inform them of the action I propose to
take in the wake of the election defeat. I will make a full statement on
Monday'
Neil Kinnock 9 April
'I got more egg on my face during the election than anyone - except for the
pollsters'
John Major 9 April
'The ERM is not an optional extra, an add-on to be jettisoned at the first
hint of trouble. It is and will remain at the very centre of our
macro-economic strategy.'
Norman Lamont 10 July
'Today has been an extremely difficult and turbulent day . . The government
has concluded that Britain's best interests are served by suspending our
membership of the exchange rate mechanism'
Norman Lamont 16 September
'The question is whether it is the prime minister or tabloid editors who
determine who should serve in the British cabinet'
David Mellor 24 September
'Last week the chancellor didn't just stop supporting the pound. He stopped
supporting the prime minister, leaving him floating downwards - to find his
own level'
Gordon Brown 28 September
'The opt-out prime minister leading a do-nothing government off the European
stage . . We were promised a new statesman, and what have we got instead?
The spectator'
John Smith 29 September
'Allowing the pound to float is not the outcome I sought, but nor is it the
sort of catastrophe that some have tried to suggest'
Norman Lamont 8 October
'I told you so'
Sir Alan Walters 8 October
'These decisions have been taken only after the most careful consideration.
They are painful, but essential to secure the industry's future and cannot
be postponed'
Michael Heseltine on the pit closure plan 13 October
'The consultation period will be aimed at considering all views without
restriction . . It will be a genuine review'
Michael Heseltine 21 October
'Progress has been made. It is not enough. It has taken six months, but six
months in the history of Ireland is but an evening gone'
Sir Patrick Mayhew announcing collapse of Ulster talks 11 November
'I was in Brussels with M Delors, negotiating our contribution to the
European Community, and to have to leave that meeting to telephone my
private office to answer questions about whether I had bought a bottle of
wine in Paddington, and the price of that wine, was the height of absurdity'
Norman Lamont 4 December
'The summit that put the (European) Community back together'
John Major on Edinburgh 13 December
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1393</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Smith firm on policy for benefits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN SMITH, the Labour leader, yesterday said he opposed moving away from
universally available social security benefits - apparently pre-empting the
impact on party policy of the independent Commission on Social Justice he
was launching.
Mr Smith said the 16-member commission would carry out the most sweeping
review of employment, tax, benefits and 'the social condition of our nation'
since the Beveridge report 50 years ago.
Labour would 'gain enormously' from the ideas the commission recommended, he
said. He would welcome a 'fresh examination' of Labour's support for
mortgage-interest tax relief, although he did not suggest its policy would
change. Mr Smith said there was 'a very strong case for having child benefit
and the retirement pension as universal benefits'.
His remarks jarred with past hints and indications from shadow cabinet
members that the Labour leadership would completely rethink tax and benefit
policy - including extending benefit targetting.
His comments also annoyed some Labour MPs. Mr Frank Field, MP for Birkenhead
and chairman of the Commons' social security committee, said: 'Everything
must be up for consideration. There are no sacred cows. It should not be an
exercise in merely shuffling our prejudices.'
Tax and the cost of Labour's spending proposals were widely regarded in
April as having contributed to the party's fourth successive general
election defeat.
The Commission on Social Justice, chaired by Sir Gordon Borrie, former
director-general of fair trading, is expected to report in 18 months. Mr
Smith said it was 'akin to a Royal Commission'.
The need for its work was as great as when Sir William Beveridge reported in
1942, Mr Smith said. 'In an increasingly competitive world, Britain cannot
afford poverty. Neither can we afford such high levels of unemployment . .
We should no longer be thinking just in terms of providing a safety net, but
of creating a springboard to independence, self-reliance and personal
fulfilment.'
At least one member - Mr David Marquand, professor of politics at Sheffield
university - is a Liberal Democrat supporter. But the Liberal Democrat party
said the commission would do little to help build an anti-Tory pact. 'It
moves an inch when the need is to move a mile,' said an aide to Mr Paddy
Ashdown, Liberal Democrat leader.
Sir Gordon hopes for consensus on the commission, even though the past
record of its members suggest disputes on the principle of universality. He
believed Labour would look 'kindly' on its conclusions but said the exercise
'will be of value in itself for the political life of this country'.
Sir Gordon's starting point was a belief in the importance of social
cohesion and common purpose but also of individual opportunity. The
commission will be serviced by the left-leaning Institute for Public Policy
Research.
Other members are: Mr Tony Atkinson, professor of political economy at
Cambridge university; Ms Anita Bhalla, editor of Asian programmes on BBC
radio in Birmingham; Mr John Gennard, professor of industrial relations at
Strathclyde university; the Very Rev John Gladwin, provost of Sheffield
cathedral; Mr Christopher Haskins, chairman of Northern Foods; Ms Patricia
Hewitt, deputy director of the IPPR; Dr Penelope Leach, president of the
Child Development Society; Ms Ruth Lister, vice-chairman of the National
Council of Voluntary Organisations; Mr Bert Massie, director of the Royal
Association for Disability and Rehabilitation; Dr Eithnie McLaughlin,
lecturer in social policy at Queen's University, Belfast; Ms Emma MacLennan,
vice-chairman of the Low Pay Unit; Mr Steven Webb, economist at the
Institute for Fiscal Studies; Ms Margaret Wheeler, national officer for the
health service union Cohse; Mr Bernard Williams, professor of moral
philosophy at Oxford university.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1394</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Turbulence marks 'annus Majoris' -
Alison Smith looks back at the prime minister's year since his general
election victory
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS John Major sped off on the last day of the Westminster term for his final
overseas trip as EC president, he could reflect that the year had turned out
rather better than he might have expected in January, if rather worse than
he might have hoped in April, when the Conservatives won a historic fourth
term in office.
APRIL
After an election campaign during which it appeared that Mr Major was the
only person in the UK who was sure the Tories would win, the prime minister
continued to sound upbeat. Two women joined his cabinet, but Tories heard
almost as much from Mrs Margaret Thatcher who said, cryptically, that Mr
Major was 'not his own man'.
MAY
The opening of parliament highlighted plans such as the privatisation of
British Coal and the toughening of asylum law. William Waldegrave, public
service minister, moved towards open government by publishing lists of
cabinet committees and cabinet office guidance for ministers.
JUNE
The start of the UK's six-month presidency of the European Community, and
the political idyll for the Tories was broken by the Danish referendum No to
Maastricht. Over 100 MPs, mostly Tories, signed a Commons motion calling for
a 'fresh start' in the UK's policy on the European Community. Mr Major
insisted Maastricht was 'good for Britain and good for Europe', but decided
to postpone its further consideration until the autumn anyway.
After attending the Rio world summit on the environment, which came under
fire for achieving too little, Mr Major insisted it was a 'milestone' that
so many nations had committed themselves to further action.
JULY
The row over Europe intensified. Baroness Thatcher (as she had become) used
her maiden speech in the Lords to renew her call for a referendum on
Maastricht. Tory Euro-sceptics accused Norman Lamont, the chancellor, of
selling the UK's sovereignty in agreeing to a minimum VAT level.
John MacGregor, the transport secretary, published the government's plans
for privatising British Rail, and Malcolm Rifkind, the defence secretary,
promised a peace dividend. Sir Patrick Mayhew, the Northern Ireland
secretary, achieved a breakthrough when Northern Irish parties agreed to
talk to the Dublin government.
Mr Lamont said that the annual public spending round would be particularly
tough because of a new 'top-down' system to keep departmental budgets within
an overall limit. Mr Major duly rejected recommendations for pay rises of up
to 24 per cent for senior officials and judges, proposing 4 per cent
instead.
AUGUST
With parliament in recess, Mr Major chaired a conference in London on the
former Yugoslavia that agreed a framework for negotiating peace, but which
had little confidence in the goodwill of the warring factions.
SEPTEMBER
Black Wednesday, when sterling was suspended from the European exchange rate
mechanism, put even other pieces of bad news during the month into
perspective.
The Treasury and the German Bundesbank swiftly began wrangling over their
very different impressions of what had happened.
Mr Major talked of being swept away in a hurricane of speculation, and was
widely seen as having lost his first encounter with Mr John Smith, the new
Labour leader, who made a witty and effective debut in the emergency
economic debate.
Though Mr Major had made clear his continuing support for his friend David
Mellor, the national heritage secretary resigned after a succession of
stories about his private life unnerved Tory MPs.
OCTOBER
The Tory party conference was racked with conflict over Europe, though Mr
Major dismissed reports of divisions as 'froth and bubble'. Yesterday's Tory
idols, Baroness Thatcher and Lord Tebbit, made heartfelt attacks on
Maastricht; Mr Hurd warned against the madness of the party tearing itself
apart over the issue, and won the conference vote.
Scarcely was the conference over when British Coal announced that 31 pits
would close, making 30,000 miners redundant, because of insufficient demand.
Within 10 days, after clamour from Tory MPs, the government had U-turned and
promised a full review. The row, which mobilised public campaigns in places
as unlikely as Cheltenham, completely upstaged the Birmingham EC summit,
which discussed 'subsidiarity' - making EC decision-taking at the most local
level possible.
NOVEMBER
The trial of three Midlands businessmen accused of breaking the embargo on
arms sales to Iraq collapsed after Alan Clark, a former minister, admitted
the government had known what the businessmen were doing. Mr Major said he
hadn't known and, amid charges of a government cover-up, announced an
independent inquiry.
The government won a critical Commons debate on proceeding with the
Maastricht bill by just three votes, after Mr Smith managed to unite his
party around a policy of opposing the government by waiting for the Danes.
As would-have-been Tory rebels complained about the strongarm tactics from
government whips, one waverer said he had been won over by Mr Major's
promise to him that the final Commons vote on the bill would not come until
after a second Danish referendum.
Mr Lamont's Autumn Statement cheered Tory backbenchers with its emphasis on
capital projects and a strict 1.5 per cent ceiling for public sector pay.
But Mr Lamont himself looked accident-prone after consecutive rows about a
credit card bill and his acceptance of taxpayers' money towards legal costs.
The political talks about the future of northern Ireland collapsed as they
ran up against the agreed deadline.
DECEMBER
MPs began their marathon of detailed consideration of the Maastricht bill,
with less drama and more boredom than forecast. Mr Major's performances
continued to improve against Mr Smith at their bi-weekly duel at question
time in the Commons.
Mr Major told MPs about his triumph at the Edinburgh EC summit. Against
expectations, the meeting reached consensus on how to enable the Danes to
ratify Maastricht and the EC's future finances. Amid growing concern about
the former Yugoslavia, the last gasps of domestic politics came as the
government faced the sharper-than-expected rise in unemployment, which went
up by 41,100, its 31st consecutive monthly rise.
Joe Rogaly, Page 13
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1395</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Sitting suspended as Scots protest
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN, Parliamentary Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A DOZEN fiery Scottish Labour backbenchers disrupted the Commons yesterday
by defying Miss Betty Boothroyd, the speaker, and forcing her to suspend the
sitting for just under three hours.
In vain attempts to secure a government statement on proposals to confer
trust status on more Scottish hospitals, they capped two rounds of bogus
points of order by staging a disorderly demonstration.
Led by Mr Ernie Ross, MP for Dundee West, and Mr George Galloway, MP for
Glasgow Hillhead, the small group of protesters, mostly from the Scotland
United faction, stood in the centre of the Chamber in front of the mace,
symbol of the Crown's authority.
Mr Michael Morris, the deputy speaker, ordered an initial five-minute
suspension when his appeals for seasonal goodwill as MPs prepared to
disperse for the three-week Christmas recess were ignored.
When the sitting resumed Miss Boothroyd took the chairbut her attempts to
persuade the protesters to comply with the rules of the House were no more
successful than those made by Mr Morris.
In ordering the more prolonged suspension Miss Boothroyd made clear her
determination to ensure that nothing interfered with the final item on the
agenda - her announcement of the measures given royal assent by the Queen.
When the House reassembled at three o'clock Miss Boothroyd announced that
three measures - the Consolidated Fund (Number 3) Act, the Sea Fish
(Conservation) Act, and the Civil Service (Management Functions) Act - had
received royal assent.
She immediately adjourned the House and the deputy serjeant-at-arms removed
the mace before protesters could take any further action.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1396</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: MPs may back extension for coal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
POSTPONING the deregulation of the electricity market is likely to be the
centrepiece of the proposals of the Commons select committee on trade and
industry to boost the coal industry.
MPs believe this would provide a necessary three to four year 'bridge' for
British Coal to raise productivity to a level where it would compete on
world markets.
MPs finished two months' of hearings this week and aim to have their report
ready by mid-January, ahead of a white paper by Mr Michael Heseltine, trade
and industry secretary.
Postponing deregulation would extend present arrangements which give British
Coal protected access to 70 per cent of the domestic power generation
market. Under the current timetable, its protected access will be reduced to
50 per cent of the market in 1994.
The all-party committee, chaired by Mr Richard Caborn, Labour MP for
Sheffield Central, is also warming to the idea of an energy commission to
set policy and provide long-term stability. Members are concerned that the
government does not have adequate powers to manage the energy market, and
that it is leaving the regulators in command.
Other measures the committee is considering include:
Making the cross-channel link with the French electricity grid revert to its
intended role as a balance to cover peaks and troughs, rather than as a
source of imports.
Stopping the switch to orimulsion, derived from coal waste, as a power
station fuel.
Diverting part of the nuclear levy into the coal industry, but as a subsidy
for cleaner coal technology rather than a price support. This would get
round EC limits on energy price subsidies.
Requiring British Coal to squeeze the last coal out of doomed pits. This
could be done cheaply as part of a 'rape and pillage' exercise, and the coal
offered on the export market at world prices.
These measures could boost coal demand by over 30m tonnes a year, though
between 20-25m tonnes is more likely.
MPs seem unlikely to support other widely canvassed options such as cutting
back the nuclear power industry to make more room for coal. This would
involve heavy decommissioning costs. But in return for being spared the axe,
nuclear power could be made to give up a portion of its levy income.
Making an outright subsidy for coal is unlikely to be suggested because of
the state of public finances.
It also looks as if the committee will leave gas alone because of the lack
of clear evidence that it is stealing market share from coal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1397</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: DTI says costs of renewable energy
are high
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX, Environment Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ELECTRICITY generated by most forms of renewable energy is several times
more expensive than using conventional fuels, according to a long-awaited
report commissioned by the Department of Trade and Industry.
But the report - which was originally due in the spring and was published
yesterday - calls for government intervention to help renewables become
established. It argues that current prices of coal, gas and nuclear energy
do not reflect start-up and environmental costs.
The Renewable Energy Advisory Group argues that large offshore wave energy
projects are unlikely to be uneconomic.
A separate review for the DTI on the potential for wave energy, published at
the same time, comes to the same conclusion for 'the short to medium term'.
The advisory group, which began work in September 1991, says that with
government help renewables could 'plausibly' contribute between 5 per cent
and 20 per cent of 1991 levels of electricity supply by the year 2025.
It estimates that this could save at least 10m tonnes a year of carbon
dioxide emissions - around 5 per cent of projected emissions of the gas,
which is believed to be implicated in global warming.
The report makes clear that most renewable energy costs at least two to
three times as much as existing sources. Costs quoted for coal, gas and
nuclear energy by the energy industry are between 2.2 p and 3.5 p per kWh,
although the figures are disputed by environmentalists.
The report recommends the government to help investment in renewables by
underwriting a minimum level of 1,500MW by the year 2000 compared with the
present agreed level of 1,000MW, and by guaranteeing fixed-term electricity
supply contracts of between 10 and 15 years.
The report urges the government to do this through the Non-Fossil Fuel
Obligation which requires the regional electricity companies in England and
Wales to take a specified amount of power from 'clean' energy sources.
The extra cost, funded by a levy on electricity consumers, is devoted almost
entirely to nuclear energy. The government would need permission from the
European Commission to extend the levy beyond 1998, the present limit.
Friends of the Earth, the environmental pressure group, criticised the
'short-term' approach to wave energy and the 'puny target' of 1,500MW from
renewables by 2000, recommending instead a target of 3,500MW.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1398</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Lottery launched amid pools row
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR PETER BROOKE, the national heritage secretary, posed happily yesterday
beside an ancient oak chest with 18 locks on the front and sides and six
padlocks on the lid. It was one of the chests used in the Million Lottery
held in 1694 to raise money for an English war against the French.
'Samuel Pepys (the diarist) said it was the talk of the town; we hope our
new lottery will become the talk of the nation,' said Mr Brooke as he
outlined details of the bill to establish the first national lottery in the
UK for more than 150 years.
The proceeds of this latter-day lottery, which could eventually raise
several billion pounds a year and is expected to have a top prize each week
of more than Pounds 1m, will be split equally between the arts, heritage,
sport, charities and a new fund to celebrate the year 2000.
'The National Lottery will be an additional source of money for schemes that
might otherwise never be realised. This money will not substitute for other
government spending,' Mr Brooke insisted.
The lottery will be run by the private sector, regulated by a
director-general of the National Lottery - Oflot. A single main licence will
be awarded by tender for the setting up of the infrastructure of the
lottery. There will be a series of sub-licences, which could go to separate
companies to run individual games. The main licence holder could also run
individual games.
Mr Brooke promised games ranging from scratch cards with instant prizes to
weekly computer draws. Tickets will cost Pounds 1.
No one would predict yesterday how much the lottery was likely to raise,
what the level of taxation would be or what proportion of the money would go
in administration.
A turnover of Pounds 1.5bn a year, Mr Brooke suggested, could mean around
Pounds 14m in prizes a week - a prize/turnover ratio of just under 50 per
cent. The level of tax is expected to be less than 20 per cent.
The National Lottery, which should be operating before the end of 1994, is
designed to provide everything from swimming pools and sports complexes to
theatres and arts centres.
The money raised will go to a National Lottery Distribution Fund, to be
split into five separate accounts for the five good causes. The money will
then go to five specialist bodies, each of which will have 20 per cent of
the proceeds for distribution.
For the arts - 97.2 per cent will go to the Arts Council of Great Britain
and the remaining 2.8 per cent to the Arts Council of Northern Ireland.
For sport - 83.3 per cent will go to the Sports Council, 8.9 per cent to the
Scottish Sports Council, 5 per cent to the Sports Council for Wales and 2.8
per cent to the Sports Council for Northern Ireland. The allocations are
based on population.
For heritage - the Trustees of the National Heritage Memorial Fund, which
tries to save mansions and paintings for the nation. Its lottery
distribution will be separated from its grant-funded work.
For charities - a new National Lottery Charities Board will distribute funds
earmarked for charitable organisations.
For the Millennium Fund - a Millennium Commission will be set up to consider
and distribute money for projects to mark the beginning of the third
millennium.
The heritage secretary will be able to vary the percentage of money for the
five main categories but not less than 5 per cent should go to each. The
millennium commission will be chaired by the heritage secretary. Members
will be appointed by the Queen.
'I believe the public will come forward with many exciting ideas about how
best we should celebrate and commemorate the year 2000,' Mr Brooke said.
There were no concessions for the anxieties of football pools promoters,
other than a commitment to keep talking.
'Skill is a factor when filling in pools coupons,' Mr Brooke said.
'Lotteries are games of pure chance. The lottery will not attract the
gambler. We expect it to attract a new section of the population, people who
are willing to have a flutter knowing that - win or lose - money will be
going to good causes.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1399</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Factory output per head up sharply
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRODUCTIVITY in manu-facturing industry increased sharply in October,
reflecting a small increase in output and a big drop in the labour force
during the month.
The Department of Employment said yesterday that manufacturing output per
head in October was 5.9 per cent higher than in the same month last year.
In the three months to October, productivity was 1.9 per cent higher than in
the three months ending in July and 5.2 per cent higher than in the
August-October period of last year.
The productivity increase combined with relatively moderate wage increases
to hold down unit labour costs.
Wages and salaries per unit of production in UK manufacturing industries
rose 0.4 per cent in October compared with October last year.
The increase in the three months to the end of October was 1 per cent
compared with a year before.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1400</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Top-quality research 'is scarce'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MOST top-quality research is concentrated in barely a dozen of Britain's
universities, assessments by the Universities Funding Council indicated
yesterday.
The assessments, which give a ranking to every university research centre in
the country, show that fewer than 50 of Britain's 130 universities, colleges
and university institutes have two or more centres judged to be conducting
research of international standing.
Of the 344 centres judged to be at that level nearly a third are in just
four institutions: Cambridge University, Oxford University, University
College, London, and Imperial College, London.
The former polytechnics scored poorly in the exercise, which they have
entered for the first time since joining the university sector. This caused
little surprise given their lack of research funding and their status as
teaching institutions.
But a number of older universities are in the same position. Five, including
Aston and Bangor, have no department of international standing and a further
eight, including Salford, Aberdeen and Dundee, have only one.
The assessments, the first since 1989, are crucial to universities as they
are used by the council to allocate research funding, which was worth Pounds
860m in 1990.
Each university research centre is ranked on a one-to-five scale. Next
year's research funding will be linked to the new rankings with funding
concentrated on departments achieving the higher four rankings, especially
on those with the highest rankings.
The council said its survey was based on 'rigorous' assessment of the output
of more than 43,000 academics by 450 of their colleagues and some outside
assessors.
Professor Graeme Davies, chief executive of the council, said: 'The ratings
have been decided by academic staff and others who are all experts in their
subjects. The judgments are theirs. The role of the UFC was to manage the
exercise and ensure it was conducted fairly and consistently according to
clear guidelines.'
The Committee of Vice-chancellors and Principals welcomed the evidence that
'old' universities had improved research quality since a similar exercise in
1989. Dr David Harrison, the committee chairman, said that against the
backdrop of rising student numbers it represented 'a remarkable tribute to
our dedicated and underpaid staff'.
Mr John Stoddart, vice-chancellor of Sheffield Hallam University, a former
polytechnic, said the assessment would lead to 'a very substantial increase'
in state funding for the new universities, even though only one,
Westminster, achieved a top grade - and even that institution obtained only
one.
The success of many in achieving mid-ranking scores for some departments
will open up new funding opportunities for them.
The assessment shows research quality to be unevenly distributed. In
history, 82 centres were assessed, and only five were judged to be of
international standing. In anatomy 18 centres yielded four of international
standing. In nursing none of the 29 centres assessed were found to be at
that level.
The top-scoring institutions in business and management studies were the
universities of Bradford, Warwick, Lancaster and Strathclyde, the London
Business School, the London School of Economics and UMIST in Manchester.
The survey is the third to be conducted. Previous assessments covering the
work of all academic staff in institutions were carried out in 1986 and
1989. This year's assessment required institutions to put forward only those
staff they judged to be 'active' in research.
Institutions were invited to submit up to two publications and up to two
other forms of public output for each 'active' staff member. The panels of
assessors also took into account research grant and contract income, total
numbers of publications and numbers of research students.
The council has yet to assess teaching quality in the way it has judged
research. The new Higher Education Funding Council, to succeed the UFC in
April, has been charged by the government with developing a quality
assessment framework for university teaching.
Observer, Page 13
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
               NUMBERS OF CENTRES IN UNIVERSITIES DOING
                 'INTERNATIONALLY EXCELLENT' RESEARCH*
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
            1992 (out  1989 (out                 1992 (out  1989 (out
            of 72 per  of 37 per                 of 72 per  of 37 per
             univ) **   univ) **                 univ) **   univ) **
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Cambridge         40      19       Bradford           4       0
Oxford            28      17       Essex              4       1
Univ Coll Ldn     22      12       Newcastle          4       4
Imperial Coll     12      12       Q Mary Ldn         4       0
Edinburgh         11       3       Strathclyde        4       1
Nottingham        11       7       York               4       1
Warwick           11       6       E Anglia           3       1
Birmingham        10       1       Exeter             3       1
King's London     10       2       Hull               3       0
LSE               10       2       Leicester          3       1
Manchester        10       3       Sch of Oriental
Bristol            7       6       Studies, Ldn       3       0
Glasgow            7       1       St Andrew's        3       1
Lancaster          7       2       Goldsmith's Ldn    2       0
Leeds              7       4       Heriot-Watt        2       1
Sheffield          7       3       Keele              2       0
Southampton        7       4       Loughborough       2       0
Durham             6       1       Open               2       -
Liverpool          6       3       Queen's Belfast    2       0
Sussex             6       1       Royal Holloway/
UMIST              6       1       Bedford London     2       0
Birkbeck Coll      5       0       Royal Postgrad
Reading            5       1       Medical School     2       1
U Wales Cardiff    5       1       Stirling           2       0
Bath               4       0       Surrey             2       0
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
* only institutions gaining more than one top rating in 1992 included
in the table; only top ratings are counted ** notional maximum of
research centres per university
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Universities Funding Council
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1401</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / South-east jobless rate above 10%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN, Economics Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MORE than one in 10 of the workforce in the south-east of England was
unemployed in November, highlighting the destructive force of the recession
in Britain's most important economic region.
The Department of Employment reported yesterday that the number of
unemployment benefit claimants in the south-east increased by 17,700 to a
seasonally adjusted 916,800 last month, taking the region's jobless rate to
a record high of 10.1 per cent from 9.9 per cent in October.
The south-east's unemployment rate in November was nearly three times the
3.6 per cent for the region in early 1990.
In Greater London alone, unemployment rose to 11.3 per cent in November from
11.2 per cent in October, making the capital the third worst region for
unemployment in the UK after Northern Ireland and the north.
November's 41,100 jump to 2.9m in UK seasonally adjusted unemployment was
the 31st consecutive monthly rise in the claimant count since the spring of
1990, bringing unemployment to its highest level since April 1987. Since
early 1990 - when unemployment bottomed out - registered unemployment in the
UK has risen by more than 1.31m, lifting the national unemployment rate to
10.3 per cent last month.
Total unadjusted unemployment was 10.1 per cent or 2,864,069 in November, up
49,657 on October's level.
Yesterday's jobless figures gave only a partial picture of the shakeout in
the labour market since the start of the recession. Employment department
figures showed that the UK workforce in employment fell to 24.95m in the
third quarter of this year, nearly 2m down from its 26.92m peak in the
second quarter of 1990.
According to the department's labour force survey, also published yesterday,
the percentage of the UK population over 16 that is economically active fell
to 63.1 per cent in the summer from 64.3 per cent in the spring of 1990.
The latest statistics suggest the labour market shakeout will continue for
some time. The November jump in unemployment was higher than the 35,000
increase generally expected in the City and above the latest six and
three-month averages of 32,200 and 32,600 respectively.
The 399,000 fall in the UK workforce in the third quarter was the highest on
record. The inflow of claimants at job centres has also been running at a
higher monthly rate in the second half of this year than in the first half.
The stock of unfilled vacancies at Jobcentres rose 2,600 to a
seasonally-adjusted 100,800 last month, but there were about 20,000 fewer
vacancies than in the first quarter of the year.
The latest UK figures show a big difference in unemployment rates between
males - where seasonally adjusted unemployment set a post-second-world-war
high of 13.8 per cent in November - and females, where the UK unemployment
rate was 5.6 per cent.
A notable feature of the year to October was the steep 241,000 drop in
manufacturing employment. The latest figures also show that 233,000 service
industry jobs were lost in the third quarter alone.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1402</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Pay rises for clerical and management staff have been around
3.5 per cent, says analysis
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PAY RISES for most clerical and management staff covered by awards in the
past three months have been around 3.5 per cent, close to the rate of
inflation, according to the latest quarterly analysis from Hay Management
Consultants, David Goodhart writes.
For the year to October, however, pay rises averaged 6.2 per cent - slightly
higher than the rise in national average earnings for the same period of 5.5
per cent. Hay predicts average salary increases of 4 per cent over the next
12 months.
About 10 per cent of the 568 organisations surveyed said they had
implemented pay freezes for periods of between six and 12 months.
About 50 per cent have frozen additional payments for skill shortages and 10
per cent have reduced them.
A report from the Public Finance Foundation found that public-sector pay in
the year to October 1992 had risen 6.4 per cent against 5.3 per cent in the
private sector. Inflation increased by 3.6 per cent in the year to October.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1403</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Councils to defy 1.5% pay ceiling
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO Conservative-controlled councils that have opted out of national pay
agreements are to breach the government's 1.5 per cent pay ceiling for
public-sector workers.
South Oxfordshire District Council is likely to pay an extra 3.6 per cent
from April and Tandridge District Council in Surrey will increase pay by 4
per cent from January 1.
The councils are likely to apply the 1.5 per cent increase in 1994.
Both said they agreed on the deals just before last month's Autumn
Statement, which signalled the pay curb.
Most other councils that have opted out of national pay negotiations over
the past few years do not intend to breach the government's ceiling for
public-sector workers.
Similar decisions are being made by other independent public-sector
employers, including National Health Service trusts that are able to
negotiate pay locally for new staff.
Local Government Chronicle estimates that nine out of 15 local authorities
with settlement dates between January and April do not intend to breach the
1.5 per cent limit.
The magazine reports in its latest issue that Surrey County Council will
join Kent and Buckinghamshire in opting for local pay bargaining.
White-collar workers and residential staff will, however, have the option of
staying in the national agreement.
Other local authorities - especially in the Home Counties where recruitment
difficulties are greatest - are considering whether to remain within the
system.
Conservative-controlled Kent County Council will stick to a 1.5 per cent pay
increase for its 14,000 staff. Buckinghamshire County Council is expected to
follow suit.
Mr John Redwood, the local government minister, has written to all the
opted-out councils 'seeking co-operation' at what he described as an
extremely difficult time.
Breakaway action by organisations such as councils and NHS trusts does not
normally indicate lower pay; most want more flexibility and the ability to
reward merit.
Few NHS trusts have broken away from rates nationally negotiated by the pay
review bodies, although they are free to do so for newly recruited staff.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1404</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Frugal Christmas in store: Chris Tighe finds shoppers in
widely separated retail centres sharing the same worries about their festive
spending
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CAUTIOUS consumerism is the dominant theme of Christmas 1992 in two urban
retail centres 297 miles apart.
Croydon's Whitgift Centre and Newcastle upon Tyne's Eldon Square serve
communities with different historic roots, but they are united by the impact
of the recession and concern about Britain's economic outlook.
In both centres the signs are the same - shoppers are shunning credit cards,
are fearful of debt and are thinking hard about purchases. This is a
Christmas when 'Pounds 1 off' matters. Christmas shopping at both began a
week late. Extended evening openings and - at the Whitgift Centre - Sunday
trading have probably exacerbated the trend, giving shoppers more
last-minute buying time providing they have money to spend or the
inclination to go into debt.
After a difficult trading year and a slow start to Christmas, much hangs on
this crucial last week. 'We take 12 per cent of our annual turnover in the
last eight days,' says Croydon jeweller Mr Ray Lyons.
The Whitgift Centre is a 1.25m sq ft, partly covered complex with 126 shops
which opened in 1969 and is owned by Barclays de Zoete Wedd and the Whitgift
Foundation. Mr Rod Wood, the manager, forecasts that pre-Christmas takings
will be between 4 per cent and 7 per cent down on last year. 'Some shops are
up, but they're the few,' he says.
Eldon Square is a 1.5m sq ft covered complex with 160 shops that was
completed in stages from 1976 and is owned by property development group
Capital and Counties, Newcastle City Council and Shell Pension Trust. Mr
Gordon Allanson, the manager of Eldon Square, expects trade to be '1 per
cent to 2 per cent down on last year'.
Retailers' dizzy days of dramatic turnover growth based on high inflation
are over, he warns. 'We're going to have to get used to a different climate.
We must come to terms with being cost-conscious and not expecting big
year-on-year increases.' Realism has settled on shoppers as well. 'One could
boringly call it a practical Christmas,' says Mr Brian Forbes Turner,
chairman of the Eldon Square Merchants' Association and managing director of
the Bainbridge department store. 'People are looking at the sensible
purchases.'
A Croydon shopper says: 'Last year we bought my dad a silver-plated lighter
 -this year it'll be socks and boxer shorts.'
Children are the last to suffer - toys are classed as essentials and both
centres report strong sales in electronic items. The recession reached
Croydon before Newcastle. Eldon Square has only felt the full effects this
year with an unprecedented 10 receiverships. 'In terms of boom and recession
Newcastle tends to be 18 months to two years behind the south-east,' says Mr
Bill Black, Capital and Counties group manager.
Extensive office developments and prosperous housing areas gave Croydon
self-assurance in the 1980s, but now it is adjusting to harder times. Local
unemployment has touched 10 per cent this year and the borough's rate of
mortgage repossession actions is among Britain's highest.
The recession and technological change have cost office jobs.
Newcastle, on the other hand, suffered traumatic structural economic change
in the recession of the early 1980s, but had hoped to withstand the present
downturn. In contrast, Croydon has smaller mortgages, freeing up spending
power. It does, however, have large pockets of deprivation and long-term
unemployment.
Newcastle, with 13.8 per cent unemployment, is fighting to remain one of the
government's assisted areas - regions which qualify for financial support.
Croydon is striving to become one.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
NEWCASTLE BUSINESSES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The centre manager
Gordon Allanson: 'People are being very much more careful. There are
still a lot of people around but they aren't buying quite as much.
They're very discerning shoppers this year.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The department store manager
Brian Forbes Turner of Bainbridge, part of the John Lewis Partnership:
'We were up by 2% last week (on the same week last year). That was an
increase for the first time in eight weeks. That's indicative it's been
tough going. Last Saturday was excellent; it had a buzz about it. I'd
think we will match last year or be slightly up.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The small businessman
James Doyle, proprietor of Watch It, clock sellers, and former general
manager of the Tick Tock chain with 32 shops which went into
receivership in January: 'I took this shop over on November 21. It's a
hell of a risk. I've now got a third mortgage on my house. We're doing
as well as we thought we would.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The shop assistant
Ann Dobbing in Gullivers, a national leather goods chain: 'It's very
busy, I don't know if it's because of our sale. You can have the shop
empty or chock-a-block; you'd think a train had tipped everybody off.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
SHOPPERS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The family
Fireman Alan Henzell and his wife Pat live in Newcastle with their
children aged 9, 8 and 5. He earns Pounds 16,000 a year. Mrs Henzell
said: 'I think we're spending more this year, but we haven't bought it
all at once. The Sega Megadrive (computer games console) - Pounds 120
 -we've had for a few months and the portable TV's a 'buy now, pay cash
in June' offer. We'll spend over Pounds 1,000 this year. I feel worse
off.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The female shopper
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Sharon Blackburn, 21, is a personal assistant in a Northumberland
environmental consultancy, living in Tyne and Wear: 'I'm spending about
the same, Pounds 200-300. My work's great; it's a small company, there
were just four of us, now there's 10. But a lot of my family have been
made redundant; two of my uncles and a cousin have lost their jobs.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The unemployed man
Michael Cook, 32, is married with children aged 11,10 and 6. His wife
isn't earning. They live in Stanley, County Durham. 'I've been out of
work six or seven years. We'll spend Pounds 200 on the children. We
began putting money away in June. You have to give up a lot of things
as Christmas gets nearer.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The mother
Jennifer Latimer is married with a six-year-old son. Her husband is a
service engineer. They live in Chester-le-Street, County Durham.
'Nobody's bothering as much this year. My family are saying: 'Don't
bother with me,' so I haven't. I feel worse off, mainly because we
haven't had a pay rise. I've spent less, about Pounds 200.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The male shopper
Nick Booth, a doctor, is a GP in Prudhoe, Northumberland, where he
lives. He is married with three children. 'I'll spend about the same.
How much? I haven't a clue. I think things are in a mess. I see lots of
people (patients) who were hardly buying any food in November to have a
good time at Christmas.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The pensioner
Widow Jean Jackson lives in Newcastle. 'The pension doesn't go so far.
I had to go for new glasses today - Pounds 122. That's taken a big
slice out of my Christmas spending. My son could be out of work by
tomorrow; he's an accountant. The firm's going bust. We're used to
recession here.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
CROYDON BUSINESSES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The centre manager
Rod Wood: 'Shoppers have still got their wallets padlocked. They're
taking their time and looking for the best deal. They're more
discerning and long may it reign.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The department store manager
David Batt of Allders, part of Allders Group: 'It's been slow to start.
We'll be just ahead of last year. There are some signs the recession's
abating. People seem to be spending generally less on individual gifts
but ironically there appears to be a very noticeable trend where people
are spending on better merchandise.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The small businessman
Ray Lyons, the proprietor of Lyons Jewellers, has worked in the centre
for 20 years: 'Building societies are bulging with money. The shops
pushing it (Christmas) will do better because a lot have gone down the
pan. I think we'll come out quite a lot ahead. I think lots of
businesses are going to go.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The shop assistant
Karim Pridmore is 23 and works in a family-owned business selling
computer and electronic games and videos: 'People will cut on
themselves, but the last thing they do is cut on the children.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
SHOPPERS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The family
Ashley and Yvonne Tuck. Ashley is a self-employed dental technician in
Brixton earning up to Pounds 25,000 a year. Yvonne is newly redundant.
They have one daughter who is nearly two, and live in Croydon. Mrs
Tuck: 'We've no money to spend; we've got a bank loan to be repaid in
the new year. We'll spend Pounds 500-600. We tore our credit card up,
we got ourselves into too much difficulty.' Ashley: 'With using credit
cards we spent more.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The female shopper
Juliet Graham, 23, is a tour operator in London and lives in Croydon.
'I'll spend about Pounds 150, not as much as last year. I'm buying more
practical things. The company I work for (American Express) have made a
few redundancies here; it looks as if there'll be more. I'm paying by
cash. Last year I had a big splurge on my Visa card.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The unemployed man
Michael White, 29, is a decorator. He is married with children aged
three and nine months. His wife isn't earning. They live in Crystal
Palace, south London. 'We get a giro every fortnight; we've saved
Pounds 300. We'll spend that for Christmas; when it's finished, it's
finished. I think next year will be a bit better.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The mother
Jane Lockwood, a housewife has children aged five and two. Her husband,
a printer, has not been much affected by the recession. They live in
Eltham, south London. 'We aren't buying for as many people as we used
to. Our mortgage has been big. We've neglected ourselves all year so we
need a little bit extra to spend. We'll spend Pounds 600. We'll pay
cash.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The male shopper
Raymond McConnell, 44, a Cellnet radio engineer, whose wife isn't
earning. has children aged seven, four and 18 months. They live in
Crystal Palace, south London. 'We're spending the same - a hell of a
lot, about Pounds 300. I'm paying by Switch; the credit card's far too
dangerous. An overdraft is financial discipline.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
The pensioner
Winifred Feeney, a widow, has a small occupational pension. She lives
in south London. 'Things have got so expensive. I'll spend Pounds 500
this year. I use my Access and Barclaycard and Marks and Spencer card
 -you don't want to walk through here with Pounds 200. I work it all
out and pay the bill in January.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1405</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / German blow for machine tools
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GERMAN machine tool makers are poised to make further inroads into the
depressed UK market following the creation of a global strategic alliance
between Traub and Maho, two of Germany's biggest producers.
The announcement last week that the two companies are to merge their sales
forces worldwide is likely to put further pressure on UK machine tool
producers by strengthening the German companies' sales opportunities in the
UK.
The deal, under discussion throughout this year, comes less than two months
after Gildemeister and Deckel, two other big German producers, announced
they were forming a worldwide joint venture to market their products.
Both deals take effect on January 1. Maho and Deckel, meanwhile, are
discussing co-operation in manufacturing.
The sales links mean that four of the biggest German producers are now
grouped into two powerful combines, each with both milling and turning
machines to offer a broader range to customers.
'It's got to increase our share of the UK market,' said Mr Paul Maynard,
Traub's UK managing director, who will become UK managing director of the
two companies. Maho, in particular, would have a substantially increased
direct sales force.
Germany was the biggest exporter of machine tools to the UK last year, with
sales of Pounds 149.1m out of total imports of Pounds 451.2m. This compares
with total UK machine tool consumption last year of Pounds 773.2m.
The two new groupings will be competitors for each other, and for Japanese
companies such as Yamazaki and Mori Seiki.
Traub and Maho will retain their legal independence and will still operate
from their bases in Wembley and Coventry, but are considering moving to a
single site.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1406</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Clash over pensions review
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE National Association of Pension Funds may be on course for a clash with
its second-biggest member over its submission to the government's Pensions
Law Review Committee, published yesterday.
The association has backed a compulsory compensation scheme for occupational
pension funds in spite of fierce opposition from the Electricity Supply
Pension Scheme, the UK's second-biggest. That scheme threatened earlier this
month to resign from the NAPF over the issue.
The committee, chaired by Professor Roy Goode, was established after Robert
Maxwell's pension fund frauds. The committee invited responses to 81
questions on pension regulations. It received about 1,000 submissions.
There has been a change in the NAPF's stance on compensation following
submissions from its members. The association no longer believes that
shortfalls should be met by the compensation scheme, however they occur.
Instead, compensation should cover cases of fraud, theft and criminal
negligence alone.
Mr Brian Matthews, finance director of the Electricity scheme, said the NAPF
had responded 'in part' to its objections. 'But it is still taking a
position to which we object, that compensation levies should be paid by
scheme members.'
He added that the question of resignation would be considered further once
the electricity scheme had studied the submission. The NAPF argues that a
strengthened Occupation Pensions Board should be the regulatory body for all
aspects of pension schemes except investment management and taxation.
Several bodies including Prudential, the insurance group, and the
Confederation of British Industry want a single pensions regulator.
The Institute of Actuaries, which announced details of its submission to the
Goode committee yesterday, argued for a compulsory compensation scheme to
cover fraud and theft alone.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1407</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Railtrack gains a board champion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD TOMKINS, Transport Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE government yesterday moved to shake up the board of British Rail in the
run-up to privatisation by appointing Mr Robert Horton, one of Britain's
most forceful business executives, as its non-executive vice-chairman.
Mr Horton, 53, is the former chairman and chief executive of British
Petroleum. He was ousted in a boardroom coup in June after his abrasive
management style caused friction with fellow directors.
The Department of Transport said Mr Horton would take a particular interest
in Railtrack, the state-owned body which is due to take responsibility for
BR's track infrastructure under the government's privatisation proposals.
The implication is that he has been appointed to set up and head Railtrack,
using his private-sector management skills to develop it as a
market-responsive organisation rather than an inefficient bureaucracy.
The move will go some way towards countering fears among would-be
private-sector train operators that Railtrack's charges will be too high to
enable them to offer a competitive service.
Mr Horton's appointment is likely to be greeted with trepidation within BR,
where management and staff will fear the consequences of his management
style on working practices and jobs.
BR said yesterday: 'It is not appropriate for us to comment: appointments
are made by the department.' Mr Horton, whose appointment takes effect from
January 1, will work two days a week at his new job.
Based on the present rate of Pounds 7,000 a half-day for existing part-time
board members, he will collect Pounds 28,000 a year.
Two other part-time members have been appointed to work half a day a week on
the board.
They are Mr Archibald Norman, 38, chief executive of Asda, the stores group,
and Ms Jennifer Page, 48, chief executive of English Heritage.
Other changes announced yesterday are the re-appointment of Ms Kazimiera
Kantor, finance director of Central Independent Television, and the stepping
down of Ms Adele Biss, a former director of Aegis Group, a media buying
company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1408</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Thames service
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD TOMKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Operating between Wandsworth and Gravesend, the 12-seat Ebenezer Scrooge
will be the first of a proposed fleet of 26 fast river taxis owned by White
Horse Ferries. Yesterday's inauguration coincided with the Department of
Transport's establishment of a working group to examine ways of making more
use of the Thames for passenger and freight traffic in London, Richard
Tomkins writes.
Mr Steven Norris, minister for transport in London, said he had wanted to
find better ways of using the Thames for transport since his appointment
last April. 'The Thames is potentially one of London's greatest transport
arteries, and I believe we are not using it to anything like its full
potential.' Mr Norris made the announcement shortly after launching the
first of the planned White Horse fleet, that will offer a passenger service
in competition to the loss-making RiverBus operation, under threat of
closure.
The new service will be run by Thames Fast Ferries, a subsidiary of the
Swindon-based White Horse property group, which also operates the Tilbury to
Gravesend ferry crossing down-river from the capital.
The company's 12-seater vessels will offer a high-frequency service between
Wandsworth and Docklands with more boarding and alighting points than
RiverBus. The vessels will stop only on demand so shortening journey times.
The river taxis are expected to be manufactured at the rate of one a month.
The company is not expected to start a comprehensive service until autumn
next year, and a full service is not expected until December 1994.
Thames Fast Ferries said it planned to launch a high-speed commuter
operation between Tilbury/Gravesend and central London next year, using
120-seat craft.
Mr Norris said the Thames working group would identify obstacles that
prevented people from making better use of the river. Problems include
access, land ownership, safety issues and capacity.
No deadline has been set for the working group's report, but it is expected
to take about a year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1409</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / ASB warns companies to abide by spirit of rulings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ACCOUNTING Standards Board has warned British companies and their
auditors that they must interpret its rulings by their spirit and not the
letter of the regulations.
In an information sheet circulated yesterday, the board's urgent issues task
force stressed that its abstracts should be guided 'by the spirit and
reasoning . . . so as to achieve their underlying purpose'.
Mr David Tweedie, ASB chairman, warned that if companies and the accountancy
profession did not follow this principle on new standards and rulings he
would be forced to introduce 'a monumental rulebook' listing every possible
permutation.
He said he was 'furious' at the way some companies had begun to interpret
board rulings by exploiting loopholes to evade their stated purpose.
'I thought we could get away from this approach,' he said.
The statement will apply to all standards, but was spurred by at least five
companies' most recent accounts which departed from the spirit of the task
force's third ruling last December.
This dealt with the treatment on disposal of goodwill - the difference
between the purchase price and the net book value of a business when it is
acquired.
Yesterday's note stressed that companies should not separate the goodwill
element from the profit or loss on disposal of an acquisition, but should
instead show it as a single item.
They should also not credit the profit-and-loss account with an amount equal
to the goodwill shown.
At least two companies have already done both of these things this year.
Mr Tweedie said that the statement was 'a pre-emptive strike'. Any other
companies that did the same might expect to be referred directly to the
Financial Reporting Review Panel, and their auditors to their own
professional bodies for possible disciplinary action.
Meanwhile, the task force is also considering proposals that would force
companies to show the costs of repurchasing their own debt in the year in
which it takes place.
The move would have a substantial effect on a significant number of
companies that are currently able to spread the effect on profits over
several years.
It comes at a time when lower interest rates have encouraged companies -
including some recently privatised utilities - to buy back higher-rate debt
and exchange it for debt at lower cost.
The task force said in a memorandum yesterday its preliminary view was that
it should require companies to recognise any profit or loss on the
repurchase immediately.
The task force has started airing its more controversial views before making
them mandatory following criticism from companies that were caught unaware
of previous changes. But a ruling could be introduced early next year.
In a separate ruling, the task force's seventh abstract stated that
companies must clearly state in their accounts the details, reasons and
effect of any departure in their accounts from the Companies Act requirement
to provide a true and fair view. This will become effective from December
23.
The Accounting Standards Board also issued a proposed amendment to SSAP 15,
the accounting standard dealing with deferred tax.
This would permit companies to make deductions net of tax annually on the
costs of any post-retirement benefits other than pensions, such as medical
costs, incurred by their employees.
Amendment to SSAP 15. Accounting for Deferred Tax. Accountancy Books, PO Box
620, Central Milton Keynes MK9 2JX. Pounds 1.50.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1410</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Furniture trade bodies to merge
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THREE furniture trade organisations are to merge on January 1 into British
Furniture Manufacturers. The new body will be an amalgam of three autonomous
companies: BFM Exhibitions, an exhibition organiser; BFM Exports, which
provides advice and assistance to exporters; and BFM Federation, a loose
grouping of four regional trade associations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1411</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Lecturers' unions closer to link-up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HIGHER education unions yesterday moved closer to a merger after the ruling
council of AUT, the university lecturers' union, voted unanimously for a
confederation with Natfhe, the university and college lecturers' union.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1412</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Water supply reliability improves
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WATER SUPPLIES are more reliable than last year, with fewer interruptions
and cuts in pressure, Ofwat, the water industry regulator, reported
yesterday, Bronwen Maddox writes.
The number of people affected by hosepipe bans and other restrictions was
6.7m in the 12 months to July this year compared with 21m in the 12 months
to July last year, in spite of a continued lack of rain.
Ofwat also reported that the risks of sewers flooding had fallen as a result
of the companies' big modernisation programme. It warned, however, that past
figures may have underestimated customer service problems.
Wessex results, Page 16
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1413</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Doctors seek talks on NHS funding
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN PIKE, Social Affairs Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LEADERS of the British Medical Association yesterday called for an urgent
meeting with Mrs Virginia Bottomley, the health secretary, to discuss
National Health Service funding problems.
The move comes as some hospitals and health authorities are reducing
activity to avoid overspending in this financial year.
Dr Jeremy Lee-Potter, BMA council chairman, said doctors were dismayed that
predictions of the government's NHS reforms failing to solve the service's
problems were being confirmed.
The decision to approach Mrs Bottomley came after a meeting of the BMA's
general practitioners' committee yesterday, at which family doctors
complained of growing difficulties in obtaining treatment for patients. Last
week members of the consultants' committee reported concerns over hospital
bed closures and cancelled operating sessions.
'What is now needed is a fresh look at the level of resources which would
ensure that the NHS can provide the care that the public requires,' Dr
Lee-Potter said.
Mrs Bottomley has taken the view that hospitals must work within the
financial constraints of their contracts with health authorities and GPs,
and not expect to be bailed out late in the financial year if they
overspend.
Critics argue, however, that the central problem is inadequate funding. The
BMA said yesterday that the new system of health financing had 'made the
continuing underfunding of the NHS even more apparent'.
Costs of restructuring London's health services under the Tomlinson report
proposals may well have been underestimated and 'half-measures will be
extremely damaging', Britain's medical royal colleges warned yesterday. The
colleges called for full costs to be recognised before implementation was
undertaken.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1414</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Case on council swaps is settled out of court
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE first of a batch of nine lead cases between banks and councils over
interest-rate swap agreements has been settled out of court. This is the
latest in a steady stream of settlements since the House of Lords ruled such
contracts invalid in January last year.
The ruling left 80 banks facing losses of about Pounds 560m. They have since
sought to recover about a quarter of their losses by suing councils for
restitution of funds paid under the swap contracts.
A report in Local Government Chronicle suggests that the rest of the nine
lead cases may not now come to court following the settlement of the first
group of six lead cases last year.
The case in question, between Birmingham City Council and SG Warburg, was
due to go to court in January. The amount of the settlement has not been
disclosed.
Warburg's writ involved three swap agreements and one forward-rate
agreement, but the claim mainly concerned one swap. Warburg was trying to
recover a Pounds 5m principal payment and Pounds 5m in interest.
The leading cases, due to go to court in January, are now Westdeutsche
Landesbank Girozentrale, which is claiming Pounds 1.15m from the London
Borough of Islington, and Kleinwort Benson which is claiming Pounds 360,000
from Sandwell, West Midlands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1415</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Output of cars for export rises
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO out of every three cars produced in the UK last month were destined for
export, by far the highest proportion in the industry's recent history.
Exports accounted for only about a quarter of the UK industry's total
production as late as 1989.
Part of the reason for the rise is that UK new car sales remain weak,
depressing production for the home market. Export output rose 22.16 per cent
to 73,431 cars against 60,111 the previous year. Over the first 11 months of
this year exports accounted for 48 per cent of total car production. At
535,088, it was 4.96 per cent down in volume on the corresponding period in
1991.
Short-time working at Ford and Rover Group was largely responsible for last
month's domestic production falling 23.2 per cent to 43,216 from 56,265 a
year before.
As a result - based on statistics from the Society of Motor Manufacturers
and Traders and the Central Office of Information - total November car
output was only 0.23 per cent above the 116,647 reached a year earlier. This
puts total output for the year's first 11 months 3.3 per cent higher than
the 1991 figure of 1,196,427.
In spite of the domestic setback, the industry expects production to rise
strongly next year as the UK market starts to recover and Toyota, whose
Derbyshire plant started production this week, and Honda add their
production to Nissan's. The SMMT predicts car output will rise 12 per cent
to 1.4m next year from this year's forecast 1.25m. Commercial vehicle
output, however, fell back sharply in November by 29.8 per cent to 19,521
from 27,806 a year before.
Production for export was particularly hard hit, falling 39.26 per cent to
9,365 from the previous November's 15,419. Export output remained well ahead
for the first 11 months. At 120,931, it was 21.81 per cent ahead of last
year's 99,281 for the same period.
Total commercial vehicle output for the first 11 months, at 233,741, was up
16.65 per cent compared with last year's 11-month total of 200,383.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1416</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Working Party recommends guidelines for formatting of
interim accounts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ACCOUNTING Standards Board should establish guidelines for the format of
companies' interim accounts, a working party led by accountancy firm Coopers
&amp; Lybrand has recommended.
In an analysis of existing practice, the working party of accountants and
senior business executives concluded that the wide variation in existing
practices needs to be narrowed.
The details, in a report published yesterday, come when the Cadbury
committee on corporate governance is increasingly demanding greater interim
information.
The study shows that while all FTSE-100 companies include a chairman's
report in their interims, only half include balance sheet information and a
fifth show cashflow details. Just 17 per cent of these statements include
accounting policy information.
From a sample of 168 smaller companies, only a quarter provide a balance
sheet and just 2 per cent a cashflow statement. Only about 77 per cent -
against 81 per cent for FTSE-100 companies - produce any notes to the
financial statements.
The working party says the time permitted between the end of the company's
half-year and publication of the results should be cut from four months to
two.
It also argues for limited balance sheet and cashflow information, saying
that it would save costs and be quicker to produce.
Reporting by Companies on Interim Results. 0800 289520. Pounds 25.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1417</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / TGWU in costs shake-up
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN'S biggest union, the Transport and General Workers', has agreed to
rationalise its regional structure and appoint a finance director in an
attempt to reduce bureaucracy and improve value for money for its 1m
members.
A special rules revision conference yesterday agreed to implement some of
the main findings of a report by management consultancy Adam Klein,
including the recommendation to reduce the eight English regions to five.
The merging of the east coast, Yorkshire and the north into one region and a
merger of the south coast and south-west will save the union about Pounds 5m
a year. The move is politically controversial because it will reduce the
power of the minority right-wing group in the union.
The Klein report also criticised the union for having no budgeting and
little accountability for spending.
After a deficit of Pounds 12m in 1991 the union is expected to report a
Pounds 3m surplus this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1418</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / BR deal settles slander action
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE former chairman of Permaquip, the railway track maintenance equipment
maker, has accepted Pounds 50,000 and Pounds 171,550 in legal costs from the
British Railways Board in settlement of a slander action over statements by
transport police that he had been arrested for corruption.
The High Court heard yesterday that in September 1988 British Transport
Police, investigating allegations that corrupt payments had been made to BR
personnel by contractors, raided Permaquip's offices and Mr Peter Martyn's
home in Nottinghamshire. Personal and business documents were removed.
Mr Martyn, who was at his Ravenshead home during the raid, later learnt that
one of the officers involved in the office raid had stated that he had been
arrested and was to be charged with corruption.
No accusation had been put to him by the police who raided his home and he
had no inkling that he was under suspicion.
It was later reported to Mr Martyn that on three subsequent occasions BTP
officers had made similar allegations to different people.
His slander action would have come for trial long ago but for BRB applying
repeatedly for the case to be stayed because it said police investigations
were continuing and it was likely that he would be prosecuted.
BRB finally served its defence a year ago, denying any slander had been
published and pleading qualified privilege and justification.
Last month it paid a very substantial sum of money into court to settle the
case.
Mr Martyn accepted that the payment did not amount to an admission of
liability and that the officers concerned still maintained their words were
not accurately reported to him.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1419</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Furniture trade bodies to merge
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THREE furniture trade organisations are to merge on January 1 into British
Furniture Manufacturers. The new body will be an amalgam of three autonomous
companies: BFM Exhibitions, an exhibition organiser; BFM Exports, which
provides advice and assistance to exporters; and BFM Federation, a loose
grouping of four regional trade associations.
Mr Adrian Hill, chief executive of the new organisation, said its priorities
would be to take a lead on furniture safety and the use of rare tropical
timbers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1420</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Lecturers move closer to link-up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HIGHER education unions yesterday moved closer to a merger after the ruling
council of AUT, the university lecturers' union, voted unanimously for a
confederation with Natfhe, the university and college lecturers' union.
AUT said: 'The confederation will give us greater strength and a united
voice in higher education: united we stand, divided we fall.'
Mr David Triesman, formerly Natfhe national negotiating secretary, was
yesterday narrowly elected AUT general secretary.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1421</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Japanese curb stays
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UK will continue to restrict imports of cars from Japan at least until
the end of 1994. Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade secretary, said that in the
light of the 'present economic circumstances' it would remain a restricted
market for at least a further two years.
Earlier this year the government caused consternation in the industry when
it announced it was examining the possibility of ending all restrictions on
imports of Japanese new cars from the end of this year.
A voluntary export restraint - or 'gentleman's agreement' - has existed in
the UK since 1975, limiting Japanese imports to no more than 11 per cent of
the market for new cars.
This restraint must be withdrawn from the end of this year with the start of
the single market in Europe. Last year the European Commission reached an
agreement with the Japanese government on continuing limits on direct EC
imports of cars from Japan until the end of 1999.
The agreement assumes that the UK, France, Italy, Portugal and Spain remain
restricted markets until the end of the decade, and that Japan observes
voluntary restraint on overall vehicle exports to the EC during this period.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1422</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / After two steps back, Brazil takes another familiar one:
Christina Lamb assesses the debilitating impact of the resignation of the
latest economy minister after just two months
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRAZIL woke up yesterday to a familiar scene. Another economy minister out -
the seventh since 1985 - and frantic speculation on impending economic plans
which caused a rush into the dollar and prompted shopkeepers to mark up
prices.
The resignation of Mr Gustavo Krause after just two months in office
provoking such disarray shows just how much expectations have fallen since
Mr Itamar Franco assumed the presidency after the suspension of President
Fernando Collor on corruption charges.
The appointment of the inexperienced Mr Krause to run the world's
ninth-largest economy had, after all, sent stock markets crashing. Yet his
continuation in government as a known free-marketeer had become a guarantee
that the orthodox stabilisation programme would continue.
Mr Paulo Haddad, the planning minister who has temporarily assumed the
economy portfolio, insists that there will be no change in policy, nor any
shock measures in the battle against inflation of 25 per cent a month.
But in the absence of any clear policy direction, the departure of Mr Krause
 -combined with the suspension of the privatisation programme and a series
of meetings between Mr Franco and economists advocating nationalist ideas -
are being viewed as strong indications that Brazil has seen the end of its
modernisation programme, at least for the near future.
'Everything points towards a sharp change in orientation of the Brazilian
economy and the trend is for less liberalism and more state intervention,'
says Mr Carlos Langoni, economics professor at the Getulio Vargas
Foundation.
Such a shift will not be certain until after Mr Franco's ministerial meeting
this weekend and his first address to the nation next Wednesday after the
senate judgment of Mr Collor which is expected to strip him of power. Mr
Franco says he cannot get on with governing until he is officially President
and can take Mr Collor's portrait down from his office wall.
But analysts note that the 61-year-old Mr Franco has given no commitment to
the modernisation programme of his predecessor.
Instead, he shows every sign of favouring the state intervention,
nationalism and populism that he has always supported throughout his long
political career.
He chose a communist as leader of the government in Congress and his main
policy moves so far have been to suspend privatisation, albeit temporarily,
the suppression of public sector tariffs, and a war on foreign
pharmaceutical companies for 'abusive price increases'. He has ordered the
Inland Revenue to investigate their activities. Last month he cancelled
talks with the International Monetary Fund.
He rejected the Krause-Haddad formula of continued high interest rates,
privatisation, and fiscal adjustment to combat inflation. He has been
consulting all week with Mr Paulo Nogueira Batista and Mr Dercio Munhoz,
economists who favour prices and incomes policy and the lowering of interest
rates and a big state investment programme to restart growth. The former
even advocates a moratorium on foreign debt payments.
Already behind much of Latin America in stabilising its economy, Brazil has
never really gone far down the path of modernisation. Many people have still
not accepted the failure of the old import substitution model which for many
years made it the world's fastest growing economy.
The focus now is on whether Mr Haddad remains in office and manages to
maintain real interest rates against Mr Franco's desires. He is under
pressure from sectors within the government to leave and from outside to
stay and keep up the resistance against less orthodox measures. His hand may
have been strengthened by the strong reaction to Mr Krause's resignation
which sent the black market dollar premium soaring to almost 20 per cent,
its highest for more than a year.
The congress is still discussing a fiscal reform package crucial to help
plug a Dollars 15bn hole in the government budget for next year. Mr Roberto
Freire, the leader of the government in Congress, asked yesterday: 'Hasn't
anyone noticed that while they are all speculating about shocks and
deviations in policy in fact we are still negotiating fiscal reform ?'
However the departure of Mr Krause, a key negotiator in Congress, has
reduced the likelihood of this passing and uncertainty is now so high that
the main economic agents are acting as if a shock plan had been announced,
resorting to risk instruments and marking up prices as protection against a
future freeze.
Through his vacillations, Mr Franco has already undone the work of former
economy minister Marcilio Marques Moreira in convincing the business
community that the era of shock plans had ended.
According to the director of FIPE, an institute which measures inflation,
protective price increases have already put 2.5 percentage points on
inflation this month which is expected to near 30 per cent in January.
Mr Daniel Dantas, director of Icatu Bank, believes this may be a good thing:
'We've all got too accustomed to 25 per cent a month inflation. Perhaps what
we need is for it to rise to a level which cannot be tolerated and shakes
everyone up.'
But Mr Langoni complains: 'We're just wasting time. What we have learnt from
the experiments of the last few years is there is no other way but strict
monetary policy and fiscal adjustment.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1423</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: Rules add to US bank costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US BANKS face costs of up to Dollars 17bn (Pounds 11.1bn) from the burden of
regulations imposed on them by Congress and their supervisors, a study by
the main federal regulatory agencies concludes.
In a report delivered to Congress yesterday, the Federal Financial
Institutions Examination Council - grouping representatives of the Federal
Reserve Board, Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, Office of Thrift
Supervision, National Credit Union Administration and Office of the
Comptroller of the Currency - estimated regulatory costs in 1991 at between
Dollars 7.5bn and Dollars 17bn.
This would amount to 6-14 per cent of total non-interest expenses of the
banking industry, the study concluded, even without the additional burden of
statutory reserve requirements and provisions of the new banking law passed
at the end of 1991.
Mr John LaWare, a governor of the Federal Reserve Board, said that excessive
regulations weighed particularly heavily on the smaller banks; although many
of the regulations were necessary, their cost was ultimately borne by the
consumer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1424</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Old allies ponder future of Special Relationship: Britain
may find itself becoming an intermediary between the US and Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE arrival of Mr John Major in Washington for a farewell visit to President
George Bush brings to a close a particularly fruitful chapter in the
'special relationship' between the UK and the US.
The personal chemistry between Mrs Margaret Thatcher and Mr Bush may have
been a little cooler than her earlier rapport with President Ronald Reagan,
but Mr Major and Mr Bush seem to have found their way back onto the same
wavelength.
Now the British prime minister will have to re-establish common ground with
President-elect Bill Clinton, at a time when the common threat of Soviet
communism no longer looms so clearly; when international challenges such as
the crises in Yugoslavia and Somalia raise new questions about the roles the
US and the UK should play in the world; and when the US's first instinct may
be to turn inwards, away from Europe and, in the process, from the UK.
The special relationship has never been free of friction, and the clashes
over issues such as Suez and the Skybelt missile have at times been
spectacular.
And some US officials slight talk of a special relationship as wishful
thinking.
'We are constantly struck here by our allies' desire to maintain special
means of consultation,' said one official.
Nevertheless, most British and US officials agree there is a different
quality to their relations, built on the memory of Sir Winston Churchill and
on linguistic and cultural foundations, but also on a feeling that the UK is
consistently the US's most dependable ally.
'There is a very high comfort level because of language and institutions and
political process,' says Ms Rozanne Ridgway, former assistant secretary of
state in charge of European affairs and president of the Atlantic Council of
the US, a Washington-based policy group.
'A conversation with a British diplomat is in some ways different from a
conversation with any other diplomat,' comments a senior congressional
officer.
'Until I came to Washington I would never have believed the relationship
between the British and the Americans,' confirms a European diplomat.
While think tanks often urge the US to concentrate more on its links with
Germany and Japan, both countries, though economically more important, are
inhibited by history and by their constitutions from acting on the world
stage. France and Canada can get involved, but each has regularly been at
philosophical odds with the US on when and how to act.
This gives the UK a stronger voice on questions such as Yugoslavia - though
not on Somalia, where it has chosen not to get involved.
Washington officials attribute much of the recent strength of the special
relationship to the Gulf war. Images of 'plucky Brits parading through the
desert' filled US television screens.
More recently, the UK has played an important role in reviving the stalled
trade negotiations between the US and the European Community, opening the
way for a possible completion of the Uruguay Round of the General Agreement
on Tariffs and Trade.
Some have argued in the past that the UK must prove its commitment to Europe
by distancing itself from the US; others have taken the opposite view that
full British involvement in Europe will damage its US ties.
Ms Ridgway, however, disputes the idea that there is incompatibility in the
UK's simultaneous involvement with Europe and the US.
'I don't find there has been any dilution of the dialogue since Britain
joined the EC. It's an argument that people use for other reasons,' she
says.
Nevertheless, the UK may increasingly be placed in the difficult position of
acting as interpreter between the US and Europe - especially France - as the
EC continues down the road of unification, a process which most US
politicians applaud in theory but find somewhat disquieting in its
application.
But Mr Hans Binnendijk, director of the Institute for the Study of Diplomacy
at Washington's Georgetown University, argues that British discomfort may
ease as the new Clinton admin-istration finds more common ground than its
predecessor with Brussels and Paris.
'That doesn't mean Britain would become less important as an ally, but it
wouldn't be the two of us against the rest of Europe,' he says.
On some issues, US-UK friction is likely to be greater under Mr Clinton than
under President Bush. These include Northern Ireland and British nuclear
testing in the US's Nevada explosion sites, which the new administration
will want to halt.
Clinton aides insist that no snub is intended by their inability to find
time for a meeting on this visit.
Since both men are basically likeable and eager to be liked, their chemistry
should in time prove to be more than adequate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1425</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: Russian space deals for US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Russia's main space launcher maker has won permission to sign commercial
contracts with Motorola and Lockheed of the US, writes Daniel Green.
The Interfax news agency said Mr Viktor Chernomyrdin, Russia's new prime
minister, had agreed that the Khrunichev factory sign the contracts. The
deal with Motorola would be for the launch of three communications
satellites, while a joint venture would be set up with Lockheed.
Lockheed said yesterday it was continuing talks with several Russian
companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1426</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: China buys Boeings for Dollars 800m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA Southern Airlines, the expanding Guangzhou-based carrier, yesterday
ordered six Boeing 777 widebody aircraft worth Dollars 800m (Pounds 507m),
writes Paul Betts, Aerospace Correspondent.
This is a boost for the US manufacturer, which is developing the new 777
twin engine widebody aircraft at a cost of around Dollars 4bn.
It is scheduled to enter service in 1995.
Boeing said earlier this week the Californian-based International Lease
Finance Corporation was buying six Boeing 777s as part of a significant
Dollars 4.1bn package of new aircraft orders involving both Boeing and
European Airbus airliners.
The Chinese order also reflects the buoyant Chinese airline market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1427</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / British officials pessimistic about BA/USAir deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
British officials were last night pessimistic that Mr John Major would
secure US government approval for British Airways to buy 44 per cent of
USAir during talks with President George Bush today, writes Philip Stephens,
Political Editor.
As Mr Major arrived last night in Ottawa on the first leg of his North
American trip, the officials said the US administration appeared unlikely to
drop its opposition to the Dollars 750m (Pounds 476m) deal.
The prime minister would press Mr Bush to accept the deal, designed to
further BA's ambitions to become a global airline carrier, and would stress
that Britain was offering greater access to UK airports for US carriers.
Editorial Comment, Page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1428</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Argentina's capital inflow up
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARGENTINA'S central bank says capital inflows have topped Dollars 1bn so far
this month, a record since the country made its currency convertible in
April 1991. The record is all the more remarkable because in November the
country suffered its first sustained currency crisis in nearly two years.
A central bank official said yesterday the bank has added Dollars 1.008bn to
its reserves so far this month, bringing net capital inflows for this year
to Dollars 5.76bn. Between April and December last year, the central bank
bought Dollars 3.11bn in foreign currency.
To prevent a return to its tradition of heavy inflation and massive
devaluations, Argentina has made its central bank independent and pegged the
peso to the US dollar by law. Under this so-called convertibility law, the
central bank may print money only if it is fully backed by foreign currency,
gold or a limited quantity of government bonds.
Last month, investors, worried that economy minister Domingo Cavallo's
policies were unravelling and his grip on power slipping, bolted for the
exits by selling pesos, leading to a Dollars 230m net outflow.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1429</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: EC revises list of tariff cuts on
industrial goods
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Community yesterday presented a revised draft list of tariff
cuts for industrial products in the Uruguay round of trade liberalisation
talks, but admitted it fell short of the target set by ministers of a
one-third overall reduction in import duties, writes Frances Williams from
Geneva.
The EC offer, described by a senior official as 'illustrative' and a basis
for negotiation, would lower tariffs across the range of industrial products
by an average of nearly 25 per cent.
However, for countries such as the US and Canada, the reduction is nearer 30
per cent while for others, notably Japan, it is less generous. This reflects
what EC negotiators say are unsatisfactory offers from the other side.
Community officials said the Uruguay round target had been missed because
the US had rejected the across-the-board formula approach favoured by the EC
and others. Instead, it had insisted on a request and offer approach to the
tariff negotiations, alongside reciprocal zero-for-zero deals in particular
sectors. 'It is now clear this is not leading to a satisfactory outcome,' a
top EC negotiator said.
However, US officials complained yesterday that the EC appeared to be
pulling back on parts of an 'emerging maximum package' the two sides had
agreed to aim for last month, which would have combined additional
zero-for-zero sectors with reductions in remaining very high tariffs.
The EC offer mixes a tariff reduction formula, including bigger reductions
for the highest duties, with some sectoral initiatives. Officials claim
that, after applying formula cuts averaging one-third, the EC would be the
only leading trader with no duties on industrial products above 20 per cent.
The Community is also proposing to scrap all duties on pharmaceuticals,
medical and construction equipment (and is prepared to do so for steel, if
current problems can be settled).
In addition, it has offered to harmonise tariffs on chemicals, at rates
ranging from zero to 6.5 per cent, and on textiles where the maximum duty
would be cut to 12 per cent.
However, the EC has not met US demands for zero-for-zero deals, for instance
on electronics and wood and paper products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1430</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International consortium wins satellite contract worth
Dollars 1.7bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ARGENTINA has awarded a contract worth Dollars 1.7bn (Pounds 1.1bn) to
build, launch and operate its first domestic communications satellite to a
five-company international consortium, which is expected to put the
satellite in orbit by 1996.
Since Argentina has already privatised nearly all its telecommunications
services, the government in effect picked the operators of what will be a
privately operated satellite communications system, which will have the
right to use both of Argentina's now unused satellite allocations.
The consortium - in which France's Aerospatiale and Alcatel, Alenia Spazio
of Italy, Embratel of Brazil and Deutsche Aerospace all have a 20 per cent
stake - will be responsible for designing, building, launching and operating
the satellite.
Building and launch costs are estimated at Dollars 200m. Earth stations and
infrastructure should cost a further Dollars 1.5bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1431</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Argentina's capital inflow tops Dollars 1bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARGENTINA'S central bank says capital inflows have topped Dollars 1bn so far
this month, a record since the country made its currency convertible in
April 1991. The record is all the more remarkable because in November the
country suffered its first sustained currency crisis in nearly two years.
A central bank official said yesterday the bank has added Dollars 1.008bn to
its reserves so far this month, bringing net capital inflows for this year
to Dollars 5.76bn. Between April and December last year, the central bank
bought Dollars 3.11bn in foreign currency.
To prevent a return to its tradition of heavy inflation and massive
devaluations, Argentina has made its central bank independent and pegged the
peso to the US dollar by law. Under this so-called convertibility law, the
central bank may print money only if it is fully backed by foreign currency,
gold or a limited quantity of government bonds.
Last month, investors, who were worried that economy minister Domingo
Cavallo's policies were unravelling and his grip on power slipping, bolted
for the exits by selling pesos, leading to a Dollars 230m net outflow of
funds, the first since Mr Cavallo took office in January 1991.
Although December's strong capital inflow is a sign of renewed confidence in
Mr Cavallo's policies, analysts warn investors are being attracted by high
interest rates that yesterday stood at 22 per cent a year in dollar terms.
They warn that once companies' traditional end-of-year demand for local
currency eases, the inflow of foreign capital may slow down sharply.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1432</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: Trade talks season likely to come to end
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INTERNATIONAL trade negotiators are today expected to call a halt to the
pre-Christmas push for a breakthrough in the Uruguay Round of talks on
global trade liberalisation.
Many are voicing frustration at the slow progress made in recent weeks,
while others are casting doubt over whether a successful result is
achievable.
Mr Arthur Dunkel, director general of the General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade, has called a meeting today of the top-level Trade Negotiations
Committee (TNC), at which he is expected to 'close the negotiating season'.
His hope that a final Uruguay Round text might be agreed by Christmas has
been dashed. Negotiators expressed fears in Geneva yesterday that top-level
changes in the EC on January 1, and the change in the US administration on
January 20, would slow negotiating progress still further in the new year.
A gloomy senior US official complained of 'an overall disappointing lack of
progress in securing a large market access package either in industry or
agriculture', and said that it was 'becoming increasingly difficult to
imagine how we can possibly wrap up a political consensus in the near
future'.
He challenged the credibility of compromises proposed by the European
Community in industrial, services and agriculture schedules published in the
past week: 'Before the ink is even dry on the EC offer, it has been
repudiated by one of the EC members.'
He was referring to a statement made by Mr Roland Dumas, the French foreign
minister, in Geneva on Wednesday, in which he said the EC package went
beyond the European Commission's mandate, and as such was 'null and void'.
The US official said that France's actions 'call into question the status of
much of the EC's overall negotiating position'.
EC negotiators were swift to challenge Mr Dumas' claims, insisting they had
a full and unequivocal mandate to negotiate a Uruguay Round deal. They said
the offers tabled this week were aimed at achieving a 'global, balanced
package' (one of the few phrases they shared in common with Mr Dumas). They
called the offers 'illustrative', confiding that there was scope for them to
be improved if better offers came from other countries, in particular Japan.
One Community official insisted that it was still possible to complete the
talks by the beginning of March, when the expiry of US fast track authority
would put progress in jeopardy: 'I feel it can still be done.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1433</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: Texas and Samsung in chip venture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER WISE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LISBON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Texas Instruments (TI), the US high-technology company, and Samsung, the
South Korean electronics giant, yesterday signed a letter of intent for a
multi-million-dollar joint manufacturing investment in Oporto, northern
Portugal, writes Peter Wise in Lisbon.
The agreement is the first joint venture between the two companies and the
Samsung Electronics' first overseas investment in a semiconductor
manufacturing plant.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1434</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Rebound in exports cuts US trade gap sharply
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US trade deficit fell sharply between September and October but the
longer-term trend remained adverse, figures from the Commerce Department
indicated yesterday.
A rebound in exports accounted for most of the decline in the deficit, which
fell to Dollars 7bn (Pounds 4.6bn) against a revised shortfall of Dollars
8.6bn in September.
Wall Street analysts were taken by surprise, having forecast a deficit of
about Dollars 8bn in October.
Exports rose Dollars 1.3bn to Dollars 39.2bn, a new record in cash terms.
Imports fell Dollars 0.2bn to Dollars 46.2bn.
However, the US's bilateral deficit with Japan rose sharply to Dollars 5bn,
the highest monthly figure for four years, raising fears of increased trade
tension in coming months.
Much of the overall rise in exports, moreover, reflected higher sales of
civilian aircraft, which are notoriously volatile on a monthly basis. Sales
of telecommunications equipment also rose strongly.
In spite of the stronger-than-expected figures for exports, the longer-term
trend appears to remain adverse, reflecting faster growth of consumer demand
in the US than in most overseas markets.
The trade deficit averaged Dollars 8.2bn in the three months to October,
compared with only Dollars 4.9bn in the first three months of this year.
The trade deficit for the first 10 months of this year was Dollars 67.8bn,
compared with Dollars 55.1bn in the same period last year.
In a separate report the Labour Department said claims for state
unemployment insurance rose 22,000 to 347,000 in the week ending December 5,
the first rise in four weeks. The level of claims, however, remains
consistent with steady improvement in labour market conditions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1435</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / World Trade News: EC says Japan must open up legal and
financial services
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Frans Andriessen, the EC external affairs commissioner, said yesterday
Japan should not regard agriculture as 'the only issue' in the Uruguay Round
of trade talks and should be ready to make concessions in areas such as
legal and financial services.
The controversy within Japan over a likely relaxation of the rice import ban
as part of a Uruguay Round settlement has dominated Mr Andriessen's two-day
visit to Tokyo, but he sought to draw attention to a range of other
outstanding issues.
Mr Andriessen said Japanese banking and insurance regulations still unfairly
limit the activities of foreign institutions.
He said import controls should be lifted on foodstuffs, leather and footwear
as part of the multilateral negotiations under the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade.
'Financial services have always been a key area in the Gatt agreement,' he
said.
'In Europe, we have the most open financial services market in the world,
and we want others to give us fair treatment.'
On rice, Mr Andriessen yesterday met Mr Masami Tanabu, agriculture minister,
who defended Japanese farmers' interests. While other Japanese ministers
indicated that the government will be 'flexible' on rice, Mr Tanabu said a
market opening was unlikely.
But Mr Andriessen's general impression after his round of the ministries was
that the 'mood is there' for a market opening, but that the Japanese
government must act quickly on rice, and other issues, to ensure the
momentum of the talks is maintained.
Meanwhile, officials of the US trade representative's office and Japan's
justice ministry yesterday held talks in Tokyo on improving business
opportunities for foreign lawyers in the heavily regulated Japanese market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1436</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Osman remanded in Hong Kong
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON HOLBERTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Lorrain Osman, the former chairman of a Malaysian bank who was extradited
from Britain to Hong Kong on Wednesday, was yesterday remanded in custody
pending a bail hearing early next week, writes Simon Holberton in Hong Kong.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1437</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / East Timor talks start
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
After United Nations-sponsored talks between Indonesia and Portugal in New
York yesterday over the disputed territory of East Timor, UN secretary
general Boutros Boutros Ghali said there was agreement to continue to try to
solve the problem, Michael Littlejohns writes from New York. A further
meeting of foreign ministers was scheduled for April 20 in Rome.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1438</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / IMF assails S African tax break
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The International Monetary Fund has strongly criticised tax incentives
provided by the South African government which formed the basis for the
Alusaf aluminium smelter and Columbus stainless steel plant expansion, two
large capital projects worth more than R10bn (Pounds 2.1bn) approved in the
past month, writes Philip Gawith in Johannesburg.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1439</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Moi to be warned over election
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HOLMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NAIROBI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Commonwealth observers are expected to warn President Daniel arap Moi today
that Kenya's election process has not so far been free and fair, writes
Michael Holman in Nairobi. A delegation led by Mr Justice Telford Georges,
leader of the 38-member monitoring team, will ask the president to respond
to charges of nomination 'irregularities', misuse of state resources, and
intimidation by the ruling Kanu party.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1440</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / French retake Somali embassy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOGADISHU
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
French troops reclaimed their embassy on Mogadishu's 'green line' yesterday
almost two years after a civil war forced its evacuation, Reuter reports
from Mogadishu. About 300 French troops arrived in Somalia last week as part
of a US-led multinational task force to stop gunmen from looting food
convoys.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1441</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / UN troops halted by Khmer Rouge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BANGKOK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KHMER ROUGE guerrillas in Cambodia yesterday detained 46 more United Nations
peacekeepers, only hours after releasing an earlier batch of 21, in their
latest act of defiance against the UN's Dollars 2bn (Pounds 1.3bn) mission
to bring peace and democracy to the country, writes Victor Mallet in
Bangkok.
All 46 are armed Indonesian soldiers who were told by the Khmer Rouge not to
leave the village of Phum O Sala, 10km east of the central town of Kompong
Thom. They had gone there to discuss the seizure of the 21. Last night the
Indonesians were in a stand-off with about 70 armed Khmer Rouge guerrillas.
UN soldiers may fire only in self-defence, and so far none of the 16,000 UN
military personnel in Cambodia has fired a shot in anger.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1442</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / S Korean candidates trade insults
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOUTH Koreans vote today in presidential elections after a campaign in which
allegations of vote-buying and state interference in the electoral process
have overtaken discussion of key issues such as the ailing economy.
Mr Kim Young-sam of the ruling Democratic Liberal party (DLP) and Mr Kim
Dae-jung of the main opposition Democratic party are virtually tied in
private surveys - publication of opinion polls in banned. The outcome is
likely to be determined by the performance of Mr Chung Ju-yung, founder of
the Hyundai business group, who is attracting votes mainly from the DLP.
The campaign's last days have had the atmosphere of a thriller, with talk of
secret corporate funds, North Korean spies, electronic eavesdropping and
'black' propaganda.
In other respects, the election has shown that democracy is taking root five
years after the downfall of military dictatorship. Gone are the tear gas
attacks that marred rallies in the 1987 election.
Political analysts believe mud-slinging was inevitable since personalities,
rather than issues, dominate Korean politics. There is little to distinguish
the centrist policies of the main contenders.
Although turnout is expected to exceed 80 per cent of the 29m registered
voters, crowds at election rallies are smaller than in 1987 when Koreans
wanted to show support for their new political freedoms.
The faltering economy and a lacklustre campaign threatened to erode the lead
of Mr Kim Young-sam, who has been the frontrunner all year long. When
opinion surveys showed his support to be weakening, he went on the offensive
accusing Mr Chung of trying to 'buy' the election by illegally employing the
financial resources and manpower of the Hyundai industrial empire, Korea's
largest. This coincided with a police investigation of Hyundai's role in the
election.
Mr Kim Young-sam has focused on the weaknesses of his opponents.
Although Koreans admire Mr Chung for building up Hyundai many also fear that
the chaebol, the country's family-run conglomerates such as Hyundai, will
come to dominate politics as the military once did.
Public distrust of Mr Kim Dae-jung is based on his long association with the
trade union and dissident movements and his geographical origins. He comes
from the south-western Cholla region, the most underdeveloped and rebellious
part of the country.
Mr Kim Young-sam may find his tactics could backfire. His own weakness lies
in the public perception that he is a political opportunist after he left
the opposition and joined the ruling party in 1990, with the promise that he
would become its presidential candidate. The DLP candidate's attacks against
Mr Chung and Hyundai have been alleged to be part of a biased government
effort to focus attention on illegal election practices of the opposition
candidates.
Mr Kim Young-sam was thrown on the defensive this week when Mr Chung's party
revealed it had a tape recording of a secret meeting among local government
officials in Pusan discussing means to help the DLP candidate.
The meeting in Pusan appeared to prove that the government was interfering
in the election on his behalf. The disclosure led to the forced resignation
of the Pusan mayor and other officials and may represent a serious setback
for Mr Kim Young-sam.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1443</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Party rallies to back Rao in MPs' vote
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR P V Narasimha Rao, the Indian prime minister, last night looked likely to
survive a parliamentary no-confidence motion today over his government's
handling of the Ayodhya mosque crisis.
The ruling Congress (I) party and its smaller allies seemed set to rally
around the prime minister to defeat a motion proposed by the right-wing
Hindu Bharatiya Janata party (BJP), the main opposition party. The BJP
organised a rally at which Hindu militants destroyed the mosque in Ayodhya
and provoked a nationwide wave of violence.
However, despite the public show of loyalty, many Congress party MPs harbour
serious doubts about supporting Mr Rao as prime minister. They feel some of
the criticisms of the government's role before and after the storming of the
mosque on December 6 have hit home. Some believe the party may have to call
a general election next year to restore its damaged credibility.
With the BJP defiant, India could face a prolonged political fight over
Ayodhya.
The uncertainty clouds the outlook for Mr Rao's widely praised economic
liberalisation programme, which has drawn much of its force from the
single-mindedness of his cabinet and its senior advisers.
Any hope that the crisis might be settled quickly has evaporated with a
government decision to impose central rule on three BJP-ruled states -
Rajastan, Madhya Pradesh, and Himachal Pradesh.
Mr Rao had earlier won praise for dismissing the BJP government in Uttar
Pradesh, which includes Ayodhya. But this week's move has been condemned by
commentators as unconstitutional.
If he sits tight and tries to ride out the crisis by doing as little as
possible, he will alienate hardliners in his own party who want him to go
all out in attacking the BJP. Moslems, who have traditionally supported
Congress, also want firm action. However, the strong use of government power
runs the risk of provoking sympathy for the BJP.
Even Indians who have no time for the BJP are very wary of the government
imposing central rule - because of the memories it evokes of repressive acts
carried out during Mrs Indira Gandhi's period of central government rule in
the 'emergency' of the 1970s.
The loss of support from newspapers is significant because most of the press
has supported economic reform.
India's Supreme Court yesterday reinstated an investigation into allegations
of corruption over a Dollars 1.3bn (Pounds 855m) artillery deal with the
Swedish company Bofors, Reuter adds.
It delivered final judgment on a government appeal against a lower court
order in September which ended the investigation into the 1986 deal on the
grounds that no charges had been brought despite the lengthy probe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1444</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Japanese party plans tax changes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S ruling Liberal Democratic party yesterday revived tax incentives for
house purchases in an attempt to stimulate the property market and lifted
the tax-exempt threshold on the savings accounts of elderly people.
The tax proposals were part of a much-debated package of reforms drafted by
the party's tax system research council and approved yesterday by its
executive council, which had an eye on an election scheduled for next year.
Japanese business organisations generally condemned the proposals, having
pressed unsuccessfully for income tax cuts to stimulate the economy. The
Finance Ministry had opposed the income tax cuts, arguing that the economic
downturn has seriously slowed the flow of tax revenues.
Mr Masaru Hayami, chairman of the Japan Association of Corporate Executives,
said his organisation would continue to push for income tax cuts and an
increase in value added tax, now 3 per cent, to compensate for those cuts.
But Mr Gaishi Hiraiwa, chairman of the Keidanren federation of economic
organisations, praised the proposed reintroduction of tax breaks on the sale
and repurchase of housing. He said the measure would help ordinary Japanese
trying to upgrade their home.
The housing tax break, curtailed in 1988, is designed to stimulate the
property market but discourage the rampant speculation of the late 1980s.
Tax exemptions will apply to owners who have lived in their houses for over
10 years and be limited to transactions of Y100m (Pounds 530,000) or less.
With votes in mind, the party decided against increases to alcohol and
tobacco taxes, and lifted the tax exempt amount of bank and postal savings
accounts for the elderly and the disabled from Y3m to Y3.5m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1445</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Beijing welcomes Yeltsin
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By YVONNE PRESTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIJING
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RUSSIAN President Boris Yeltsin, vilified a year ago as a traitor to
communism by China's leaders, was warmly greeted in Beijing yesterday by
Chinese President Yang Shangkun and accorded a 21-gun salute.
The Russian leader told reporters it would be abnormal for two great nations
sharing a 4,000km border not to develop co-operation. He said the two sides
must make 'every effort to develop mutually beneficial trade and friendly
co-operation.'
Mr Mikhail Gorbachev, the then Soviet leader, visited China in May 1989 in a
trip overshadowed by the doomed student democracy movement which took over
the streets and hailed him as a hero.
The Chinese economy is booming under tight political controls while Russia's
attempts at free market reform have so far failed to bring the measure of
economic prosperity and double digit growth apparent along China's east
coast. Barter trade along the border grew 20 per cent this year.
Almost 20 documents are due to be signed during the visit. They include a
joint declaration on the basic principles of Russian-Chinese relations and
agreements on co-operation in trade and in the economic, scientific,
technical, nuclear energy and cultural fields.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1446</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Hopes fade for German pact
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HOPES of a rapid conclusion of the planned 'solidarity pact' between German
government, opposition, trade unions and employers were fading yesterday as
serious differences emerged over tax plans and aid to east German industry.
Chancellor Helmut Kohl said he was still confident, hoping for substantive
results in January or at the latest February - well after his original
Christmas deadline. Agreement on such a deal, including an accord on wage
restraint by trade unions and strict budget savings by central government
and the 16 federal states, is seen as essential to a relaxation in interest
rates by the Bundesbank.
Mr Bjorn Engholm, leader of the opposition Social Democrats (SPD), said he
believed the chances for a genuine pact were receding; some form of
unilateral government declaration was more likely.
Wide differences existed in how far the government was ready to maintain key
east German industries, and what the opposition and trade unions were
seeking. The government does not wish to give any general employment
guarantee, and wants a strictly limited and defined policy of industrial
subsidies for companies restructuring for identified new markets. The SPD
and unions want at least 400 major east German enterprises saved.
The other key difference is that Mr Kohl is only prepared to consider a tax
increase to finance the debt burden of east Germany in 1995. The SPD and
unions want more tax revenues next year, to cut the budget deficit and
encourage a relaxation in the Bundesbank's strict monetary policy.
Mr Kohl said the German business community was prepared to play its part in
the solidarity pact. They were ready to guarantee large-scale training of
eastern apprentices. Several insurance companies had agreed to provide
urgent finance for increased house-building in the east.
He was confident the unions were ready to present moderate wage claims, but
urged public-sector unions to reach a new wage agreement by February at the
latest. Many other west European countries had already embarked on drastic
budget savings, including Spain, Britain and France.
Mr Kohl promised a budget savings package in January, and a supplementary
budget to provide more cash for the east in the first quarter. His plan for
a 1995 tax rise should be agreed in the first half of 1993.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1447</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Chancellor Kohl proposes sending 1,500 German troops to
Somalia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Chancellor Kohl yesterday proposed sending 1,500 German troops to Somalia,
including 'self-defence' units, engineers and communications teams, writes
Quentin Peel.
His initiative was condemned by the opposition Social Democrats (SPD) as
provocative, and contrary to the German constitution, because it would send
armed soldiers potentially into action outside the Nato area.
Mr Kohl's move aimed to bring to a head debate in Germany over whether to
join only peace-keeping operations, as the SPD prefers, or peace-making
efforts too, as the chancellor proposes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1448</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Bundesbank resists cut in interest rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A CUT in German interest rates now would fuel inflation and lead to even
sharper monetary restrictions in future, the Bundesbank warned yesterday.
It said domestic economic conditions had worsened and admitted that
relaxation of its policies might temporarily help counter the effects of the
slowdown on production and employment.
But any easing would come at the cost of accelerating inflation later.
Experience showed monetary policy served economic development best when it
provided stable monetary conditions, the bank said in its latest monthly
report.
Domestic criticism of the central bank's stance has increased as recession
has hit production, employment and company profits. But while the report
acknowledged the mounting difficulties, it said it was up to the government,
unions and employers to find the new answers necessary for a return to
'lasting, inflation-free growth'.
The bank accepted that the public sector's attempts to control spending were
being hampered by the deteriorating economic climate, but noted that
inflation was still 'stubbornly high'.
Total public-sector deficits this year were expected to be higher than in
1991 and to account for almost 4 per cent of Gross National Product, or 6
per cent if the borrowings of the Treuhand privatisation agency and the post
and railway authorities are included.
The federal government's deficit was expected to increase in 1993 as tax
revenues fell and social welfare and unemployment payments increased, the
report noted.
The bank reminded the Bonn government it still had to find cuts to
compensate for next year's planned supplementary budget of DM12bn (Pounds
4.9bn) in development aid for the east.
The Bonn government, which is aiming to produce its spending cuts proposals
by the end of January, is also under pressure to deliver its mooted
'solidarity pact'.
The Bundesbank showed concern about recent decisions by Lander (state)
governments to increase their 1993 spending by up to 6 per cent and an
average 4.5 per cent.
While this marks a slowdown in the rate of growth, it is still far wide of
Bonn's demand that regional budgets should increase by an annual maximum 3
per cent for the next few years.
The bank said the forthcoming public-sector pay negotiations would be
especially important this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1449</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Sauna diplomacy of Kohl and Yeltsin: Quentin Peel reports on
how two leaders went to extremes to reach a finance deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF THE irrepressible Mr Theo Waigel, Germany's finance minister, is to be
believed, then the key to the complex package deal negotiated between Bonn
and Moscow this week lay in the chilly conservatory of Mr Boris Yeltsin's
hunting lodge at Zavidovo, north of Moscow.
'It was cold enough to concentrate our minds,' Mr Waigel said when he got
back to the splendid surroundings of the Vladimir Hall in the Kremlin to
sign the joint declaration, and a string of bilateral treaties. 'Either we
reached agreement, or we got the flu.'
While Chancellor Helmut Kohl and President Boris Yeltsin went hunting boar
(the Russian got one, but none for the nervous Chancellor), their ministers
thrashed out the last tricky details of the debt-and-compensation deal,
after more than a year of hard bargaining.
Then Mr Kohl, Mr Yeltsin and Mr Waigel all repaired to the sauna, with
nothing but an interpreter and a few birch twigs between them, in a display
of intimate camaraderie with which no other western leaders can compete.
As the German delegation flew back to Bonn on Wednesday night, it was
obvious they were relieved and elated to have emerged unscathed by the
political upheavals surrounding Mr Yeltsin. Mr Kohl had demonstrated his
support for him, sorted out their outstanding disputes over compensation for
Soviet military installations, and Moscow's debts to the former East
Germany, and put Bonn back on top of the list of Russia's most helpful
western partners. It was no mean achievement.
And yet there were dissident voices in the back of the aircraft, suggesting
that the entire exercise was little more than sticking plaster.
It would buy Mr Yeltsin's embattled government a few more months before they
are faced with the next desperate need for another round of debt relief.
There were really four elements to the deal. Germany agreed to suspend its
claim, until the year 2000, for repayment of a small mountain of debt run up
with the former East Germany in the last six months before unification. The
sum is 6.4bn transferable roubles - the accounting unit used by the former
Comecon states, and valued in the German unification treaty at an exchange
rate of DM2.34 (96p).
The money is owing for goods which were ordered and delivered before Moscow
had to pay for its imports in hard currency, and the Russians dispute the
true value of the debt.
Now both sides have agreed not to talk about it at all for eight years, and
then try to negotiate a deal. Most Germans admit the money is as good as
written off, but the fact the debt exists is accepted by Moscow. In
exchange, Mr Yeltsin has agreed to abandon claims for massive compensation
for the Soviet military property in East Germany: Bonn's claims for
environmental reparations, and Moscow's claims for property payment for its
243,000 hectares and 20,000 buildings, have simply been cancelled out in a
'zero solution'. The Soviet military is decidedly unhappy, but Germany is
delighted with a reasonable compromise, even if the environmental clean-up
costs billions. The only new cash in the agreement is DM550m, to be paid by
Bonn in extra housing grants for returning Russian soldiers.
There were many fine words about future economic co-operation, and the green
light for potentially the biggest joint venture of all - an oil and gas
exploration scheme by Germany's Deminex near Volgograd. But the businessmen
who came with Mr Kohl were very tough and sceptical about investment
opportunities when they met Mr Yeltsin.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1450</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Successor to MacSharry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Padraig Flynn, Ireland's justice minister, has been appointed as his
country's new commissioner to the EC commission, to replace Mr Ray
MacSharry, who stands down next month, writes Tim Coone in Dublin. A
conservative-minded former school teacher and publican, Mr Flynn, 53, is a
devout Catholic and member of the Fianna Fail party.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1451</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Western Europe's new car sales up by 1.2%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SALES of new cars in western Europe increased by 1.2 per cent last month,
with higher demand in Germany and France compensating for a heavy decline in
sales in Italy.
According to industry estimates, sales in the first 11 months of the year,
at 12.53m, were 1.3 per cent lower than in the corresponding period a year
earlier.
New car sales last month rose to an estimated 974,000 from 963,000 a year
ago. However, carmakers are becoming increasingly gloomy about the outlook
for new car demand in west Europe in 1993.
According to Mr Jacques Calvet, chairman of the Peugeot group of France, new
car sales in west Europe are forecast to fall by more than 4 per cent next
year.
Most car producers have already imposed short-time working, and Ford this
week became the latest to announce a big cut in its workforce, with plans to
eliminate more than 10,000 jobs in Europe by the end of next year.
Ford's Spanish subsidiary said yesterday that it would cut 1,200 jobs next
year, of which 950-1,000 would be lost at its car and engine plants at
Valencia. Ford's Spanish workforce has already been reduced to 9,680 from
10,084 at the end of 1990.
Despite the steep fall in new orders in Germany, new car sales in Europe's
single biggest market rose last month by 4.7 per cent to 285,730. Demand is
being pulled forward from January in advance of a rise in value added tax.
Ominously, new car sales fell heavily in Italy, showing a decline of 11.7
per cent. Italy, the second largest car market in Europe, has long enjoyed
steady demand, but sales have now been lower than a year ago for four months
in succession.
Demand is also weakening in Spain, where car sales fell by 1.3 per cent in
November. Sales had increased strongly in the early months and in the first
11 months were still 9.9 per cent higher than a year ago.
In the weak UK market, new car sales rose by 6.3 per cent in November,
although sales for the first 11 months were still 1.3 per cent below the
very low level of last year.
Registrations in the UK have been higher than a year ago in three of the
past four months, although the stronger demand is mainly coming from the
fleet sector.
Across west Europe, new car sales in November were lower than a year ago in
nine of 17 markets. The Volkswagen group of Germany, which includes Audi,
Seat and Skoda, has consolidated its lead in the west European market and
has boosted its share to an estimated 17.4 per cent in the first 11 months
of the year from 16.3 per cent a year ago.
Despite its sales success, the group has warned this week that it has
slumped into loss in the final quarter of the year. It is facing widespread
short-time working at its German plants and further job cuts, as it seeks
belatedly to tackle its uncompetitive German cost-base.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 WEST EUROPEAN NEW CAR REGISTRATIONS
                         January-November 1992
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                    Volume      Volume       Share (%)      Share (%)
                    (Units)     Change(%)    Jan-Nov 92     Jan-Nov 91
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
TOTAL MARKET        12,535,000      -1.3         100.0          100.0
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
MANUFACTURERS:
Volkswagen*(incl.   2,181,000       +5.7          17.4           16.3
Audi,SEAT&amp;Skoda)
General Motors      1,557,000       +0.7          12.4           12.2
(Opel/Vauxhall,
US++++ &amp; Saab)
 -Opel/Vauxhall     1,490,000       +1.4          11.9           11.6
 -Saab**               47,000       -3.2           0.4            0.4
Peugeot (incl.      1,521,000       -0.1          12.1           12.0
Citroen)
Fiat (incl. Lancia,  1,499,000       -7.7          12.0           12.8
Alfa Romeo, Ferrari
Innocenti,Maserati)
Ford (Europe,       1,432,000       -5.8          11.4           12.0
US++++ &amp; Jaguar)
 -Ford Europe       1,420,000       -5.7          11.3           11.9
 -Jaguar               10,000      -12.7           0.1            0.1
Renault+++          1,328,000       +5.6          10.6            9.9
BMW                   415,000       +7.2           3.3            3.1
Nissan                403,000       -4.5           3.2            3.3
Mercedes-Benz         382,000      -11.1           3.0            3.4
Toyota                312,000       -9.4           2.5            2.7
Rover++               299,000      -10.3           2.4            2.6
Mazda                 253,000       -8.4           2.0            2.2
Volvo+++              185,000       -0.7           1.5            1.5
Honda++               165,000       +1.5           1.3            1.3
Mitsubishi            150,000      -18.4           1.2            1.5
Total Japanese      1,484,000       -6.8          11.8           12.5
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
MARKETS:
Germany             3,638,000       -7.4          29.0           30.9
Italy               2,226,000       +2.0          17.8           17.2
France              1,886,000       +1.1          15.0           14.7
United Kingdom      1,514,000       -1.3          12.1           12.1
Spain                 897,000       +9.9           7.2            6.4
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
++++Cars imported from US and sold in western Europe.
 *VW holds 31 per cent and management control of Skoda.
 **GM holds 50 per cent and management control of Saab Automobile.
 ++Honda holds a 20 per cent stake in Rover vehicle operations.
 +++Renault and Volvo are linked through minority cross-shareholdings.
Source: industry estimates
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1452</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Franc fort and Frankfurt in trial of strength: France's
'strong franc' policy may create tensions in the New Year between the
Bundesbank and the Bank of France
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE French government has for five months valiantly defended the 'franc
fort', the cornerstone of its economic policy, against intense currency
speculation, write James Blitz in London and Alice Rawsthorn in Paris.
Mr Pierre Beregovoy, the French prime minister, was in battledress again
yesterday, saying the existing parity against the D-Mark, on which so much
of his political capital has been expended, was inviolable.
'This government must keep its cool,' he said. 'I am absolutely against any
talk of devaluation or of floating the European currencies.'
But his words could not mask what one dealer called the franc's 'significant
loss of credibility' in recent weeks. Some analysts believe that a
devaluation of the French currency is a possibility next year. The move
would probably mark the end of the European Exchange Rate Mechanism, whose
cornerstone was the fixing of the D-Mark and franc parities in 1979. A
devaluation might even endanger the entire project of European Monetary
Union, of which the ERM is the foundation. In recent days, speculation
against the French currency has been comparatively restrained, because
currency operators are unwilling to risk the profits that they have made in
dealing earlier in the year.
But some are preparing for what could be a New Year of intense speculation
against the franc, now the weakest currency in the ERM.
Yesterday, the franc dipped to FFr3.4210 to the D-Mark, less than a centime
above its ERM floor of FFr3.4305.
The currency has also fallen this week through the critical level of minus
75 percentage points on the ERM's 'divergence indicator'. This measures a
currency's relative strength against the European Currency Unit (Ecu). Once
a currency has reached this level, it is presumed that its central bank
should defend it by intervention and by raising interest rates.
Currency pressure has also forced France's state-owned banks to raise base
rates by 0.55 percentage points in the wake of rises in money market rates.
'The French government is clearly concerned about industrial confidence and
would like to stimulate investment, so the base rate increase is a blow,'
says Mr Christopher Potts, chief economist of Banque Indosuez in Paris.
By any reasonable standard, a devaluation of the franc should not be on the
currency market's agenda at all. Measured by economic fundamentals, the
franc should actually be a candidate for revaluation against the D-Mark.
France's year-on-year consumer price inflation is 2.1 per cent, well below
western Germany's level of 3.7 per cent. France also enjoys a healthy
annualised trade balance of FFr4.71bn.
Germany, meanwhile, appears to be entering a serious recession: the Ifo
institute claimed this week that German GDP could fall by 0.5 per cent next
year. However, the franc is falling victim to the currency dealers'
admiration for the D-Mark as a currency that has never been devalued, a
respect that was at the heart of the September currency crisis.
'The German currency is being bought by dealers not because of the economic
fundamentals, but because of the belief that the German currency will never
be devalued,' says Mr Paul Chertkow, global currency strategist at UBS
Philips and Drew in London. Dealers believe there is no risk at all in
investing in D-Marks, which currently trade above 9 per cent. Compounding
the faith in the German currency is uncertainty whether Paris can go on
defending the franc's existing parity by raising interest rates. The
country's parliamentary elections, due in March, have also forced the
government's hand, while opposition leaders are threatening to break the
bipartisan agreement on a strong franc.
Miss Alison Cottrell, an economist at Midland Montagu Global Markets in
London, believes that the unwillingness to raise official interest rates may
create tensions between the Bundesbank and the Bank of France in the New
Year. She believes that the Bundesbank will support the franc through
intervention only if France plays by the ERM rules and tightens monetary
policy first.
Mr Chertkow, of UBS Philips and Drew, is more optimistic. He believes that
President Francois Mitterrand of France and Chancellor Helmut Kohl of
Germany have staked so much political capital on the ERM that they will do
whatever is necessary to defend the parity.
Yesterday, the Bundesbank president, Mr Helmut Schlesinger, said in
Frankfurt that he still saw no reason to change ERM parities involving the
French franc. 'I stay with what we said on September 21 (at a meeting of the
IMF and the World Bank) in Washington that, based on fundamental factors, we
see no reason to change the parities of the French franc.' However, Mr
Chertkow also believes that there is a 30-to-40 per cent chance that market
pressure will overwhelm the combined efforts of the Bundesbank and Bank of
France next year.
In this situation, he believes France and Germany will resort to temporarily
suspending the Exchange Rate Mechanism for a limited period.
'Devaluation would be the death-knell of the system,' he says. 'But a
suspension of the ERM would allow the market to determine what the fair
value for currencies is.' If the markets go by the economic fundamentals,
they would probably devalue the D-Mark and allow French rates to fall below
Germany's before the parities are fixed.
Editorial comment, Page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1453</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Panic denounces election rival
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The Yugoslav prime minister, Mr Milan Panic, yesterday urged tens of
thousands of cheering Serbs to depose his rival, Mr Slobodan Milosevic, the
president of Serbia, in elections on Sunday, writes Laura Silber in
Belgrade.
About 100,000 people braved freezing temperatures to show their support for
Mr Panic, the strongest challenger to Mr Milosevic.
Mr Panic said Mr Milosevic had 'built a Chinese wall around Serbia' through
war.
Stark choice, page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1454</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Backing for Polish miners
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Poland's steelworkers yesterday threw their backing behind the the stoppages
sweeping the industrial heartland of Silesia, as strikes spread to all but
five of the country's 70 coal mines, writes Christopher Bobinski in Warsaw.
The steelworkers declared a 'strike alert' to underscore their support,
enabling them to take action if the government refused to meet the miners'
demands.
Protests began on Monday against continuing government wage curbs on state
industries. Mr Waclaw Niewiarowski, the industry minister, warned the
strikers that a return to the priority status the region enjoyed under
communist rule was impossible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1455</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Gaidar given advisory position
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Boris Yeltsin, striving to keep Russia on the free-market road,
has given his sacked reform chief Yegor Gaidar a new advisory role and told
the new prime minister to form a cabinet by next Tuesday, Reuter reports
from Moscow.
Mr Yeltsin's press office said Mr Gaidar, replaced as premier three days ago
by the more conservative Mr Viktor Chernomyrdin, had been appointed a
presidential adviser on economic policy.
A separate presidential order set a Tuesday deadline for Mr Chernomyrdin,
previously deputy prime minister in charge of fuel and energy, to form his
new government.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1456</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Orders rise slightly as jobless total hits 2.91m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN, Economics Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH manufacturers yesterday reported a slight improvement in orders over
the past month, but a bigger than expected increase in unemployment in
November brought little hope of a speedy recovery from recession.
The monthly trends inquiry from the Confederation of British Industry, the
employers' group, found that manufacturers' order books were at their best
levels for five months, although well below normal. Export order books had
also improved, suggesting that the pound's decline since September's Black
Wednesday might be prompting higher export demand.
However, 26 per cent of the 1,383 companies polled by the CBI between
November 26 and December 11 expected output to decline over the next four
months compared with 19 per cent expecting a rise and 55 per cent expecting
output to stay unchanged.
Although the companies' output expectations were less gloomy than in
November, the survey was the sixth monthly poll in a row in which more
manufacturers forecast output decreases than increases.
The CBI report covered companies accounting for about half of UK
manufactured exports and employment.
It did nothing to ease fears that unemployment would continue to rise after
increasing by a seasonally adjusted 41,100 to 2.91m, or 10.3 per cent of the
UK workforce, between October and November.
The increase in the number of benefit claimants seeking jobs was more than
the 35,000 expected by City analysts and higher than the average monthly
increase over the past six months.
The Unemployment Unit, an independent group campaigning for full employment,
forecast that the official jobless total would reach 3m by February and peak
at 3.2m by the early summer of 1994.
After making allowances for the many official changes in the definition of
unemployment made during the 1980s, the Unemployment Unit estimated that
underlying unemployment in Britain was 4.06m last month.
The latest government figures indicated that the unemployment data have not
captured the full extent of job losses over the past year. While seasonally
adjusted unemployment increased by 391,000 in the 12 months to November,
Department of Employment figures showed that the UK workforce in employment
fell by 861,000 over the four quarters to the end of September.
Mr Norman Willis, TUC general secretary, said there was a clear need for
government action on unemployment.
But the Treasury said the November figures related to activity levels before
the government's Autumn Statement. It said that since Black Wednesday the
government had eased monetary policy and acted to restore confidence and
encourage recovery.
South-east jobless rate above 10%, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1457</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / BA furthers global ambitions with ADollars 665m stake in
Qantas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS and KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS took an important step yesterday in its strategy to become a
global airline by acquiring a 25 per cent stake for ADollars 665m (Pounds
291m) in Qantas, the Australian national carrier.
The UK carrier was chosen by the Australian government as the preferred
foreign airline partner for Qantas against stiff competition from Singapore
Airlines.
The Qantas deal coincides with growing signs that BA is likely to fail in
its efforts to win US government approval for its proposed Dollars 750m
(Pounds 476m) acquisition of a 44 per cent stake in USAir, the sixth largest
US carrier.
Mr John Major, the prime minister, will make a final attempt to secure US
government approval for the BA-USAir deal during talks with President George
Bush at Camp David tomorrow.
BA said it had 'significant cash resources and external borrowing
facilities' to finance the Qantas stake.
The deal is the first stage in the privatisation of the state-owned
Australian carrier. The Australian government's remaining 75 per cent stake
will be sold through a flotation next year.
The government said it hoped to receive a further ADollars 1.5bn to ADollars
2bn from the flotation, which would value the airline at between ADollars
2.1bn and ADollars 2.6bn.
Foreign financial institutions will be allocated 10 per cent of the stock,
which may be listed on overseas stock exchanges. The net return to the
government will be between ADollars 800m and ADollars 1.3bn, after providing
for a ADollars 1.35bn recapitalisation of Qantas through the conversion of
ADollars 1.2bn debt to equity and a cash injection of ADollars 150m.
But the flotation may have to be delayed until 1993-94 to avoid a clash with
the next federal election, due to be held by June.
BA's bid was accepted after Sir Colin Marshall, BA's chief executive, topped
a rival offer from Singapore Airlines in last minute negotiations in
Canberra with Mr Ralph Willis, Australia's finance minister.
Mr Willis said BA also offered greater strategic benefits to Qantas than
Singapore Airlines, which sought to buy 20 per cent of the Australian
carrier.
Mr Willis said Australian control of Qantas and its identity as a national
flag carrier would not be jeopardised. BA's bid had met some strong
opposition in Australia because of fears that the UK carrier would seek to
dominate Qantas.
But BA, which will be allocated three seats on a new 12-seat Qantas board to
be chaired by an Australian, went to considerable lengths to reassure its
critics it had no intention of seeking control. BA also said it planned to
sign a 10-year commercial agreement with Qantas and establish a joint
committee to identify areas of potential co-operation.
The two carriers have an association dating back to 1933 when the then
Qantas Empire Airways was formed. BOAC sold its shares in Qantas to the
Australian government in 1947.
Sir Colin said the deal would provide 'significant benefits' for both
airlines by linking BA's strong North American and European networks with
Qantas's Pacific and Asian routes.
BA has now fulfilled its ambitions in Asia and Europe, where it recently
took over Dan-Air in the UK and acquired large stakes in a French and a
German regional carrier, but it is facing an uphill battle to gain approval
for its proposed USAir deal.
The US has been seeking greater access for its carriers in the London market
in return for approving the BA-USAir transaction. This has so far been
vigorously resisted by the UK side.
Editorial Comment, Page 12
Lex, Page 14
BA's global jigsaw, Page 15
Delta cuts dividend, Page 19
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1458</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Pools operators fear lottery will cost 3,000 jobs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOOTBALL POOLS operators warned yesterday that up to 3,000 jobs could be
lost in their industry as a result of the government's plans for a national
lottery starting in 1994.
Tickets will cost Pounds 1 and there will be a top prize of at least Pounds
1m a week. The games will range from scratch cards with instant prizes to
weekly draws using the latest computer technology.
The National Lottery Bill, published yesterday, contained no concessions for
pools operators employing 6,500 people, mainly on Merseyside.
Mr Malcolm Hughes, managing director of Vernons Pools, said two of the three
main pools operators - Vernons and Zetters - could go to the wall unless the
industry was allowed to 'compete on level terms with the lottery'. Operators
of existing charity lotteries were also critical of the plan.
On an annual turnover of Pounds 1.5bn, Mr Peter Brooke, national heritage
secretary, predicted prizes of about Pounds 14m a week. The money raised
will go equally to five causes - the arts, heritage, sport, charities and a
new fund to celebrate the millennium.
The lottery 'will create jobs and generate new work for existing
businesses', Mr Brooke said. 'It opens up a wealth of exciting new
opportunities. It will create millionaires and museums.'
A single licence will be awarded by tender to run the lottery although other
companies can get sub-licences to run individual games which will be part of
the national lottery. The bill gives no details of the tender criteria.
Companies expected to bid for the lottery licences include Racal, Rank,
Vernons, Bass, UK Charity Lotteries and consortia being put together by a
number of merchant banks. British Telecommunications is also considered a
possibility. The Post Office wants to sell tickets.
Mr Brooke rejected concessions for the pools industry, which has turnover of
Pounds 853m a year and is dominated by Littlewoods. He said talk of a level
playing field was 'misplaced'. Skill was a factor when filling in pools
coupons whereas lotteries were games of pure chance.
Mr Hughes of Vernons claimed this was 'absolute nonsense', saying most
people used birthdays and any other numbers that they could think of.
The pools companies want the right to advertise on television, collect
contributions legally through retail outlets, roll over prizes from one week
to the next if there is no outright winner and pay the same rate of tax as
the national lottery. The pools companies pay a total of 47.5 per cent of
turnover on tax and donations to sport and the arts.
More than 100 MPs have already signed a Commons motion supporting the pools
operators' case and Mr Brooke promised yesterday that 'dialogue will
continue'.
Mr Frank Flannery, managing director of UK Charity Lotteries, a lottery
manager, said charity lotteries were currently worth about Pounds 260m a
year. 'There is a grave danger that this will be completely wiped out,' he
said.
Lottery launched amid pools row, Page 8
Editorial Comment, Page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1459</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 ----------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 ----------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100: 2,740.3 (+7.5)
Yield 4.46
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 1,034.41 (-2.21)
FT-A All-Share 1,309.31 (+0.5%)
FT-A World Index 140.22 (+0.5%)
Nikkei 17,437.91 (+169.20)
New York:
Dow Jones Ind Ave 3,269.23 (+14.05)
S&amp;P Composite 435.43 (+3.91)
 ----------------------------------------------------
US RATES
 ----------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds: 2 15/16% (2 15/16%)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld 3.25% (3.271%)
Long Bond 102 3/8 (102 9/32)
Yield 7.420% (7.428%)
 ----------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 ----------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank 7 5/16% (Same)
Liffe long gilt future: Dec 100 (Dec 100 17/32)
 ----------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 ----------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day Feb dollars 18.425 (18.25)
Gold
New York Comex Feb dollars 339.2 (337.9)
London dollars 338.35 (337.05)
 ----------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 ----------------------------------------------------
New York:
dollars 1.5795 (1.575)
London:
dollars 1.5735 (1.577)
DM 2.4575 (2.4525)
FFr 8.4025 (8.3825)
SFr 2.205 (2.2025)
Y 193.75 (Same)
pounds Index 80.7 (80.5)
 ----------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 ----------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM 1.55755 (1.55705)
FFr 5.325 (5.322)
SFr 1.3975 (1.399)
Y 122.835 (122.98)
London:
DM 1.5625 (1.555)
FFr 5.34 (5.315)
SFr 1.4015 (1.397)
Y 123.15 (122.9)
dollars Index 64.6 (64.7)
Tokyo open Y 122.98
 ----------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1460</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLRBYAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Israel action threatens peace talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY and GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM, WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE FUTURE of the Middle East peace negotiations was thrown into doubt
yesterday as Israel expelled about 400 Palestinians to Lebanon, bound and
blindfolded, in spite of international protests.
The Palestine Liberation Organisation said in Tunis that Palestinians would
suspend taking part in the peace talks until the deportees were allowed to
return.
In an unprecedented mass expulsion, the Israelis drove most of the deportees
across the border in convoys of buses, while 32 were flown out in a
helicopter. The expulsion follows the kidnapping and killing of an Israeli
border policeman earlier this week.
Opponents went to court to try to stop the expulsions, but the deportees -
accused of belonging to militant Islamic groups - were taken over the border
as soon as Israel's High Court approved their deportation.
Last night they were still trapped in snow-covered terrain in the
Israeli-controlled security zone of southern Lebanon after Lebanese troops
had drawn up with orders to stop them going deeper into Lebanon.
Outraged Palestinian leaders and the Syrians boycotted the last day of their
current round of talks with Israel in Washington in protest at the
expulsions. But President George Bush, seeking to keep the US-backed peace
process alive, hosted separate meetings at the White House with teams
representing Israel and its adversaries, Syria, Lebanon, Jordan and the
Palestinians.
The US State Department condemned the deportations and said it had urged
Israel not to go ahead with them. In Little Rock, Arkansas, President-elect
Bill Clinton said he was concerned the expulsions 'may go too far and
imperil the peace talks'.
Mr Bush said: 'I am confident the new administration is going to want to see
the peace talks continue. It has got to go forward.'
But Mrs Hanan Ashrawi, the Palestinian spokeswoman, said: 'The peace
process. . . is on the brink of disaster.'
Mr Yitzhak Rabin, the Israeli prime minister, ordered the expulsions in
retaliation for violent attacks on Israeli forces by the Hamas Islamic
fundamentalist movement, culminating on Tuesday in the murder of the
kidnapped paramilitary border police officer. It is by far the largest
peacetime expulsion by Israel since it captured the West Bank and Gaza Strip
in 1967.
The deportees were kept tied and blindfolded for almost 20 hours in 22 buses
at the Lebanese border while civil rights lawyers tried in vain to win a
court order halting the action.
The Israeli government said the deported Palestinians could appeal against
the decision once they were in exile and could return home after not more
than two years.
Mr Rabin brushed aside protests, saying the expulsions were necessary to
crack down on Hamas.
'We said we would wage a war against terrorism as if there were no peace
negotiations and engage in peace negotiations as if there was no war against
terrorism.'
Saying the alternatives were to introduce the death penalty, destroy
Palestinian homes or allow soldiers greater freedom to open fire in the
occupied territories, Mr Rabin added: 'We chose the way which involves the
least violation of human life and property.'
Palestinians said the expulsions went beyond the harsh policies of the
previous government led by the Likud party and undermined the credibility of
Mr Rabin's commitment to peace talks.
The decision 'shows that the Labour government is capable of taking more
repressive measures than the Likud,' said Mr Sari Nusseibeh, an adviser to
the Palestinian delegation.
The decision was supported by ministers from Labour's left-liberal Meretz
coalition partners who had strongly opposed the 66 previous deportations
carried out during the five years of the Palestinian uprising, or intifada,
in the occupied territories.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1461</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: French hotel and casino group
slips 4.6%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOCIETE des Bains de Mer, the company that controls most of the grand hotels
and casinos in Monaco, suffered a slight fall in net profits during the
first half of the year.
The company, which owns the Hotel de Paris in Monte Carlo as well as the
main casino, saw net profits slip by 4.6 per cent to FFr107.6m (Dollars
20.24m) in the six months to September 30 1992 from FFr112.6m in the same
period last year.
By contrast, interim turnover rose by 5.6 per cent to FFr1.56bn.
Rhone-Poulenc Rorer, the US-based pharmaceuticals subsidiary of
Rhone-Poulenc, France's flagship chemicals group, made a profit of Dollars
258m from the sale and leaseback of its headquarters to an unidentified US
investment group. The proceeds will be used to reduce the company's debt.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1462</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / Albania makes hard work of investment: Kerin Hope reports on
the risks and frustrations of setting up in Europe's most backward country
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FILTERED through wheezing loudspeakers at the Shkodra Chamber of Commerce,
Mr Ahmet Musavi's invitation to invest in Albania could almost be mistaken
for an obituary of the country's manufacturing industry.
With unworldly truthfulness, Mr Musavi, chairman of the city council,
explained why all but three of the 15 state-owned factories on offer stopped
work over a year ago. The reasons he cited were similar: shortages of raw
materials and spare parts, outdated technology and mass departures of
skilled workers.
'We are ready to welcome foreign investors, whether in joint ventures or on
their own. We want to modernise, but we don't have any money,' he said.
The factories in question, among them plants that used to produce textiles,
shoes, soap and canned vegetables, could serve as a museum of industry. It
is hard to imagine that anyone could get the pre-second world war machinery
from Italy - along with Chinese and Hungarian imports from the 1960s -
working again.
Albania's emergence from autarchy is going to be painfully slow, despite the
government's avowed enthusiasm for establishing a market economy. While
strikes and massive emigration to Italy and Greece succeeded in hastening
the collapse of the Stalinist system, the economy was reduced to ruins.
When the Democratic party came to power in March, almost two-thirds of the
country's factories had shut and most farm co-operatives had been divided
up, sometimes by force, into peasant smallholdings. Albania's foreign debt
has swelled from Dollars 200m to Dollars 600m in two years, while exports
almost ground to a halt.
The Albanians' dream was that as soon as communism was defeated, luxury
tourist resorts would start springing up along their unspoiled coastline. In
fact, initial interest shown by Italian hoteliers and Greek contractors has
faded because the government insists that foreigners cannot buy land, but
must settle for a 49-year lease.
The European Bank for Reconstruction and Development is trying to find
international companies willing to modernise Albania's mining industry,
dependent until recently on the unpaid labour of political prisoners. But a
slump in prices for copper and chrome could discourage potential investors,
who would have to spend heavily on improving processing and productivity.
Prospects look somewhat brighter for the oil industry. Preliminary offshore
surveys by US, Italian, and German oil companies granted concessions last
year reportedly produced encouraging results, with test drilling due to
start early in 1993. Yet no foreign company has been signed up to modernise
the onshore fields in southern Albania, where output has dropped by more
than 40 per cent in the past decade.
For all the apparent willingness to embrace change, Albanian officials
clearly find it hard to throw off their traditional suspicion of outsiders,
which did much to sustain Enver Hoxha's policy of isolation in the communist
period.
Efforts to set a legislative framework for investment are also hampered by
the past: Albania lacked a justice ministry for over 20 years before it was
re-established in 1990. Importing legal expertise has become a priority in
order to introduce basic tax, commercial and company law.
'Confusion over the legal position, combined with the long-drawn out process
of decision-making makes it very frustrating trying to do business here,'
says Mr Alex Standish, a British consultant.
Over 50 joint ventures have been set up, mostly by Italian and Greek
companies in partnership with state companies or individual Albanians,
according to the Ministry of Trade. But only a modest amount is being
invested: the total capital invested this year is Dollars 38m, of which
Dollars 21m was provided by foreigners.
Greece is keen to help develop the Albanian economy, partly as a way of
stemming the flow of illegal Albanian immigrants across the border. Its
investment incentives law was extended this year to include southern
Albania. The state-controlled Hellenic Industrial Development Bank includes
Albania in an EC-financed programme it runs for developing small business in
eastern Europe.
But the practical problems of working in a country with only a few thousand
kilometres of surfaced roads, where bank transfers take weeks to arrange and
where ports are almost permanently occupied unloading EC and US aid, mean
that fewer than half the joint ventures are in regular operation.
It will be some time before Albania starts getting international funds for
making infrastructure improvements. Much will depend on how firmly the
government sticks to the conditions of a Dollars 25m IMF stand-by loan
granted this year. There are already problems over its readiness to delay
unpopular measures, such as reducing unemployment benefits or launching
privatisation.
Mr Vassilis Anastasiades has spent almost two years negotiating a joint
venture to make sports clothes in southern Albania. 'The risks in Albania
are huge and it's impossible to predict when the investment climate will
stabilise. But if you're in a business where labour costs matter, it's worth
persisting,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1463</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / EBRD signs Dollars 10m telecoms loan pact
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Bank for Reconstruction and Development and the government of
Albania have signed a Dollars 10m loan agreement for a telecommunications
project. The bank has also been awarded a mandate to act as financial
adviser on foreign investment in its chromium industry.
The loan will help finance the modernisation and expansion of the
telecommunications system in Albania. The expansion will almost double the
number of subscribers in Albania, increasing the telephone density from 1.45
lines per 100 inhabitants to 2.25. The project is the first phase of a
long-term development programme towards a digital network by the turn of the
century.
The European Bank's involvement with Albchrome, the Albanian state-owned
chromium industry, will be assisted by a consortium of advisers providing
technical assistance in legal, mining, accountancy and financial analysis.
The bank has arranged for the financing of technical assistance contracts
from funds made available from the US Agency for International Development.
Albania is the third largest producer of chromium in the world.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1464</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLUB4AD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921218
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  18 DEC 92 / International Company News: Gota Bank's shares worthless,
says S-E Banken
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SKANDINAVISKA Enskilda Banken, Sweden's leading commercial bank, said
yesterday that shares in Gota Bank, the country's fourth largest, were
worthless, improving prospects for Gota's reconstruction.
S-E Banken made its gesture conditional on the administrator of Gota AB, the
holding group which collapsed in September, handing the shares over to the
state.
Five years ago, S-E Banken lent SKr1.1bn to Gota AB in return for all Gota
Bank's shares as collateral. S-E Banken stressed it still hoped to get back
a substantial amount of its loan.
Gota Bank's reconstruction will take place under Sweden's new support
programme for the country's banking system.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1465</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / International Company News: Reebok to write off Dollars 135m
for restructuring
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
REEBOK International, the US sports shoe maker, yesterday unveiled a
substantial fourth-quarter restructuring charge and said it would put its
Boston Whaler and Ellesse USA subsidiaries up for sale. Reebok is also
writing-off the carrying value of its Avia unit.
The company, which disappointed Wall Street with its third-quarter earnings,
said it would take after-tax charges of about Dollars 135m, or Dollars 1.45
a share, against fourth-quarter earnings. This will more than offset
one-time gains of Dollars 29.6m recorded in October on the sale of Reebok's
CML Group.
Reebok earned Dollars 74.4m, or 80 cents, in the 1992 third quarter and
Dollars 49.7m, or 53 cents, in the 1991 fourth quarter.
Reebok said the restructuring charges were substantially non-cash in nature
and added that operating income should remain on target.
Mr Paul Fireman, chairman and chief executive, said: 'The sale of Boston
Whaler and Ellesse will immediately benefit our operating earnings, and we
believe our shareholders will be better served by the company focusing its
resources and energy on fewer brands.'
Mr Fireman said Reebok had also considered divesting Avia but decided that
its strategic value and improving prospects were sufficiently strong to
retain the business.
Reebok also plans to move its international headquarters in the UK to London
from Bolton.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1466</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / International Company News: How the charges at Ford come to
more than Dollars 8bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FORD, the US carmaker, last night disclosed more than Dollars 8bn of
one-time write-offs that it said would result in the company reporting a net
loss in 1992.
The first of these is a Dollars 419m after-tax charge in the fourth quarter
of 1992, caused by the decision to reduce Ford's European workforce by about
10,000 employees during 1993.
The second charge is a Dollars 440m one-time write-off for 1992 related to
the adoption of new accounting standards governing retiree benefits, which
are in large part healthcare costs. A number of US companies are making such
one-time accountancy-related charges.
Mr Harold Poling, Ford's chairman, said these write-offs would result in a
net loss from operations for the whole of 1992.
Beyond these 1992 charges, Ford last night also announced a separate
one-time Dollars 7.5bn write-off caused by the accounting changes on
benefits and covering the period until 1992.
Ford also said it would have a Dollars 685m one-time net gain related to
accounting changes for income taxes.
In the first nine months of 1992, the Ford group made a Dollars 681.4m net
profit. The company was, however, in loss in the third quarter and has
warned that it could also be in the red in the closing three months of 1992.
The one-time charges and the gain disclosed yesterday, minus the net profits
already earned for the first nine months, point to an after-tax loss for the
whole of 1992 of nearly Dollars 7bn, a figure that could be higher if Ford
suffers an operating loss in the fourth quarter.
Ford incurred a loss of Dollars 2.26bn for the whole of 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1467</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / International Company News: General Mills sees record year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MINNEAPOLIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GENERAL MILLS, reporting improved second-quarter returns, expects to achieve
record results for all of fiscal 1993, Reuter reports from Minneapolis.
In a statement, Mr Bruce Atwater, chairman, said he expected another year of
record sales and earnings.
Second-quarter earnings at the leading US consumer foods producer and
restaurateur, rose to Dollars 138.1m, or Dollars 0.85 a share, from Dollars
128.3m, or Dollars 0.76, a year ago. The current-year results included a
gain of Dollars 1.9m, or 1 cent a share, from the sale of the Pycasa frozen
prepared meals business in Spain, and miscellaneous restructuring charges.
The restructuring charges involved the Betty Crocker packaged mixes
production and European food operations. Consumer Foods' operating profits
include a net pre-tax gain from these items of Dollars 19.9m, and corporate
expense includes a Dollars 5.7m charge for the debt call.
Second-quarter sales rose to Dollars 2.1bn from Dollars 1.99bn. Excluding
revenues of Pycasa and the operations that became part of the Snack Ventures
Europe joint venture with PepsiCo Foods International in July, sales rose 10
per cent.
First-half net earnings advanced to Dollars 297.7m, or Dollars 1.82 a share,
from Dollars 270.4m, or Dollars 1.63, previously on revenues of Dollars
4.12bn, up from Dollars 3.91bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1468</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Chemring rise lifts shares 55p
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER PEARSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CITY responded favourably to Chemring Group's announcement of a 10.5 per
cent rise in pre-tax profits from Pounds 4.72m to Pounds 5.21m in the year
to September 30. The shares climbed by 55p to 883p, writes Peter Pearse.
Mr Philip Billington, chairman since January 1 of this industrial holding
company with interests in the defence, marine, leisure, environmental and
engineering markets, said that the group aimed to 'increase its level of
civil business to approximately 60 per cent of overall turnover by 1996'.
Turnover rose by 10 per cent to Pounds 37.9m (Pounds 34.5m).
This rebalancing was at the behest of the City, and he said it would
probably be achieved via a large acquisition in marine, aviation or
engineering.
However, he said he was irritated by the tendency to lump Chemring with
defence companies like Vickers.
At present, the defence business accounts for about 53 per cent of turnover.
Mr Billington said there was currently a record number of ships being built
worldwide.
The group is proposing a share split to increase the liquidity in the market
for the shares. Three 5p shares will be issued for every 5p share held and
this will be achieved by the capitalisation of about Pounds 600,000 of the
share premium account.
A recommended final dividend of 21.72p (19.75p) will make a total of 32.62p
(29.65p), payable from unchanged earnings of 68.6p per share.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1469</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Harrisons in joint venture talks with Akzo
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Harrisons &amp; Crosfield is in preliminary talks with Akzo of the Netherlands
which could lead to the creation of Europe's second-largest polymer additive
manufacturer after Ciba Geigy.
The companies announced yesterday that they were investigating the
possibility of merging their additives businesses in a joint venture.
The additives are used in PVC manufacturing for hard plastics such as window
frames and piping.
Both companies stressed that the talks were at a very early stage. Any
decision was not likely to be made until the spring. The venture would have
sales of more than Pounds 200m and employ some 1,100 people in 12 sites
throughout Europe and the US.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1470</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Northern Investors net assets at 289.4p
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Northern Investors, the Newcastle upon Tyne-based venture capital group,
reported a fully diluted net asset value of 284.4p per share as at September
30.
The figure showed a marginal decline on the 289.4p of six months earlier but
an increase on the 276.8p at end-September 1991.
Mr Robert Dickinson, chairman, said the group's investments had shown
'encouraging resilience' in the economic downturn. Three new investments
were completed during the interim period, involving a total commitment of
Pounds 593,000.
The pre-tax surplus fell to Pounds 206,000 (Pounds 282,000) reflecting
reduced investment income of Pounds 419,000 (Pounds 491,000) following the
decision to move some resources from cash into longer term investments at
the end of 1991.
Earnings per share emerged at 4p (5.4p) and the interim dividend is cut from
3.5p to 2p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1471</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Dartmoor net asset value declines
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Dartmoor Investment Trust had a net asset value of 74.2p per share at
October 31 compared with 117.4p a year earlier.
Net revenue for the six months fell slightly, from Pounds 966,000 to Pounds
919,000, to leave earnings per share at 4.02p (4.83p).
A second interim dividend of 2.5p (2.4p) is declared, making 5p (4.8p) so
far.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1472</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / PM seeks to save US airline stake
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR, the prime minister, will make a final effort to secure US
government approval for British Airways to acquire a 44 per cent stake in
USAir for Dollars 750m (Pounds 493.4m) during talks with President George
Bush on Saturday.
The proposed share stake agreement will expire on Christmas Eve. The deal,
which would greatly further BA's ambitions to become a global carrier
through the acquisition of stakes in other big international airlines,
continues to be fiercely opposed by other large US carriers.
Failure to complete its partnership with USAir, the sixth-largest US
carrier, would be a serious setback to BA's international expansion
strategy.
The three biggest US carriers - American Airlines, United Airlines and Delta
Air Lines - have asked their government to block the BA-USAir deal unless it
can secure greater access for US airlines in the UK market, especially into
London's Heathrow airport.
Mr Major will throw his weight behind UK proposals tabled two months ago to
liberalise the UK-US air transport market to help win US government approval
of the USAir deal.
Mr Major is not expected to make any new concessions in the original
proposals, although he is likely to warn President Bush of the possible
repercussions on the future of liberalisation if the two countries fail to
agree on the issue.
Mr Major's initiative coincides with signs that the outgoing Bush
administration appears increasingly reluctant to approve the BA-USAir
transaction unless a compromise can be reached on access for US carriers
into Heathrow.
The UK three-stage liberalisation proposal so far rejected by the US
involves:
Immediate access from all American cities to all UK regional airports for US
carriers if the BA-USAir deal is approved.
The opening up of transatlantic routes to London airports other than
Heathrow if the US simultaneously agrees to ease its rules on foreign
ownership of US airlines. Foreign airlines are restricted to 25 per cent of
the voting rights in a US carrier although they can acquire up to 49 per
cent of the shares.
Complete 'open skies' between the two countries including access to Heathrow
once UK carriers can compete on equal terms with US airlines in the US
domestic market.
Mr John MacGregor, the transport secretary, confirmed this week that the
UK's phased liberalisation proposal hinged on the proposed BA-USAir deal
going through.
Unless a last-minute breakthrough can be achieved, it now looks increasingly
likely that the US administration will not clear the BA-USAir deal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1473</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: MPs to proceed on Lamont probe
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE cross-party Commons committee on MPs' interests has decided to press
ahead with an inquiry into whether Mr Norman Lamont should have declared the
payment by an anonymous Tory benefactor of most of his legal bill for
removing an unwelcome tenant.
The committee received a complaint from two Labour MPs that, under the rules
requiring MPs to publish any gift or business interest that might be thought
to affect their judgment, Mr Lamont should have registered the Pounds 18,000
payment. It also received written evidence from the Treasury.
A draft report will be considered when the committee meets again in January.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1474</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Parliament and Politics: Heseltine warning on coal inquiry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Michael Heseltine, trade and industry secretary, warned yesterday that
there would be 'uncomfortable conclusions' from his department's inquiry
into the market for coal, Lisa Wood writes.
He told the employment select committee, which is investigating the proposed
closure of 31 pits, that there were still no contracts for coal when the
existing ones ran out in March, apart from a conditional contract signed by
Eastern Electricity and PowerGen this week.
British Coal and the power stations had large stocks of coal, would not need
more for a long time, and it was cheaper to import foreign coal, he told the
committee.
'That is the stark position we face. It is as stark today as in October when
I first announced it,' the secretary of state said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1475</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Continued job cuts at British Aerospace
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Aerospace, the defence contractor, continued its job-cutting
programme yesterday with the shedding of about 650 jobs at Chester,
Cheshire, and Filton, Bristol, Daniel Green writes. The plants make parts
for Airbus civil aircraft.
About 350 jobs are likely to go at Chester and 300 at Filton in the first
half of next year. The cuts would leave a combined workforce at the two
sites of about 8,000.
The news follows the cancellation last week of a Pounds 2.3bn Airbus order
by Northwest Airlines. The blow was softened by a Pounds 1bn Airbus order on
Tuesday from Los Angeles-based International Lease Finance Corporation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1476</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Changes to libel laws announced
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CHANGES in the libel laws designed to simplify court hearings and to give
judges greater control over the level of damages awarded were announced
yesterday by the Lord Chancellor.
The most radical change involves the introduction of a new 'offer of amends'
defence which will allow defendants to cut cases short by admitting they
have defamed the plaintiff and agreeing to pay damages set by the judge.
Lord Mackay said he had decided to introduce the changes following
recommendations from a committee chaired by Lord Justice Neill which looked
at ways of reducing the complexity of defamation hearings.
Under the other changes announced yesterday the normal time limit for
bringing defamation claims is to be cut from three years to one from the
date of publication.
Judges are also to be given the power to rule on the meaning of words
complained of. Lord Mackay said he had also decided to accept a suggestion
made by Lord Justice Hoffmann for a new summary procedure that would enable
the plaintiff to claim damages up to a fixed ceiling.
Some of these changes will be made by amending the rules of the Supreme
Court. But other changes will require legislation which Lord Mackay said
would be introduced 'as soon as a suitable opportunity occurs'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1477</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Move on terrorism cover broached
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Association of British Insurers yesterday made a move towards a possible
compromise in the row over insurance cover for terrorism damage, Richard
Lapper writes.
The insurance industry's trade association announced that it would consider
working with the government to cover such damage. Such a move might provide
a solution to the crisis caused when the association announced that
terrorist damage would be excluded from new commercial policies.
The association had previously insisted that the government should directly
compensate bomb and other terrorist damage, as it does in Northern Ireland.
Last week the ABI was unsympathetic to compromise solutions advanced by
industrial risk managers and insurance brokers, but yesterday Mr Tony Baker
of the ABI said the 'insurers must be as accommodating as possible'.
He said: 'A compromise must be worked out in the interests of the economy
and business.'
The shift in the ABI's position increases the pressure on the government to
support any joint initiative. Mr Baker said:'There is no way the insurance
industry can move without government support.'
The ABI said terrorism cover could be provided as a voluntary 'buy back' or
an addition to commercial policies for extra premium. That would be possible
only if insurers could limit their own exposures by obtaining reinsurance
from the government.
Letters, Page 19
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1478</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / World Trade News: Kvaerner deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Kvaerner, Norwegian engineering, shipping and shipbuilding group, has won a
contract worth NKr400m (Pounds 39m) for fabricating the drilling module for
the Heidrun production platform in the North Sea, writes Robert Taylor in
Stockholm.
The order from Conoco Norway, the field's development operator, will be
carried out in Kvaerner's yard at Egersund south of Stavanger by July 1994.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1479</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / World Trade News: EC tariff cut plans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The European Community yesterday presented trading partners in the Uruguay
Round of global trade talks with a list of proposed tariff cuts spanning the
range of farm and industrial products, writes Frances Williams in Geneva.
The move is expected to unblock the stalled tariff negotiations in the
108-nation round, which are intended to cut import duties by at least 30 per
cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1480</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Palestinians brace for Israeli reprisals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PALESTINIANS in the occupied territories were last night braced for tough
reprisals by the Israeli government for the kidnap and killing of a
paramilitary border police officer by Islamic fundamentalists.
Mr Yitzhak Rabin, the prime minister, chaired a cabinet meeting yesterday
which discussed what ministers described as a list of options for
retaliation for the killing of Sgt-Major Nissim Toledano by guerrillas of
the Hamas Islamic movement on Tuesday. Mr Rabin said the world should expect
harsh action by Israel.
Palestinians feared that Mr Rabin, who has pledged a merciless response to
the kidnapping, would resort to mass deportations of some of the 1,200 Hamas
leaders and sympathisers rounded up in the West Bank and Gaza Strip
following Sgt-Major Toledano's kidnapping on Sunday. Such a move was called
for by a range of Israeli politicians yesterday, despite strong
international condemnation of previous deportations.
The Israeli government yesterday agreed to bail out the financially stricken
Israel Military Industries in an attempt to keep afloat one of the mainstays
of the country's big state-owned defence industry, which has been hard hit
by falling world demand for military products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1481</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / UN plan for Mozambique
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE UN Security Council last night approved unanimously a big peacekeeping
and election-monitoring operation for Mozambique in support of the October
ceasefire agreement which ended a ruinous 14-year civil war, writes Michael
Littlejohns in New York.
Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali, the secretary-general, proposed sending more than
7,500 troops and civilian staff at an estimated cost of more than Dollars
330m. But the council decided to seek economies through a phased deployment
of forces, as well as strict reporting on progress made.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1482</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / 'Time is running out for refugees'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TIME is running out for the people of Bosnia-Hercegovina, Mrs Sadako Ogata,
UN High Commissioner for Refugees, warned yesterday.
'It will be an uphill battle for humanitarian organisations as winter sets
in, the infrastructure deteriorates and hostilities continue,' she told
foreign ministers attending a one-day meeting in Geneva on the Bosnian
crisis.
Mrs Ogata said new waves of refugees had been created in recent weeks by the
fighting, and predicted more population movements in the coming weeks as the
military situation worsened.
Ethnic cleansing and terror tactics, including rape and sexual abuse of
girls and women, were continuing despite greater international condemnation.
Meanwhile, continued fighting, harassment and threats suffered by aid
workers, looting and other obstacles continued to handicap the relief
effort.
UNHCR now had the capacity to meet the aid needs in Bosnia but was
delivering only about 80 per cent of food needs and half the supplies for
winter protection. The quantity of relief reaching Sarajevo and eastern
Bosnia remained far below requirements, 'putting at serious risk some
800,000 persons'.
A UNHCR official said yesterday continued fighting in Sarajevo had forced
the agency to postpone resumption of the humanitarian airlift, suspended a
fortnight ago, until the weekend.
The governments involved have asked the UN protection force in Sarajevo to
institute further security measures around the airport, including perimeter
patrols, before they agree to further flights.
The UNHCR is assisting some 1.7m people in Bosnia and almost 1.3m refugees
and displaced people elsewhere in the former Yugoslavia.
About 600,000 refugees have fled to other European countries. Just over a
year ago the number of displaced was around 300,000.
Mrs Ogata urged 'decisive political action,' but cautioned against military
intervention.
'Any debate on enforcement action should take into account the security of
our highly exposed and unarmed staff and the humanitarian implications for
the victims of the conflict,' she said, adding her voice to those of Mr
Cyrus Vance and Lord Owen, the international mediators for ex-Yugoslavia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1483</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Six charged with kidnap
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A boy of 16, three men and two women will appear in court in Manchester
today charged with the kidnap and attempted murder of Suzanne Capper, 16,
who is critically ill with burns. Suzanne was found naked on Monday on a
road in Stockport.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1484</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment - Switzerland (8):
 Soffex gets the real thing - The electronic exchangehas had a good year.
Options volume is up 35 per cent, and futures volume has more than doubled
thanks to the new government bond future / The derivatives market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DERIVATIVES markets, in Switzerland as in most main financial centres, are
among the most active and innovative to be found in these recessed times.
Whether it is in the Soffex futures and options exchange or in the warrant
market on the Zurich Stock Exchange or in the over-the-counter (OTC)
markets, there seems to be a constant flow of new activity.
Take the case of Soffex, now into its fourth year of life and revelling in
the success of its latest product, a future on a long-term Swiss federal
government bond.
Until this year, it was impossible for the exchange to organise futures on
Swiss government bonds, because there were too few of them. In its place, a
future on a synthetic bond, based on the five-year swap rate, was offered,
but it was not what the market really wanted.
But this year, with the government's finances deteriorating, the volume of
bond issues has increased, and a real future was introduced in May, the
first Soffex future to be physically delivered. It is already trading at a
level of 1,500 contracts a day, and attracting increasing interest. 'We
could always have more, but we are satisfied,' Mr Otto Nageli, chief
executive of Soffex, says.
The other star products are the futures and options on the Swiss Market
Index (SMI) of 21 leading issues (23 from next month) on the stock market
launched in late 1990. Typically, the future accounts for more than half of
all future trading, while turnover of the options accounts for about 40 per
cent of all option trading.
The net result is that Soffex has had a good year. Options volume is up 35
per cent, and futures volume has more than doubled thanks to the new
government bond future. Mr Nageli is forecasting a return to profit for the
exchange this year after a disappointing slump into a SFr0.86m loss last
year.
Meanwhile, on the Zurich Stock Exchange, the volume of warrant issues on
Swiss equities continues to grow, in spite of the gradual disappearance of
the original reason for issuing them. When they were introduced in the
mid-1980s, the objective was to help foreign institutional investors get
around restrictions on the ownership of shares in many Swiss companies. In
the past year, many companies have lifted those restrictions, but investors
have learned to use these warrants to avoid payment of withholding or income
tax on dividends. According to one active dealer in these securities,
another attraction is that transaction costs are significantly lower than on
the equivalent values of underlying shares.
In the OTC markets, the big banks make most of the running with their offers
of strangely named new derivative products like GROIs and CLOUs, which are
designed to give small investors a bit of a flutter as well as a secure
return. The big banks are also the main producers of tailor-made packages
for their big customers, which tend to be very big but not actively traded.
These issues have compensated largely for the drying up of Japanese warrant
issues in the past year, which used to be the mainstays of the over the
counter market.
There are no clear statistics on the relative importance of these derivative
markets, but participants say the stock exchange warrant market is the
largest, perhaps accounting for half the total value of contracts and
commissions, with the rest split between Soffex and the OTC markets. Soffex
claims to be the third-largest options exchange in Europe, after the
Deutsche Termin Borse and the London International Financial Futures
Exchange (Liffe), and number two in index options, thanks to the success of
the SMI options.
For all the progress, the year has not been a total success. Soffex
encountered its first important reversal early this month, when it announced
the suspension of trading in short term Eurofranc interest rate futures. The
volume did not develop 'in keeping with Soffex expectations', the exchange
said in a statement.
This was the one case in which Soffex was offering an identical product to
that offered on Liffe, and market participants say that Liffe provided a
more efficient market than Soffex, and so attracted most of the volume.
Mr Nageli acknowledged defeat, suggesting that, ironically, Soffex's
weakness was the transparency it offered as an electronic exchange. That
transparency is much appreciated when there are many small participants
dealing in a product, but in this case, the market was dominated by large
professionals. 'Professionals prefer to trade outside an exchange or, if
they have to use an exchange, they prefer the outcry system where posted
prices are indicators, not fixed offers. So I would have to say this was a
product not suitable for an electronic exchange.'
Similarly, the low exercise price call options (LEPOs), introduced in May
1991, have not been a great success, with volume of 51,000 contracts this
year. They are vehicles for avoiding stamp duties, and Mr Nageli says market
participants do not seem to have understood them.
Among new products under consideration at Soffex are options on futures. The
exchange could launch them in the second quarter of next year, probably on
the federal bond future, although the liquidity and open interest are not
yet big enough. Mr Nageli says the only other plausible candidate would be
the SMI future, but he suspects that would just split the volume that exists
already on the options and the futures.
Soffex has made some progress in the past year on co-operation with other
European futures exchanges, notably those in Amsterdam, Vienna and
Stockholm, with which trading links have been established. It has also won
regulatory approval to sign up its first member based outside Switzerland,
Timberhill in Germany, and has applications from six others.
With the rejection of the European Economic Area (EEA) treaty by the Swiss
in a referendum two weeks ago, it is likely that regulatory co-operation
between Switzerland and other European countries will remain difficult and
this process will be retarded.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1485</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment - Switzerland (9):
 More look to far horizons / The insurers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR SILVIO CAFLISCH, senior vice-president at Winterthur, Switzerland's
biggest insurance company, cannot contain his enthusiasm about the
successful expansion of his company in the UK.
Only three years after its establishment, Churchill, the direct motor
insurance subsidiary formed by Winterthur, has amassed a 2 per cent share of
the motor insurance market and is beginning to make profits. 'It's a dream.
I can feel lyrical about it, even though I don't expect such beautiful
margins to last for ever,' says Mr Caflisch.
Churchill, like Direct Line, the pioneer of direct selling in the UK,
advertises its products in the press and television and sells directly to
the public over the telephone.
Nor is Winterthur the only Swiss insurance company innovating successfully
in overseas markets. Zurich Insurance, Winterthur's biggest rival, is
looking at its overseas business with a fresh eye, focusing on highly
specialised market segments such as Wisconsin meat packers, US auto
dealerships and British local authorities rather than the traditional 'all
insurances to all customers' approach.
These shifts in international strategy have been dictated by declining
margins on domestic business as the Swiss seek to compete in a more
competitive and deregulated European market.
Overseas expansion is not new. The domestic Swiss market is simply too small
to contain the ambitions of its largest companies. The nine biggest
companies control 81 per cent of the non-life market, with Zurich and
Winterthur between them accounting for nearly 40 per cent of sales.
After rapid growth during the 1980s, the domestic life and non-life markets
are virtually saturated. The Swiss spent Dollars 1,292 per head on non-life
insurance and Dollars 1,635 on life insurance in 1990 - the highest levels
of spending in the world - according to Sigma, a statistical digest produced
by Swiss Re, the country's biggest reinsurance company.
However, until recently the domestic market was highly profitable,
generating huge surpluses which Swiss companies could invest in overseas
ventures. A liberal taxation regime has enabled Swiss companies to build up
reserves more easily than competitors in the UK and the US, while cartel -
like arrangements at home have traditionally guaranteed healthy profits on
domestic business.
During the 1970s and 1980s these advantages allowed Swiss Re to consolidate
its position as one of the world's biggest direct insurance companies and
paved the way for Zurich and Winterthur to build their own overseas empires.
Both companies have won a reputation as providers of global all-risks
insurance programmes to multi-national companies, increasingly overshadowing
British companies, which once dominated this field. Both companies also
moved ahead in Europe. Both they and Swiss Re's local direct insurance
subsidiary are among the leading foreign companies in the competitive and
rapidly growing Spanish market, and have significant activities in various
corners of the US.
Recently, though, the character of overseas expansion has changed, as Swiss
companies come under greater competitive pressures in their home market.
'The Swiss market is becoming more competitive, although a good steady flow
of profits is still going to be there - but not to the same extent,' says Mr
Simon Rudolph, insurance analyst at Morgan Stanley.
Although Swiss voters rejected membership of the European Economic Area in
December - which would have brought the country directly into the European
single market - local law has already been modified in order to extend some
of the provisions of European insurance directives to Switzerland.
At the beginning of 1989, a cartel by which property insurers had set
minimum premium rates was lifted, triggering unprecedented competition in
the industrial risks market and moves are also afoot to liberalise the motor
insurance market. 'The cartel is melting away like the snow in the sun,'
says Mr Caflisch.
New approaches have emerged in response to these realities. Winterthur's
preparedness to break with traditional distribution methods and Zurich's
highly selective approach to overseas expansion, are designed to boost
underlying profitability. 'We made so much money in Switzerland we could
subsidise our companies abroad,' says Mr Caflisch.
'There is now much more urgency to repatriate profits. In the past we have
acted as a small copy of the mother organisation, serving traditional
markets with traditional products through traditional distribution systems.'
Churchill can do better than many of its more conservative competitors
because it underwrites more selectively, rejecting drivers who it considers
to be bad risks, and avoids paying commission fees to brokers, the
industry's traditional intermediary.
Winterthur sees Churchill as a laboratory experiment which it is already
using to redevelop other parts of its international business. Already a
'direct writer' has been established in Denmark, for example.
Zurich believes that by building up expertise and understanding the
businesses of its clients in depth, it can obtain better underwriting
results and a more stable long-term relationship with its clients.
By emphasising its ability to provide advice about how to manage risks - by
installing fail-safe equipment in a chemical factory or by new management
procedures for the drivers of hire cars - Zurich believes it can not only
reduce claims but also retain greater numbers of customers when policies are
renewed each year, thereby cutting its overall distribution costs.
Recent moves to acquire blocks of business from the stricken Municipal
Mutual, were motivated less by the desire to pick up market share than by
the desire to build up long-term relationship with MMI's local authority
customers, so that it can manage the insurance business profitably.
Chief executive Mr Rolf Huppi says that even though local authority business
might have been loss making in the past, by working closely with customers
and by being the best in that category of business, Zurich can make it
profitable.
 ------------------------------------------------------------
                NON-LIFE PREMIUM INCOME: 1990
 ------------------------------------------------------------
                          SFr      Market             Rank
     Company              (m)      share %          Status
 ------------------------------------------------------------
1    Winterthur         2,235       20.6            Quoted
2    Zurich             1,931       17.8            Quoted
3    Mobiliar           1,136       10.5            Mutual
4    Baloise            1,041        9.6            Quoted
5    Elvia                736        6.8   Quoted/Swiss Re
6    Berner Allgemeine    502        4.6           Private
7    National             443        4.1           Private
8    Waadt                440        4.1            Mutual
9    Helvetia             418        3.9            Quoted
10   Schweiz Vers.        240        2.2          Swiss Re
 ------------------------------------------------------------
Source: UBS Phillips &amp; Drew
 ------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1486</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment - Switzerland (6):
Still the world champions / Banking, the private business
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT HAS been a strange year for Swiss private banking. It began in an
atmosphere approaching siege, as more and more big foreign banks turned
their attention to this extraordinarily profitable niche, and it is ending
in triumph as the turmoil in European exchange markets and economies brings
unexpected new life to the haven aspect of Swiss banks.
Some bankers believe that this haven quality will be further enhanced by
Switzerland's refusal earlier this month to join the European Economic Area
(EEA).
But then private banking, as the Swiss like to emphasise, is an unusual
business. The provision of financial services to the rich - or high net
worth individuals, as the Swiss call them - is not like other types of
banking. According to client surveys, the price charged for services in this
field is far from the key to success, for example. Knowing how to deal with
rich people and maintaining a stable, well trained staff are more important.
By all accounts, the Swiss are still the world champions in private banking.
According to Chase Manhattan Private Bank, which is one of several non-Swiss
banks with a significant presence in the country, wealthy individuals around
the world have placed some Dollars 2,000bn in banks outside their home
countries, and banks in Switzerland hold more than a third of it.
These figures are broadly similar to ones mentioned by others, but there is,
in the nature of this business, no way of knowing for sure. Many of
Switzerland's private banks are private partnerships that publish no
accounts. Others do not reveal the extent of their funds under management.
However, in the past couple of years, some Swiss private bankers began to
wonder if perhaps their magic touch was coming to an end. On the one hand,
many hitherto fertile sources of funds, such as Mexico, were drying up as
confidence in their currency stability stability grew, and people took their
money home to invest.
On the other hand, non-Swiss banks were becoming increasingly active in the
niche, seeing it as a source of stable earnings and minimal risks. According
to a recent study by the management consultants McKinsey, the return on
equity in private banking in Switzerland averages 42 per cent. The Swiss
willingly admit that competition gets tougher all the time.
The Swiss have been irritated about foreign competitors' claims that Swiss
private banks' charges were excessive and their investment performance for
customers less than impressive. 'That is an old story, and it is simply not
true,' says Claude Demole, a managing partner in the largest Geneva private
bank, Pictet &amp; Cie.
Mr Demole claims that, with the removal of the Swiss cartel on commission
rates on securities transactions nearly two years ago, charges have tumbled.
A customer's total fees now vary between 0.8 per cent and 1 per cent of his
assets under management.
As for performance, Swiss bankers say the cult of performance, which
flourished in the 1980s, has receded somewhat in the past couple of years as
financial markets around the world have been depressed and/or volatile. If a
private banker can merely succeed in preserving the real value of his
clients' fortunes, he is doing well, they say.
'It is back to fundamentals,' says Mr Patrick Odier, a partner in Lombard,
Odier &amp; Cie in Geneva. 'Markets have been very volatile in 1992. We have had
to work very hard to get a satisfactory result for our clients.'
The non-Swiss claim that they are more attuned to world financial markets
and the latest investing technologies than the Swiss. The Swiss reply that
they are among the most global-thinking fund managers.
Also, technology, while important, is not a key marketing tool. 'You do not
run private banking on technology,' says Mr Oskar Holenweger, chief
executive of Bank Vontobel in Zurich. 'It is a people business, a question
of confidence and trust.'
Mr Holenweger and others acknowledge that big foreign banks have an
advantage in tapping into their home client bases for private banking
customers, but he is mystified about why they would bring them to
Switzerland. 'Why should a foreigner bank with a foreign bank in
Switzerland?' he asks.
Most Swiss private bankers say the currency turmoil in Europe in September
has helped their business. The Zurich bankers have also gained considerably
from tax increases in Germany and the threat of more to come as the country
struggles with its budget.
On the other hand, a few customers were lost because of the final
implementation of regulations in September requiring Swiss banks to know the
beneficial owners of all accounts.
The tightening of regulations in recent years to prevent money laundering
and insider trading and to ensure due diligence has been welcomed by private
bankers. But there is some nervousness about a proposal that would require
bankers to report clients suspected of being involved in illegal activity.
'We risk making some big mistakes, and the problem of responsibility have
not been sorted out,' says Mr Demole.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1487</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment - Switzerland (5):
Few easy answers / Banking, the cantonal and regional players
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CANTONAL and regional banks are in the front line of small-scale local
finance in Switzerland, and these days that is not a comfortable place to
be.
The serene image of solid Swiss banking projected by the big universal banks
and private banks falls apart at this more pedestrian level. Here there is
real trouble and few easy solutions.
The collapse of property prices in particular has undermined their primary
business, mortgage lending, while the squeeze on consumer spending has hurt
their small business customers. Some of these banks have also fallen victim
to dubious entrepreneurs and, in the case of the cantonal banks, excessive
political interference.
Meanwhile, competition from the big universal banks is forcing them to find
innovative ways to increase efficiency.
To appreciate the scale of the task they face, some comparative figures are
helpful. The 28 cantonal banks - one for each canton, except for Vaud and
Geneva, where there are two - had combined assets at the end of last year
totalling SFr228.3bn (Pounds 102.7bn), roughly half the four universal
banks' combined assets of SFr543.2bn. The 189 regional banks had only
SFr92.7bn in combined assets.
Mr Marc Fues, executive vice-president of the Caisse d'Epargne de Geneve,
says a general service bank now needs at least SFr10bn in assets to survive.
'Below that, life is going to be very difficult in the future,' he predicts.
The squeeze on these banks first came to public attention last year when the
Spar- und Leihkasse Thun, a regional bank in the canton of Bern, was
suddenly closed by the Federal Banking Commission, leaving depositors
bereft.
There has still not been a final settlement in that case, but the sight of a
Swiss bank going bust and depositors lining up in vain to claim their money
was enough to push the whole banking fraternity into creating a safety net.
Since then, as far as the regional banks are concerned, the safety net has
worked well. In some cases, rescues have been arranged within the sector
itself. Two weeks ago, six small regional banks in the Emmental region
merged into two, although the Association of Swiss Regional Banks insisted
that the move was preventive, in the sense that none of the banks involved
was in financial difficulty.
In other cases, one of the cantonal or big banks has had to step in, the
most recent case being when Credit Suisse rescued EKO Hypothekar- und
Handelsbank in Olten. In November, the Solothurn Cantonal Bank completed the
acquisition of Bank in Kriegstetten.
So far so good, but banking industry officials worry that, if the economy
remains depressed, the pace of failures could increase beyond the ability of
the big banks to absorb them.
Among the cantonal banks, problems tend to be less urgent, largely because
these banks are controlled by the cantonal governments, and their
liabilities, to varying degrees, are guaranteed by the cantons.
Also, reflecting the great differences in the size of cantons, they vary so
much in size that they can hardly be looked at as a group. The Zurcher
Kantonalbank (ZKB), for example, had total assets at the end of last year of
SFr48.1bn, ranking it among the universal banks and enabling it to have a
significant role in the country's financial markets. At the other end, the
Appenzell-Innerrhodische Kantonalbank, has only SFr919.1m in assets.
The main problem cases are the cantonal banks in Valais, Bern, Solothurn,
Appenzell-Ausserrhoden and Basle City, of which the worst is undoubtedly
Bern. The Berner Kantonalbank made large loans during the 1980s to the now
defunct Omni Holding group led by Mr Werner K. Rey, and there have been
charges that it did so under pressure from leading cantonal politicians.
Provisions this year are expected to be similar to last year's level of
SFr558m, exhausting the bank's capital and forcing the cantonal government
to raise new funds to cover its liabilities.
The excessive political influence in some cantonal banks, especially in Bern
and Solothurn, has brought calls from some quarters, notably the Swiss
National Bank, that something be done. Some cantonal banks have asked to be
regulated by the Federal Banking Commission. Others have found a partial
solution through partial privatisation and the appointment of directors not
connected to the cantonal governments. This has taken place in Vaud, Zug,
Jura and Valais.
Up to now, to preserve the cantonal guarantee, there have been no
privatisations beyond 50 per cent, and none are planned. However, the value
of the cantonal guarantee could decline if Switzerland chooses to move
towards harmonising its banking laws with those of the European Community.
Now that the Swiss have voted against joining the European Economic Area,
there is no pressure to do so, but the government says it intends to move in
that direction anyway. The immediate impact for the cantonal banks would be
to eliminate the 12.5 per cent abatement they are allowed from normal
capital requirements. This is given partly because of the cantonal
guarantee, and partly because they are not allowed to raise subordinated
debt (which is a meaningless form of capital when a state guarantee exists).
The elimination of this abatement would be expensive for the cantonal banks,
requiring ZKB alone to raise an additional SFr300m in capital, so it is
unlikely to happen quickly.
As they are creatures of their cantonal governments, these banks cannot
legally merge, so the response of the smaller ones to rising costs and
intensifying competition has been to co-operate in cost and service areas,
such as data processing, clearing, lease finance, venture capital and
pension fund management.
Early this year, six cantonal banks in north-east Switzerland, led by ZKB,
signed a co-operation agreement with two large German banks in neighbouring
Bavaria and Hesse, with a view to covering more cross-border trade as the
European integration process advances. Similarly, the Geneva cantonal banks
are eager to intensify links in neighbouring areas of France.
The banks are also contemplating setting up a holding company for handling
new security issues and portfolio management.
The two Geneva cantonal banks have finally agreed on a project to merge,
which will create a new bank with assets of about SFr14bn. The ownership
structure of the new bank has been designed to limit the potential for
political pressure, with the canton and local communities having equal
shares and the public having 20 per cent at the start. The bank also intends
to submit to regulation from the Federal Banking Commission.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1488</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment - Switzerland (7):
The yield curve looks up / Peter Montagnon examines the bond market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MONTAGNON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SWISS foreign bond market has enjoyed something of a renaissance since
the summer, as the franc yield curve has returned to normal after a long
period of inversion.
New-issue activity has leapt ahead after a first half which saw only SFr9bn
(Pounds 4.1bn) of new issues, compared with SFr14.5bn in the same period of
1991. Between July and October, however, the pace of new issues jumped to
around SFr11bn, roughly the same pace as that recorded in the previous year.
Bankers say they believe that volume could continue to run at high levels.
Inflation is broadly under control, and the National Bank has become more
worried about the economy. So, provided the Swiss franc does not suffer any
pronounced weakness in the foreign exchange market, the central banks may
now be ready to see short-term interest rates fall further, reinforcing the
positive yield curve.
That should encourage investors to move out of short-term instruments and
into longer-dated bonds, helping to establish a price level in the bond
market that makes swaps attractive. During the long period when the yield
curve was downward-sloping, swap rates generally remained unattractive and
Switzerland lost business to other markets.
However, some bankers also acknowledge that, despite the trend towards
liberalisation over the past few years, the Swiss foreign bond market has
some way to go before it can match the depth of liquidity available in other
markets.
For example, Switzerland only recently established a bond futures contract
for government paper, an instrument which should improve liquidity by
creating hedging opportunities as well as allowing for the establishment of
a benchmark price in the market.
In fact, the instrument is imperfect in this respect, because the
withholding tax levied on domestic bonds means the local market is subject
to differing price trends.
The sharp increase in the borrowing requirement of federal, regional and
local government, whose combined deficit is forecast by Bank Julius Bar at
SFr8bn this year, meant the domestic market suffered from a considerable
over-supply in the first half. This led to the unusual situation where
domestic borrowers actually had to pay higher rates than foreign issuers in
the Swiss market.
Unless the federal government were to start issuing large amounts of
witholding-tax-free bonds to foreigners - which is unlikely, for political
reasons - bankers say there is little chance of ats paper becoming an
accepted benchmark for the foreign bond market.
In the meantime, though, they do expect some increase in liquidity as a
result of the September referendum decision on relaxing stamp duty
requirements, which will effectively allow for more active market-making in
Swiss foreign bonds.
Large issuers, such as the European Investment Bank and the World Bank, have
already begun introducing clauses into new-issue documentation, permitting
more bonds to be sold at a later stage. Thus it is expected that, over time,
investors will be able to buy into large issues with a high level of
liquidity.
The hope is that this will attract fresh institutional investors into the
market, further eroding the traditional dominance of the retail market. With
greater liquidity and a stronger institutional presence, there could even be
some structural fall in yields, which would help attract borrowers.
Swiss bankers are acutely aware that, to win mandates nowadays, they have to
compete with other international markets which may be able to offer more
attractive swap rates. This is a much larger preoccupation for them than
either the breakdown of the bond-issuing cartels a couple of years ago, or
the more recent succession of payment difficulties experienced by heavily
indebted corporate borrowers such as Heron and Mountleigh of the UK.
The end to the old cartels, whereby the big banks were able to secure the
lion's share of new-issue activity, has not done much to alter their overall
market share, largely thanks to their strong distribution capability.
Indeed, if anything, it is that smaller banks that have suffered, as there
are no longer formal arrangements for them to participate in the market.
There is no doubt that the larger banks have not yet lost their sense of
wounded pride over the way in which Warburg Soditic, the Geneva-based bank,
managed to upset the cartel arrangements which had served them so well in
the past. But the changing nature of the market, in which an ever larger
amount of new business has become swap-driven, means that the cartels would
have probably died a natural death sooner or later.
The immediate response required when a swap opportunity arises means there
is no time to parcel out deals and pre-arrange market share. Indeed, the
large banks nowadays have to compete more and more with each other to win
mandates.
A lingering worry is that the highly publicised difficulties of some
corporate borrowers, a number of which were brought to the market by
Soditic, has harmed Switzerland's reputation as an issuing centre.
Admittedly, fears of a bad reputation are probably overdone, but there is no
denying that investors have become more selective. They are reluctant to buy
paper with a rating less than AA, and there has been a shift in favour of
sovereign and supranational names.
Such preferences mean that the market may face a singular challenge next
year, which will be see the peak refinancing requirement for the warrant
bonds issued by Japanese borrowers in the late 1980s.
At the moment, it is not clear how many of these issuers will actually
attempt to refinance their borrowing in Switzerland. Some are expected to
refinance the debt in the Japanese market. Others may choose to refinance in
other currencies, such as US dollars, if swap rates are more attractive.
It is tempting to wonder whether the banks privately hope that a large
portion of this particular business may pass them by. The saturation of the
market with warrant issues during the 1980s, for which the large banks
rather than houses such as Soditic were responsible, has not been
particularly helpful.
Ironically, though, with the Nikkei index at such a low point, it is
possible that the warrants on the refinanced paper may prove more valuable
than those on the original issues.
 -------------------------------------------------
   NEW ISSUES IN THE SWISS BOND MARKET (SFR M)
 -------------------------------------------------
              Domestic        Foreign
              issuers:       issuers:
                   all            all
Year        categories     categories
 -------------------------------------------------
1985          11,205.6       36,969.1
1986          11,054.3       42,461.0
1987          11,726.6       36,034.6
1988          13,527.1       40,029.2
1989          14,218.7       31,281.0
1990          17,146.1       32,173.7
1991          16,201.8       30,115.9
1992          17,739.7       17,163.7
 -------------------------------------------------
 Source: Swiss National Bank
 -------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1489</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment - Switzerland (3):
Key Facts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                             KEY FACTS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
POPULATION:
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
6.8m, of whom 65 per cent are German-speaking; 18.4 per cent
French-speaking; 9.8 per cent Italian-speaking; 0.8 per cent
Romansch-speaking.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
ECONOMY:
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
GDP at market prices (1991) SFr332.7bn (13th in OECD), GDP per capita
(1990) SFr47,977 (highest in the OECD).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
TRADE:
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Exports total (1990) SFr88.3bn, to EC countries 57.8 per cent (1970
50.6 per cent); to Efta countries 6.6 per cent (1970 11 per cent).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Imports total (1990) SFr96.6bn, from EC countries 71.6 per cent (1970
69 per cent); from Efta countries, 7.2 per cent (1970 8.8 per cent).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
EMPLOYMENT:
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Labour force (1990) 3.6m.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
By sector: agriculture 5.5 per cent, industry 34.9 per cent, services
59.6 per cent (incl trade 14.7 per cent, bank and insurance 5.3, hotel
and restaurants 5.9, public services 3.6 per cent).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Unemployment rate (November 1992) 3.9 per cent.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1490</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment - Switzerland (2):
 A flat year ahead - The persistence of the recession has prompted debate
over economic management which transcends immediate reaction to this month's
vote on membership of the EEA / The economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MONTAGNON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SWITZERLAND's economic performance this year is one of hopes unfulfilled.
While there might have been some expectation that 1992 would see a recovery
from recession that had produced a fall in GNP of 0.1 per cent last year,
the economy has contracted by slightly more. Worse still, growth looks like
being flat next year, too.
A combination of weak property prices and, for a time in the spring,
short-term interest rates of around 9 per cent, has left both consumer and
business confidence weak.
According to to Credit Suisse, private consumption is likely to fall by some
0.1 per cent this year, but capital investment by industry and construction
spending have been hit much harder. They are due to fall by 6.3 per cent and
7 per cent respectively.
Exports, and to a lesser extent public spending, provide the only bright
spots.
Unemployment has risen to what, for modern-day Switzerland, is an
unprecedented rate of some 3.9 per cent; and, thanks to the slowdown
elsewhere in Europe, the chance of exports sustaining the economy into next
year seem to be diminishing.
The persistence of the recession has prompted debate over economic
management which transcends immediate reaction to this month's vote on
membership of the European Economic Area (EEA). Has Switzerland lost its
privileged position as an oasis of wealth and stability in Europe? Has the
National Bank been conducting an appropriate monetary policy? And is lack of
competition in the domestic economy to blame for consumer price levels some
40 per cent above the EC average?
Certainly, part of the increase in unemployment appears to be structural.
Improved benefits have made lay-offs more acceptable. Workers of foreign
origin are less mobile. Many of them are second-generation immigrants, who
cannot simply be sent home as they were in the deep recession of the 1970s.
As Switzerland becomes less sheltered from the economic forces affecting
other modern economies, some of its antiquated structures are being thrown
into greater relief. In particular, the OECD has criticised the country for
the wide range of restrictive practices which permeates its economy. Its
report has fuelled a growing sense that Switzerland has done too little to
restrict cartels, which have sustained prices in the non-traded sector of
the economy at levels far above the international norm. Switzerland also has
a heavily subsidised farm economy, and suffers from restrictive procurement
practices by individual cantons.
Such are the current pressures on the economy that reform of these
structures was almost certainly inevitable, whatever the outcome of the vote
on joining the EEA.
A yes vote would, however, have accelerated the process, adding to growth
and putting downward pressure on prices. According to a study by Bank
Vontobel, membership of the European Economic Area would have reduced
inflation by 1 to 1.5 percentage points and increased economic growth by 0.5
points over the medium term.
Even so, the kind of restrictive practices about which the OECD complains
will take time to unwind. Since the main preoccupation of the public sector
is to reduce its deficit, the monetary policy of the Swiss National Bank
remains probably the most important factor determining the economic outlook
in the short run.
Here, too, controversy rages. Monetarists regard the present policy as
excessively tight and likely to stall any recovery and push up unemployment
even further.
According to the OECD, the focus of monetary policy on the monetary base -
cash in circulation plus sight deposits of the banking system at the central
bank - no longer makes sense. The development of an electronic clearing
system has brought about structural changes, which have marginalised the
importance of the banking system's deposits.
Among the most frequently cited alternatives are the adoption of a target
for M1 or the establishment of a direct relationship between interest rates
and the exchange rate.
Mr Markus Lusser, president of the Swiss National Bank, has, however,
dismissed the idea of an exchange rate peg, on the grounds that it would
force Swiss interest rates to rise to German levels. M1, he argues, is a
statistically unreliable indicator.
Other National Bank officials say the debate has less relevance at a time
like the present, when all the various monetary aggregates point to
weakness.
Some economists, such as Mr Kurt Schiltknecht, of the BZ Bank, argue that
weak monetary growth means there is no risk of inflation from exchange rate
depreciation. Central banks, they say, have been far too obsessed with
maintaining exchange rate targets. The danger is that this can ultimately
play havoc with the domestic economy, as the sad example of Sweden shows.
The National Bank is clearly not so sure that it can ignore the exchange
rate. Bankers say that it is now increasingly pessimistic about the domestic
economic outlook, and would probably like to see interest rates somewhat
lower. But it is more likely to oblige if the franc is strong against the
Deutsche Mark.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-1491</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLQCFAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 DEC 92 / Survey of European Finance and Investment - Switzerland (1):
Outsiders with a purpose / Moves to restore international competitiveness
will not be helped by a slow economy or the people's refusal to join the EEA
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER A decade of relative decline, the Swiss financial centre appears
finally to be on the mend.
In the past year, Swiss government, banks and quoted companies have burst
into action, taking important forward-looking steps to restore and enhance
the international competitiveness of Finanzplatz Schweiz.
Stamp duties have been removed from many transactions, a new companies law
has encouraged companies to become more investor friendly, a plan to develop
a single national electronic stock exchange has been fixed and toughened
regulations to prevent money laundering have come into force.
Whether these and other moves are enough to bring back some of the billions
of francs-worth of securities and money-market activities that have decamped
to London and Luxembourg remains to be seen. But Swiss bankers are at least
confident that they are at last stopping the rot.
'The Swiss financial centre is alive. It still accounts for 9 per cent of
GDP and 135,000 jobs. And it is performing,' says Mr Oskar Holenweger, chief
executive of Bank Vontobel in Zurich.
That does not mean that the way ahead for Swiss banking and finance is
trouble-free. The whole industry was shaken at the beginning of the year
when Moody's downgraded Credit Suisse's rating from triple-A, and did the
same to Swiss Bank Corporation three months later.
The appeal of Swiss banks in international markets relates crucially to
their reputation for sound management and capital strength, but Moody's
decisions focused attention on some lax management as well as some possible
negative effects of liberalisation in Swiss financial markets.
'Realistically, it is a price we had to pay for our lending mistakes', Mr
Georges Blum, prospective chief executive of SBC, admits.
The process of recovery is not being helped either by the dreary state of
the Swiss economy, likely to suffer a third year of recession in 1993 as a
result of the rejection of the European Economic Area (EEA) treaty.
The pressure on many banks from the slump in property prices is unlikely to
ease in the near future. Several have warned that their provisions arising
from soured property loans, especially in western Switzerland, will remain
high this year, and probably next year as well.
The refusal of the Swiss people to join the EEA will also make life tougher
for Swiss bankers. In the past, some bankers, especially those in the very
large private banking fraternity, might have argued that they would be
better off remaining a haven outside European institutions. But no more.
Swiss bankers know that their task of remaining competitive has become
greater, because it will now be more difficult for them to attract highly
qualified people to work in Switzerland.
Of equal concern is the damage caused this year by further scandal. In July,
it emerged that a senior executive of Rothschild Bank, the Zurich affiliate
of NM Rothschild of London, had made more than SFr220m (Pounds 99m) in
unauthorised loans to a single group, breaking federal banking regulations.
Swiss bankers wince at the mention of this affair, but point out that at
least the Rothschild family covered the losses and no clients were hurt.
On the brighter side, the tough economic climate is accelerating the pace of
much needed rationalisation. Consultants Arthur Andersen forecast, in a
study published in November, that another 100 of the remaining 577 banks in
the country could go in the next few years.
Much of the contraction so far has been among small regional banks, which
specialise in mortgage and small business lending. Their number has plunged
from 186 to 160 in the past two years, and is likely to continue to fall
rapidly. The worry among Swiss bankers is that healthy banks will not be
able to absorb the casualties as quickly as they emerge.
There have also been retreats by a few US banks from private banking and,
more recently, by a few of the 40 Japanese banks and securities companies,
because of the slump in Japanese Swiss franc bond issues.
A big question-mark hangs over Swiss Volksbank, now a distant fourth among
the universal banks with assets of SFr48.3bn at the end of September. In
October, it warned that cash flow could be off 10 per cent this year and
loan loss provisions would be higher than last year's SFr394m. In a step
that seemed to be clearing the way for a merger or a takeover, Volksbank
said it would convert itself from a co-operative into a joint stock company
next year.
It has been an eventful year for the Swiss capital markets as well. From
early on, there was considerable excitement in the equity market about the
implementation in July of company-law amendments that would enable companies
to split their shares and simplify share structures.
Many took advantage of it to improve their overall transparency and to
remove discriminative clauses against foreign shareholders. Analysts agree
that these changes contributed substantially to the popularity of Swiss
shares, especially among foreign investors.
During the first 11 months of the year, the Swiss Market Index rose nearly
15 per cent, making it one of the best performers in the world.
On the other hand, the opening of a lavish new stock exchange building in
Zurich in July was cause for only muted celebration. This was because a far
more important move - to create a national electronic exchange - had finally
been agreed a few months earlier.
When it comes into operation at the end of 1994, the electronic exchange
will concentrate the activity of the three remaining Swiss exchanges -
Geneva, Basle and Zurich - in one screen-based market, thereby rendering the
new Zurich trading floor obsolete. The hope is that the greater liquidity in
the market will help Switzerland to compete with London for trading volume
in Swiss shares. Analysts say that more than a fifth of all trading in Swiss
shares is now done in London.
On the bond market, the most momentous trend of the year was the
deterioration of Swiss public finances. According to Bank Julius Bar, the
combined public sector deficit this year will rise to SFr8bn.
The result has been that the hitherto somnolent domestic bond market has
come to life. A benchmark federal issue has been established for the first
time, and a future on it has been one of the hits of the year on the Soffex
futures and options exchange.
In the foreign sector, Switzerland's once flourishing junk-bond market
collapsed, as issuers such as Heron, Mountleigh, Polly Peck and Bond
Corporation came to grief. But there was little mourning for a market that
did not seem to coincide with the Swiss image of quality. The big worry in
the market now is what will happen next year when the peak of the
redemptions of Japanese warrant bonds will occur.
Swiss bankers are, on balance, heartened by the progress they have made in
the past year or so to improve the international attractiveness of their
financial markets. They have no delusions about catching up with London, but
they are confident that they can maintain their position as Europe's second
truly international market. The key, as they see it, is to concentrate on
their strengths, particularly international private banking where they
remain far ahead of any competitor, and fund management in general.
They also know much can still be done to improve the attractiveness of their
capital markets, such as clarifying the law on investment trusts,
introducing a takeover code and making further tax reforms. And the
country's decision to stay outside the European single market increases the
urgency to get on with it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
